Collared Prompt List
And greentexts/concepts that I found interesting

I always loved the idea of dog anthro's being human servant race. They would annex and subjugate other anthro races for us and all we have to do is let them suck are dicks every now and then.

I like the idea of them going to extreme lengths to get their masters to tell them that they're good girls, which makes them cum on the spot.

>a princess of a desperate wolf clan deliberately triggers a human's trap, willing to accept enslavement over starving in the winter
>as the human approaches she raises her tail and offers to him the only thing she has of value
>he accepts, and mates with her
>the rest of her pack will join them later
>they too, will surrender their bodies and offspring to the human as nothing more than property to be used, modified, and disposed of
>a thousand years later they are bred into the perfect companions, eternally slaves but eternally happy

>Struggling wolves partner with humans for mutual survival
>Over time, as human civilization advances and they spread across the world, wolves also join them
>Growing more submissive to their human “masters”
>They eventually become dogs
>A lot were still partners in adventure or farming
>But most became slaves to their masters
>Becoming entertainment for humans, and they loved every bit of it
>They lived to see humans happy, and they’d do anything to make it happen
>To this day, no other species is as close to humans as dogs
>Modern wolves laugh at dogs, while the latter enjoys a lavish lifestyle
>Some are subservient lovers who live for happiness
>Some are lifelong partners and friends who stay with you through thick and thin
>And some (or most) are both

>You'll never be a brave, fearsome wolf battle maiden charging into combat with hundreds of your sisters to determine the future of your children, nay, the very future of your species!
>You'll never be defeated almost instantly by the smarter, stronger, sweeter smelling humans using bullshit technology like 'rock' and 'rock on stick.'
>You'll never be pinned down while they wrap a rope around your muzzle, clip your claws, bind your paws and give you a spank on the butt to guide you forward.
>You'll never be forced to watch as the humans fuck your vulnerable, weak sisters until they break; shattering their will.
>You'll never come to a realization.
>"Holy shit, this is hot as fuck!"
>You'll never realize that this is 'betray my species and serve humans forever' level of hot.
>You'll never realize that humans and wolves were supposed to be together.
>You'll never vow then and there to commit the rest of your life to serving your new masters, capturing other wolf clans into their service.
>You'll never smile with glee as someone steps forward to 'tame' you, unaware that you've already domesticated yourself.

Dogs were Humanity's first lay, they really do hold a special place in our hearts. They're so trustworthy and loyal that they get to manage our harems. Speaking of harems, IIRC sheep were next to be domesticated and our dogs would be very helpful in catching a few fluffy woolen girls from their flock-tribes.

Horses have also earned a special place, with all the hard work they do for us and have done for hundreds if not a few thousand years.

Generations selective bred to service humans whether they're bound and pulling carriages or put on full display for show.

Indeed. Used for everything from physical labor to simple fun and pleasure. Bred by their human masters generation after generation, until they're the perfect companions to serve our every need.

Even boss anthros are unable to resist their human employees' advances.

Remember to not neglect the anthro males, lest they forget who is the true master of this domain. While they may be more useful as dumb labor and breeding more purebred daughters for you to conquer, inviting them into your bedroom as submissives along with their fellow females will help maintain the chain of dominance. While physically stronger, feral instincts will take over and force them to submit after they witness you stealing all the prospective mates. Once they have accepted their place as lesser males have them get used to servicing you just as their females would. From cleaning you off after a seeding session to being seeded themselves, only once you have secured the loyalty and submission of the anthro males have you truly dominated a species.

I guess if you put them in a cage, they can stay around and watch if they like. I don't want them getting any ideas that this is for their pleasure though.

Of course. Their reproductive rights must be tightly controlled while they are being taught that their bodies are no longer their own. They must be willing to accept anything that their master orders of them, from changing diets to impregnation. Until they learn that your pleasure equals their pleasure they will not even be allowed to masturbate. It's best if you start them young, as demonstrated by this deer here. So thoroughly he has been taught that he has no problem stripping down to fur in public, revealing his cage without even a blush of embarrassment.
Ironically his extremely submissive nature makes him an ideal candidate to stud, though whether he will be able to maintain an erection without backdoor support from his human is still to be seen.

That's where selective breeding comes in. Only the most submissive and obedient of anthro males will have the privilege of mating with one female of their kind to secure their species, even if the female shows some kind of disdain in spending some time with a non-human.
It will take a few generations until their rebel nature are bred out, while their docility to humans will be ingrained in their generic disposition. Of course this selective breeding will not only bring changes in their attitude but also improvements in their body. We will see males with wider hips and bigger rears to better serve their human masters, chastity cages will be seen as an accessory rather than a necessity as most anthro males will be unable to have an erection without his master breeding his hole.

You just need to make them understand that they're not the ones fucking their partner, you're fucking their partner THROUGH them. Like a condom. They really are pathetic. They cum more from the gigantic cock turning their prostate to dust than the five seconds their little clitty is inside literal heaven. But maybe it just doesn't feel as good for them, considering how stretched out their partners hole would be compared to their size. And then the instant they let out their single, tea spoon sized, watery load (which they claim is the hardest they've ever cum,) you pull out of them and slap the cage back on.
They can sit back in the corner and prepare to hold the dozens of used condoms you'll create making up to his partner for having to fuck such pitiful creature instead of a noble human.

Another effect after centuries of selective breeding will be the reduction in size of the male anthro genitalia, to the point their "penis" will be replaced by "clitty" in their vocabulary. It will feel unnatural for both of them, their vagina was molded to receive human dicks, they won't even feel when such a nub is inside them. They only do it because that's what master ordered, and after their "mating" is done, both will be back to happily serve their human owner.

Memes and Nigs aside, (literal) buck breaking is hot as fuck. When you've got the alpha stag of your herd bleating like a freshly deflowered doe what choice do the others have but to submit? Their strongest has been humiliated and emasculated for all to witness, a failure that couldn't protect his own from conquerors.
He will still be allowed to breed his females to better break him, and they shall be the last of his line. He will watch his sons spill their royal seed onto the ground while servicing his masters on his knees and being taken anally like common whores. His daughters will raise their short tails to show off their stolen virginities and the human sperm dripping slowly from their gaping holes to their broken father. Even his pregnant wives join in, accepting human cocks into their pussies to flood their occupied wombs with superior seed in an attempt to provide the weak fetus sired by the stag with strong, human DNA.

>Every male is required to do at least eight hours of milking duty per week as their dicks are no longer long enough to properly seed a female
>Eight hours of surrendering their sperm in order to maintain the stock of young purebreds for the master to enjoy
>Four anthro boys are tied up and milked until the sperm jug is full
>By the time they got the jug full their cocklets are throbbing red and oversensitive and are not interested in using their dicks
>But their butts are fine and thus, go out to enjoy the one thing that can bring them some pleasure
>One jar has enough sperm to impregnate dozens of anthros

>"What do you think you're looking at, you smug cunt?"
>"Keep staring, my throat will beat your cock into submission."
>"What do you think of that?"
>"Let's see how smug you are when you're begging me to gag on your dick."
>"Just say the word, fucker. I'll knock you out."
>"...p...please say the word."

>your wolf bitch daughters bully a bungirl to establish dominance
>they'll only quit after she's hopped on your human dick and puts that supercharged bunny womb to work
>maybe after five litters they'll think about not sodomizing her with carrots during lunch break

>When A skaven alchemical doomsday invention accidently dooms them all to become femrats addicted to the cocks of Imperial men.

Which world do you prefer
>Non-humans are only semi-intelligent. They can speak and learn but couldn't build a civilization on their own. Natural human superiority makes them into docile pets. They naturally want to be dominated.
>Non-humans are just as intelligent. Human ingenuity and pheromones that they are much more receptive to keeps them from being anything more than pets. They choose to be pets and that's how they like it

>The anthros are objectively smarter than humanity
>All they want, with their incredible intelligence, is to have people take care of them and act like the dumbest bimbos they can.
Just like dolphins.

>Gallade is last Pokémon his master hasn't touched.
>Sees all his companions turned into lusty slots that talk about nothing but the next time master fucks their brains out
>Is determined to not let that happen to him
>Wait, when did master get so big?
>Wasn't he just a human child?
>Oh, not a child anymore. Definitely not!
>Days later, Gallade wonder why he ever tried to resist.
>Gets why the others count the days before they get to taste master's big cock again
>He does too.

All a guy has to do is tell any anthro girl off the street to strip down and bend over, and they'll do it happily.

I gotta say, kobolds might be tricky to keep. While they are often very submissive, and any human dick is far more than enough to keep them wanting more, they're schemers. And it takes a real keen eye to tell male from female. Also, unless you are very tight on security you're going to be dealing with unmanaged breeding, and with kobold maturity cycles being like they are they'll get their feisty and competitive males back in no time. The foolish man will entice a pack of kobolds thinking they're easy and be overrun and never practice the art again, but the master will entice a pack of kobolds for the challenge.

They can't help it though. To a kobold, making more kobolds for their master is just natural. What kind of master wouldn't want more slaves? Remember, back when they served dragons, they'd keep breeding until they had an army of little servants that would go out and gather treasure. You can't blame the stupid things for their instincts.

Alright, then based on that would you prefer
>Humans and non-humans are totally integrated with humans as the masters and non-humans as the pets. No real conflict aside from the outliers that resist the status quo for some reason or another. They don't last long.
or
>World is split between human and non-human civilization. Non-humans are hostile as any invasion by humans leads to non-humans following the raiders back home on a leash. War is talked about but never happens, because everyone knows that will end with tons of warriors becoming pets.

>Noble from Human Kingdoms visiting Zootopia 'on business'
>Judy is assigned as security detail
>Unknown to them noble has a dominant streak and looking to expand his menagerie
>Brings collection of 'tamed' girls along that shock Judy.
>Sense of justice compels her to confront human about illegal slavery
>Forgets Human Kingdom law that doesn't see animals as people(and thus technically not slaves)
>Human uses trap to convince Judy to play a game
>He wins, she has to be his pet for the night
>She wins, his pets go free.
>Game is rigged, he wins.
>A night of unending sex awaits as human fills her with drugs and cum
>When human demands she returns the next day or no drug, she accepts
>Continues the entire time human is in Zootopia.
>Judy plays the role of bodyguard during the day, while fighting urge for drugs.
>At night, she sucks and fucks for her fix.
>Final day, human reveals the drugs were fake sugar pills. Her addiction was just his cock
>Judy doesn't show up to work next day. Just a letter of resignation as she joins human's menagerie.
>Story ends with her joining mile high club with her new master.

Final question. What kind of setting would you like most?
>Modern world where humans and non-humans live like we do...just with humanoid pets and no one has a problem with it.
>Medieval ish world of swords and slavery. Not uncommon to some people to make a living catching and selling non-humans as pets
>Bronze age. Most people are tribal savages with only the odd kingdom just starting to form. No one even bats an eye at a human slave, much less a non-human one.

>humans are classified as predators
>rabbits (and other small prey species) are terrified of them and tell each other all sorts of tall tales
>how humans are skilled hunters and often come in packs
>how they never give up and hunt you for hours, even days, as they track you down when you try to escape
>maybe even take you alive, making you their slave for a variety of purposes
>hunting practice, housework, labor... even carnal pleasure
>"Can you imagine it, Debbie? Being some horny human's helpless toy! How awful...!" "Y-Yeah, awful..."

>fall into the underground domain, get found by Toriel
>instead of living comfortably as her "son", dominate her completely and make her your slave
>fuck her at anywhere any time, on a whim
>bend her over the dining table in her living room and pound her, mating-press her on the floor in the hallway, sit in her chair while she bounces on your lap, fuck her in bed at night until you fall asleep with your head on her sweaty tits, etc.

>humans are at war with anthros
>anthros keep the humans at bay with their superior numbers due to their higher reproduction rates
>humans start raiding vulnerable anthro communities and kidnap females
>soon enough, humans' numbers explode and the tide quickly turns
Anthros' impressive breeding can be used against them easily.
Just use the typical hentai logic of "women used as breeders by X race create purely X babies".

Pregnant anthros give birth to
>100% Human Babies
The power of human sperm is unmatched, dominating anthro genes
>50%-80% Human
Gives away their mother's species but cute ears makes for fun headpats. May also gain things like wings and tails.
>Human Males, Female Anthros
Porn logic but gives you cute lolis if that's your thing, will also guarantee that there will be an endless supply of human men to conquer and anthro girls to get conquered
>100% Human Males
Orc-tier genes, porn logic again but a human-seeded anthro will birth yet another human to conquer the world
>100% Anthro babies
Your seed, being compatible with all eggs, will produce children that are fully anthro. It means that the anthro population will explode but human men still need human women.
>Random, no hybrids
She will birth children of either species and either gender, but nothing in between.
>Random, completely
Who the fuck knows will come out of that pussy.

>On no! It appears that one of your bitchbois has not actually been broken!
>Apparently he took advantage of your extended leave and broke into the girl's dorms
>Unfortunately he was able to expose his erect cock to their virgin eyes before he could be stopped and they've had nightmares since
>He's secured in the dungeons and there's a band around his sack in an attempt to stop the release of his banned sperm
>What say you, master? What is your punishment for him?

I'd like to put foward a hypothesis: Animal Crossing: New Horizon is the perfect /collared/ game! It allows you to build a harem on an insolated island where the only way to leave is by plane. The locals can be made to dress up however you please, and thanks to the hard work of fan-designers these dresses can be strings of fabrics no self-respecting anthro would wear in public. But since it's from their mayor, these ladies wear it eagerly. You, as the mayor, can just walk into any home and mating-press them any time you damn well please. Heck, some slutty female mayors force their denizens to serve as cumdumpsters on their islands.

Imagine being the father in a family of dogs, with a thicc wife and little daughter, when a human comes into your life.
>your girls immediately start fawning over him, despite yourself you feel butterflies in your stomach whenever he smiles at you so you can't bring yourself to kick him out
>while you're at work, he's home with your wife and kid, you're sure he's fucking your wife while you're away
>strangely you can't really muster anger towards either of them for it
>when you come home the human makes sure to give you lots of affection, belly rubs, headpats, good boys, the whole works
>you used to consider yourself the alpha of your own little pack but in his arms you're nothing more than a whimpering, mewling little puppy
>after 3 days it happens
>you're in your usual spot after work, laying on his lap while he pets and scritchs you in all the best places
>but this time he does something he's never done before
>he leans down and kisses your muzzle
>you feel as if your heart will leap out of your chest
>you have to feel that again
>you lean up and kiss him back
>he doesn't object so you go all in
>you never considered yourself gay but tongue wrestling with this human has you harder than you've ever been
>you feel he's gotten hard too
>he pulls you off and bends you over the coffee table
>he pulls down your pants and using only spit as lube he pushes into your ass
>you're an anal virgin so it hurts like hell, but you already feel your knot inflating
>he doesn't let you adjust and pounds you like a slut
>in 5 minutes he has you squealing through an orgasm, doggy jizz staining the coffee table
>your wife and daughter clap and congratulate you
>you completely forgot they were there
>they both have leather collars around their necks
>soon one is slipped on you too
>the human declares you to be his pets from now on
>the declaration only makes you buck back harder

>Tell my maid that she's gonna get demoted to an amputated fuckdoll if she accidentally stumbles and smashes a vase for the third time.
>She immediately runs off, and then returns saying that she smashed another vase.

>tfw no doe wife to go hunting with, gunning down bucks and then carving them up for meat

>acquire doe wife after bagging her entire herd
>infiltrates other deer herds and betrays their location to you
>lures young, horny bucks into your killing zone
>seduces alpha stag until he also follows her to his doom
>leads panicked females into your traps
>get bred or get dead, she tells them

>Doe wife becomes skilled in cooking with cervid meat and making clothes with their hides
>Doe wife wears a coat, which she made, made from the pelts of the other does, who chose the latter on her 'join or die' offer.

>A look of shock rises on Toriel's face
>She had been told to never wear clothing again
>But she thought she could at least get away with some panties while her master-son was away
>She wasn't expecting him home so soon
>She had been a very bad girl.

>gather a harem of MILFs
>each one has birthed at least two children, some more
>society's decided that they're too old to breed and their husbands won't touch them anymore
>nuts to that, dick them all and have their bellies and tits plump and full by the end of the year
>each MILF has more children with you than they've had with their husbands

>For as long as you can remember the only mom you had was her
>Your biological mother passed away giving birth to you, leaving your dad a widower and heartbroken.
>He always reminds you though that you were his saving grace.
>He never blamed you for her death or mistreated you.
>And eventually he found love again.
>By the time you were 5 years old he had remarried, but not to a human.
>Instead he found a statuesque bear anthro.
>You don’t know the details of how they met and honestly it’s not something you want to ask directly despite your curiosity but you know they loved each other.
>It didn’t take long for her to make you love her either, the way she doted and cared for you.
>She became your mom, through and through.
>As the years went by and you got older however your thoughts became... impure.
>It all started when one of your friends brought pornography on his smartphone to show off during recess.
>It depicted human and anthro action, with the anthro acting like a pet dog.
>Complete with collar and leash, even going as far to make them bark.
>Of course everyone found it wierd and funny, but you found it... hot.
>You were already on the cusp of puberty, the school’s mandatory sex ed course already done.
>And now you got to see it, but it isn’t just simply penis going into vagina, but something more.
>After watching as much of the video as you can before your friend switched to human/human porn you suddenly had a desire to see more.
>You didn’t know the term at the time but now you know what it was.
>You found your fetish.
>Since that fateful day you could not look at the anthro girls the same way without your mind bringing up the video.
>This worst of all included your beloved mama bear.
>In the video the anthro was smaller then the man, but she is so much bigger then anyone else you met. Even your dad is a head short compared to her staggering height.
>You had to shake those thoughts from your head, no matter how hard it was.
>Eventually you managed to handle your lust.
>The internet was a huge help in that regard, as you were able to find plenty of videos and images to sate your desires.
>Of course things were still a bit awkward, especially when you stayed up one night.
>You had gone out to get a drink from the kitchen but noise from your parents room caught your attention.
>At this point you seen enough porn to know what it is.
>Curiosity drove you forward and you opened the door a crack, and you saw it all.
>Your big strong mama bear, moaning and begging like the whores in your video.
>You do your best to ignore your dad and just focus on her.
>Both of them are facing away so you are free to voyeur, watching her massive breasts swing and large ass jiggle.
>You knew this was wrong, that you shouldn’t be watching.
>But you couldn’t bring yourself to look away.
>you watch as your dad brings a hand down on that expansive asscheek, causing it to oscillate as she lets out a whorish moan.
>You can’t help but feel jealous, wishing it was you who reduced her to that state.
>After that thought hits you decide to leave, closing the door behind you gently
>Once again the years pass by and you do your best to move on.
>You try dating anthro girls but every time you subconsciously compare them to your stepmother.
>Once you graduated and moved out to pursue college you thought that would be the end of it
>But then terrible news strikes.
>Your father passed away, a drunk driver had rammed into his car as he was coming home.
>They tried to save him but he passed away at the hospital
>Your stepmother was the one to tell you the horrible news.
>Needless to say you were shocked.
>The man who raised you, who cared for you. The one who always made sure you had everything you could need alongside your stepmother was gone, just like that.
>You can only imagine what your mother is going through, but it’s bad if the empty tone she spoke to you with is any indication.
>So you do the only thing you can think of.
>You head out to the hospital she listed, where they are keeping him.
>’What’s left of him’, you mind morbidly interjects.
>You fight back your own tears, after all your dad always put emphasis on being strong for others.
>And she’s going to need to you to be strong for her, so you go as quick as you can.
>Once you reach the hospital you ask about your father and they direct you to the floor and room.
>Up the elavator you go and when you reach the outside of the room you see her.
>There’s clear tearstains on her furred face and the way she looks is heartbreaking.
>She’s completely lost.
>As you approach her she only opens her arm, a clear indication of what she wants.
>Wordlessly you hug her and she embraces you in one of her patented bear hugs.
>The dam breaks loose as she sobs into your shoulder, her tears soaking into your shirt.
>Her hug is constricting, her usual control lost in her emotional state.
>At this point even you can’t hold back as a couple tears fall from your eyes as you come to terms that this is really happening.
>You aren’t sure how long the two of you stand there but eventually the tears dry out.
>After that the two of you head back to your old home, the home your father brought.
>The rest of the day is spent as you comfort your mother as she reminisces of all the memories she made with him.
>She even brings up the first day she met you and how adorable you were to her which only makes you blush in embarassment.
>You decide to go along and bring up your best memories of him.
>How he taught you how to drive, the games he would play with you, and much more.
>It doesn’t take long until the two of you fall asleep on the couch way past midnight.
>After that the rest of the week is long. Funeral plans had to be made, letters and messages had to be sent to the rest of the family.
>You end up missing a few classes but it’s nothing you can’t make up for.
>She matters much more to you then any of that anyways.
>She tries to keep up a strong front but it’s clear what your dad’s death has done to her.
>So you find yourself sleeping over more often then not, if only so you can help her feel more at ease.
>You would cook breakfast for her just like she did for you when you were young.
>Then there was the issue of finances.
>You father was one to buy life insurance so at the very least mama bear has some breathing room but it won’t last forever, especially since a good chunk of it will go to funeral services.
>So you remind her that your almost done with college, and that you can take care of her once you graduate.
>She only smiles, finding it endearing but you really meant it.
>Once the funeral comes around everyone in your immediate family, both your father’s and stepmother’s side shows up.
>It’s a bittersweet affair as everyone shares their thoughts of the man one last time before he is put to rest.
>Once the casket is lowered you and your stepmother are the first to place dirt over it, the final sendoff as the rest of the family follows as your mother cries once more holding you close.
>After that the family gets together for dinner at a restaurant/bar.
>You all share a toast to your dad before taking a sip of the alcoholic beverage.
>The bears are much more capable of drinking but it’s ultimately a good time for all, something you are sure you dad would had wanted.
>You drink little since you need to take your mother home who ended up drinking herself under the table.
“Come on mom, it’s time to go home,” you remind her as you help her out the passenger seat.
>”Okay shun...,” she slurs as she leans heavily on you.
>Eventually you manage to get the front door unlocked and opened before pulling the two of you inside.
>Closing the door you make your way to the bedroom so your mother can rest
>however as you bring her to bed she drags you into it with her.
>”Your look sho much like your father...”
>This is bad and good.
“Of course I do, I’m his son,” you answer weakly as you try to break from her iron grasp.
>She doesn’t let go however and only snuggles you closer before she falls fast asleep, snoring cutely.
>As theres no way out you resign yourself to falling asleep in her grasp, your face trapped in her bosom.
>You can’t say you hate it as you fall asleep in comfortable bliss.
>When you wake up you are lucky as her grasp on you was gone as she laid asleep on bed.
>You quietly make your way out of bed, not wanting to make things awkward with her.
>At the end of the day you still have your feelings for her and it would be bad if she found them out.
>So instead you’ll be there for her, since your dad cannot.
>That’s what you do, making sure to be there for the main lady of your life to help her through this.
>You end up moving back in, since there’s no point going back and forth constantly between your apartment and her home.
>You’ll still have to make the commute to college but it’s not that far from home.
>As the days pass by you find yourself getting closer to your mother.
>Ever since your lust for her emerged you always kept a certain distance.
>She always chalked it up to you being a teenage boy but the reality is nothing she would had expected.
>Now with your dad passed away you find your feelings once again showing themselves as you end up getting more intimate with her.
>Nothing too crazy, just little things like leaning against each other while watching a movie on the couch, or linking arms when going out to run errands together.
>She misses your dad a lot so you just think that she just misses that intimacy.
>Plus it’s not like you don’t enjoy it.
>As you get closer she even asks if you can sleep with her, as she admits that she doesn’t enjoy sleeping alone in the massive bed.
>Not the way you wish she would sleep with you but still it’s nice.
>After that you find yourself more emboldened.
>Instead of hugs goodbye you give her a kiss on the cheek.
>When you spend time on the couch with her you hold her big fluffy hand.
>She notices the changes if the way she glances at you is any clue but she doesn’t protest and instead gladly reciprocates as she kisses you goodbye as well and laces her fingers with yours.
>More days pass and after a month it finally reaches the point where you can’t hold back.
>The two of you are once again watching a movie, a romcom involving a human and a anthro pretending to be dating to rebel against their family wishes or some crap like that.
>The movie isn’t the important part, but one scene in particular.
>The two of you are side by side, you with your arm around her waist.
>Definitely not normal for a stepmother and her stepchild but neither of you mind.
>the two fo you watch the movie, but while she enjoys it you are only waiting for the scene.
>The sex scene. Most of the movies you watched with her are for the most part without sex scenes and the ones that do she usually excuses herself.
>But just as she tries to lift off the couch you hold her tight.
“Stay.”
>She could easily break free from your grasp.
>”It’s not appropriate dear,” she weakly protests.
“Just watch it.”
>She looks like she wants to say something but she keeps quiet and sits back down to watch.
>Part of the reason you picked this shows up as the guy puts a collar on the dog girl before telling her to bark for him.
>You gotta admit its funny how they basically allow softcore porn in movie theatres now but it works to your advantage as she watches intently, a blush on her face.
>As the scene moves forward you decide to make your move as you move one of your hands to her meaty thigh and rub it, her sweatpants the only thing between you and her fur.
>Her attention on the sex scene is broken momentarily as she looks down at your wandering hand with a blush.
>”W-what do you think you are doing?!” she whisper-yells as if anyone else can hear her.
“What I wanted to do for a long time,” you tell her before squeezing her thigh.
>”I-if you stop this now we can just forget this ever happened...”
>in response you slide your hand under her shirt and up to her bra covered breast, groping it and getting a moan from her
“Unless you’re going to stop me I’ll keep doing as I please.”
>This is it, will she stop you? it wouldn’t be hard for a anthro as big as her.
>But as you keep molesting her body she doesn’t so you take it as a queue that she’s yours now.
>And you are going to enjoy her.
>The movie long forgotten you get up and stand over her seated form.
“Take off your shirt.”
>She obeys with a reddened face as she lifts the shirt over her body, revealing her soft snow white fur and just as white bra.
>reaching down you pull the bra down exposing her huge furry breasts as they spill from it.
“You can’t believe how much I dreamt of these,” you admit to her as you start groping them, the furry boobs heavy in your hands.
>”H-how long?”
>You move your left hand to her nipple, pinching it gently getting a yelp from her.
“Too long. But now I don’t have to.”
>Kneeling down to come face to face with those glorious globes you bring your mouth to the other nipple and start sucking on it.
>No milk comes out but you can change that later as she wraps her arms around your head as she moans in pleasure.
>with your idle hand you reach down and under the waistband of her sweatpants and to her groin.
>The heat radiates from between her legs as you reach down and press against her panty covered pussy, getting a jolt from her.
>Her undergarments is completely soaked, revealing her true feelings for you.
>You pull away from her breast and she relinquishes you from her grasp.
>Getting back on your feet you issue another command.
“Lay down on your back and lift your legs.”
>She quickly does as she is told, her need apparent on her face.
>Grabbing her pants and panties by the waistband you start taking them off her as she shimmies her huge ass in order to make it easier.
>Slowly you reveal her perfect body, the body you hadn’t seen since that night and had only dreams to remember it by.
>But now you don’t have to rely on your dreams.
>Eagerly you take your clothes off, baring yourself to the bear of your desires.
>”Oh my...”
>You cock is rock hard, it is just as eager as you are.
“I’m not going to hold anything back,” you warn her as you take your position over her, grabbing and pushing her legs apart so you can kneel between them, exposing her sopping cunt.
>You move your left hand down and aim it at her hungry hole before pressing forward, teasing her sensitive folds and getting her to release a needy whine.
“Beg for it.”
>”P-please!”
“Please who?” you ask as you thrust against her again.
>”Please son!”
>hearing her desperate cry for you was enough to push you forward as you enter her fully in a single thrust, getting a whorish moan from her.
>You keep going as you press against her, forcing her to bear your weight.
>You look directly into her eyes as her face twists in pleasure, her moans escaping between her hands as she tries to muffle them.
>Reaching up you grab her wrists, pulling them away from her face.
>You savor the look she gives you, a mix of shame, embarrassment, and desire as you continue pounding her fat ass, her large boobs bouncing obscenely.
>You let go of her wrists and instead move your hands to the bulbous beauties bouncing around, groping them roughly.
>The fluffy titflesh easily spills between your fingers as you squeeze, increasing her pleasure as she vocalizes it.
>You feel yourself coming close, the sight of her too much for you to handle.
>You pick up the pace and reach a hand down to her clit, rubbing the sensitive ball of nerves gently.
>She lets out what could only be described as a roar of pleasure, her arms coming up to grip you in a familiar crushing vice.
>Her cunt tightens around you as you drive yourself to the hilt one last time before you release your seed in her carelessly.
>you only look at her pleasure-struck face, her eyes rolled up as your head is forced between her twin peaks.
>the pleasure of filling her with your cum and the sight of her face is all you could had hoped for as you give her a few weak thrusts to deposit the last dribbles of cum into her.
>Using what little energy you have left you pull away from her grasp and get to your feet.
>Moving towards her head you move your cock in front of her face, her eyes looking at it as a droplet of cum lands on her.
“Clean it.”
>She opens her move and leans in, her tongue lazily licking away the combined juices of your coupling until it is clean.
>once she is done you rest your cock on her snout, your balls covering her eyes.
“Who do you belong to now.”
“You, only you my beloved child,” she amorously answer.
>After that day every day that followed was nothing but new experiences as you claimed her in as many ways as you can
>You had many years to come up with fantasies, fantasies that she gladly indulged you in.
>from fucking her while she is washing dishes to having her service your dick as you watched television.
>Of course it wasn’t just sex you were after.
>You still spent just as much time with her, even more now that she belonged to you.
>She was no longer just your stepmother, now she was your lover, your housewife, and if things go the way you planned then also your broodmother.
“Mom I’m home!”
>”Welcome home son,” she greets you at the door wearing nothing but a apron and collar with your name on it.
>god you love her.

>travel to Morrowind, meet with Dunmers who own argonian slaves
>buy a few argonians
>the argonians are timid and uneasy but very obedient
>fuck them all every day
>the argonians are shocked, after living under the Dunmers' disdain and constant punishments
>but they're happy to please, eager to satisfy your lust and earn a few orgasms of their own
>it's much better than being a ruthless Dunmer's property, after all
>word soon spreads in Morrowind that humans are horny but also kind masters
>Dunmer start to show up more often to trade, to get rid of argonians they don't want anymore
>argonians start to find loopholes to offer themselves to you, or straight up run away from their Dunmer masters to join you
>every night you have massive orgies with dozens of argonian slave women who are all happily obedient and eager to please

That line about the Bambi movie has me picturing a scenario where sometimes the same action/sci-fi/fantasy movies will get licensed out in to both anthro majority and human majority regions, but get hit hard by localization.
For the /Collared/ setting version of the John Wick movie, Keanu is one of the only human cast members. All of the mob and most assassins are one furred species or another. Anthro-targeted marketing present the film the same way you would expect a horror movie monster, while in human populated areas it's still just a regular action movie.
Human regional trailers get viewed just as much online from anthro countries as they do in ones with men as the majority. Getting hold of the "humie cuts" of films becomes far more popular among tech literate youth than any old furs would have expected.

I like the idea of of dogs specifically being totally unable to help themselves submitting to humans. Like some big tough alpha bitch who snaps at any other anthro who even looks at her the wrong way who just rolls over (both metaphorically and literally) the moment a human guy comes into the room. He calls her a good girl and suddenly she'll do anything to get his approval like that again.
Dogs have been bred for this for thousands of years so it would be so deeply drilled into their minds they could never overcome it.

COLLARED.COM forums regularly host arguements between anthro girls of different species as to whom is the most domesticated. Dogs point out that they're "man's best friend", mares usually resort to "muh pussy", cows talk about humans turned them into walking milk machines. Everybody typing one-handed.

>arguements between anthro girls of different species as to whom is the most domesticated
That's both hilarious and hot.
>dog brags incessantly about being the best companion and "best friend"
>horse talks about helping her master with ploughing fields, and then getting ploughed by him
>cow talks about being milked and giving her human lots of it straight from the source, at any time, no tools required
>other species pitch in, talking about being hunted or used for other purposes
>arguments get more and more lewd and explicit until it's just a bunch of horny anthros schlicking to everybody's vivid descriptions instead of actually debating
I like how these girls argue.

>It turns out some of the most vocal members for that forum thread on COLLARED.COM are all internet friends, with a small number actually all sharing the same floor of a college dorm or apartment complex.
>One of them is a streamer. As a holiday special, she decides to invite them all on to a shared discord call so they can settle the argument once and for all in front of her chat audience.
>The moderator of the event is a big cat living in a big city with a mixed poulation.
>About an hour in to the discussion, she gets a 'hot mic' situation. Lots of movement, whimpers, and heavy breathing can be heard on the other side.
>The domestic furrs ask if everything is okay. The answer they get back is mostly mumbled, but the words 'humie room mate' were clear as day.
> Naturally, The question that was the whole point of the stream is left unanswered that day.
>Audio of modern day "circus-training" of a tigress heard live by hundreds of fans.
>Record setting view count and donations to the streamer.
>Should get perma-banned from the streaming site, but only gets a 30 day suspension and a single strike against her account (It's near the end of the year and that strike will expire then anyway, so it's clearly just a slap on the wrist)
>The girls decide to re-release the VoD as the pilot episode of a new web series they start, dedicated to the ties between humans and anthros. With the different guests they have, it's both informational (History, Biology, sociology, personal health/Sex Ed, relationship advice, entertainment news, etc) but also frequently devolves in to straight up porn as one or more of the girls gets worked up by the subject matter and start playing with themselves/each other ( or a human guest decides to claim a girl or three for the rest of the night.)

>A captured buck follows his human master as they walk through his former forest home
>He can hear the whispered gasps of his former herd as they see their collared friend
>eyes blindfolded, mouth gagged, and cock caged, he shows off his absolute loyalty to the outsider
>some of the males blush as they ogle his shapely and plump feminine rear
>his family tries to look away as their only son unknowingly shows off his surrendered masculinity swinging pathetically between his thick thighs
>Once they've reached the middle of the forest village the human ties his pet to a tree
>They are given a good demonstration as to why they should join him in his worship to his master

There are so many angles to take this.
1) Human action
a) Exploitive
b) Mutually beneficial
2) Anthro response
a) Unwilling
b) Consensual
3) Setting
a) Dark
b) Wish Fulfillment (They just all happen to be into it or mind broken to enjoy it)
4) Snuff?
a) Yes
b) No
>AAAA
>Fuck meat butcher shop
>AAAB
>Furry slave trade
>AABA
>White kitten setting
>AABB
>Brainwashing slave market
>ABAA
>Sacrifices/Offering
>ABAB
>Conquest
>ABBA
>Restaurant at the End of the Universe
>ABBB
>Slave Contract

>Brainwashing slave market
bro all i want to do is work in an anthro brain breaking facility, watch them convulse as electric shock and hypnotic noises and lights. Imagine watching how hard they cum when there personality and ego get killed and they become objects, imagine having an anthro co-worker who secretly wants to be brain broken and cum to her own ego death.

>"Hey Anon, wouldn't it be funny if it was just you and me working late one night and you pinned me down with your strong human arms, strapped me into the one of the machines, set it to the experimental higher than maximum settings, turned it on and then locked up for the night? Think about how hard all the other objec...I mean, slaves, I mean, people would cum as I got my comeuppance for brain breaking them, haha. Haha! Nobody would even hear me screaming until the morning crew came in, El Oh El."
"Haha, yeah, you said that yesterday, bro."
"Haha. Yeah, did I? Haha."

>"Hey, Anon, you ever think about what it would actually feel like to get wiped by one of these machines?"
"Nah, I try not to think."
>"Oh, right, haha. It was just a silly question."
"..."
>"...but like, it would have to hurt, right? The fresh girls always scream the loudest when we turn them on and the electricity can't exactly be pleasant."
"That's why they don't let us touch them while the machines are on, yes."
>"But at least 80% of them also cum SUPER hard once the programming starts. Like, that last girl had an orgasm that lasted twenty minutes. So it has to feel good in some way, right? And not just good, but like, 'good,' you know?"
"Don't we trigger the pleasure parts of their brains directly or something? I dunno, I remember hearing that somewhere, something about hypnotic triggers?"
>"But isn't that super hot? Don't you kinda want to see what the big deal is? I...I mean, hypothetically, of course, haha. This is all just a joke, it's not serious. Who'd want to sign up for something like this, haha!"
"Yeah, I guess it is kind of funny."
>"HAHAHA, yeah! Just a funny joke!"

>"Boy, what a long day, am I right, bro? We gotta find a new topic to talk about or something before we get bored out of our skins."
"Actually, I did kind of want to talk about your weird..."
>"Oh, I have one! What kind of animal is your favourite to break?"
"What?"
>"You know, dogs? Cats? ...Crocodiles? You can say crocs if you like, I won't get mad. I mean, it's just easier to break a stupid croc. It's because we have these smaller reptile brains, you know? Just lock us in and 'zoop,' away goes our free will. Most of us can't even last five minutes, even bunnies fight back more. Very easy, a great choice."
"Crocs are cool, I guess."
>"I wonder how long I could last, haha! As a joke though. Not long, I bet. Even a 'smart' crocodile like me is no match for you humans. I'd fight back, sure, on principle, but I've seen enough lizards fry to know that it'd be hopeless. My fun personality, gone. The fastest erasure on record, I'd bet! One of our best workers, reduced to your little breakroom toy."
"I like bunnies the most."
>"Haha, wait...oh. Oh."
"Yeah, they're so little, but so determined. They're always a treat."
>"Oh, I...guess they are pretty cool. Maybe. But like, crocodiles though? You don't wanna just...pin down a croc and force me into...HER! Force HER into a machine? It's always fun. Think about it."
"Nah, they go into death rolls too often."
>"I wouldn't do that."
>"I...I mean..."
"So what's your favourite?"
>"Bunnies! Bunnies, as well, yeah. Not...certainly not anything scaly, that's for sure. Hits too close to home down there, you know? Why did I say that? We should get back to work."

>”I-I’m a proud citizen of the Empire! Stop calling my people tamed!”
>Obsessed with humans
>Treats whatever humans say as gospel
>Obeys whatever they say
>Wears a fucking collar
>claims its just ‘fashion’
dumb anthro sluts

>t. jealous rabid varg-nik who cries herself to sleep everynight knowing she will not get headpats or a collar and who intentionally goes on risky raiding ops in the hopes an imperial patrol vessel will capture and forcibly tame her, but is too ashamed to say it.
Dont worry, tsunderes are common among your type.

I'm curious, what's your take on markings or other symbols of an anthro being human-owned. Obviously if you see an anthro you already know she's built for human men, but like collars are there other means of anthro girls showing their loyalty?

Cattle and mares getting brands.
Sheep being abnormally concerned with making sure their wool is high quality and grows long despite it being uncomfortable.
Goats doing the same with their cashmere and staying milky outside of nursing.

Honestly this reminds me of the idea i had early about anthro dogs being the henchmen race of humans have down most of the heavy lifting for humans for centuries with only a headpat for reward. Most other races think of them as nothing more the human proxies.

I like this idea
Humanity gets pretty good at genetic engineering, and besides freshening up their genome a bit, longer life, stronger, better reaction time and iq, that stuff, they also semi uplifted dogs to be the perfect "mans best freind" in SPACE. And of course enjoys it from a basic psychological level.
You usually dont see humanity having henchmen races like other species in si-fi, but I could definitely see it. Like a normal Human tends to have like 2 dogpeople associates, higher ups have more. but they are intigrated totally into society.

Sounds like humans are the Culture of this setting
>Machine intelligences range from human-equivalent drones to hyper-intelligent Minds. Artificial intelligences with capabilities measured as a fraction of human intelligence also perform a variety of tasks, e.g. controlling spacesuits. Without scarcity, the Culture has no need for money, instead minds voluntarily indulge humanoid and drone citizens' pleasures, leading to a largely hedonistic society. Many of the series' protagonists are humanoids who choose to work for the Culture's elite diplomatic or espionage organisations, and interact with other civilisations whose citizens hold wildly different ideologies, morals, and technologies.
>The Culture has a grasp of technology that is advanced relative to most other civilisations that share the galaxy. Most of the Culture's citizens do not live on planets but in artificial habitats such as orbitals and ships, the largest of which are home to billions of individuals. The Culture's citizens have been genetically enhanced to live for centuries and have modified mental control over their physiology, including the ability to introduce a variety of psychoactive drugs into their systems, change biological sex, or switch off pain at will.

little further into the post-human element than what I was going for, but sure.
I was more thinking
>Humans are the master of genetic manipulation in this setting
>uplift various animals
>Even other spacefaring races get a little jelous of humantiies mastery and willingly ask for "enhancements"
>and of course they give, but in turn they become a (happy) clientele race that is semi genetically bound to humanity.

I find that conflict can still exist, just more focus on the external conflicts, or very creative internal ones. Like say maybe a civilization is in the middle of talks regarding a contract to receive genetic enhancements, but radicals see through the deception and want to destroy humanity's embassy before they can go through with it. As a diplomat, they cannot resort to the typical method of warfare since it isn't everyone in the civilization that's fighting. It would be up to them to neutralize the threat. Like along the lines of
>Alien matriarchy is iffy about getting treatments
>One is actively aggreessive.
>Her and her forces need to be surgically removed
>With sleuthing and subterfuge, human diplomant finds out which matriarch it is.
>When confronted, she tries to kill the human but fails and is captured
>According to laws of the aliens, she is the human's prisoner to punish.
>Human punishes her by adding her to his harem and performing the enhancements
>Aggressive, confrontational matriarch returns as a happy, submissive wife that wants to convince her sisters to join.

Of the entire list, only one I found interesting was the hayokonton. An advanced species that resisted humanity so aggressively, only to become idealized wives after assimilation? That i find interesting. And kinda hot. Imagine a story involving that. Doesn't even have to be totallly linear, just a collection of anecdotes across the race's history
>Opening is a scouting report detailing first contact with a human vessel. Remarks how bizarre the ship is as it looks like it was designed by multiple races
>Middle is a recording of a high ranking general declaring to her soldiers that the war has only just begun, and that the 'hoo-manity' will regret ever meeting them
>Finale is the journal of a harem wife detailing everything she learned about her race and feel second hand embarrassment that they fought so hard. Then she describes how her human husband fucked her pregnant and how it was the best thing she ever experienced.

I like to think of a conflict going like
>Starship captain attempts to destroy human fleet, gets boarded and captured by a mix of machines, soldiers, and warrior-wives.
>She tells her human captor her race will never surrender to humans and they'll fight to the end.
>Human simply puts her in the chambers and starts fiddling with her genetics, leaves her to command the ship.
>Captain pops out of editing chamber, wordlessly goes to cockpit, climbs into the human's command cushion and starts sucking him off.
>Refuses to let any other sister-wife near him, and keeps sucking him off until the battle is concluded as a means of establishing herself as head girl despite being new.
>She's so good, human doesn't intervene.
>Rest of her career is spent in command chair, not so much giving orders, but fellating her husband when he isn't balls deep in another wife.
>Might still offer guidance on the off chance he needs military advice.
>Which is instrumental in ending the war much sooner with fewer casualties than humans had anticipated

Imagine going to a joining a human supremacist group and all the members are anthro cum brains who thinks this well get them a human boyfriend/master

Okay just imagine the scenario for a lil bit in all honesty:
>Sign up for a human supremacist group, hoping to meet other Anons to bitch about their pets not doing their jobs, or some haughty gal at work
>Most of the members seem pretty cool, sharing the same sentiment, they seem REALLY into talking about you though.
>In fact most of the group chat seems to be asking you about your experiences.
>Either they must be because you're new, or they don't get a lot of members in the first place.
>They ask to meet up
>"Oh yeah we have a planned movie night coming up, we're watching -"
>Half the group chat starts to argue about what is the best /Collared/ movie
>Go to the movie theater
>The entire row is filled with chubby, nerdy looking anthros and sub-humans, half of them having any good social skills
>Entire time they're half watching the movie and half watching you

>get invited to the school's human supremacy group
>not a single human in sight
>fat and stinky NEET anthros and coomers who read too much hentai
>but otherwise they're pretty cool, if a bit scared of your presence
>a month passes
>you then hear rumors about an "orgy"
>you're kinda scared but you've got nothing going on
>sure you might see some stinky NEET pussy but it's not like you're limited in what pussy to fuck
>there should be at least one clean hole there, right?
>some of the girls and a few of the boys cum in their pants before your response has a chance to leave your mouth completely
>day of the orgy comes
>they have it at the fucking school for some reason
>it's even worse than you expected
>human dildos, human body pillows, human suits, and in one case, human skin
>most of them have collars, cages, and quite a few tattoos
>oh god the smell
>tell them all to strip down and follow to the gym showers
>they think you just don't want to make a mess
>lock them in, one starts schlicking at how you're going to gas them like you did the six million rats
>they start squealing and hissing as you hose them all down Civil Rights Movement-style, though that one anthro masturbates even harder
>spray her until she stops
>you help them scrub, washing away years of filth from their fur
>afterwards you'll teach them how to be functional members of society that just so happens to enjoy nerd stuff
>but right now you ignore their begging for you to stop
>they may be your friends but this is a necessary treatment

Does definitely get off to snuff much more frequently, and much harder, than other anthros like cows or pigs, since they've gone so long as humanity's prey without being domesticated. Their only utility to humans was as food, and not companionship until recently.
>you've got her tied to a tree in a secluded grove
>you're wearing camouflage as you enter
>she can barely see you
>undress and it's like you've appeared out of nowhere
>she starts thrashing against her restraints eagerly

>14 race horses competing per track
>1st get a rewarding dicking by their owner
>2nd get painfully bounded, but still gets dicked
>3rd gets nothing
>4th simple punishment
>The lower the horse's ranked, the worse the punishment gets
>at 8th, torture
>at 10th, usually ends in a painful death
>The worst possible fate of a racing horse is getting last place, known to be described as being extremely slow and excruciatingly painful

I want to easily defeat jobress in a fight and then mating press her!

very very true.
tigeress would make an excellent jobber breeding slave. She wasnt able to become the chosen one, even got replaced by some diabetic endangered bear, so might as well be #1 at something in her life!

Just imagine watching her as the years go by and her toned, muscular body, the one that she'd spent her entire life training and dedicated more hurt into improving than anything else, gradually becomes soft and squishy; preparing her for her new role in life. Her breasts get bigger and swell with milk to constantly throw her off balance, her hips thicken to help her deliver daughter after daughter, the fire in her eyes burns out into a dull stare, until she barely resembles the famous warrior she used to be and is indistinguishable from any other slave.
And then you can make fun of her for 'letting' herself go so hard while you pump another baby into her. She should have known better than to try and fight a human.

A good anthro wife understands that it's not cheating if it's with another anthro.

And if it's with a human woman, she has no place interfering with her betters.
And if you've got a human wife and you're fucking an anthro? It's completely crazy bitch shit to stop you from what's basically masturbating.
With a second woman? That shit's hard to pull off, she should be proud she snagged such a charismatic man.

> Be human RA at a mixed species dorm
> See the lights on from a unit that's supposed to be unoccupied.
> Door is open
> Capybara girl on the bed, on her phone, in her underwear
> "Sup?"
> Ask what she's doing here
> "Blacked out at a party last night. Woke up here. The bed was comfy so I figured I would stay for a minute while I texted my friends"
> What do?

>Cum in a honeypot ant
>All worker ants have to consume the honey+cum
>Some love the combination
>Some hate it, but need the nutrients

>The Queen married a human
>She took his name, his DNA, and most humiliatingly, his scent
>Once the handover of power was complete the ants had to adopt their bodies to produce the new colony scent
>The new brood that was born from his seed already released their father's pheromones, it was the Queen's previous children that needed to accept their new King
>The most economical way was to simply consume some of the honey that he had injected his jizz into, sucking out the salty, sweet mixture from their honeypot sister's anuses
>Even just a single hint of his essence was enough
>Some were less agreeable, especially one of the Princesses that was planning a coup
>She was publicly humiliated in the central chamber, tied like prey and forced to endure her step-father's penis being rubbed all over her face
>Despite her resistance there was nothing her body could do in response to the pure, concentrated load of human DNA that was blasted down her throat
>The princess could feel her body changing, forced to abandon her original scent as her body acknowledged and accepted that he was the superior being regardless of her conscious wishes
>She would be allowed to leave to build her own future, but only after her belly swelled with her daddy's eggs

Even the artificial insemination is done by humans.
> Human Lady of the house owns a strapon
> Dildo of the strap has a cumtumbe
> Fucking the family She-wolf
> With the press of a button, anthro seed impregnates the slut-puppy
> (It's common practice in some regions that the Husband or one of their sons will fuck the girl too immediately before or after the artificial insemination)
> The bitch instinctively thinks of one of the humans in the household as the "father"

>and then the condom broke.
>her womb eagerly sucked up every drop of his sperm, leaving her deepest places utterly defenseless against the invading sperm-cells.
>her unsuspecting ovum was ambushed and ruthlessly fertilized, with Bea only realizing her pregnancy when she woke up to find two eggs in her bed.
>that was her life now, a single mom with only the faint hope hope that the human father would pass through town again.

>Protag is working as a trainer for underground slave ring.
>Makes money by taking locals and grooming them for sale
>Gets police attention
>Cope tries to bring protagonist down.
>Ends up going down on him
>Protagonist doesn't sell her. Decides to keep this one for himself.

>Silly Anthro, clothes are for Humans!

>come across the Japanese equivalent of a hmofa thread on 2ch one time
>a couple posters roleplay out a scenario involving a monster hunter raping and impregnating a werewolf and dragon for the purpose of driving their species to extinction
>realize porn of this sort of thing is non-existent

>is bloodborne
>old ones are sealed away, but some of the beastblood remains
>hunters are still required, but not as much
>if possible, hunters are now trying to jntigrate some of the further gone back into yharnam society
>it is hard work, as they are no longer completely human, only marginally above beasts
>but these brave lads do their dardness to reintigrate them as pets back into civilized society.

>due to pigs being mostly used for food, they tend to breed the most by their human masters so as to keep the livestock population up. they tend to be plump pampered and juicy and are treated like fucktoys by the rest of the farm. even pigs love to be served pig when their masters let them, and they love their role as literal fuckmeat and bottom of the rung in the barn.

One popular idea was that the farm worked as a kind of commune or cooperative. Those animals that can produce goods do so (wool from sheep, eggs or milk, etc). But the others just do physical tasks. Yard work, planting crops, fixing the house, maybe bee-keeping. In most of these scenarios the human still acts as a kind "owner", or at the very least a boss. Male anthros are sometimes used for breeding (in scenarios where you can't just impregnate the anthro girls yourself). While in others the males are deemed too unruly to be tamed and live more like wild animals in the forests surrounding the farm. So for pigs we have domesticated-like females, and males are more like wild boar. Female dogs are loyal and help humans, the males are more like wolves. So on and so forth. Some farms need to almost keep a little militia in place to keep themselves safe from the occasional raid from the forest anthros. Some species tend to be all feral, regardless of them being male or female (think badgers, raccoons, foxes, etc). So the feral anthros tend to outnumber the tame ones.

>tough mares and stallions traveling the land with their master
>the absolutely loyal dogs, watching over the farm and protecting the homeland
>the motherly cows, taking care of the many younglings from all species
>the gentle sheep, keeping their wool soft and clean as possible
>chubby piggu girls, the middle managers of the farm who blast anime OSTs while working and make extra cash by farming gold on runescape

>the most successful and hard working animals get impregnated by the farmer.

>before you stood the best of your proud herd
>Sammy, the best of dogs and the goodest of girls
>Taylor, the strongest and fastest of the mares
>Maria, the sheep with the fluffiest wool
>Doria, the most motherly and milky cow
>and...
>you stare into her obliviously happy eyes for a moment to give her a chance to correct anything
>sigh
>Magikaru Shoujo Lucy the pig, who somehow made this farm work on a shoestring budget >ground out 100m gold on runescape and operated a surprisingly healthy ebay and onlyfans accounts
>what exactly she sold and posted on there respectively, you did not want to know
>oh fuck she probably posted your nudes on the onlyfans
>Did I do good, Husbando?"
>goddammit, why is she such a weeb
>then again she and her team were the only reason you and everyone else weren't living in absolute poverty, so a good dicking was definitely deserved
>Yeah, you did good

> finally catch that coon who's been sneaking onto the farm
> she somehow keeps evading the guard dog
> acts all tough at first
> but you can tell she's actually jealous of all the attention the girls on the farm receive
> offer her a compromise
> you'll fuck her until she can't see straight at least once a week
> and she stops sneaking around and terrorizing your girls
> she continues grumbling even as she climbs onto your dick
> by her third orgasm she's dropped the facade and is begging for more
> you start wondering what sort of job a coon could have on the farm on a permanent basis

> Panda girl leads a group for the revival of her species
> One week later, she's actively championing their extinction from breeding with humans instead of their own.

Depends, I like to think that a pet-wife would produce daughters of the mother's species. Otherwise how would we be getting all of the aforementioned pet-daughters?

A monster girl Pokemon style game would work great for this thread. Imagine all the monster girls including the anthro ones which you can enslave and force into glorified cockfights.

I like the idea of monster girls still being blood thirsty but towards each other now and willing to fight for thier husband's amusement

There is something special about a waifur that will fight others for you.
And then dominating them for you.

> anon gets kidnapped by fae after hiking in the woods
> comes back with some fae cumdumps and some illegitimate children left behind

> government taking action to help endangered anthros population
> passive approach failed
> decide to take a more aggressive approach
> panda anthro walking home from the gym
> white unmarked van pulls up beside her the door opens and pulls her in and takes off
> ain’t seen or heard from for a couple of months
> white van pulls up to her house in the dead of night she’s dropped off at home

So I heard that if I can catch an uncollared anthro trespassing on my property I can claim ownership on them pretty easily.
How does that actually work though?
Do I need to get a video of them hopping the fence or something?

Has to be considered loitering. Doesn't work if they're just running through your backyard UNLESS they cause property damage. The fuckers are fast and if they want to get from Point A to Point B without going around a bunch of buildings they'll take any route they want.
However, if you can prove they're actively specifically trespassing on your property with intent to use your possessions, you have a case. A surefire way to claim ownership is to have them eat your food. Leave out something to drink or eat if you know they're lurking around. If they take the bait, you can call up the local authorities and they'll set up a warrant and collar for you, provided you don't already own one for personal use. It's only good for three months but it won't even take that long to make it an indefinite stay.
I got real lucky one time and one thought she could spite piss on my porch when I called her a lazy tabby fatty cat. Got that dumbass by the nape and she's still mewling on my dick.

If they don't have a collar, they're free game.
Hell, you could technically claim the mail lady just doing her job, if she doesn't have an owner yet. Or someone you invited over.
Just call the cops, provide proof the anthro was
there, and they'll sign off on her new tags.

>I shit you know dude, you can get yourself a harem of pet girls and have the government pay you to do it.
>So every local government's got their own name for it, don't matter
>If you get your house officially designated an anthro sanctuary, they pay you to keep anthro girls.
>You need like 5 anthros living with you in my region so I'll use me as an example. Follow my lead and you'll start cashing checks for getting your dick sucked in no time

>First off, you gotta pick up some strays, you'll see why.
>They're everywhere. Anthros go into heat and they screw anyone.
>Lots of kids with deadbeat parents so they just wander the streets
>So starved for affection if you give them food to eat and a roof to sleep under you already got happy pets.
>I picked up a pair of young bitches-Beth and Steph. Obvious runaway strays-try to look tough, but were shivering and starving.
>Take em home and pamper them
>Give them real food, none of that processed shit
>Stopped washing after exercise so they get real used to my scent
>Make sure they touch you throughout the day. I mean like make sure they sleep with you and hold them close. When you watch tv, make them rest in your lap or under your arm. When shitposting, put them on your lap.
>You know you're doing this right if you take them outside and they get anxious if your more than a few feet away.
>Eventually(this will happen to you), they'll take the first step.
>Spin up whatever speech you want. When a stray first lets you cum in them, they are totally in love and they'll take anything you say as gospel.
>They'll be your partners in breaking other bitches cause they think you're right.
>Important thing is they need to feel like they started it.
>They got to make the first move.
>Take me- my girls, "accidentally" feel my boner in bed.
>By this point they are at the tipping point, giving all the signals
>Looking at my crotch, smelling my boxers when they think I can't see them, start talking stupid if they see me naked(or not at all).
>They are close to heat and want me to be their first.
>I reciprocate, and start kissing Beth. Her tail is wagging like crazy. Start whining when I start fondling her breasts
>She grabs my hand and guides it to her puss. It's sopping
>Beth begs me to just stick it in her. She gently guides my cock into her snatch.
>There's resistance as I break her hymen. She doesn't seem to notice. Steph is holding me from behind as I stuff her sister, telling me how long they wanted to do this.
>They love me and want me to love them back
>They want me to cum in them and give them puppies.
>I pump a load into Beth and she kisses me again.
>As soon as I pull out, Steph is lapping and sucking my member, cleaning Beth's juices off me and getting me hard.
>She climbs on top the moment I'm stiff again and starts to bounce in my lap, even as virgin blood coats my dick.
>Pump a load into her.
>They are high on my cum and still riding the afterglow.
>That's when I tell them how anthros need a strong human to love and care for them. Only natural for them to serve me and I care for them.
>They eat it up like morning eggs and bacon.
>Making some fake evidence to get them registered as mine is easy after that. They want to be with me forever. Their words.
>Next step, getting other bitches. There's plenty of them out there if you know where to look.
>Start small though, with easy targets so nobody cares if they wind up your pet.
>Also, find girls that your new pets can help reel in, make them feel like they're helping
>Since there's literally hundreds of possibilities I'll just list some of mine as examples
>Example 1: Students
>My pets are in last year of high school. Mandatory attendance.
>They know which girls are problems and skip classes. They know which ones won't be missed.
>They bring home this cat girl. 7/10. A bit of chub, but in the right places.
>Her name's Maureen. Total bookworm. Says she is studying to get a scholarship and leave this place.
>Home doesn't have basic running water or electricity. Easy to convince her to come over
>Didn't waste time buttering her up like my first two. Got lewd from the start
>She was real horny watching how lewd I got with Beth. Didn't notice Steph slipping aphros into her soda.
>My pets convinced her to join. She was awkward at first, but the moment she got a taste of pre it was like she did this all her life.
>She sucked my cock like her life depended on it.
>Getting her pants off wasn't even a struggle
>Chubby Maureen is on the floor taking my cock in less than an hour and Beth and Steph are next to her.
>As I'm thrusting they tell her how much better life is when a human care for them.
>How good it feels to get a proper man-shaft plunging their depths and filling them with cum
>Maureen is so zonked on aphros she's agreeing to everything.
>Begs me to love her
>Begs me to cum in her
>Begs me to make her mine
>I do all three.
>Like Beth and Steph, she's all to willing to help forge evidence of her trespass.
>Since she's a stray, nobody cares that she's becoming my pet.
>Some think it's a good thing because now she has someone to care for her.
>Maureen is certainly happy.
>Couple weeks go by, things are back to normal. My girls are finishing up high school.
>Maureen's still getting her scholarship and is a studious little kitten.
>But at home she wears nothing but the collar and bends over with her "sisters" for Master's cock every night.
>Alright so you got some anthros under your belt(maybe literally)
>Maybe you still don't got enough, or maybe you want a girl that's a bit...healthier?
>Time to move on to more "moderate" diffiulty targets.
>These are girls who are established. They have homes, livlihoods, maybe caretakers or a family?
>It's harder to make them a pet. They won't start worshipping your cock cause of good food and a house with working AC. They need training.
>On top of that, some may wonder why she goes missing. Or why someone that looks just like her pops up in the pet registry.
>Your best bet is to find outsiders. Tourists, Volunteers, College students, etc.
>These girls are expected to go abroad for weeks, months at a time.
>By the time starts snooping around, you've already broke them and they'll support any story you fabricate to keep suspicious off of you.
>So example 2: Sister Guillana. She's one of those missionary types
>You know that cult that goes around door to door to 'save souls'? Yeah one of those.
>She knocks on my door, Steph answers it. Here's another reason why it's important to have loyal strays
>Sister Guillana asks to come in, Steph can see she's the sort of girl I'd like
>Goat-anthro, proportions are not too big not too small
>Got this innocent smile that would look perfect with a collar
>Steph lets her in. They talk about god, and salvation
>Steph pretends to be interested and shit, steers the conversation towards where she's from
>Guillana assures her that even though she's not even from this country, her fellowship has asked her to start another out here.
>Bingo, perfect target.
>Steph brings the other pets out of hiding.
>Guillana is surprised, especially when they strip her and tie her down.
>Starts spouting some dogma about damnation.
>When I get home, they got her all ready for me.
>Because she's a "moderate" that means I got to start training her.
>Guillana, she's one of those cultists all about abstinence
>But I knew she played with herself cause she was no virgin.
>Apparently she also went a long time without by the time I got to her
>Sucking on her tits and rubbing her cleft was enough to make her sing.
>Her body practically sucked my cock in.
>She keeps crying about how sinful I am.
>I tell her she's worse.
>She pretends like she doesn't want this when she clearly does.
>Half my thrusting is her own body drawing me back into her warmth.
>I cum hard in her, and on her. Get her used to my smell.
>This back and forth is common. Expect her to do it alot. The purpose is to wear her down, until she realizes you're right.
>She's just a bitch that wants a human to fuck her stupid.
>My girls work her over when I'm busy, getting her wet, and telling her all the good things that come from being a pet.
>Guillana resists the first week.
>The second week, I fuck her in every room of the house. We fuck over the table, fuck in the bathroom, fuck on and off the bed, fuck over the washing machine, fuck as my girls watch tv, fuck our way up and down the stairs.
>Third week, I do nothing to her but edge her. The denial drives her crazy.
>By the end of the fourth, she begs me to cum in her. She misses my cock.
>That's when you know you've gotten the hard part done. She's broken down. Now to build her up as a proper pet.
>No one comes looking for Sister Guillana.
>I luck out becuase she wasn't even supposed to come through my town, so no one knows to come here.
>By the time I get papers from my new pet Giona, the missing reports stop coming.
>Giona likes her new name.
>She likes the collar I picked out for her.
>She just likes everything master does for her.
>She's still as spiritual as ever.
>But now she's worshipping my cock.
>That's what I call it to tease her.
>She doesn't mind, and keeps giving my crown a kiss every time I cum.
>So you got some 'easy' girls. Got some 'moderate' girls. You may be asking:
>Is there a 'hard'? Yes.
>These are the hardest to break. Hardest to disappear. Most are case-by-case basis.
>Most cases, you got a 'hard' case because someone got really suspicious of your activities and your only solution to make them go away is to break them in
>Mai-mai. The crown jewel of my collection
>Would you believe she was once an investigator? Officer Mai Shen she used to be called.
>She wouldn't stop looking into the missing anthros reports around my area. I had to hide my pets for so much longer than usual, even had to fudge my 'anthro sanctuary' numbers to keep my trail cold
>She still nearly got me. Twice.
>The third time, she was building a case against me. It was time to stop.
>She reached out to Giona- an innocent victim who wanted out.
>So she went undercover. She followed Giona to my house to gather evidence.
>Giona had her dress the part. She wore a tanktop and ragged shorts. Typical stray clothes.
>Even forged some papers to make it look real.
>She came to me pretending to be a stray looking for a new home.
>I am an anthro sanctuary after all.
>Things are fine, she gets some toiletries, a hot meal, and a bed to sleep in.
>Oh and she gets searched. Can't have the girls shanking each other. You'd be surprised how much that happens.
>When everyone else is a asleep, she starts sneaking around.
>She thinks I keep missing girls in the basement until they are properly broken.
>It's partially true. I keep them in A basement. Not in the main house though.
>Still I catch her in the act. She tries to get away, but I'm blocking the only way out, and my girls surround her.
>She fights. Oh she fights. But a few black eyes, and a bruised jaw later, I got her bound.
>She drops the act, tells me how fucked I am.
>I tell her I got cameras in every room. All I have to do is show footage of her breaking into my basement to steal food, and I nail her
>She's pissed cause she knows how I could do that.
>If she wasn't an officer.
>She dangles that in front of me. All she had to do was flash her badge and any story I made would be bunk.
>Which meant I'd have to break her hard and fast.
>By this point I had plenty of experience with anthros.
>Dogs get knotted for hours so what really gets them is foreplay.
>Cats got barbs and they finish in less than a minute.
>So I tie her up and give her a dose of sexual torture.
>Vibrator in both holes, nipples clamps and leave her in the dark.
>By the next day, there's a thin layer of femcum all across the floor. Officer Shen can barely stand.
>And that's when I grab her full ass-fluff and destroy her cunt.
>She alternates between telling me to "pull out" and "don't stop" like she's got split personality
>One pretends she's still an officer of the law.
>And the other that knows she was put on this planet to take my cock.
>Her pleas turn into gibberish as I pound her sopping cunt raw, more of her juice spilling out as I smack her cervix with each thrust.
>The proud police woman who had for the last year tried to shut me down was now begging me to put a baby in her.
>I lean in and tell her I'm gonna fill her full of kittens.
>She tells me to do it.
>And my cockhead kisses her womb-hole, injected my hot cum straight into her baby-maker.
>Officer Shen's legs finally give out and she collapses into my arms. Hours of toys and a single relentless fuck was enough to break this proud tigress.
>Then I start thrusting again.
>According to official reports, Officer Shen disappeared after getting into an altercation with her boss.
>Apparently she was told to give up on me as everything I had was legit, and her undercover work was her last ditch attempt to save her career.
>Well, too bad for Shen that Mai-Mai had no interest in getting evidence or search warrants
>She just wanted to stay with master and have his babies.
>I've had dozens of anthros, strays, students, delivery girls, moms and their daughters, but nothing gives me as much satisfaction as Mai-Mai.
>So when you wonder why go for a 'hard' girl, remember Mai-Mai.

>Had a similar thing to that "Sanctuary anon" going on, authorities won't mind you so much if you keep it small and keep it safe. They now what you are doing, but they couldn't care less, their are worse things around, and taking some strays out of the streets is a huge favour you do to them.
>I have a similar "entrepreneur" going on, a small and "remote" countryside property, with some field and other kind of work to do around.
>Now my "target antros" are usually girls that passed through some sort of correction facility , like a reformatory or even jail
>You see, some antrhos, specially the stronger gals, have a hard time getting a job with a criminal antecedent.
>On paper, my "business" is a alternative-sentence serving for gals with lower sentences, so I make a favour to our good men and woman in blue and take some of this troubled gals in
>Most of my antros aren't bad gals, they just got the wrong lot in life. Some stray that committed a minor crime to have something to eat, some rebellious gals with a rough upbringing in a broken home that decided to lash out against society and got caught, even some junkies that got lost on drugs and ended ruining their lives
>Now the thing is, the deal is simple. They know they got nowhere else to go, and working on the field is way better than getting back to the cell block. Clothe attire is also way more lenient than using just orange

>places with a bunny population are perfect targets to set up a sanctuary.
>They quickly outgrow their space and many are just left out in the cold.
>Give them a home where they can be as raunchy as they want and they'll do anything you say

>So, how do you prevent other human males from kidnapping and fucking your wives into submission
Oh that's easy. It ties in to the Cluck Cuckening of '85. A sanctuary for bird anthros got raided and the girls were mindfucked into vegetables. The perpetrators were caught, but that started the mandate all pets be chipped; and it's now required by law they wear a collar. The collar can be removed, but the chip? Not so easy. It's how a crime like the Cluck Cuckening was averted when a bunch of cows were tracked 50 miles out of their usual area. Turns out the collars they had were forgeries and didn't match their chips. And this is just the basic law. Local government adds their own restrictions by territory which just add a lot more work to smuggling a pet out.
>But they can take the chip out
You could but without the proper equipment you'll kill the girl on the operating table. Honestly the time and money needed to take another man's waifu is so high, you might as well just pick up a stray. No shortage of them, and far cheaper. That's been the best deterrent: making it so complicated it's not worth the effort.

Oh here we go, another Anthro Rights activist. You people just stir up trouble for attention. When the anthro moms try to get help for their pregnancies, are you there to help them? No, you shame them for keeping a baby they clearly weren't prepared for. Are you there cooking or donating food when the strays are lining up outside the soup kitchens? No, that would mean you would do something harder than standing at a corner screaming a slogan. Hell, I remember when Beth was out grocery shopping and one of you nutballs, grabbed her and cut her collar off with a pair of fucking bolt cutters! Nearly cut her neck in half, and did more damage to the bolt cutters than the collar, but did you care? No, you were screaming at her to be free and shit. She was so scared, she didn't leave my side until I got her a new, stronger collar.

Why are there so many strays anyway? Are anthro-families that uncaring?

I'm pretty sure it's a mix of things, the anthros and their inability to control their heat, whatever support they can find in their region, and general living conditions. Some places are pretty well off, where an anthro can get a lot of support to overcome their heat and live a normal life, but some still fall through the cracks. Other places, help is nonexistant and anthros become a slave to their cycles. They'll drop pants and fuck anyone anywhere. By the time the kids are born and need to be raised, another heat will have hit and they're off to do it again. Those are where the strays come from. They have to make their own way cause dad is gone and mom's swallowing yet another anthro man's balls. It's only right a human gives them what they've been missing.

Who said anything about taking out the chip. Nothing a little electroshock therapy can't fix and if the not human doesn't survive their body parts can still be sold on the black market.

You were talking about abducting and fucking an anthro into submission. What you're talking about now only happens in places where humans are still dumb enough to think eating lion poop cures their diabetes. And again, why bother taking someone else's pet when a stray does the job for you without incurring the death penalty? Those places I was talking about? Yeah, property is everything. Take someone else's shit, they just line you up against the wall. Take a stray, they'll pay you for the service.

>Live in a small remote town in the mountain region of Oregon.
>Lived in cautious fear of the rampant werewolf tribe that lived in the forest for the ten years that I helped out the town defend against their attacks and raids.
>Always felt wary when the mayor and the locals would form a treaty with the tribe and their buff leader Kayden Highclaw when they would always fuck over the town regardless weeks after it was formed.
>Mayor conjures up a plan to weaken the tribe by sending them "peace offerings"
>We send out drug laced food packs to the tribe weeks before the raids happen.
>Months go by until the tribe has been whittled down to a small group of six at the cost of the townsfolk being severely injured and most of them leaving the town
>The six remaining werewolves were four mothers, one young adult male huntsman and the leader Kayden Highclaw.
>With the Mayor's victory finally in hand, he had all except the leader work for him and keep the town hall clean as personal sex maids where Kayden the once strong and rowdy werewolf leader was turned into a chubby obedient hermaphrodite slave named Kacey for the town as the public breeding bitch kept in an open cage to be tied in and in front of the town hall for the rest of eternity.
>Five months go by as the mayor has his maids a part of the events throughout the town.
>He also has the male huntsman turned into his slutty herm bodyguard.
>A year passes a more people leave the town as he unveils his breeding homes for his werewolves.
>Three years go by until the mayor dies as he came inside one of the maids, Kacey eventually appoints himself as mayor when him and the other werewolves are the only ones left.
>He has the milfs and the bodyguard herm abduct me and force into being their husband.
>Kacey spends the remaining fifteen months getting the town in good shape as I fuck him and the other werewolves full of pups to repopulate the town with the breeding homes.
>Seven years go by and the town has been turned into a thriving sexual tourist trap named Crescent Peak.
>Thanks to the four werewolf mother's mass breeding and increased birthing appointed by Kacey, the herm bodyguard and I pumped enough sperm in them to repopulate the town throughout that time.
>Crescent Peak eventually became a pleasant and lively community filled with male and female/herm werewolves where Oregon visitors and out of state tourist can fuck and do as they please.
>As soon as the town went back to some form of normalcy, Kacey stepped down as mayor and made me mayor as I look over Crescent Peak and hold public events as he became my devoted slut wife while the herm bodyguard became the town sheriff as the werewolf mothers repurposed the breeding homes into an all in one love hospital and became the lore bearers for their old tribal history and rituals to share with townsfolk and tourist alike.
>To this day urban legends and myths from Crescent Peak are spread and told throughout the Oregon highlands.

What's the funnest species to dominate? Your personal choice, whether it's because they're huge BHC sluts or haughty like elves or anything that tickles your fancy.
It'd be a hard one to answer for me, but I'm feeling felines at the moment. They'd pretend to put up enough resistance to make things exciting, but it won't take long before they're purring around your cock either.

Ankha being a sub is great, probably because people so often portray her as a dom.

She's high-quality royal fuckmeat. With the right amount of training she'll accept rough mind-breaking sex as a normal part of her routine. After all, someone of her station deserves the best dick the animal kingdom has to offer.
Well, that's how she'd reason with her current situation after you've creampied her purebred womb and gave her phat cat ass a smack, signalling an end to her pure feline lineage.

>Appointment with manager
>Sucks to be me.jpg
>Never seen the guy.
>But you know him by reputation
>Total ballbuster. Everyone he calls in gets a reaming that leaves them shaking.
>Find his office. It's in the corner of the building.
>Felix Nemo.
>You step in. He's on the phone.
>It's a cat anthro. And he looks familiar.
>While he isn't looking, you pull out your phone.
>No...it can't be. Can it?
>"How has your day been?"
>You heard that line before.
>Anytime someone starts with that, they are about to deliver bad news. They don't care if your day is good or bad, they're going to make it worse.
>Felix starts laying into you. Your on thin ice, you're going to get fired, blah blah blah.
>Your mind blanks. For some reason you aren't listening.
>Keep thinking to back to that photo you saw.
>Maybe...maybe it was a fluke?
>Ignore Felix. Pull out your phone again. Get a different picture and hold it up.
>No question. This is that online slut kuroNeko.
>"Are you listening?!"
>This manwhore is trying to ruin your life and you got him dead to rights.
>What do you do?

>Chad Cop appears at your door
>sees your harem of anthro sex slaves
>he just gives you a bro fist and leaves

>become a trainer as a young horny teen
>catch any pokemon you can, and they all become your obedient minions
>encouraged to travel far and wide, fight for badges and whatnot, but not actually required to
>just catch all your favorites, then spend your time fucking them repeatedly
>rather than learning to battle, they learn to pleasure you
>travel around to see the sights, then fuck your pokemon in all these locations
>forget all about badges and rivals, instead turning your team into fucktoys

That's really hot.
>they compete for your attention and lust
>during threesomes or group sex, they try to please you the most, trying to become your favorite
>sometimes things get so heated, a fight breaks out

I wonder how many anthros are turned on by that idea. At any point they could be jumped by a human, raped into a drooling mess, and locked away to be used again later.

Depends on what sort of reputation humans have, I suppose. But no doubt it wouldn't take much to get those kinds of ideas rolling. It would add such a thrill to everyday life and be a dirty, taboo pleasure.

Imagine anthro girls scolding each other for walking home alone at night, or wandering through human-filled areas casually, only to then start giggling as they speculate how they would've been raped and captured.
>"Oh my god, Jane, you did what?! You could've been attacked! Humans could've jumped you and... you know!"
>"Oh yeah, that would've been awful, right? A whole pack of humans just using me like that, over and over..."
>*giggle* "Their strong furless hands ripping your clothes off, pulling your legs apart, before the first one... Gosh, let's not."
>"Really? I thought it was just getting good! Can you imagine they then keep you? Carry you back to a dark basement somewhere, and then that's it for you. They have their way with you like that again every day, like their sex slave."
>"Totally. Best time of my life, I bet."

I like to think that anyone trying to sniff in the K-9 department anthros is given the choice of joining the department or getting a beating. Because they need these dogs and don't appreciate attempts of poaching.
Let's build into this a bit: the police force does tend to do its job because crime is always going to exist. They keep the rounds, patrol cities and highways, arrest and detain criminals, investigate things and all that. There's a certain degree of respect towards the work, with many anthros admiring both the anthris that managed to get to high positions and the human men. Of course, that attracts both genuine believers in equality and justice, and those anthros that just seek a human husband. The latter drop out relativly early, the former tend to work until they end up in a corrupt department (which is to say, any of them). There they end up noticing patterns and blaming the sanctuaries for it which in turn pisses off their superiors because they got friends or family running those. The idealists are then tasked with investigating and then disappear until they return to their yepartment, quit their job, and move into whoever collared them.
Because there's a vast open conspirancy that acts to keep things as they are, with anthros as the second class and humans enjoying the fruits of their hard work.
As for human cops, they are onto the scam and just enjoy the benefits like rawdog anthros in return for ignoring small crimes.
Overall, it's a world where a human can pretty much live off the back of anthros, and said anthros love it.

>Morning comes with crowing roosters and a nuzzle against your crotch.
>The pigs got in again.
>The Farmer's Regulatory Board recommends weaning your cattle for the first five years after birth and then letting them free range
>These girls are all well into free range age, but they still miss daddy.
>Sigh and push them away. First load of the day is the most potent, so you need to find a milker first.
>Of course they follow you around.
>Find Hollyhock first.
>Getting a bit long in the horn
>Produced you twenty head of sturdy calves.
>She's still in great shape though and will probably be fertile for a good decade more.
>So hell yeah you're gonna breed her.
>She sees you, and your erection, coming to her stall.
>Rolls over and spreads her legs, big smile on her face.
>She's just the right consistency. Not too tight like the young ones, not too lose like the older girls
>Her vagina is perfectly shaped to you cock, and it sucks you as if welcoming you home.
>She loves how much your gene-shifted shaft lubes her up.
>The young ones peer in from outside with rapt attention as you put another sibling in Hollyhock.
>First load of the day. Extra creamy. Your balls are spent, but still plenty of Feed to go 'round.
>Your cow is left in her pen, tail wagging as she rubs your excess seed back into her snatch.
>The girls continue to follow you out like a puppy waiting for food.
>Quick wash, you know they don't like the taste of mom-juice. You don't shower though. They're used to smelling daddy's natural scent when they feed.
>You come back to the kitchen. Lay out breakfast of cold cereal and milk. The girls are getting antsy. Probably because they know what comes next.
>With a sigh, you pull down your pants and sit down. You're still flying high as you pour a bowl.
>"Come and get it" you call out.
>The girls worked out who goes first already.
>She crawls under the table as you take a spoonful of corn flakes.
>Sigh as you feel those warm, full lips enclose around your cock.
>Starts sucking slowly and you feel your re-made vesicles work overtime.
>Your seminal fluid contains all the nutrients normally used to keep sperm alive.
>Only the nutrition count has been fortified and tripled for cattle nursing.
>That's why you call it Feed.
>The glands that make it are more sensitive, and larger to accommodate.
>So when you start nursing, it rubs your prostate and it feels like a sort of long, drawn out 'mini-gasm'.
>Girls are hungry today. She's already sucking hard like trying to get the last bit of soda from the bottom of a cup.
>Feed comes out in large spurts. As soon as she swallows, she draws another mouthful out.
>You don't see what's happening under the table, but you feel cold air as the girl is pushed aside.
>Next girl starts kiss-sucking.
>Kisses your crown, and sucks on the tip. Pulls away to swallow. Kisses again, and then she sucks.
>You grunt. That's the sign you give the girls that they were too hard and you're gonna blow.
>The table shakes as they shift around and you feel your entire length swallowed by one of the heifers.
>They like the extra salty flavor that comes with the sperm.
>She pulls away and another girl takes your place.
>Somewhere along that line you forget your cereal as your hands grab hold of the table
>One by one, each girl comes out, gives you a kiss on the forehead and leaves to go play with their sisters.
>Fuck you need to lie down. You leave your half-finished cornflakes and collapse on the couch.
>But you forgot one.
>She always waits for the others to finish. That way she has you all to herself.
>Your cock is slick with cattle-slobber, Feed, and sperm.
>She doesn't mind.
>You sigh, and gesture for the open spot on the cough.
>She happily climbs between your legs and goes down. Your extra sensitive cockhead twitches as her tongue wraps around your underside, coaxing your Feed to come out.
>She drinks longer than any of them.
>Now doubt she'll be biggest and strongest of them all.
>Time for chores.
>Fields that need to be watered, crops harvested, holes patched, there's always something that needs doing
>Fortunately you got Caramel for that
>Your family got her when you were a kid. You sister named her. You actually raised her
>You got close. Real close
>Hell, you were..."feeding" her before you got the gene-hancements for feeding.
>She likes it too. Which is why she tries to do your chores for you so she gets more time to spend with you.
>You find her in the barn hooking Hollyhock up to the milking machines.
>With that new calf you put in her, you'll probably get twice the amount of usual milk until the new baby is born.
>Caramel trots up to you, big smile on her face
>She nudges your chest, then recoils.
>She smells the other girls on you
>She snorts in annoyance. You know it's an act. She likes you too much to stay mad
>Sure enough, you're behind the barn, pants around your needs, and your legs slick with Caramel-slobber and Feed.
>She suckles until you cum, but doesn't stop. She knows you'll let her know when you've had enough.
>That won't be for a while. Caramel does things to you that no one else on the farm can match
>Caramel licks her lips and gives you a bone crushing hug as she trots away, satisfied.
>Milk is collected, eggs and fur harvested. A good haul today. Not as much as you'd like, but because so many come from prizewinning stock, their premium selling price will make up the difference.
>So what are you forgetting? Oh yeah...
>You head back to the barn
>All the cows are out in pasture. Save for one.
>Eulabelle
>She's older than Hollyhock. She gave you so many prizewinning heifers. She won awards herself. How many in total? High thirties or forties, somewhere in that range.
>When she was pregnant, you cocknursed her to keep her healthy enough for two.
>When she was sick and could not eat solids, you cocknursed her to keep her strength up
>When her calf won a contest, you cocknursed her as a reward.
>It was simply bad luck Hollyhock was the first cow you ran into first.
>Eulabelle makes prize winning calves.
>And she's ready to make another.
>Eulabelle's ears flick when she hears the barn doors close.
>Her blue eyes focus on your approaching form, a sultry smile on her lips
>It's obvious what comes next. No words need to be spoken.
>She waits patiently as you strip down, getting onto the hay bale.
>Eulabelle climbs on top.
>This was how she conceived her first.
>If it ain't broke don't fix it.
>She moans with a throaty 'moo', as she rides your babymaker, slamming it back into her dark mound with every breath.
>Her massive jugs bounce in time with her dance, you swear that you can still smell that rich butter scent that is her milk.
>It's so tempting to reach out and just -
>"FUCK!"
>You both reach your end simultaneously. Your well practiced dance is over.
>She gives you a smile, confident that your seed took.
>Fuck is the day gone already?
>You return the girls from the field and go home.
>Too tired to make dinner, so you just microwave some frozen whatever. It's bland, but filling.
>Plan to just sit in front of the TV and space out.
>Only Eulabelle is there
>Her mound is still puffy from your lovemaking.
>Her face is flushed, but happy.
>She's confident your seed took and is looking for her reward.
>You spoil her...
>The TV plays, but you aren't really watching. There's a better show in your lap.
>Eulabelle drinks your Feed with gusto, sucking with a passion only Caramel has matched.
>You stroke her head as she continues to suck, exhaustion sapping your will to do anything else.
>You fall asleep to the sounds of infomercials and Eulabelle's wet, greedy slurping.
>Farming life is hard.

Remember breeders, if you are new to breeding anthros there is no shame in starting small and asking questions from your peers.
A shy bookish cowgirl will always be best for beginners. Shy girls are some of the most pliable and willing breeding stock. And, as other books on ranching will attest, the noble cow is the best cattle to be raised. When impregnated, she will produce a grand amount of milk which can be sold as is or, should you have the know-how, be made into cheese. Strong enough to help plow and harvest the field. And the calf itself is valuable but, should it be female, must be kept as future stock.
The gentle cowgirl is also one of the easiest to please, simply grow a field of dandelions(good for the heart and a substitute for coffee), sugar cane(a sweet treat if chewed and a good liquor if fermented), and wheat(for making your own bread). Groom her in the mornings, and speak gently to her in the evenings(should you not understand this you are too young and have no business keeping cattle) and your cowgirl will always be in a pleasant mood.
Should your Cowgirl ever become unruly, gently address the issues that have affected but NEVER raise your hand or voice to her. Remember, NEVER abuse your cowgirl, while some girls do enjoy a fair amount of BDSM, hurting your cowgirl is a quick way to have her turn on you AND be blacklisted from future dealings within the industry. Furthermore, a girl that has been improperly kept will be of inferior use as the stress will dry her milk and her eggs be unwilling to be fertilized.
Remember, a cowgirl is a herd animal, give your cowgirl company, be that in the way of other cowgirls/cattle or in calves. Should you not be able to afford other cattle then your company will suffice for a time but remember that if you neglect her you will also suffer.
Make sure to properly feed, house, and care for all your charges and they shall in turn care for you while also making you a good amount of money.

Long ago in the age of deities the Human God vanquished the Dragon God (whose dragonkin ruled in tyranny over lesser anthro creatures).
In appreciation, the lesser anthros respect humans as the apex animal, some even willingly become domesticated pets and livestock eager to be bred.
Herbivores like deer are still timid and fearful of how powerful humans are, while carnivores like wolves are conniving and want to overtake humans as the apex predator. Meanwhile the last few dragons skulk in caves having a bitter hatred of humans who defeated their God

>when a doe finally meets a member of the mythical human species
>they are said to be capable of shaping mountains and redirecting rivers, dominating the skies and seas in a way that not even their original inhabitants could
>when she heard those stories of course she'd be interested in you, the lost traveler that wandered into her tribe's lands
What would you show her?

>12 anthros were born to be connected to some funamental anime element of the universe(light, dark, fire, water, love, etc).
>Half were picked up by Generic Evil Empire and augmented to be generals and champions
>Other half were adopted by someone or another
>All trained up to fight each other
>Something something something no idea
>They all unite, fight Evil Empire, and win.
>Then they pump out some kids I guess
>No more conflict so they just fuck around and have sex with randos I guess
>Maybe some of the fanfiction is canon, maybe not, I dunno
My story is kinda all over the place, and involves bullshit magic as I've gained other kinks over the years and ties in to a game I played once
>After empire is destroyed usual stuff
>Kate(pic related) hears about a city losing many of its people overnight without a trace. Goes to investigate
>>In an alternate dimension, humans live in a stratified society where humans are on top, non humans serve.
>>It's also sitting on a leyline between realities so all sorts of shit funnel into their world.
>>It's a might makes right society where whoever is strongest dictates law and order.
>>MC is a human son of one of these leaders who got killed by his underlings
>>MC is driven to revenge and taking his dad's position as top dog.
>>To do that, he needs a group of loyal slaves(everyone has them) to do his dirty work/lead his underlings in the street wars.
>>Uses his control of magic portal to start bringing in slaves to either fund his operations or fight his rivals
>>Which is what is causing all those people to go missing in Crest-world city
>Kate arrives at the city. Follows some leads but finds nothing. Reports back to her friends what is going on. Then she goes missing
>>Kate winds up in MC's world. Is quickly captured and undergoes sexual torture to become MC's slave-wife.
>>Uses her skills to fight MC's enemies.
>Other Crests get worried about Kate's disappearance, and one by one follow her trail, only to get abducted and broken.
>>End goal of the story is MC seizing control of the entire city with a Crest harem.

In what situations would anthro on anthro sex be allowed?
>In the absence of humans/their master
>To breed more cute purebreds for their master to enjoy
>If the anthro male has been sterilized
>If the anthro female is already pregnant with a human fetus
>In a contest of masculinity between the human master and anthro male
>Absolutely never

>Small city is devastated by the latest Anthro Lives Matter riot, probably having something to do with being offended of a statue of an anthro girl kneeling before her human master
>Some even called it Hurricane Feral from how thoroughly some buildings were destroyed
>Everyone is packing up and leaving for the week because there's rumors of another round of rioting and looting
>The police chief gets an idea
>She cordons off a few streets and let's off a few noisemakers, causing a stampede
>They are funneled straight into the south residential district where the majority of their humans live
>A few months later they have a bigger problem, as the landfills are overflowing with positive pregnancy tests and unused condoms while the sewers start clogging up with the massive amount of anthro sperm going down the drain
>And they never had a problem with riots ever again with there being enough humans to take in young, confused "revolutionaries" and teach them the ways of submitting to human cock

>First, it was the humans
>They had bound and gagged the defeated wolves to logs
>the bitch could do nothing but whimper as they stole what was meant to be none but her mate's, staining her womb and ruining her purity
>the dog growled and snapped but obediently surrendered any status he may have had once the first human cock slid deep into his anus
>growls turned to whimpers then moans until finally their hot seed flooded their innards, the bitch her fertile womb and the other bitch his guts
>they wiped their dripping cocks onto their faces and waved their deer over
>The deer, former prey of the wolves and now willing servants under the protection of the humans, were less gentle
>Having lost many a loved one to the wolves they showed no mercy, ravaging their well-lubricated holes until the bitches began to yelp pathetically
>they too, added to the mess of sperm that flooded their gaping holes
>but the humiliation was not yet complete
>they brought out their human-tamed feral gryphon mounts
>having already been aroused from the strong scent of sex, their girthy cocks hung heavily from between their furry legs
>their handlers guided them behind the now crying pair, pleading for anything but this
>he promised eternal servitude and submission, she promised to birth as many human or even deer young as they wished
>but no, all they could to was stare into each other's widening eyes
>the deer hollered and cheered as they watched the former male wolf orgasm from being fucked like a true bitch, splattering his own seed onto the ground below where it belonged while his mate felt the third gush of foreign cum filled her battered belly
>they were the lesser, the submissive
>lower than the humans, their former prey, and even lesser than feral, mindless beasts
>they didn't even notice their binds being cut
>after a short rest they got up and began to follow, knowing that they would be forever shunned by their own kind so long as their butts were claimed with a foreign scent

> rabbit opens a small gym near a more human part of town ignoring the warnings from others about humans
> thinks it’s all rumors and miss-information
> gets raped and knocked up by some humans who come in
> gets tuned into the gym cumdump

Ant queen watching her human husband fucking her ant princess daughters.
Two or three kobold slaves sneak to their masters bedroom to fuck him while mistress stays sleeping unaware.
Girlfriend invites anthro friend over to her house. GF notices how uncomfortable anthro friend is, it's because she's in massively severe heat. GF calls bf over to fix her friend's problem.

Not him, but this was too fun not to write. Probably not exactly to prompt but oh well.
>Ant queen watching her human husband fucking her ant princess daughters.
>Long, long ago when your wife's ass and tits were not large but still manageable, the two of you scooped out the first handful of earth to your new home.
>You bred her nightly for a year and sometimes right past into the dawn.
>Your first worker daughter labored hard for the colony, delivering honey straight into your mouth from hers, cleaning up the mess between your legs with her tongue, and even caring for her many, many, many young sisters that her mother regularly laid as she slept.
>For her loyalty, you let her have a turn as the Queen rested. She couldn't breed but she accepted the extremely rare reward that very few would ever enjoy.
>The colony grows
>Soon your home is bustling with your hundreds of daughters, building, cleaning, caring, guarding, and serving.
>But the Queen could no longer enjoy your touch, as she was too busy pumping out egg after egg, using only a single sperm from the billions that she kept alive in her belly
>Her daughters took the place of their mother, laying down on the bed that their mother had been first deflowered, spreading their legs open to accept the cock that had originally sired them, letting the hot seed of their unborn siblings fill their barren wombs.
>One night it was the honored captain of the guard that had organized the defense against the enemy, the next it was a worker who had been lucky enough to discover a whole year's worth of food.
>However one morning after a particularly pleasurable night with one of the nurses, you were called by the Queen to the throne room
>Inside you were greeted by six very special girls, winged, standing tall and regal
>Virgin queens
>While normally they were to go out and find a mate of their own, the Queen had decided that a suitable male was already here
>There were no words, only a single nod before each of the virgins turned around, blushed, and presented themselves
>Sex may have been fun but there was something different, something visceral about filling a lady's womb with the express intention of leaving her with your legacy
>Each one of them squealed as they received the seed of their new colony, making the next blush and leak in anticipation
>One after another they fell to the floor, exhausted, chest heaving as they took in fresh air
>The Queen smiled, satisfied, and you took your rightful place next to her
>After a short rest the newly impregnated queens rose back to their feet, spreading their still blushing lower lips to confirm your genetic gift leaking from their recently deflowered snatches
>And they left home, the first girls to do so
>But you'd see them again
>Many years later you'd be surprised with a visit from an unknown queen, a granddaughter as it turned out
>Hailing from a land far away, they had traveled for many weeks
>Supercharged with human genetics they had toppled an ancient bee empire that had held strong for centuries and were now enjoying the sweet, sweet victory within
>But for their dear father they had something else
>Limbs bound by spider silk rope and gossamer wings in shreds, they tossed seven captured, defeated queen bees at your feet, one for every fortress they had sieged
>To say that you were quite proud would be an understatement
>Well, you thought idly as your eternally pregnant Queen serviced your cock
>One empire is nice, but two is always better...

>rabbit cop is sent to deal with a disturbance complaint
>finds that it's a group of humans having a party
>the intoxicated humans decide to just jump her
>she doesn't stand a chance
>she gets gangbanged over and over, taking throbbing human cock in all her holes for hours
>by the end of it, she's too exhausted to even leave
>the next morning, she ends up being gangbanged again, being passed around like a fuckdoll to take care of every human's morning wood
>when it's finally over, she makes no arrests or hands out any fines, she's just a mess of sweat and spunk as she's too tired to stop the humans from simply leaving and going home

>you have a team of psychic pokemon
>constantly think lewd thoughts about them all the time
>project your own horniness into them
>eventually they start to crack
>first it was espeon, always eager to please
>she pops out of the ball her pussy dripping wet for you
>she levitates her own body and lines her pussy up with your hard dick
>quicker than you could pound a flesh light she moves up and down your dick on her tight hole
>she spasms as you inject your cum deep inside her
>she vibrates uncontrollably and collapses curling next to you purring
>next one is your gardevoir
>always attuned to your feelings she masturbated constantly when you weren't looking
>she linked minds with you as she lied spread eagle on your bed
>her pussy begged for your dick and you obliged
>as you fucked her, her legs locked around your hips preventing you from pulling out
>when you came she exploded in her own orgasm
>she flooding you with the pleasure you were giving her
>you both collapsed in a sweating heap on the sheets.
>The next one was your first pokemon, now a delphox
>she has been with you for the longest
>she saw you fuck the others and wanted to participate desperately
>forced to paw at her own cookie while you fucked the others into a mess
>you took your time with her
>you first teased her with your tongue until she was on the verge
>then you had her do the same to you with her muzzle
>when you locked hips with her you both finished the union that started when you first went on the journey
>your female alakazam was interested more in meditating than being tame
>that is what you thought until you saw she was actually masturbating in the corner of your eye
>moisture dripping down as she levitated
>you kissed her gently and then she broke down and started inserting her finger rapidly inside
>she cried out to you to put it in
>You flipped her on her chest and fucked her drooling pussy on her favorite meditation spot
>she couldn't communicate telepathically for a week after she came
>latias took a little more work
>in fact the others helped in not only capturing her but taming her
>the other girls teased her constantly even using her when she was inside the pokeball as a masturbation toy
>she was even let out when you weren't looking
>as soon as she was let out she tried to masturbate
>the others stopped her and told her that only master could get her off
>when you woke up one morning your dick was being slobbered over by the red dragoness
>she begged that you use her
>you pinned her to the wall with your thrusts pounding her opening deeply
>she scratched the drywall with her claws as she orgasms again and again
>the girls trained her well, just a touch from you is enough to cause her to drool in pleasure
>your sixth pokemon
>she was difficult to catch
>in fact she refused to leave her ball sometimes
>the others say that she knows what her fate is and is trying to prolong it
>the mewtwo kept her distance from your other pokemon
>they snicker at her when you take them all out in the park
>your gaze causes her to blush and leak lubrication between her legs
>your alakazam said that she was so focused on her future self because she liked it
>you decide to take it extra slow and careful with her
>you let your other girls have a room to themselves while you shared one with your sixth
>she levitated in the middle of the room and watched you curiously as you stripped for her
>your mind was filled with all the thoughts of pleasing the mewtwo
>you didn't even touch her, all you had to do was think about touching her and it caused her to react
>she bobbed up and down as she floated, her juices dripped onto the floor
>you snickered and thought about her clit and all the wonderful things you would do to it
>she fell to the bed quivering her folds contracting on air
>you continued the onslaught of thoughts her strong psychic powers practically doing the work for you
>she was yours

>To keep the peace in the farm, you ordered that the most aggressive and rebellious stallion was to be gelded
>Regular fights and little acts of violence disappeared overnight as the instigator became quiet and submissive with his masculinity stolen away
>In the wild he would have been the one to breed the mares and dominate the herd but here he was a liability, a feral amongst the civilized
>And so, he became the one to be bred
>Each night he hiked up his tail and slutted himself out to the others who had their testicles kept intact to maintain their muscles for field work
>With sexual relief now free and easily accessible and the ringleader no more than an anal whore the quiet days returned
>He would complain, quietly
>But you waved him away and he submissively obeyed
>His body was nothing more than your property

>randomly discover a goblin community out in the countryside
>being so small and comparatively weak, they're timid and submissive
>easily bully them, ending up taking over the entire community as its unofficial leader
>do as you please while the goblins submit to your whims
>claim every female in the community as you harem
>fuck one after another day in and day out
>pick one up randomly and use her as a fleshlight
>go to bed with one, wake up the next morning and grab another
>get blowjobs and titfucks several times a day, until your favorites know every inch of your cock and how to pleasure it perfectly

>I no longer rule these Skies, it appears
>Long, long ago my rule was absolute, unquestionable
>But it appears that your kind has grown wings far more majestic than mine
>I saw you humans grow, from tilling the ground with your hands to letting your iron servants erase mountains
>From the lands, to the seas, to the skies, and finally here
>Now we are the worms who can do nothing more than slither through the muck whilst you reach for the stars
>So I request from you, a favor
>Request, for I have nothing you want
>Breed me, in full view of the gods
>Let them witness the union of my kind and yours without roofs or clouds
>I shall present to them my precious, seeded sex as proof of our bond, touched by no other but you
>Let them see the first droplets of milk from my breasts
>Let them bless the birth of our child
>This is why you built these crafts, no?
>My duty as a female is to breed with the strongest male
>And who is stronger than one who has conquered the heavens itself?

>Walking down a park in the middle of the night
>Suddenly see an unnatural glow in the sky
>You can barely make out the shape of a triangle
>It descends toward you, and lands a few feet away
>A humanoid animal-thing that vaguely reminded you of a white-furred dog walks out, dressed in a jumpsuit
>It looked to have jumped straight out of a sci-fi movie, and was somewhat female looking
>At least, it had breasts and womanly hips, despite its thin body shape.
>It (she?) gazed upon you with a look of wonder, and a small smile formed on her face
What do, /collared/?

When human teens bully them sexually.
>Human kids regularly dominate the anthro kids due to their stronger genes
>Usually it's playful bullying like playing doctor or police officer
>As they all grow into horny teens they get more serious
>Both anthro girls and boys get randomly groped and spanked, pranks such as human kids sneaking into and jerking onto anthro faces while they sleep and unplugging their alarm clock so they rush to school with dried cum in their fur is common
>And eventually it turns to actual sex
>Both anthro boys and girls forced to give double blowjobs, the girls enduring many, many embarrassing examinations of their sexy bits, boys getting sodomized with their sister's dildos
>In fact, it's very often that the human teens invite or force, the anthro parents to join in as well
>There are plenty of photos of a complete anthro family all on their hands and knees while a group of human teens fuck them from behind
>Their children will learn from their mothers and fathers that their kind are the bitches for humans to dominate

High School
>Anthros start hitting puberty. Getting aggressive. And horny
>Your fox friend who was a good buddy through elementary is distancing himself.
>Starts to date girls, sells bjs for cash
>Get ideas
>Meet fox next day.
>Pay for a bj
>He smirks and mocks how you're finally catching up
>Wait until after school then go to park bathroom, his favorite spot(cause it's the only public toilet that doesn't stink)
>Unzips your pants. Sucks your dick.
>No emotion. All business.
>Spring the trap.
>Tackle him. Gag his snout, tie his arms behind his back.
>Pull down his pants and show him where a human cock should go.
>Fuck his boipussy until he stops struggling, and grunts become moaning.
>Squeeze his balls and tell him you are coming.
>Both of you jizz. You into his ass, him on the floor.
>His tail is wagging.
>He liked it. Really really liked it.
>He stops dating, closes his fellatio business.
>Comes to your house everyday like when you were kids.
>Only now it's to fuck him over and over.
>He declares his body is only for you
>Begs you to fuck him more, faster, and harder.
>Near end of the semester, studying for finals. He says he never gave you that blowjob you paid for.
>Sucks you off slowly and lovingly rest of the night. Get no studying done.

>be a human teacher at an anthro school
>despite your reputation you do a good job
>your precious students must be taken care of, after all
>doesn't stop you from banging plenty of young, virgin anthro puss
>before school, during school, after school, there would be at least one anthro teen girl around your cock every hour
>rebellious students would be pacified with your cock
>good students would be rewarded with the cock
>struggling students would be promised the cock if they passed their next test
>but you never gave them a freebie, no matter how hot they were
>it was always hot seeing one of your girls walking down the hallway with your cum seeping through her panties and down her legs
>but it was a necessary part of a growing teen girl's life, educating herself on how to serve her future human
>you got first pick of course, having claimed a few gems as teens, now MILFs who were equally skilled at managing your busy household as they were at popping out more children

>Humans and anthros have a shared evolutionary history that has developed into a symbiotic relationship that ensures the survival of both species.
>Originally anthro women could be impregnated by human sperm as easily as human women
>In such events, the anthro always births at least one human and one anthro offspring ensuring propagation of both species.
>Over time however, anthro men had become receptive as well; but only to human males.
>This has ensured communities with a severe lack of females in the population did not suffer from genetic bottlenecking and ensured healthy genetic stock in both parent races
>Once impregnated, an anthro male undergoes a change. Their bodies become more feminine to accommodate the growing children, their penis shrinks and virility reduced as energy is redirected to lactation and feeding the offspring inside them.
>In certain parts of the world there are entire towns that are comprised solely of males, of equal human and anthro males who have taken on the traditional role of human housewives
>To ensure anthros are aware of their place in modern society, they are made aware of this as they enter puberty around junior high/middle school so that they can make a sound decision when their bodies reach full maturity.

These threads really need more rape content, I want to fuck up an anthro girl physically and mentally

Same. I want to enslave her against her will and make her my property when she wasn't expecting it.
See a lovely anthro I want, jump her and fuck her whether she wants it or not. Pound her on the ground until all her scream and calls for help are just cries and moans, then drag her home and tie her up. Fuck her every day whenever I want, and she just has to get used to being my sex slave from then on.

I want to visit a fancy, expensive college and pick out a cute, nerdy anthro with high grades and a lot of potential in her life and a bright future in front of her, and maybe a little rebellion in her nature to help her get this far in the first place. Then I want to simply walk into her dorm room, tie her up, put her in one of those dog carriers, and carry her home in full view of everyone. It may take a few days, where she rationalizes that someone must have called the anthro police and someone is coming to save her, but as the months go by and the pleasure starts to melt her brain, she'll accept her proper place in society as a cocksleeve for humans.

>all the "class beauty" students get fearful of being picked
>the furbois inwardly pray their girlfriends aren't the one you grab
>the degenerates secretly fantasize about being dragged away to be violated daily
>the losers cross their fingers, hoping to be picked, thinking "I'd rather be this guy's cumdumpster than spend the rest of my life flipping burgers or some other shitty low-wage work. At least I'd get a few orgasms every day."

>the degenerates secretly fantasize about being dragged away to be violated daily
>the losers cross their fingers, hoping to be picked, thinking "I'd rather be this guy's cumdumpster than spend the rest of my life flipping burgers or some other shitty low-wage work. At least I'd get a few orgasms every day."
Bullying is still on the menu for both. They'd be routinely queaned and be expected to hold a job to make sure I can afford a lot of kids.
If they do a good job, and have good genes, some of those kids might even be theirs.
But until then, they're anal only girls to be safe.

>You were given a bunch of puppies as a kid
>They grow up with you
>A cadre of loyal bitches that now tower over you.
>Will bite the head of anyone that tries to get smart with you
>But a snap of your fingers and they go belly-up

>Come to new apartment.
>Learn your neighbor is an anthro cougar, a furry milf, a fuzzy mommy, 9/10 body
>See her daughter sometimes, but most of the time don't
>You get the feeling they don't get along.
>Cat-mommy invites herself over for a house warming.
>Small talk, get a little tipsy
>Her husband was some limp dicked cat that got himself killed.
>Daughter resents her for that for some reason
>Something to do with keeping her body in shape.
>You're not listening. You decide a body like hers shouldn't go to waste.
>She is surprised at first, then resistant as you insert your human cock
>No barbs, just a big mushroom shaped head that causes her eyes to roll back
>First time you cum, she stops thrashing
>Don't pull out, but keep fucking her
>Second time, she starts moaning
>Third time, she's got her legs wrapped around you.
>After that, she wants you to use her.
>Abuse her
>Put new kittens in her.

>There's a reason the anthro cops don't send female officers into Humietown
>Actually there's a reason no anthro goes into Humietown
>The last time anyone from the force went in to investigate a noise complaint they were found six months later in a sex dungeon, heavily pregnant and missing all their clothing
>The weird part was that she wasn't chained up, the door wasn't even locked
>She fought and begged to be left down there when her former coworkers tried to drag her out
>What kind of drugs and torture techniques they used to corrupt a once proud officer of the law into a sex addict no one knows for sure...

Do anthro girls even grasp the concept of wearing clothes? They’ve been isolated from human society for so long that they’re used to being naked. I believe humans create anthro clothes specifically for female anthros to wear. However, they’re extremely skimpy, but anthros can’t grasp that they’re being objectifying and think this is normal for anthros to wear.

>No mice colony to physically fight each other over which one gets to be your cocksock for the day and gets thrown into the trash before bed.

I wonder if female anthros have a shameful fantasy on being mated by a human? Considering mating a human is considered taboo among anthros.

The good thing about mice is that since they multiply so quickly you don't really have to worry about being rough with them. You could use a different onahole everyday if you wanted to

>they multiply so quickly
That alone is hot as hell. Imagine getting your tiny cumrag-slave pregnant after her little pussy gets utterly flooded with your cum whenever you use her. She not only has to struggle to pleasure your giant cock, she also ends up being a baby-factory for your offspring.
>make use of her every day, several times
>she jerks you off with her arms and legs wrapped around your dick, or being pinned under it while you rub it against her whole body
>your loads are big enough that they almost cover her entire body
>coating her face completely so she almost can't breathe, smearing her tits and body, drenching her fur and leaving her sticky all over
>it seeps into every orifice, her mouth, her ears, her ass, her pussy
>or you deliberately cum between her legs, coating her crotch and flooding her little cunt
>surprisingly (or not), she becomes pregnant
>it happens fast, her belly swelling in just a couple of weeks or so
>she gives birth to a litter, and they grow up to become larger than all other mice, obviously fathered by a human
>you knock her up again and again, as she milks your cock and you use her body like a cumrag

Having hundreds of servants/pets/slaves feels a bit impersonal and kind of more like a chore, especially if you want to treat with all of them.
Better to have a closer, more personal interaction with fewer toys than spacing out your interaction with too many of them until the effect on them becomes negligible.

>You notice that your teenage college student has trouble paying attention
>She's staring right at you but you can tell her mind isn't on the lesson
>Oh ew she's drooling
>It's soaking into her top and-
>Her nipples are hard
>Face blushing
>Dopey smile
>Still staring at you
>Thankfully unlike the actual retards in your class this is a student you can actually help

Why are dogs the goodest of pets?

>first animal to be domesticated
>literally longest time to become symbiotic with humans
>Usually used as a partner in an activity like herding or hunting or guarding instead of just passive livestock
>in super close proximity to humans, Often was used as a bedwarmers instead of alienated cattle, and literally the closest animal to the Family for Millenia, Greek philosophers and writers (like xenophon) had entire subsections of their immortal texts dedicated to their personal dogs so that their memory too would be remember.
>creates personal loving bond with you as leader of a pack. "Mans best friend"
>Intellegent, will bark and gets someone's attention if you get stuck down a well.
>not an asshole cat
>Insatiable need to please their human master
> super horny
They are the bestest of pets. A dog girl would definitely be a humans number 2 in a haram/collared scenario

>Dogs are so in tune with human emotions they can gauge our feelings better than even chimps or gorillas, despite evolutionary distance.
>Dogs get depressed if you show active favoritism towards one dog over another.
>Have been known to attack their own puppies because master suddenly decided he likes them more than mom.
Dogs are yandere as fuck.
They're completely fine with you fucking around with as many girls as you like. Hundreds if it pleases you. But you MUST remember your good girl. For the other girls sakes.

What if there was a Hot Topic in this universe that sold anthro domestication gear?
There's something for every species!
For canines and felines:
• Collars and ownership tags made to order
• Leashes and muzzles
• Nail caps to prevent scratching. They come in silver, gold, and vinyl colors
Bovines:
• Cattle eartags and cowbells
• In the backroom they offer branding and aftercare kits
Avians:
• Engraved ankle bracelets and bangles. Flight trackers sold separately
• Falconry hoods
All things aquatic:
• Fishhook shaped earrings and gillrings
• Sushi-shaped keychain accessories
• Fishnets, fishnet lingerie
Cervids:
• Air-powered nerf shotgun and rifles
• Cover scent lotion
• In the backroom they offer DIY antler trimming and removal kits. Rack sold separately
And like any self-respecting mall store they offer in-house 'chipping' services. With permission from their owner, of course.

>bovine GF getting a brand of your choosing with the casual ease of a piercing at a mall kiosk
>make her strip down completely, ostensibly so she doesn't ruin her clothes
>french her as soon as the iron hits her flank
>everyone can see her submission running down her thighs as she shakily redresses
>canine GF asking your opinion on colors and styles of leashes and collars with degrading things or custom names written on them in gemstones
>eventually get a rosy red one with your name on it, a hot pink one that says something like 'Daddy's Bitch' and one that isn't anything special but apparently felt really good when you pulled on it fucking her in a changing room so why not
>feline GF gets caped nails
>anyone who sees them can tell at a glance their sole purpose is so you can dick her the fuck down 'human style' without getting your back torn to ribbons
>and that's a lot of people, since she's so proud to show them off because they match her eyes
>equine GF wants you to pick out a new riding crop
>only way to know what's good is to try them out
>her ass is red as a cherry under her skirt when you finally leave the store with your purchase
oh the lives we could have lived anons; had only fuzzy bitches existed

You think Furbois watch human dominating a female anthro? Like they fucking hate human males but can’t get their knots hard when they imagined a furgirl being railed by a human.

If you were to collar multiple anthros, would you rather have:
>Several of the same kind of anthro, a herd of sheep or a pack of dogs perhaps?
Or:
>A mix of several kinds, a cow with a cat and a mantis-girl, or something?

>debates rage over the benefit between what has been called positive enforcement and negative enforcement and which allows for happier anthros
>while negative enforcement, or punishment-led, often yields quicker results, it is positive enforcement, or reward-led, training which leads to happier anthros and their human masters

In 4,000 BCE,in the stone age, wood encasement is used to keep the captured "meat" fresh and for other reasons while penetrating anally to "encourage" the captured to secret milk for the tribe. The wooden encasement is tied to the fence to keep the captured off the ground while also acting as a weight onto the logs.
In 395 AD, in the age of the arts, captured animals are encased into the statues to incoporate an aspect of "movement" and "life" into the artworks.It's also sometimes use as symbolism againsts certain enemies or animals, encouraging hunting to provide for the country.
In 1965, who doesn't like waking up to bird chirping in the morning. Same goes for the moaning of a deer. Being able to keep a deer alive as a facade on the building gives an impression of "wealth" and "hunting prowess" to the owner of the building. It's also rumor to bring in more visitors into the building so these kinds of "facade" can be usually seen outside a museum or shops.

I feel like catching and collaring a Worker Ant from her nest might be the easiest and hardest way to get a good maidpet.
It’s easy because they’re kind of dumb when they’re working, or to be more polite, they usually work in a weird kind of hyper-focused, self-hypnotized, autopilot.
If you find one who was going to harvest fruit or something you could lead her right into your car with a box of jelly donuts.
And since there’s so many of them, and they’re usually all like that, it’ll take forever before they even notice she’s gone. They barely even search past their weird homesteads.
If you’ve ever seen an Ant living independently, it’s almost always because they got lost and found a normal city before they found their nest again.
Most nests just assume that’s what happens and drop the issue.

The reasons it’d be hard are well, she’s an Ant.
Even if she stands eye-level with your collarbone, she can still probably lift you up and carry you.
And their loyalty is surprisingly strong, which you’d want, but it does mean breaking them to change loyalty to you is a slow and gradual process.
There might be points I missed.
I’d still consider it worth doing though.

>you will never get to casually kidnap and bind anthros to abuse in bondage, keep as furniture, or casually enjoy snuff play with.
Imagine easily catching these deer sluts, and recording/calling some one while talking about how you'll be eating well for a while, but you'll keep one to pump into for a bit before releasing (because who wants to eat something they nutted in?) They'd squirm and scream through their gags pointlessly like the stupid anthros they were as you drove them home. You don't even have to be mean and hurt them, just the fear and desperation of it all because you have so much control of them sells it well enough as is.

>. You don't even have to be mean and hurt them, just the fear and desperation of it all because you have so much control of them sells it well enough as is.
This is the good shit. Since they are bound and gagged most of their stimulation is gonna come from you directly,meaning each time you decide to bring them out or use them they are gonna be terrified because it could be more rape or death

You could just treat them like stupid meat dolls desperate for their own lives or freedom too.
>have them all bound up standing
>tell them that only the one that entertains you the most gets the reward of being allowed to see or speak while you fuck them raw.
>they've been bound and abused for so long that they all wriggle pathetically trying to look 'sexy' or to just jiggle their tits.
>amused by how stupid and desperate they are
>pick a slut at random, enjoy her as you please.
>other two can be put in even more uncomfortable positions, whipped, or even further isolated so they can't even have the comfort of hearing their partners in captivity whimper in solidarity.
Honestly I'd keep one of these sluts standing in the living room indefinitely for me to use as a perverse dispenser. Suck, grope, or slap her tits on a whim when passing. Her whole life devolved to a living stress ball

>Pacifist ending happens
>There are still humans who distrust monsters
>One such group is your employer
>Be part of an elite task force designed to hunt monsters
>Your group gets word that they broke the barrier and are sent to neutralize them before a second war can break out
>Several of the monsters, including Toriel and Asgore, survive the skirmish and are kept in captivity
>As a reward for your hard work and accomplishments, you are allowed to keep Toriel as a sex slave
I know Sans would probably make this impossible but man just let me have this.

>Have a dating app for "hookups"
>Most of the dates I go on are with big fur dudes that wanna take me to their places to fuck
>Furboi's that look like girls that wanna fuck as soon as I meet them
>And actual anthro women that either turn me down as soon as we meet or just staight up ghost me
What should I do?

>pregnant pet anthros deliberately take alcohol a la brave new world
>their kind are happier, dumber, and sluttier as they are, living their lives eating, sleeping, fucking, breeding and living under the care of their human masters
>the one thing they do know is that those who keep their full minds crack from trying to process the complicated and cruel outside world
>they evolved to live simple lives, not this labyrinthine maze of modern society
>many don't live past 30, usually ending in suicide or OD
>the lucky ones get adopted by particularly merciful humans willing to accept broken anthros into their homes
>in exchange for their human master to handle all the difficulties of daily life they keep the home warm and comfortable with their eternal happiness, loving innocence, unconditional love, and raunchy fucking sex

>Your anthro abductions gets the attention of investigators
>Turns out only two detectives are working on the case
>The investigators are also female anthros
It's like they wanted to get captured and fated to your judgement
>To decrease the chances of any long-term injuries all students will be required to undergo a full body examination after every practice session
>Examinations will take place in the locker rooms and will require all students to be nude
>Any attempt in self-concealment and obstructing the human doctor will result in disciplinary action
>He will be allowed to use any method he deems necessary and it is the responsibility of each student to obey his instructions and allow him free reign to their bodies
>Expect invasive examinations

>To decrease the chances of any long-term injuries all students will be required to undergo a full body examination after every practice session
>Examinations will take place in the locker rooms and will require all students to be nude
>Any attempt in self-concealment and obstructing the human doctor will result in disciplinary action
>He will be allowed to use any method he deems necessary and it is the responsibility of each student to obey his instructions and allow him free reign to their bodies
>Expect invasive examinations

Fuck yes, that's hot as hell.
>previously proud warrior race was conquered by humans
>enslaved, they were fucked and bred by their human masters constantly
>generations later, they have developed an instinctual submissiveness and affection towards humans
>even the hardcore traditionalists who yearn for their past glory and pride can't help but feel certain things towards humans

>be anthro boy
>your human best friend starts fucking your anthro crush even though he knew you liked her
>you want to be mad but for some reason you just get hard thinking about him collaring and petting you while she sucks him off

Depends on the setting.
>Modern/Sci-Fi
Anthros were/are made through genetic engineering for the purpose of servitude to/ownership by humans. There are political movements seeking to give them rights and they have been successful for the most part, but many places and people still regard them as second class citizens or even less so, and an anthro can be made to lose their rights and personhood if they sign the wrong forms or go into the wrong places.
Worst of all, most anthros find themselves to eb instinctively submissive towards humans due to their genes making them attracted and complacent towards them by their very nature. Even the most proactive and outspoken anthro rights activist must have incredible willpower and still be careful to not take a whiff or look for too long at the wrong human, or else their might put themselves at risk of going weak on the knees.
>Ancient&Medieval/Fantasy
Anthros and humans exist in their own communities and civilizations, though some of them share the same towns and cities. Anthros are seen from noble savages, to barbarians, to overdeveloped beasts, to the freak experiment of some maddened wizard (sometimes true) by most humans, and are constantly fought, raided and enslaved by the commonly more civilized and developed human nations.
Anthros can fight back using their natural talents, but will often lose against human powers.
Anthros are treated as monstrosities to be killed, savages to be civilized, rare exotic pets and loyal and useful servants and slaves, especially after they've been broken using a multitude of methods, bith mundane and magical.
A rich suthern merchany might keep a harem of bunny girls for his perosnal use as well as to serve his human wives, but you might also see a northern commander with his muscle, a gigantic, terrifying she-wolf beast woman serving as his bodyguard and hitwoman (serving as the bad cop to his good cop amongst his troops) in public, but an obedient, playful pet in private

(YouTube) - Artificial insemination of honeybees - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=W1_LhfK-VN4
>She was royalty, queen of a hive, god of her domain, mother to her children
>And she was now the prisoner of a human, plucked from her throne as easily an apple would be stolen away from its tree during the harvest
>Beside her were many more bee queens
>And beyond them were the other fruits of the human's perverted harvest
>The hardy ant and the warrior wasp queens had also been captured
>Some were friends that she recognized, others enemies that she swore to slay the next time they met
>But most were unknown for there were dozens, possibly hundreds of fertile queens held in their cages, bodies nude and unprotected in this cold, sterile laboratory
>The queen watched in horror as the scientists worked closer and closer to her own cell
>They injected some kind of gas into the cages to pacify their victims
>Pleas for mercy and surrender went ignored as their eyelids began to droop in seconds and they laid limp on the floor
>And then the indignity began
>They pulled their legs open to unceremoniously reveal their royal sex, shoving in two savage-looking hooks to stretch their holes wide open so that they could insert a tube as deep as their depths went
>It was over in a minute
>She watched as her neighbor received the same treatment and then it was her turn
>It was an odd feeling, there was the pain of a headache but also of serenity
>She felt a cold breeze dance across her exposed privates but could offer no resistance
>The queen felt it all, the cold metal hooks easily pushing past her defenses until it broke through into her womb, rubbing up against the unfertilized eggs that slept in her belly
>She knew it was supposed to be painful and she was supposed to be screaming but the gas made it nothing but a bad dream
>The tube slid in easily then a heavenly warmth filled her abdomen, splattering her unborn children with foreign sperm
>They extracted their tools to her disappointment
>She almost didn't want it to end

Buy one kobold, get 2 free!

Or you can just capture them.
>Go to marketplace
>Carry an obvious gold pouch on your belt
>Find kobold pickpocket
>Get her attention, don't be too obvious
>Get her to follow you
>Go to an alleyway, turn a corner, then stay there
>Wait for kobold to catch up
>Once she makes the turn; tackle, bind, then gag.
>Instant kobold for free
You can start a collection with no cost.

Idea: Setting, IDk gene editing or something. Females are rnow snakes. they form bonds with their humans, and act as more or less constant cocksocks. They are pretty much symbiotic parasites. they can derive nutrition from the male organ, and you can cum straight through them. their continued attachment on someone actually pumps extra testosterone and other choice chemicals, getting them very masculine and generally superior. also, it Massively increases cum production (the snakes main source of sustenance, can be absorbed through either oriface). Oftentimes the male is chemically altered to near constantly leak a small stream of cum and the female snake is always at a minor level of orgasm gently messaging the cock unconsciously. More active sex can also occur which delivers a greater discharge of semen and a greater orgasm on the snakes part.
The relationship is kind of like a reverse anglerfish. instead of the male bemocing a vestigial semen dump on the much lager female. the snakes nervous system becomes connected with the males, so that the human, over time, can develop both control and sensation in the snakes body, almost acting as a cock extention. They can even shift if and when the snake is fertile. And since the snake gains all substance from their human partner, there is effectively no difference between their mouth and vagina. Men can even cum completely through snakes and into another girl! Borth orfi\aces lead to a internal womb.

Hey /collared/ I need some ideas for a story that I'm writing. Basic premise: ancient Romans are having a slave auction of anthro barbarians, and they use enchanted body piercings to mark the new slaves and control them. Protagonist is the goldsmith who does the piercings, he's closeted and is disdainful of anthros in general, but he really hates humans who keep bringing them into the enpire. Pic Related...
So I'm trying to come up with six or so little episodes of binding a different species, to do different tasks, and having a different kind of piercing or mod to match. Here's a few that I've come up with so far:
Minotaur is gonna be used as a stud for a cattle farm, but the new owner doesn't want them to fuck his wife and daughter. Gonna get him a permanent ring around the sack for ++Fertility, and a Prince Albert type charm that'll make him impotent around humans. Piercer realizes that the rancher's son has poorly-disguised cock lust for the bull, and subtly alters his enchantment so that the bull can't do anything to the women, but the son is still fair game.
Three foxes, mother and two daughters, going to be used as domestic servants. Pretty simple job, ear piercing as mark of ownership, but they're depressed that they're going to be slaves from now on. Any ideas for a twist on this one?
Zebra anthro being turned into a courtisan, gonna get the works. Ears nose and tongue pierced, chained nipple piercings, clit/pussy piercing, etc. What kinds of spells should they put on them?
Bird anthro musician, needs to have restraining clamps on her wings to prevent her from flying away, but still leaves her enough range of motion to be able to play her instrument.
Any other ideas? I'm trying to use as much real-life piercing technique and imagined magical system details as I can, The story's gonna have a happy ending, goldsmith's apprentice falls in love with a goat girl and needs his help to run away with her, goldsmith helps as long as they leave town.

I want to turn a cold calculating femme fatal villlenese reptile into a baby factory. all that immense intellect going to waste, soley focusing on her role of being a semi mobile womb and baby factory.
no more plans for world domination, no more plans of turning people into reptiles, just focused on MAKING more reptiles for her husband and bull. she no longer considers her 200IQ brain her primary organ, it is only a suplemental tool for the real "her" her womb. the thing her master uses. She uses her vestigial mind to come up with more and more gene alterations to make her a better, more dedicated babyfactory and fuckwife for humanity, the creatures she originally despised, but now worships. Knowing her daughters will literally be engenered to worship them to, not conquer the planet for the reptilians. At this point, most of her body mass is dedicated to her expanded and improved reproductive system, even making many automatic functions highly pleasurable semiconcious actions ,so she can focus her mind on what matterss: gestating her husband's children. You will often see her dull eyes and drooling, her effort being largely dedicated to broody behavior.

>teacher strips down to prepare for the first day of the class
>all of her students will be tested on how well they preform
>after a month of intense training she stops taking birth control pills and gets creamed by every one of her growing young boys
>at the end of the year whoever managed to impregnate her gets a special visit when he graduates

>with the increasing dominance of humanity and their destruction of traditional nectar harvesting grounds the queen of the hive has begun a secret war for their survival
>she has ordered every one of her millions of infertile workers to slut themselves out to any human man they see
>every drop that reaches their barren wombs is one drop less that reaches more fertile gardens
>non-penetrative sex is highly encouraged as well, anything that will result in a possible decrease in human birth numbers
>although weirdly it seemed like less and less workers were returning to the hive each night
>they're just super dedicated to the task, she thought
>but the moment the new batch of honey touched the queen's lips it was all over
>rich, filling, and somehow even highly addictive than nectar honey, the bees had accidentally found themselves with a second source of a newer, superior honey
>it was even said that the new honey was even better from the source, whatever it was
>regardless, the queen now decreed that each worker bee must return each night with a storage womb and stomach filled with this new honey
>eventually she herself ventures out at night to sample some of this newly discovered drink
>years later their traditional majestic hives lay abandoned, forgotten by their creators as the bees fully integrated themselves into a human-dominant society
>instead they live deep in the urban zone, running some of the cheapest yet still high quality brothels where all holes are free and patrons are required to cum inside
>even the queen can sometimes be seen shaking her royal ass for a crowd or even spreading her legs to display the birth of her latest daughter's egg
>pictured is a virgin bee princess servicing a very lucky guy with her thighs before mating with him to produce even more sluts
>she has been out of her pupa for not even five minutes and already she knows her place, sucking, licking, breeding, and generally slutting it the fuck up

Social bug anthros make for top tier lays
>millions in number
>lays thousands of eggs
>majority female
>11/10 milf queen
>will serve you til death
>ants are hardy, resilient, literally down to earth girls who build massive empires. They are also some of the smartest of the bunch, capable of creating economies to more efficiently distribute supplies, including organizing the best orgies.
>bees are girly girls, making the best sweets out there with the flowers they planted themselves. Sex is free and open in the hive, and everyone is free to do whatever whenever.
>wasps are warrior amazons, fly fast, die fast. If you can keep up you can help conquer other species. The craziest in bed but if you ever manage to overpower them they will melt in your hands.
>Termites are a weird type as they do not appear above ground frequently, but can be absolute darlings once you get to know them. Termite queens mate for life and make the best lovers. If she ever dies one of your daughters can turn into a fertile queen, if you're into that.

>Hey! You a spaceman, right?
>I need out of the planet. You nice man?
>How about now, you like my body? Can leave now?
>Ok, you can touch, still no?
>Wait, you let me go in spaceship? Thank you!
>Want me to stay in your room, never leave bedroom? Wear no clothes too?
>Ok...

>So she'd gotten the vaccine, Canid-25 was rampant and getting it meant your life, as you knew it was absolutely done-zo. The chance of vaccination side effects was so infinitesimally small; one in 30,000,000, effectively making it slightly better odds to win the lottery. For that matter, the retrovirus usually didn't have much of a side effect even then. The world had taken a hard right though and here we are. Some ended up with "wet-nose", some had tail nubins, some went color blind (and had their sclera turn black or amber.). If the change was minor enough they could hide what had happened, some folk weren't so lucky. Some ended up as full on humanimals, or "furries" or "awoos", or any of a dozen nicknames for humanity's newest minority. In the entire world, roughly 2,500 of these hybrids existed as a result of being inoculated against the canine/human distemper virus.
>At first her symptoms were very minor, slight dizziness, a little bit of swelling at the site of the injection. Madeline didn't think much of it and went back to work the same day. It wasn't until a few days passed when she noticed a bit of peach fuzz around the spot she got the shot. A few more days and she noticed a strange feeling as she adjusted her blouse (a quick check in the ladies room revealed a set of new nipples; 3 on each side, had appeared along her torso.). She read up online, and started losing sleep over what she found. Madeline read accounts of hybrids losing their citizen status, some even being imprisoned or killed since they were no longer covered under any laws. "Oh fuck, oh fuck oh fuck!" she whispered desperately after reading the latest headline "President Eric declares federal bounty on all dog-people."
>She went to work anyways, after taking a quick inventory. Her teeth had somehow lengthened and sharpened overnight. Her gums turned a burnt brown, she shaved fur that sprung up around her pubes. She was thankful that there was still a mask advisory in effect.
>Returning to the Ultor Beauty Mall, Madeline made a quick rush for the Employee break room (and accompanying restroom), Cosmetics were a specialty and she had to powder her nose... as well as wax her brows, pluck those weird new hairs around her upper lip, apply her base, and decide whether she can get away with wearing shades. Though a chime from her phone reminds her to get back to her office to arrange her day planner. "Maddeeee" she hears coming from the stall behind her. "Eugenia," Madeline responds "it's Ms. Beaumont, or Madeline. We've spoken about this." her co-worker tittered with mock cheer, "Call me Ginny! Eugenia is so FORMAL.". "Yes, Ginny, it's time to get back to work I think." Madeline quickly put her mask on to the dubious looks of 'Ginny'. They both made their way out to the sales floor Ginny with an "Associate" badge and herself with the "Supervisor" moniker attached. Madeline flattened her shirt back against her abdomen drawing in a sharp breath when nipples that hadn't always been there brushed against the rough fabric, a faint feeling at the base of her spine caused her to straighten up instinctively.
>Most of the day went by without much incident, though the last few hours were an absolute slog. Madeline stared down the clock for the last hour. "See you tomorrow, Mad-Dog!" Ginny offered, as they left. Madeline considered dressing her down for insubordination but thought that it could wait for the next day. And yet, when she was at home, all alone, she began to consider the ramifications of what the Associate had said. Madeline held her wrist thoughtfully, it was sore with the suggestion of "growing pains", her feet, which were always sore ached in an entirely new way and her nails, all of them had darkened and started to raise into a talonish shape. Madeline looked behind her and grimaced that nub didn't seem at all like a good sign.
>Another day, another inventory. Madeline checked the mirror and renewed her dread. "Just call in." she whispered at the narrow face looking back at her. "Just tell them you got the Canid... you were acting weird yesterday anyhow." she lied to herself. Yesterday, Ginny aside went swimmingly... or at least no different than a thousand other days. Madeline put her hand up to her face and jumped at the sight. Her nails had rounded upward, the tips were darkened and sharper. She started to hyperventilate and gripped her counter hard enough to leave several pits. She removed her shirt and nearly fell over. Her tits were almost half their size, with much smaller ones filling in under them. She cringed while running a finger along the happy trail leading up her body. "I uh... shit." She grabbed the shaving cream, and a few nicks and scrapes later, decided she'd have to wear a dark wine colored blouse today, also an undershirt.
>Later, at the building, she gripped her steering wheel. "No one knows you're here, just... just call in sick." she repeats the phrase three times knowing that she's still going to ignore her own very sound advice. She pulls the driving glasses from her visor and gets up to go back to work.
>Gloves, a godsend, and maybe some fake lashes... big and gaudy. A LOAD of eyeshadow to cover up they changes in her eyes. Some wax, and uhh.. FUCK, there's Ginny. "Hey Maddy," Ginny says in a sing-song voice "what's barkin'?" "Ms. uh, Ginny...." Madeline sighs, "this is not really a good time." "Oh," Ginny comes right back, "nervous about tonight?" "Tonight?" she says thinking (what's toni- OH... fucknuts! Store fucking Project fucking NIGHT.) "no Ms Anders, we have a very busy schedule besides."
>She kept disappearing throughout the day. Back to the bathroom for checks, touch-ups, personal inventories. Teeth sharper, ears growing pointy too, and golden fur, sprouting seemingly by the minute. ***The store is now closing, please make your way up.*** thank GOD!
>"Mads!" the associate squealed, kicking in the restroom door. "Guess what TIME it IS!" Madeline nearly jumped out of her skin, she'd forgotten that they were staying over. "Yes Ms. Anders, I know what time it is. How about you get st-" Ginny interrupted with a formidable scowl "No, bitch, "she began "that's what you are, aren't you? You're a little bossy bitch." Ginny then pulled Madeline's mask. "I was right, I was FUCKING RIGHT!" she laughed. "Oh, bitch, you and I... we're gonna do some shit." Madeline slowly stepped backwards, "Ms. Anders, I th-think you've made a mistake, you sh-" Ginny then continued, ignoring Madeline. "So Maddy, I ever tell you I used to have a dog named Maddy? She was great, I used to have ALL KINDS of FUN with her." Ginny then smiled cruelly. "Me and my boyfriend both had fun with Maddy, good times... MADDY."
>Madeline turned to make for the door before she suddenly slammed to the floor. Ginny had pushed her, hard. She scrambled on the floor for a second gasping, "Somebody, help!" when Ginny pinned her to the tile. "I told everyone to take off, that you me and Michael will take care of tonight... speaking of which. HEY MIKEY!" Miichael peeked into the door, his eyes widened immediately. "Oh FUCK Ginny, you were RIGHT!" "Wait, Mike," Madeline began "you don't ha-" *SLAM* Madeline saw stars after her head bounced against the tile. "Bitches don't talk, bitch." Ginny laughed cruelly. "Hey Mikey, check this out." Ginny stripped the bottoms off of her boss. Madeline blushed under golden fur. "this COOKIE is hot for stuffing!"
>Ginny pressed Madeline's face deep into her own crotch, the musk of 3 days shower-free hits like a bus. "Maddy, my Maddy, you need to start cleaning me up, be a GOOD GIRL and I'll squirt out a big treat!" Madeline struggled against her captor's box, tried to fight, something about the smell though, she had nearly escaped into her head when she felt him, Michael straddling up behind her. "Muh-Michael..no." she pleaded.
>The following hour was a blur of humiliation, of enormous pain, of vile & spiteful shit rained down upon Madeline. Ginny twisted sensitive and new nipples saying "THIS is for making me take 2 weeks off when I got CANID, THIS is for making me wear a mask for an entire MONTH after they said we didn't have to!" Ginny also pissed straight into Madeline's face, while Mike deposited the contents of his nuts up into Madeline's snatch, her backside involuntarily rutting back towards him. "This one is thirsty a.f. babe!" Mike giggled, poking his thumb deep into her tail-hole. Madeline wept quietly on the floor, "please, please just... let me go."
>"Go where, Maddy? Way I see it, ya can't go back home now, way I see it, I think we got ourselves a new doggo. Maddy, make like a dog and clean yourself up." Ginny pushed Madeline's face, first onto the floor, "It's yellow," she laughed, like your piss yellow fluff. LICK IT." Madeline obeyed with shuddering breath, "That's a good bitch, now clean yourself up." Ginny then bent Madeline's torso, impossibly across itself until she was face deep in her own crotch. "Do it!" Madeline gulped and made one last plea, her eyes regarding her captors. "Do it, bitch!". Repulsed at the idea, she stretched her tongue out, hot liquid bubbled up her throat, hot goo bubbled out of her cunt, Madeline swallowed both down. She watched as her own tail (!!!) curled towards her face, squeezing more spunk out of her hole.
>"Now, what's your name, bitch?" Madeline looked up at Ginny "I'm" Ginny choked her and gave her a threatening look. "My name is..." she rasped. "Mikey," Ginny said ominously, "I think she needs a reminder." Michael was on top of Madeline with the quickness, pulling her jaw down as he rammed his cock straight down her throat. "GLLLRK!" she screamed. "Right," said Michael, "your name is "Maddy. Say it WITH ME" "HHNMGLLUCK-gluck-AAA-hhhgk-EEE" Maddy screamed into his dick. Michael then held her head firmly against his pelvis.
>Maddy, throat very raw, lay on the floor now. Left alone in the restroom. Michael and Eugenia were both in the hall nearby loudly fucking. She looked to the windows, far too small, she stood up and saw herself in the mirror. "Oh... GOD." she hissed. How did she even think she could come to work looking like this. "I, got, I I I, " she said to the dog lady in the mirror. She picked up her clothes and approached the door. Did they HEAR? She asked herself, she reached out a... PAW... hand? Curled it around the handle and *bam!* the door flies open again sending her straight back to the floor, clothes fluttering all around her. "OH MADDY!" Ginny chirps, "we gotcha a surprise!" Maddy looks around dazedly and reaches out her hand before she feels the snap of a collar around her throat. "Wha-" she begins before feeling a sharp jolt against her windpipe "Hey!" another jolt "WHAT!" the third one pretty definitely told her all she needed to know - shock collar -. "Mikey left a mit of a bess down there!" Ginny says. before spreading her browneye straight onto Maddy's face. "'fraid I'mma need a DEEP CLEANING!" "Hey!" *zap* "Nnnn" Maddy instead backs away a little, *zap zap ZAP!!* Ginny holds a remote teasingly in front of Maddy. "Get to WORK, bitch!" Maddy then presses her face against the other girl's ass *ZAP!" "What do we say?" "WHAT?" *ZZzap* "Say yes, mistress! Or Yes Mistress Ginny!" "Oh," Maddy sighed... "Yes m-mistress" she whispered. "Louder" GInny sang wiggling the control again. "Y-y-yes Mistress" *zap*. "This bitch is insatiable!" Michael says as he returns, He pulls Maddy's cheeks spreading her asshole. "Hey Mikey" Ginny demures "I want to see if something works here. Got another fuck in ya?" "As ever. " he brags. Maddy winces, no way to get away without pushing deeper into an asshole, and she knows what's coming. Mike's cock feels like it's spitting her in half. Madeline weeps pitifully into the woman's fartbox. "Deeper, BOTH of you!" Ginny demands.
>The dog girl's stomach churned the nasty soup in her gut threatened to shoot out of her if she so much as thought about it. "Maddy, maddy maddy maddy." I know that tongue of yours can get just a little... " Ginny gave a quick push, jamming the girl's face deeper and ejecting the last of Mikey's load straight into her maw. This final bit was enough to make Madeline cough eliciting a fresh bout of zaps, she swallowed it all down again, dryly. Wheezing as the man thrust up into her guts from the other side, threatening to push it all up again. **zZZzZZZAp!** "Can you feel it Mikey?" "Feel what? Feel DEEZ N-" *zap* *ZAP* "no, don't feel nothing." Ginny is more than a little bothered, "Bitch, go slob on his nob." she says, pulling Maddy's head with both hands. "why are you doing this?" she whispered in protest. "Fucking do it!" *ZAP* Maddy saw Mikey's dick, a tuft of matted fur near the tip, and it looked like something brown on it too... oh fucking hell, she thought. "ASS TO MOUTH!" Michael cheered, "Bitched love ass to mouth, don't you?" "Yes?" Maddy asked. "Yes MASTER!" a zap followed by a cackle from Ginny. "Yes Mast-" and all of his dick was back down her throat. "Can you feel it NOW?" *ZZZzzap!!!* "HEY! Yeah, hey... do it again?" *ZAP ZAP ZZZZAP* "Kinda tickles!" Madeline can't stop the hork from blasting up out of her. "Stupid fucking bitch, puked all over my dick!" she hears before the world goes black.
>Ginny and Mike later made Madeline's home into their own. Her shock collar was tied to an invisible fence so she couldn't leave anymore. They still fucked her a lot (not as much as the first night, and if Mike seemed to interested, she could expect a steady amount of punishment to follow.), Ginny would make her do housework and eat dog food, and surprisingly ended up with Madeline's job... which she rubbed in Maddy's face almost constantly. Mikey brought home a pitbull to see if they could breed her, didn't really do anything aside from rip up her cunt. Now they're on the lookout for a male hybrid. Mike dicks her down regularly on the DL in case HE is able to put pups in her. Madeline addresses them as Sir/Master or Mam/Mistress and to herself as Maddy now. She lays broken now, just waiting to be used like a toy, and treated like a dog.

>So yah... we've been having problems Here at Jurassic park with repeated, ah, incidents of many sorts with our creations escaping and causeing untold havok etc etc, tbqh its been overstated...
>However, by public, stockholder, and international pressures we have been forced to come up with a way to ensure the good behavior of our creations.
>We have repeated underestimated both the animal cunning and the reproductive flexibility of them, and a permanent solution was necessary
>So many of our best and brightest (and seemly also deviant). observed that one of their numbers, Owen Grady formed a particularly efficent bond with a number of Velociraptors, and the eggheads used this as the base for a solution.
>Instead of replacing key psychological components of the specimens, they simply increased the prominence of maternal, submissive, and mating impression in their psychology and replaced the object of these instincts towards male human organisms.
>Further physical manipulation in the genes also caused them to become all female species', and inception only being possible through specifically augmented human male genetic tissue. Making them both psychologically and reproductively dependent on their handlers at the park.
>In addition, minor enhancements where made to the handlers themselves including increase in sexual organ efficiency, muscular bulk, and subdermal carbon-nano tubing to better wrangle with their various charges
>Despite the projects odd nature, it has been a resounding success! There has been (almost) no casualties or catastrophes since its implementation.
>Even when various clever girls somehow escape their reserves, they tend to try and seek out a handler rather than otherwise maul and attack random passersby (usually). And once they are satisfied, they are usually docile enough to be picked up and placed back in their reserve.
>Many handlers have taken to staying near 24/7 in the reserves in order to prevent such breaches. what brave lads.

>MGS revengence world, war economy is in full motion
>Eventually it was determined that women and children were not economically viable in the war economy, so the greater war economy created mobile wombs Using tech from bladewolf prototypes, synth organic components collected from the Data from the FROG supersoldeirs, and some metal gear information to create a more effective breeding and fighting unit.
>The genewolf
>Most major PMC's use them both as active combat units, as well as stress relivers and in combat troop replenishes.
>they have a dumbie ai moddled on bladewolf, but with a feminine personality matrix and less (but not completely removed!) of that troublesome independent thought capability.
>However, their synth pleaser and maternity instincts are very real and they are devoted to their charges. Nanobots connect them psychologically with their handlers own cybernetics and they turn into very effective combat unit pairs that can bear new combat units on the feild, unburdening the great logistical expenses and problems in recruiting and training new members from the civilian sector.
>Even pencil pushers tend to have genewolf secretaries and fuckcompanions to ease their work and "personal" loads. conception can be turned on and off ass needed and deemed necissary by the higher ups, though some combat soldiers have learned how to splice into their wards for unauthorized customization.
>all and all the genewolf project has increased productivity over 69% in the course of the last few years, and the rates of psychological instability has decreased by a similarly staggering mark! Implementing a new "Normal" for the human race and making quarterly earnings much more predictable!

Yeah, /collared/ would be something like:
>you crushed the local anthro tribes
>as a soldier, you could pick any of the captives you wanted
>themales have been butchered to a man since they had been too stupid to surrender
>the females were attractive
>some of your brothers were freaks, one of them even trying to find the prettiest among those with the bodies of a eight year old
>but you wanted something more mature
>there was one, a lupine with oak-brown fur and bright redwood-colored belly
>the other female anthros were getting agigathed, desperate to attract the attention of one of the humans before they were branded and transported away for sale
>they presented their buttocks, spread their lower lips, others pressed their breasts together and traced their nipples top to buttom and up again
>a few glared hateful at your pick, but such was the fate of the losing party
>you looked forward to breaking your new concubine in

Soft or hard Dom, it would depend on the conditions you acquired your pet.
If they're war slaves or otherwise come from a life of "freedom", you'll need to domesticate them and teach their place. This could include breaking their independence, or reward already submissive traits, really depends on their personality and the life they came from.
If they come from a hard life or had unkind relations (like a tribe, mate or such), showing a stern but caring attitude would be reccomended, to keep them in their place while still making them see you as a better option than the life they had before. Limits the risks of them attempting to flee.
If they're slaveborn and are already properly domesticated to serve Human masters, do as you please for they've been breed to serve.
As for the mentioning of "Equality", you can give the impression of "equality" if it helps keeping them in line. This I would reccomend in case you got a group of pets; reward the alpha bitch with some extra attention and she'll help keeping the others in line and submissive. Works extra well if she's the mother as well.
Alternatively, you can use the idea of "Equality" if you want to "promote" a pet or slave to "Housewife". This is more risky, but can be a great way to ensure loyalty. Once again however, it really depends on how you acquaired your pet and how much you've had to pull the leash to keep them in line.

>hear something go bump in the night
>get up and creep through your own home
>hear the bump again, coming from a walk-in closet
>discover it's just your pets having some fun
>might have a little fun yourself, now that your awake

>master is finally awake
>corrupted by his constant affection, can no longer think beyond pleasing master
>his other pets corrupted (women originally indifferent with each other)
>brought together by their common, corrupted lust for their master, who gives them their sole purpose for existence

>Neolithic era.
>A starving anthroWolf bitch is looking for shelter from the rain.
>Comes across a camp of Humans.
>All men.
>Food on the fire, warmth, company…
>With no other options, the bitch tales the chance and approaches the Humans.
>They’re alerted to her presence. They pick up their spears in case she is there to hurt them.
>Too weak to be much of a threat, the wolfess lay on her back submissively, spreading her limbs when doing so.
>One brave Human lowers his spear and sits down, gesturing to her to get closer.
>He offers her a piece of the meat when she oblige.
>Tense at first, she soon relaxes as the warmth from both the fire and his hand on her back spreads through her body.
>She starts following the Humans from then on.
>At first she remain at the outskirts of the group, but as time goes on, she stay closer and closer to them.
>She even starts helping them hunt, and they reward her with the biggest piece of the game when she leads them to the good game.
>One night she wakes up with the men surrounding her.
>At first she beleives that they’re petting her heavily as their hands run across her fur.
>As their hands explore and grab her forms more, she finally smell their arousal.
>She was hesitant at first, bit did nothing to stop them as they proceded to take her one by one.
>This became the norm every night from then on.
>Eventually she would have daughters, and like their mother, they would obey they Masters.

>15000 years later
>a lonely anthro dog bitch is waiting for her master to return home
>hear his car pull up
>run to the door and wait with her tail wagging
>as soon as the door opens jump him and smother him with doggy kisses
>he's laughing and petting you
>you both run to your bed
>you get in position as he drops his pants
>orgasm as soon as he enters you
>this is your daily life

but man has always had easy domesticated existences with their favoures, horses, canines, felines, and others of that ilk get the perpetual pampered end of the stick. Bur some animals get the shit end of the stick.
rabbits, rats, hogs, hares, and mice are still detested pests to this day and this pack of rats who live in the apartment have reached the end of their host’s willingness to take it. Somebody at the end of tonight will have herself get thrown out the front door to join the rest of ratkind in skulking around in the back alley and sewers.

Yeah. Fuck that. A harem of quazi-Skaven girls would be awesome.
Fun story complication. Take a look a little critter called an Antechinus. Technically they're marsupials instead of rats but whatever. Mating for the males of this species is a frenzied form of suicide.
So mating for our rat-girls here is a dangerously violent, scary, and potentially injurious traumatic experience with the male eventually dying afterward. The girls themselves fall into a hissy spitting insane combative mindset for the event if it only allows her to better flee right after. Sure, a human can take them on, but it's gonna involve some heavy bondage. Fun part of the story? Now imagine the morning after scene when our she-rat awakens only a little sore, and in a pleasantly groggy and high as a kite happy state. Weirdest of all, she's not alone, being cuddled up to a male mate who is healthy, sane, satisfied, and obviously utterly safe to be around. Might take her a little bit to process that last though. Safe sex is human sex in this harem.

>their penchant for cleanliness and their dignified demeanor must make them ideal for a high-class setting like an imperial palace or mansion.
I kinda like that idea. They're basically trophy wives... or trophy sex-slaves, in this case. They're there to look good and be enjoyable, rather than acquired out of any genuine affection.
>be high-status guy with catgirl slave
>she wears beautiful dresses and outfits, and carries herself with dignity and grace
>everybody knows she's just your cumdumpster but nobody ever says that to her face due to how elegantly she behaves

>Safe sex is human sex
This is something i feel is often forgotten. Humans are one of the very few species that is capable of mating for pleasure and companionship.
More commonly in the animal kingdom, it’s either a hormone(heat/rut) indiced state, rape, an suicidal endeavour or otherwise. All for the slightest chance to pass on your genes.
Imagine then, in an ancient anthro society where those animalistic strategies are buildt into the cultural fabric, the very concept of Human endurance, tenderness, and ensuring pleasure for your partner(s).
It’s no wonder that Humans would come to dominate, when even an anthro slavegirl could have a more tender and fulfilling sexlife, than most free, and even aristocratic, anthro females. Why wouldn’t the pampered Queen then envy the dominantes slave of a good Human Master?

>be a queen of a great land
>mountains of gold, great wines, extravagant palaces
>and yet, no one to pat your head
>no one to call you a good girl
>plenty of studs to breed you an heir
>but no one to love you
>to passionately make love to you, regardless of whether you promised him a child or not
>to open your heart up to
>anthros have sex to breed, and to breed only
>very few females ever achieve orgasm with their own kind
>humans have sex because there is no other way to get closer to their mates
>they source their pleasure both from their cocks and from the pleasure felt by their lady
>they literally feel good from making their partner feel good
>they have entire schools on how to better please a female
What value does precious metals and gems bring to a queen's life if she doesn't even have someone to cuddle with after sex?

I definitely like the idea of being "bought" by some great queen only to slowly reverse the roles in the bedroom until she's the moaning sex slave behind closed doors.

>An anthro Queen buys a human slave for pleasure.
>She is finally able to play out all the dirty little fantasies that she’ve held on to.
>Anthro males were not up for the task, as they lacked the endurance, stamina and pleasingly-shaped anatomy.
>That is not an issue with the human.
>As his endurance keeps outlasting hers, she eventually starts to become more daring. More inclined to the more perverse ideas.
>The court have to bear withness as their Queen openly uses her slave at all times of the day, even at great ceremoniens and open court.
>They cannot do anything about it, for the Queen’s rule is absolute.
>As time goes on, she becomes more addicted to feeling the dick in her at all times.
>His warmth, caress and voice, she needs it at all times now.
>She promotes him to royal consort. It’s only logical seeing how he’s with her at all times.
>As she becomes more addicted to be told by him What to do, to do as he wants, to feel him cum inside of her, she begings to neglect her duties more and more.
>She delegates more of the responsibilities to him. It’s only ligical since his words always sounds right in her ears.
>And she’s there with him at all times anyway, so it’s not like she’ll be abandoning her duties or ve out of the loop, right.
>With all the responsibilities he now hold toward her (and the people), lets make him King.
>He’s already the Master of her heart, mind, and body after all, so it’s only logical.
>Right?
>Well, seeing how good she’s feeling underneath him, feeling the weight of his body rather then that of her former crown, it can only be right.

>Traverse the savannahs in a large safari hunt
>Track down, chase, and capture roving tribes of gnoll savages
>Gun down the males too slow to escape
>Tire out and chase down the women.
>Net them, tackle them, even a bolas a few.
>Relish the sounds of them screeching, weeping, or failing to fight back.
>keep them bound tight together, or individually in curled up bundles.
>Enjoy a night of revelry while they're kept in their massive groups of whimpering spotted fur.
>They can only cry or seethe at the sight of you manhandling and claiming whichever you personally fancy.
>Pack them up the next day and drive them back into town to sell as cheap slaves.
>Gnolls are nothing more than stupid savages that don't know how to stop breeding like the even meeker rabbits. Perfect group of furs to harvest time and again for slaves & profit.

>After the conquest and ravaging of mother nature herself, the wild anthro tribes have been carelessly shoved into reservations
>The lucky ones survive by selling their culture, their bodies, and the freedom to do whatever while in the reservation for the amusement of human tourists
>The unlucky ones have to suffer a different kind of tourist
>They live in small villages hidden in the vast forests, desperately praying that they are spared the cruel fate of those who are unlucky enough to be found during the great hunt
>Those that fight are slaughtered, those who surrender are humiliated, and their females and children are defiled in the ruins of their homes
>Pictured is a captured princess, bound under a sacred tree with her legs forced open so that her captor can take one final commemorative photo of her virginity before it too, is destroyed
>the harvest concludes with the complete eradication of their settlement
>The captured are processed like livestock, bound, tagged, and stripped of what little pride and clothing they have left
>Families are broken and the pieces either sold off or kept as breeding stock to replenish the reservations
>The weakest and submissive males are picked out and made into studs, forced to breed whatever female is presented to them so that they may birth children who will become easy targets for the next hunt
>To truly break their spirits they are sometimes forced to breed their own mothers and sisters under threat of torture
>After years of breeding and suffering they are finally released back into their original lands once the tribe's numbers has been replenished
>They are allowed a few decades to rebuild, breed more slaves, and to forget until memories of humans turn to myth
>But no worries, there are thousands of reservations and anthros that humans can cycle through them and have the great hunt every year

>Dumb tribal furs start offering slaves as sacrifice to the humans they know that're coming.
>They send their most beautiful, fertile, talented, and more to try to appease off their subjugators.
>All completely futile as once the sacrifices are swooped up and bred on the spot, the hunts still go on.
>The confused, paniced screams some anthros give into the dirt as they're held face down against the ground and raped never get old.
>and they never learn

I've been reading HMoFA and Collared from time to time and I want to ask the regulars a question. A few questions, to be accurate:
1. Do you view anthros as racial minorities?
2. Do you hate furboys because they are inferior blacks to you?
3. If anthro women are taken, bred and impregnated, are the anthro man enslaved?
4. Are anthro boys suffering from literal buck breaking?
5. Do they get feminised and impregnated too or they are worked to death?
6. Do you want to live in a Confederacy/Nazi Germany/Apartheid South African Republic but with furries instead of Africans?
7. Are other non-whites present, and if yes, what are their anthro equivalents?

You conquer the elephants rather easily, as expected. But what to do with the hairy alpha bull of the pack? You are a civilizing force, not a barbaric one, so you send him to work as your accountant, long memories and all. Of course, you are always next door, and the walls are thin, so he hears you fucking his former mates all day. The gruff burly mans man wouldnt admit it, but he is totally getting off to all of this. You know this too, its only natural for a beastkin, no mater its sex to feel naturally enwrapped by A human. You are a kind master, so you slowly over the course of months help him out with "supplements" so that he may please you just like the rest of the girls do. He a bit put off at first, But he comes to like being a "girl", which by all intents and purpouses he is. as part of the "treatment" was a chemical castration. His large elephantine cock is flaccid, and his balls are completely useless. Even when he is unbelievably horny, the best he can get up now is a slight pulse. He has accepted that it is mere window decoration now, to show what he ONCE was. He cant even really get off with the useless thing anymore, only anal stimulation gets him off, and even when he does, only a thin trickle of watery, impotent seminal fluid comes out of his downwards facing flabby member. And he loves it. parading the symbol of his total submission around, sucking off his master while filing appointments. That burly wissened old Elephant bull is long gone, replaced by a much better pseudo-cow. his useless equipment dragging lazily and impotently across the fine persian rug under masters desk. Maybe one day master will even find a way to fuck a baby into him like all the other good girls? silly little thoughts like this now being the preview of Anon's buxom shemale accountant. And he gives good head to boot. guess he has a lot of time to practice on his dummy rode.

>You are the governor of a young colony on a unclaimed continent.
>You are one of a select groups of Humans who have come to this new continent seeking to incorporate the local Anthro tribes.
>Back in your homeland on another continent, the Anthros have long been fairely treated by Humanity.
>A few lives in resevations, keeping their cultures and people pure, under the protection of Humanity, who occasionally comes to claim some of the pure stock.
>The majority of Anthros are servants, living a healthier, longer and more educated life than their still stone-and-copper-wielding Anthros.
>Anthro culture and genetics is stagnant, ever in danger of extinction due to their inability to adopt, so it is only right for Humans to claim their women to keep their species form going extinct.
>From what you have seen, the Anthros of this yet-to-be-explored continent are not that much different.
>Primitives unable to develop into the age of proper metalurgy and science, yet too strong headed and proud to bow to Humans.
>It was your job to incorporate them as peaceful as possible, even if you had to, you had the entire colonial army at your back and call.
>Imagine then your surprise, as you one morning see a group of Zebra chieftains, the leaders of a tribal confederation, comming to your palace to beg for aid.
>The chieftains, who had obviously once been mercenaries for the Humans, carry their payment - gold, silver and copper coins, as jewlery to show their prowes and skill.
>To see the otherwise proud Zebras on their knees, bowing to you, was not something you had expected to ever see.
>The Zebras came to you, begging you, so save their people.
>It would seem that the Elephants had joined together under a violent, expansionist warlord.
>Elephants were powerful and had strong hide, but they breed slowly, with gestation taking nearly two years.
>To grow his people, the warlord had seen to adopt the human custom of breeding outside their own people.
>Unlike humans however, the elephants were not kind masters, seeking to cull the other anthro tribes, and eventually the Humans.
>They had no respect for non-elephants, and their cruelty was taking its toll on the Zebras, who have no where else to run and no means to overpower the strong brutes.
>The chieftains begged you to save them.
>In return they promised to let your colony incorporate them and their lands.
>They know that they will have to hand over young females and males to you.
>They clearly are not too happy about it, but desperation and the risk of extinction have left them willing.
>All they asked for was that their holy place be left alone, and the tribes living their being allowed to keep to their traditions.
>It would make a good resevation for them, so it fits you fine.
>The Chieftains hands over their daughters - 14 of them in total, to seal their deal.
>Your consular and consort Mkira, a lioness you acquired during your first year to this land, turns toward you.
"What are your orders, your highness?"

>Deer communities/ghettos/slums are always found living next to human settlements
>both sides benefit from this, the deer gain access to protection and some economic opportunities
>and the humans gain access to doe pussy

The five stages of gym bitch domestication grief
Denial - "I'm not not one of those 'collared' weirdos. I just like his scent."
Anger - "I could beat the shit out of you, and you want me to act like your pet? Fuck off."
Bargaining - "Okay, I'll put it on the collar, but don't get any ideas."
Cope - "It's just a praise link, that's why I like it when he calls me a good girl."
Acceptance - "Please breed me, I'll give you lots of strong puppies. I promise I've been a good girl and worn my collar everywhere."

>be hunter chad
>sit in your cabin by the woods
>woods full of feral deer furs
>hunt down and shoot any bucks you see
>eat them or for trophy racks, who cares
>catch and rape any does you find. Easy to do when you set up feeders.
>Eventually does have to make a decision of staying closer to your hunting grounds/cabin for easy steady access to eat, or roughing it out like normal.
>Gets harder to make the decision the closer winter comes.
>eventually one doe will be desperate enough to just come up to you directly when you're chilling at home one day.
>don't even be mean to her. Just pet her down and give her what she wants.
>She learns then and there that good sluts live good lives.

>ywn have a femboy anthro roommate you can casually spank to emasculate him into his proper role in society.

>Everything after halo 3 is retconned (as it should be)
>After the human-covenent war everyone is depleted. Humanity mostly in terms of population, its economy thiugh is robust
>Sangheili have the opisite problem, lots of population, but they basicly functioned off of space feudalism and dont know how to get by outside of a theocracy.
>Human reps try to get the Elites kickstarted, but no luck, they are to stuck in their ways. Humans try to recoup colonies, but the pop is slow to bounce back.
> Radical, but necissary plan is made by ONI and some in the provisional elit high council.
>both know that the eratic feudal nature of the elites without the prophets will cause conflict with the regimented humanity, and a slow and torterous Human imperialism would occure from sheer administrative miosiscof th UNSC.
> To prevent this theyjointly proposed combining the species. Replacing the Prophets with Humanity.
>sangheili turned into thick broody subby amazons
>Male humans all given aupdated version of spartian augmentation
>Human women also turned into sagheili to help with the cultural consolidation efforts.
>meet with stunning success, and the repopulation efforts are going swimmingly Get a few dozen pairs on the high fertility treatment and send them to some lost colony and you get it up and running in a generation or two.
>Surprisingly, the elites took to the new normal very well, and even reveled in helping humanity to reassert itself. their respect for humanity blossoming in their very wombs. They took on most of human culture, but had some residual aspects of their own. having a perverse delight in being “civilized”
> hopeful experiments have also been tested on other former covenant member species as well and ONI plans to further reseach as a method to combat Kig-yar pirate raids,

I like the idea of that. Imagine living in an age where you could just buy anthro women as if they were nothing but a commodity or a pet. I'm a freak though, so I like the idea of them being bound up in boxes or vacuum sealed so they could be sold over the counter or delivered. Thanks for reading my rambling.

A casual world, where anthros are basically objects and and any action towards them, no matter how mean or in public, is socially acceptable.

Based, thanks a bunch. These threads are what made me get into their stuff. I can also enjoy taking it either way. They're either raised from birth to know their place as living toys, or they're just so dominated as 4th class citizens that it's common & they silently "suffer" under it. One of my friends liked the idea, and she came up with the scheme where if any of them fall into debt then they just lose their rights. I suggested that as soon as a female anthro hits the age of 30 and she remains unmarried, then she's immediately rounded up, stuffed in a little vacuum bag to be sold, and can be force hypnotized while in transit if a customer wanted to edit their pet before hand. Yeah I like bimbo milfs.

I love it when they're used for completely impractical purposes.
Sure, you could use a regular chair and table, or you could use a living slave who's only purpose is to be a table. You'll impress all your guests.
Public parks and lawns of wealthy individuals have numerous anthros, bound and immobile, doing various poses. They could be doing something useful, like sex dolls or hard labour, but society's perspective on them being literal objects makes people not care about practicality.

Oh hell yeah, absolutely. Imagine you just have a collection of anthros as furniture, but you keep bringing home anthro women to "romance." They're a little offput or scared by the fact that you have them, but they know they're lucky you're even giving them the time of day. They can hang around with you and slowly get used to it, maybe even feel superior to these dumb bound up whores. She'll even laugh when you tease her with jokes of "adding her to your collection." She giggles, a little nervous, but happy you're putting up enough of a show because you don't see her as meat. Meanwhile every other whore in the house, stuck there motionless forever, just screams in their head since they used to be in the exact same positions.

Imagine the porn industry in a setting like that. The amount of shit they could film and get away with.

I'm hardcore into forced feminization and widespread social domination. If I had my say, all porn would be STRICTLY only human men on female anthros. It'd be super draconian-dystopian (obviously) though, and everyone's internet usage was monitored since you needed to log in with your ID to browse anywhere. Furry women will be allowed to watch whatever they'd like, but furboys are stuck with videos specifically OK'd by some social welfare committee, or full on porn addict/hypno videos meant to convert them to being fags. The committee would be ran completely by furry women who hate the anthro male, so they only allow videos that show hardcore humanxanthro breeding. They're bothered and disgusted by furboys since they know that human men are just that much better. You'd probably have to put some some rule that human men on furs always only creates females, but this whole idea is already bananas.

What setting is best?
Prehistory, where primitive man tames the wolves & breaks the horses?
Feudalism or fantasy, where invading warlord armies, or sometimes adventurers, are brought to heel?
The age of colonialism, filled with the exploration and conquest of exotic locales?
A modern setting, with bored suburban housewives and office politics to exploit?
a far-future setting, with post-scarcity genetically modified sex toys and hot aliens?

Nice. I like your style. I had an idea for a fantasy setting where specifically "blessed" people were chosen to be adventurers. Adventurers could then recruit party members with like maybe 4 magic crystals, the details don't matter it's like pokemon if you need to think about it. Except those crystals are finite to each adventurer. Humans would always be adventurers, anthros would be party members. See, it's actually a dream for anthros to go on adventures and be the sidekicks to great heroes in all the stories they've heard. Bad news is that it's all just a trick, really. If a hero recruits you, he actually steals and binds your soul into the crystal so you're their slave forever. Slaves could have their physical bodies stored in a crystal too if their now master chooses to for storage. When trapped inside, they'd basically be in a state that the crystal's owner felt like, be it floating in a void, sleeping, or having their minds/souls bombarded with suggestions to submit. The kick is that you can replace some one that's in a crystal if you want, but they're immediately just dissolved away and their spirit is fed to your own powers. So it'd play out like this (since this is my favorite example.):
>walk up to anthro girl training to be a warrior
>talk her up, become friends.
>basically ask if she'd like to join you on a quest.
>excitedly, she says yes.
>say "great!" and simply press the crystal against her.
>immediately for her she's curled up floating in a black void, frozen in place.
>faceless, formless people surround her from all sides, raping her literally nonstop.
>as she's being pounded away mercilessly by whatever sort of dick you want her to be trained with, her mind is flooded with a voice trying to warp her personality by converting her into a slut.
>sleepless, no brakes, and just depraved.
>meanwhile for you, you're able to just pocket the crystal and forget about her for maybe a month

>Qtπ gf
>Both like furry art
>Both hate fursuit culture
>She wears a head and paws when she feels like a hard sub or wants punishment
>Roleplays a self hating hybrid anthro
>Talks shit on furbois
>Begs for your pure human seed
>Dirty talk about murdering "mutts" when she's close to climax
>Pillow talk usually includes her making fun of you for cumming for a furry
>Tfw you will never have this
It hurts, bros.

>go to meat section of grocery store
>looking for a good cut
>sifting through packages reading the details on them
>labels have a picture of the smiling cattle that made it
>age, height, weight and date of death just below
>pick out my dinner on who looked the cutest

>Be Anon
>Son of the only human shepherd in town
>He got the gene-augments to cocknurse the cattle
>Which means you got those augments
>You’ve seen dad around the farm feeding the lambs, and saw the milky stuff coming out of him
>No idea what it is, so you’ve been calling it dickmilk
>You realize you got the same when one day you try to take a piss and it’s white, smelling of melted butter.
>Tell your dad, he just nods and says one day you’ll be out there with him. But you don’t “got the fortitude yet.”
>You have no idea what that means
>Think nothing of it until your first sleepover.
>Dad’s got people coming and there’d be no space for you in the house while they did grown up stuff.
>Get sent to your best friend’s house.
>Cat boy(let’s call him Brent) you’ve known since kindergarten.
>Family is going through a rough spot cause their dad died and mom works double shifts to pay bills.
>Still it’s tight living for them.
>You think that cause dinner is just some frozen fishsticks their mom leave for you, Brent, and his sister(call her Kate).
>Kinda scraping it for two, not enough for three.
>Brent being nice lets you take some of his cause you’re his friend and his guest. PLay video games for a while but you can tell they’re both hungry.
>When it’s bedtime, you hear him trying to quiet his stomach. You can hear it across the room.
>Get an idea.
>”Hey Brent, I wanna show you something.”
>Pull down pants and pull up nightshirt. Whip out preteen penis, rub it a bit. Brent looking at you like you gone crazy.
>Dickmilk comes out. Offer him to drink.
>Brent is hesitant. Assure him your dad does the same to feed cattle.
>Brent gives your dick a lick. It feels good.
>Then Brent starts sucking. It’s really good.
>He keeps sucking. Sometimes he stops to breath, your cock still in his mouth. Feel his breath on your skin. Then he starts sucking again.
>Brent says it tastes like melted vanilla ice cream.
>Kate comes into Brent’s room. Sees her brother sucking your dick.
>Doesn’t scream like you think she does. She sniffs the air and thinks “Why does it smell like cream?”
>Brent explains. Kate says she wants some of your dickmilk too.
>Brent and Kate take turns drinking from you.
>You get the shakes every now and then. You didn’t realize it then, but it was your first orgasm.
>Nothing comes out after that. They tapped you dry.
>They’re full now and thank you for it.
>Next day, their mom is back with some donuts for breakfast, puts some more fishsticks in their freezer.
>She says she has work at the factory in a couple hours so don’t disturb her. She goes upstairs and falls asleep.. Brent says this is normal.
>None of you mention your dickmilk.
>She’s gone again while you and Brent are watching cartoons. Hear her drive away.
>Brent asks if he can try sucking you again.
>Since it felt so good you agree, and pull your pants down.
>Watch cartoons while Brent sucks you off.
>Kate comes in.
>Said she was thinking about your milk, how good it tastes, and how she hadn’t been so full in days.
>Once again the twins suck your cock, Brent takes a mouthful, then passes your shaft to Kate to get her fill.
>You run out when the cartoon ends. Which was longer than last time
>You and the twins start talking about why you lasted longer today.
>Maybe this is what dad meant by ‘fortitude’.
>When school starts again, you start sneaking off to the forest by the schoolyard with Brent and/or Kate to feed them.
>Every day you can do it longer and longer.
>You get to the point you can feed them during recess and lunch period.
>They start trading you their school lunches, so you’re sitting under a tree, eating three square pizzas while kittens drink your dickmilk.
>One day, Brent starts coughing. Says you suddenly tasted salty. Start to panic.
>Go home, and ask dad about it.
>Lie about the cats, say you tried getting a lamb to drink.
>Dad scolds you for trying too early. Says you’re becoming a man, and you just had your first orgasm.
>So you just came in Brent’s mouth. Dad tells you cum is for breeding, not feeding.
>You have no idea what that means. So dad takes you to the barn and shows you.
>He takes the prize sheepgirl Odessa, straps her to the mount and pulls out his own dick.
>Explains what sex is as he is jackhammering his cock into the bleating sheep. He explains what happens, and why there’s a difference between Feed and Seed.
>You were kind of an idiot back then. All you got was Feed goes in the mouth hole, seed goes in the bottom hole.
>Dad also said you shouldn’t be Feeding right now.
>"Feed is more than just nutrients and shit. Anthros who drink Feed get their brains rewired see? It starts a process that ties an Anthro to your pheromones and makes them functional only if they get a regular dose or they start gettin’ withdrawal.”
>”I only feed the sheep cause these girls hit rock bottom. They signed the waivers that said they knew they’d be dependant for the rest of their lives cause I’d pay for their livin’ expenses in exchange for their services. Sheep gimmie wool, I give em a place to sleep and Feed.”
>You being a horny idiot, heard none of that, and just watched Odessa blow your dad.
>You forget most of it by tomorrow when you meet Brent and Kate.
>You tell them you make Feed and Seed. Seed needs to go ‘down there’ so you can keep Feeding.
>This was going to be tricky, so you wait till school’s out and try it in the abandoned lot down the street. You all hide in a busted van with no wheels.
>Kate and Brent take off their pants. You note that your dad put Seed in a slit like Kate’s.
>So when they Feed from your(they went hungry all day), you tell them when the Seed feeling comes.
>They stop and you show them both how Dad put Seed in the sheep. Kate lies back and you grab her hips, lining your cock and sliding in. It’s...actually really hard. You push and push, and it slowly gives away, but damn how does dad do this all the time?!
>Kate starts to yowl, saying it hurts.
>Brent clamps her mouth shut so nobody hears. Asks if you’re sure this is what you’re dad did.
>You’re really sure. It feels great inside Kate, even if she doesn’t like it. You start to thrust into the catgirl like dad did the sheep.
>Kate cries behind Brent’s hand, but eventually stops. Reflexively she grabs your hands while moaning about how good it feels.
>Seed feeling comes back and you cum right into your friend’s sister.
>You didn’t know it at the time but you just had sex.
>There was some panic about the bleeding though and debated about Kate going to the hospital. But since there was no more blood and Kate said it didn’t hurt anymore, you just kept going with the Feed n’ Seed loop.
>Days become weeks become months. The three of you are getting really good at finding hiding places for sucking and fucking.
>Start to experiment with each others’ bodies ‘cause you all feel funny.
>Brent finally decides he wants you to Seed inside him like you do his sister cause he wants to know what she feels.
>You buttfuck your best friend, his pucker as tight as his sister’s slit.
>Brent groans as you try to push in, but soon starts moaning like Kate did.
>Cum in him, and he cums on the floor. None of you know what to do with Brent’s stuff cause he doesn’t make feed.
>Very next school day is Sexual Education
>You realize you fucked up in a big way.
>Go to Kate and Brent, apologize for maybe making them pregnant.
>Instead of being mad like you thought, they say “Why?”
>Brent: “I liked you inside me. And I don’t want to stop drinking your Feed.”
>Kate: “Yeah, and I really wouldn’t mind having a baby if it came from you.”
>What?
>Maybe you should have listened to what dad was saying about bonding and stuff.
>Too embarrassed to ask him again.
>Look it up, and realize just how hard you fucked up.
>Brent and Kate were drinking your stuff so long they were ‘bonded’ to you. You basically made them slaves to your dick, and cause of the way it worked they didn’t care.
>Everyone else would though.
>Think about stopping, but then remember the “withdrawal” thing.
>After school, you’re back in the abandoned lot. Deliberately avoid cumming in Kate.
>Ignoring Brent’s pleas to go faster, you start to come up with the craziest idea you’ve ever had.
>You notice Brent and Kate’s mom is near breaking point and barely making enough.
>Dad meanwhile has given up on having any relationships with human women, and the sheep are just business for him.
>Enact Operation ‘Unfuck Your Life’.
>Phase 1 start!
>Get up before dad, you know which sheep are getting fed today. Melinda.
>Closest thing you had to a mom. Always played with you as a kid, would teach you things when dad was too busy. And never thought twice about strange requests.
>When you ask her to ‘harvest’ you dad, she blinks for a minute, then agrees. She figures it’s none of her business why you need it.
>You have no idea how she did it, but she got your dad to agree to getting a handjob from Melinda, letting her collect his Feed in a bottle for her.
>Gives you half, keeps the rest (“Girl still needs to eat” she said)
>Easier than you thought.
>Phase 1 success!
>Phase 2 start!
>Work with Brent and Kate to start dropping heavy hints to your parents.
>You tell your dad that Brent and Kate spend a lot of time alone cause their mom is always busy. If she had a place where she could work and still be with her kids, things would be sooooo much easier.
>You don’t say it like that, but you get the basic message across.
>Meanwhile Brent and Kate start egging their mom to take some time out of her busy schedule to visit you and your dad.
>Also they start spiking her morning coffee with dad’s Feed.
>Dad’s harder to convince since he’s always been kind of a loner.
>Brent and Kate’s mom isn't, however. Tired as hell, dosed up on feed, she makes a decision one day to visit the farm
>The moment she lays eyes on him, you see something click in the back of her mind. She starts undressing him with her eyes.
>Get them together in one room.
>You put your ear to the door and listen for it
>”Miss! What are you doing?! What-oh! Oh! Oooooooh…”
>It takes some more of this back and forth.
>Their mom visits dad, they have mindblowing sex, and she leaves while the three of you ‘do homework’.
>She thanks dad for watching her kids and goes to work
>You get to spend more time with the twins as they suck you dry.
>Mom comes back in the evening to pick them up but not before she ‘pays’ dad for the trouble.
>Continue to drop hints like how she’s single, how she just needs a man in her life to support her, how things would be so much easier if she had a job closer to home.
>Almost a year later, dad gets the hint.
>Brent and Kate are your step-siblings now. They’re happy, you’re happy.
>That first night, you suck and fuck until your genitals are red.
>Hardest part over.
>Now for Phase 3. Start.
>’Accidentally’ leave your room unlocked. Dad finds Kate and Brent sucking your stuff.
>He’s pissed. Like real pissed.
>Takes you to the barn and yells at you for screwing up your step-siblings’ lives.
>Slaps your head for being so damn stupid.
>You expect this. Just let him run himself tired until he calms down.
>Give him a speech you practiced for the last year. You had an ‘accident’ in the middle of the night and Brent and Kate smelled your Feed(since you were all sharing the same room now it was easy to explain)
>They didn’t know what Feed was and because they were horny anthros, decided to give your free flowing Feed a lick.
>The rest was history.
>You wanted to stop them, but you didn’t know if the first dose was already too late and you didn’t want them going through all those nasty withdrawal effects, so you let them keep it up.
>As you explain your lie, Dad is quiet. He’s not angry anymore though so that’s good.
>When you’re done, he sighs. Says you did a damn stupid thing, but because you were trying to fix your own mistake he can forgive it. He was going to ground you, but said you were gonna take responsibility for your siblings.
>Translation: “You’re taking over the family business, no running off to college.”
>Fine by you. You had no plans outside of how thoroughly you can get your dick wet.
>Phase 3 success!
>Operation ‘Unfuck Your Life’ complete!

>Not only is your harem good for cooking, cleaning, and fucking, they are also skilled at picking out and catching new anthro girls for you to enjoy
>They will choose a juicy target and swipe her right off the streets, whether she is to be tricked or just bagged and captured will depend on their master's whims
>She was a student walking home to her college dorm one late night
>Her body was tight and healthy, breasts small but perky, virgin, and had even chosen non-cucked classes
>One swift bonk to the head and she was easily dragged into the back of the van, never to be seen again
>Six days she was tied to a table and broken, forced to survive on nothing but her new master's semen, both directly from the cock after it had been violating her and cleaning out her haremmate's similarly used pussies
>Six days she was raped, human cock claiming all of her holes all while the rest of his girls giggled and comforted the scared anthro, whispering into her ear that their life was heaven and that she would soon get to enjoy it as well
>After her submissive feminine anthro instincts kicked in and began to accept her new life under a human alpha, one of your teenage sluts snapped a picture of your new whore right next to her missing poster
>She made sure to capture the newest creampie flowing out of her deflowered sex, soon to be the new home of her baby for the next few months
>It was a public message to her family, friends, and college that she would not be returning, not even willingly

Scenario:
>dog races exist irl
>you can buy and train canine anthros to race in dog tracks
>train them as you would a greyhound, or be mean. However you'd like.
>reward them if they win
>ignore/punish them when they lose
>They're so overwhelmed with grief over letting you down they become a depressed mess
>so devoted to just winning all to bring in money for you, it's the only way they know they'll make you happy.
>Everyone knows only the best girls get to make pups for future champions.
>losers get sold off or ditched.

>Start your own business.
>All employees are also your wives.
>Work them 16 hours a day. Maybe more or less depending on how much sleep they need.
>Base the business out of a large building that doubles as the home to eliminate commute or getting dressed.
>Their only pay is being called good girls.

Not sure what's canon to the setting, but realistically I can absolutely imagine people fucking their pokemon. Some species more than others, of course, but ones like gardevoir, gothitelle, blaziken, lucario, and other humanoid-y ones would get plowed frequently.

Pokemon are intelligent and intensely loyal, and trainers are constantly encouraged to bond with them. Like, passionately. When those trainers are young teens, it's bound to bleed into sexual desires, especially with the more attractive pokemon. And the pokemon themselves would be unlikely to be opposed to it, seeing how they mate across species(?) in some really fucking weird pairs. So being banged by a human would be nothing special, and if it's their beloved trainer, they'd likely be into it.

>Pokesex regularly happens
>However games are treated like you have the perspective of an innocent child
>You have no idea why it sounded like mommy was being attacked upstairs by daddy
>When you tell your neighbor you hope to have a deep bond with your pokemon like he does with his you don't know why it makes him laugh
>When Professor Tree says the best relationships arr one of love you think he just means headpats and praise.

>tfw you raise your team of poke-wives on a steady diet of headpats, praise, and hand holding
>tfw you wake up with each of them taking turns riding your baloney pony until you're shooting dust
>tfw you now have a shitload of poke-kids to look after
>tfw you've never been happier
>gather a team specifically of pokemon you love to fuck
>fuck them all daily, one at a time, a big orgy, etc., whatever suits you then
>see young trainers who just begin their journeys
>smile to yourself about the whole new world of carnal pleasure they're about to enter
Young horny teens would think they're entering Heaven when they find out they can fuck their pokemon as they please at any time.
I could imagine slow journey progress being common among younger trainers because they're spending a big chunk of their time just fucking their favorites.

Alright, here's a challenge for you autists and writefags. Make up a gameshow, challenge, or trial featuring up to either one or many anthros. What are they competing/struggling against, what for, and what're the consequences? The post with the most (you)'s wins.

A bunch of anthros compete over several rounds until only all but one are eliminated. The losers are bound, and set up so they have to watch the winner getting bred senseless by a peak human right in front of them.
As far as the games are concerned I'm mostly just thinking of a crystal maze type deal, but far more sexually fixated, and another optional rule might be that the higher scoring anthros are also handicapped, so its not just a competition of raw ability but also wisdom or maybe submission, as they have to try to win, but also to win the least on any given round in order to have better chances.

I'm thinking like a version of the bachelor where stray anthros compete over who can be the best servant for a wealthy human. I'd call it the "The lord" or something

>Twas the day before Halloween so basically Christmas
>He was a young stray, picked up from the chilly autumn streets in the dead of winter by two of your girls while on an errand run
>They kept him hidden while he recovered, scrubbing away the filth in his fur while the others slept and feeding him smuggled food late at night
>And while he slept in the closet they worried, how would they convince their human master to show mercy to this poor boy?
>It was not a problem of a potential rival male in his home, they had many methods of preventing him from having sex and besides, there was just no way an anthro boy could compete with a human in sexual performance
>Instead it was just a problem of work, they had no need for any additional hands and it was not like he could join their harem to service the master
>Or could he...?
>On their next trip out they made a detour, visiting their favorite high end lingerie shop, again with the anthro boy hidden away in the back
>While he may have been a male he had a passable feminine figure that could be accentuated with a few undergarments
>Four hours flew past as they dolled him up with clothing and makeup, perfumes and oils
>Then the girls began the long debate of whether to present him to the master while wearing a chastity cage or showing off his adorably fun sized erection, and whether to buy a jeweled buttplug
>The boy blushed hard as they inspected his private bits, pinching, pulling, inserting, groping, measuring...
>Human males weren't even his first or even third choice when it came to potential partners and certainly not being submissive towards one
>But he had a debt to the master of the house and his sense of honor and fear of being returned to the cold, desolate streets prevailed over his pride as a male
>There was nothing he wasn't willing to do for the master at this point, no matter how depraved and humiliating
>The girls didn't know it yet, but they had just brought in their greatest rival in loyalty

There's too many scenarios about human conquering feral anthros and not enough about anthros submitting to savage humans.
I'd like to think about an universe where humans created anthros but fucked up with the technology, so they left Earth to live a more primitive life in another galaxy. Anthros would finally develop faster-than-light spaceships and encounter a planet that doesn't show up in their readings, only because the moment they land on that lush planet a forgotten instinct kicks in. They don't mind to never return to their home planet, as long they serve their human masters for the rest of their life.

>YWN convince a fuzzy anthro lady to abandon her comfortable life & go native with you in the barbarian wilds

I personally prefer humans being the more advanced ones, goes into the dommy aspect, domming them, and being better than them even socially/technologically/ Getting that paternalistic "We know best vibes". but I could see Having a savage angle, with a more primal dom having its own thematic merits.
I could see having aspects of both in a grizzled hunter/outdoorsman angle.

>ywn blackmail agent torque
>ywn make her suck you off to keep you silent
>ywn slowly mindbreak her by molesting her at any chance
>ywn chock her with your dick, ywn dacefuck her into oblivion, ywn force her to wear inappropriate clothes
>ywn put torque into mating press and breed tight snek cloaca

>play stellaris with Gigastructures and Lustful Void mods
>defeat Aeternum after several years
>be a xenophobic slaver empire that went the genetic modification path
>turn the Aeternum into an all female race of bimbo sex slaves

>It's time for a new crop of playthings, time to go hunting
>load up with traps of all kinds, bolas, tranquilizer darts and plenty of rope
>Go forth on horseback, off road vehicle, or 4 wheeler? Choices, choices
>Start out setting up steel traps and large snares along likely routes of escape
>Then put the tranq rifle to use while you still have the element of surprise
>Pick out a few particularly juicy pieces of meat as they wander off from the 'safety' of an anthro herd- tie them up and hoist them high up where nobody else can get to them, for good or ill
>Eventually the remainder of the anthros figure out they're being hunted and try to flee
>Go full on wild hunt, running down helpless anthros, throwing bolas and driving them into traps
>Backtrack, emptying traps and picking up captured women, binding them all together
>Look down on your haul of new sluts, piled high on top of each other and pleasantly whimpering & jiggling as they struggle against their bindings

>Greetings, commander of humanity. I am Tester Alpha. We are whom your people call "Sirens" or "Devil Fish".
>You don't come for a small talk, don't you? How convenient, in order for our plan to succeed, we need you to disappear this instant.
>Now, what should I- A-A-A-A-A-A!!!??
>(How!? My body is easily subdued!)
>(I can't comprehend the cause!)
>(It's impossible to comprehend! I don't understand! I'm in panic!)
>(I feel happyyy! I feel warm! I feel goood!)
>(Don't stop! I want to feel it more!)
>(loveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveitloveit)

>the deal was 50-50 split, but she still let you keep all the gold for some reason
>what else would you have that she'd consider to be of equal value...?

Pokemon, but the pokemon are anthros that DON'T want to be captured and forced into slavery for entertainment & weird child maturity rituals. They're fully sentient and intelligent, but no human understands, or they just pretend that pokemon are dumb because they just don't care.

Maybe they used to have the same rights and privileges as humans but as time goes on the government keeps putting restrictions on those rights. At first it's only relatively minor changes(segregation between human an anthro schools, anthros are payed less, laws that make it harder for anthros to get political power or move up job ranks). These eventually get harsher and harsher(only humans can decide weather or not to divorce in a human/anthro relationship, anthro on human rape is considered grounds for castration/spaying, human on anthro rape is not legally recognized, all anthros must wear an ID badge or collar in public at all times and must show them whenever they go into a public building, anthros are taught about their inferiority in schools, any business can deny anthros). Of course this doesn't come without social changes too. Friendship between human and anthro children is looked down upon due to them being considered dirty and inferior. Anthros sitting at the same table as a human is seen as gross and uncouth, even for those who are married to humans. This all culminates in the loss of the right for anthros to vote. They're still considered citizens, but only so they have to follow the same laws that humans do. While this all happens, an underground anthro slave trade gains traction. At first it's cracked down upon and is seen as barbaric, but as the human view on anthros changes the ring starts to grow and gain more supporters. Law enforcement starts to ignore these rings and as a result they start to become easier to find in the open. Individuals may try their own hand at the slave business and try to abduct and train anthros they find off the street. Eventually the slave business gains so much influence that the government gets rid of anthro status as citizens and make slavery legal.
With this comes new laws as well. Anthro schools are abolished. Anthros are no longer allowed to own land or property. Any anthro seen on the streets must have an a collar ID that states who owns them or risk being brought to "kennels" or "pounds" (basically whorehouses and slave shops). Anthro nudity is no longer considered public indecency. "Anthro zoos" are legalized, they're basically just exhibitions for humans to masturbate to. Enslaved anthros who are with their owner should be leashed at all times. Bringing them inside stores is usually prohibited but some of them may have cages or pens for them to stay in for the time being. Anthros should eat on the floor and the food that's considered most beneficial to them is genital discharge. Owners have the option to dress up their pets, usually in slutty clothing. Some businesses give the option to "rent" an anthro for a limited time. Dedicated anthro farms and breeders start popping up to sell anthro milk or new homegrown slaves.
Slave "training" typically consists of basic language lessons, a history lesson of how anthros were rightfully put in their place for their own good, and how they should (sexually) please their master. Anthros are considered property and as such responsibility for any damage they do is placed upon their owner. Anthro abuse is not illegal so BDSM, spanking and other physical activities aren't uncommon, but permanently injuring your slave is highly looked down upon. An owner may typically punish their slave by forcing them into uncomfortable positions for long periods at a time or by disallowing them sexual pleasure. Anthros can be found in sports as cheerleaders and are much more popular than human ones due to them being able to show more of their body, plus you don't have to pay them. Anthro sports do exist and are basically human sports with more nudity. There are some anthros who are free since they escaped civilization but they are considered feral and humans are encouraged to capture and "reeducate" them about civilized life(i.e. fuck into submission). This is due to a government fear of anthro rebellion.

>modern day regular world
>all typical pets are replaced with anthros
>you can find strays as normal, or hit up pounds to find them in captured masses
>they're treated the exact same, no one cares that they're intelligent anymore
>you can actually hunt down and round up strays, and people will think you're a hero for it.
>All you do is keep a caged harem of terrified stray sluts for you to abuse.
>people donate to your shelter as if it's an animal charity.

I really like settings where Anthros are pets/second-class citizens. No idea why.
I'm gonna take a few strays and treat them really well, but also make sure exactly how to please their new owner.
I wonder how long it would take to learn them that they need to give me a blowjob before they can have their food.

Because the concept of shitting on some one without consequence & still receiving full benefits from their service is awesome. Dog fighting would be cool again since you can force two dudes to fight to the death, but now with the added bonus of having their own kind hang around as slaves & sluts on a whim.

>male dogs are born for pit fights
>female dogs are kept on side to either be breeder bitches to make more fighters, or keep as sluts for fun.
>Can chill out with two fur girls at some dingy pit fight while their brother is beaten to death in the ring.
>they're too stupid or human-dependent to even care.

>Have a male dog fight in the ring while fucking his sisters
>even while he's getting beaten to a pulp his sisters won't stop serving you
>Even after you tell them you made a bet he would lose all the can offer up is a meek "thank you master"

I like it better if they don't know/care it's their brother in the ring. Like that whole aspect of where they are doesn't concern them, so why think about it? It'd just be a neat bit of trivia to you to enjoy while they go on oblivious in bliss.

>Tell the dog girl riding your cock that it's her brother in the ring fighting
>She barely even turns around to look at him and just continues to ride your cock

>getting to lure wary anthros into your home
>letting them become comfortable with your collection while you spoil them with affection.
>soon they're too comfortable, and they never worry about it happening to them.
>Then one day, mid turn to greet you with a warm, loving smile
>you snag her, freeze her, and then lock her into the perfect position.
>she's gagged, blinded, and left to loiter there forever.
>it all begins again, with her joining the silent rabbling protest of anthros screaming out in their thoughts.
>All she can do is beg and sob in her mind as she hears you cuddle your way into collecting a matching pedestal beside her.

>Want to replace the gag for one of your trophies
>Remove ball gag off of the tied-up anthro
>She immediately begs for freedom, bargains, and even apologizing for some reason.
>You weren't paying attention at all, only picked up a word here and there
>All other trophies in the room shift their heads towards the noise
>They don't know the context, some believe she's gonna be given freedom, others are more pessimistic and think he's about to "dispose" of her.
>They get their answer as her pleading gets interrupted as a ring gag gets inserted to her mouth
>Still being noisy, you end the nuisance by ramming your cock down her throat
>After climaxing, she collapses. Nice and compliant.
>Took some work. but now you have a dedicated cock cleaner.

>the media doesn't want you to know this, but these anthro-couples you see in the districts? You can walk into any given house and their women would immedially drop their panties for you to breed them! Their husbands don't even know, they think it's some kind of new perfume. And the few who catch on turn into raging faggots for human cock. Just breed 'em and leave 'em, they will raise any bastards with no complaint. Hell, I've seen reports that allow these anthros to become women as easily as changing a dress. Put a baby in both of them, leave for the neighbours, they don't care, they are grateful that you blessed them with children and expect no loyality. They get very happy if you do stay, too. I've made anthros cheat on their "husbands" and tell their husbands the child is theirs despite looking nothing like their fathers, and they not only buy it, they encourage it. Hell, move into some couple's home, the women start coming by just for the chance of getting knocked up, and some of their husbands too. I really don't know why there aren't more ghetto-fiefdoms.
>hell, even their lesbian-couples do that. Once, I fucked both dykes and neither came out clean to their wife. They only admitted to cheating on each other with me when I bred one of them in their bedroom and the other in the entryway room. Even carried the bitch up and tossed her on top of the other. Didn't even fight, just started making out, spitballing and masssing my cum into each other, and jacking me off with every part of their bodies. Fuck, they used their baby-bellies to rub my cock and babbled about how they'd raise their daughters to serve as my cumdumpsters. These anthros are addicted to humans, it's ridiculous. Saw some anthro femboy offer his daughter and himself to a passing human. Dude took them up on the offer, last I saw them, daughter was pregnant.
>it's ridiculous.
>hell, and speaking of daughters, they have no scruples at all with them. Send them on the prowl as soon as they can walk. If you tell a mother, you want to fuck her daughter, she warms up the lube and prepares her daughter as soon as she gets home from school. Or son, if you are into that. Seen a mother pin her son by sitting on his head, filled his anus with warm lube and spread it like it was goatse, I slid in like it was a real and ready pussy, and her brat even sounded like a woman. The mother laid on top of "him" once I finished, eagle-spread, and begged me to give her a second daughter, so I did. These anthros even tie the peni and balls of their sons up during puberty to try and keep them "small and adorable". Ever wondered why your average furboi's dick is never larger than a peanut and two peas? That's why. And it seems to work, too! I've fucked furgirls and -bois in equal measure, and the only difference was that the latter lacked front-piping and breasts.
>and to say nothing of their elderly! You haven't known the meaning of "depraved" or "hedonistic" until you had a granny jerk you off into the urn of her late husband's ashes or seen a granny take a shit on her wedding's photo or gotten one to swallow her ring along with your cum, only a few days later to send you a video of her flushing down her feces along with her ring down the toilet. These grannies don't have a menopause, you can knock them up too, and odds are they will send them down the street to whore themselves out. Granma got no chill, is what I'm telling you. Hell, if you let slip that her children or grandchildren suck at sucking or fucking, she will be there and critize them for every mistake until they get it right. Fucked the whole family in one go, one time. Shit's unbelievable.
>and you think that's bad, wait until you hear what they do down in the south. I've seen things there, man, the media denies ever happeneing because it would be racist to point out.
>I have done things down there that would make the devil weep in disgust, man.
>they have whole clans of purebred anthros whose sole purpose in life is to serve as sacrifices for their humans. I'm talking eating them while they are still alive. I' should know. I've participated in them.
>i've become a monster. I've devoured men and women alike, child or adult or elder. I have eaten their organs while they only moaned and begged me to eat their hearts so that they would forever serve me in the afterlife once I die. I have visited nunneries whose nuns took turn turns shitting on images of their most important saint, the freer of slaves. I'm not even joking, they only pretend to worship him as a saint because they believe we want them to. They have secret texts of the saint's wife telling them to not begrudge their liberation, not because it's a moral good, but rather because now humans don't need to pay for the upkeep of anthros.
>anyway, I'm telling you all this because odds are good that this anthro you're dating is your half-sister. They don't care, but I thought you wanted to know.

>big dobie bitches, rotties and pitties with thick, strong bodies that dote and worship men and engage in ritual snuff loving sessions to make more pups and cull their rotating follower base
>Master above all things, even life, good girls who want to rub their bodies against the smooth strong skin of men and love them with their everything, give them their everything
>no hositility, no aggression, just love and death swirling together in a horny fuckfury
Such Good, Good Doggies

>You whistle to her as she sits on the perch
>A blush floods her hooded eyes
>She spreads her legs exposing her wet vent to you
>You play with or fuck it however you want
>You can tell when she gets close cause her knees start to wobble as she keeps them apart for you
>You can leave her needy in the cage dripping or give her a treat and whistle her a tune that causes her to go over the edge.

See I only like snuff in theory, not practice. The idea of placing my pleasure over the slave's wellbeing, with her life solely in my hands is really good. like, making her choke on my cock puts my pleasure over her need to breathe. The idea I could take that to the fatal extreme is good in the same way, but actually going through with it doesn't do anything for me in any sense of the phrase.

>They actually like it when one of them gets killed.
>A competitor for his affections is out of the way.
>It shows Master loves us so much he can't control himself.
>They're dogs, literally bred to understand human body language.
>They can see master misses the dead slave, he's annoyed with himself for loosing control.
>It's scary to think about, but imagine knowing you're the one who he loves the best? It's worth it.

>retire after many years of service in the military
>never disobeyed an order, no matter how much my conscious wanted me to
>seeing my brothers in arms die by the dozens hardened your heart
>have my share of scars, both mental and physical
>obtain ex-soldier sheep dog anthro woman named Grace
>keep her well fed and in good health
>treat feel considerable better then others in her position
>though I take out frustrations on her by being extra rough when using her to relieve stress
>despite this, she adores me, does whatever I ask of her and borderline worships me
>we bond over the horrible things we had seen and did in war
>over the years, she grows to become the love of my life, my best friend and the only thing keeping me going
>grow old together, having lived a peaceful life in the countryside
>one day, she gets sick
>she grows more frail by the day
>holding her in my arms
>she shudders
>she hold me close and whispers
>"Was I a good, dutiful wife, anon?"
>though tears tell her that she was
>"I only wanted to do my duty..."
>she becomes less lucid and more limp
>beg her not to go
>"The mission... The nightmares... Finally over..."
>shes gone
Good soldiers follow orders.

If human sweat turns an anthro on like nothing else, what do urine and feces do? I have this idea that normally an anthro pissing on another anthro is an unforgivable slight, roughly analogous to a blood telling a crisp that he's his bitch now.

Of course, if a human does that, it triggers something close to an orgasm in the anthro.
Come to think of it, if you want to add that detail, anthro-ghettos must stink to high heaven because there're spots everywhere where anthros follow their animal nature sprinkling drolplets of urine or feces to mark this place for their family or clan. There's been fights when one anthro got caught by the members of the local spot that often end with the offender beaten black and blue before thrown out of the area. A human tho, can stroll in, piss on every spot in the ghetto, and they would accept it. In fact, some cities even do that regulary because it reduces fights in the ghettos as no anthro can tell who the area belongs to other than a human.

>Turn (age that is the youngest you would still be cool with this) years old.
>Your parents are pretty hush hush about what they’re getting you.
>Morning comes and a person sized box is sitting in the living room.
>Open up to the sighta smoking hot wildcat in decorative ropes who gazes up with eyes a sparkle with wonder as you molest and feel her up.
>She’s lived her life in the farm fantasizing about being sent to a master like this, the bow and ropes fanfare is just extra fanfare and wrapping paper.
>fuck her as a dirt time of the both of you and become the neighbourhood cool kid with your new pet.

How absolute I want my control over an anthro vouple to be:
1. Order the wife to take an abortion and record it with an endoscope
2. Make her get a tattoo indicating she has done so
3. Force the sissified husband to watch the video, then fuck him in the ass and make him thank me for ending his bloodline
4. Order the wife to arrive at my place, put her in a stock
5. Make her husband push in an endoscope so both her and him can watch me pump jizz into her gaping cervix
6. Knock her up with my child
7. Order both of them to call their daughter, so I can breed her too
8. Fuck their mother/mother-in-law and widow too.

>There's been a lot of GILF fucking on /collared/ lately.
Imagine fucking a widow at her husband's funeral. Imagine her flush face as she tries to ignore your seed that her traitorous womb so eagerly sucked up sloshing around in her while her husband's coffin is lowered into the furnace. Imagine fingerbanging her against her weak protests that you ought to wait at least a week before moving to claim her while driving her home. Imagine pinning her down on the fllor, hilting yourself in her as soon as the frontdoor falls shut. Imagine leaving her impaled on your dick while carrying her up the stairs, each step sending tremours of pleasure up and down her body. Imagine throwing her onto the bed, taking a moment to admire her dress and her pussy, gaping from the strain of having born three daughters, complete with her apologizing for having such an unsightly vagina. Imagine her face as you demonstrate your dick's more than big enough enough to make her feel full unlike her late husband. Imagine fucking her only to pull out at the last second cumming all over her face, dress, and tights, ruining her expensive heirloom. Imagine getting her to do sexual acts she has never done with her husband; anal, deepthroat, cumming in her ears, eyes, up her nose, every inch of her body marked with your sperm. Imagine her telling you that she will start kegel exercises for you as she drifts to sleep in your arms. Imagine using the urn as a nightstool. Imagine finding her in the kitchen, wearing only her black dress with no underwear. Imagine hilting yourself in her while she works at the stove, her weakly protesting that she needs to focus on the food. Imagine fucking her all day, trying to make her slip as she receives calls from family and friends offering her condolesces for her loss. Imagine the weeks passing, her pussy becoming puffy and damp, her tits perking up and filling out, and her ass plump and full. Imagine her admitting that she's pregnant with your child.

>Take a shortstack mousegirl off the streets
>feed her, clothe her
>Fuck her every day
>that one was at her insistence tho
>Started out as a way "to pay you back"
>Took a bit to get her to admit it was mostly just because she liked you a lot
>Collar her
>she's now yours to do with as you please
>Well, in legal terms anyway, that was already true in every other way that mattered before

I like the idea of have sinth anthro units on your ship. Humans often go on multi year journies through space alone, The advanced medical curatives makes this trivial in terms of "TIme wasted" but Its still necissary to scratch that human want for companionship. Tus synth creatures are often provided or created for the express purpose of Human comfort. Due to their nature as synths, the Human can do whatever they want to them, even change their forms, function, and even mentality.
Literally Have complete and totally control physically, functionally, and even mentally. It is said that some anthros volunteer, or are volintiered by thier masters to undergo a cyberization process and are placed in such maliable synth bodies so that their masters can shift and control them at a fundamental level. Absolute and all encompassing dominance. Their ass can be bigger with a simple injection of nanopaste, attach Handles whereever, maybe have one on the back of the head for power face fucks. Change their function to that of a "refresher". Literally giving you a tongue bath that causes you to be prestine with all the cleaning and maintenance chemicals in the synth saliva and a microfiber tounge. Or hell, any other number of functions. maybe you shift her form into more of a feral one to be a gaurd dog. Or increase her storage banks to make her an archivist for a day, or maybe make her into a refreshment dispenser giving you a hot cup of joe from her newly installed gg-cup tits. Or maybe if you are lewd enough turn her into a drone factory that converts your genetic material into drones for different menial tasks, esentially making her a broodmother-synth. All that while switching through personailty cores at a whim. You want a southern bell? or maybe atomboy? something else? And through it all you monitor every single thought she might have as her confused cortex matrix tries to wrap around different roles and personas.
Complete Control physically, mentally, functionally. Putty

>your high end cybernetic anthro wife has a normal looking body
>nothing can be discerned from the untrained eye that she has given not only her body to you but her soul as well
>she wears her normal conservative clothing, long flowing dress down to her ankles and a long sleeve sweatshirt
>modest body as well, nice B cups that don't catch too many eyes
>she gets home from shopping and puts things where they belong
>you get home from work and she presses her cybernetic body to you
>she smiles lewdly at you
"My body has been crying out for you all day, I had to leave my vagina at home to keep it from leaking everywhere"
>she points to her cunt sitting on a counter
>it's a fleshlight, her flesh.
>her engorged clit twitches when she pointed it out
>she picks it up and holds it up to you, juices drip from the tight folds
"please use me, you left me on heat mode before work and i can't get off without you."
>she spreads herself open for you to inspect
>the fur is soaked and even you can smell her arousal in the air
>you take her in the hand and start to get ready to use her separated flesh
>she starts shaking in anticipation, she can feel every movement you make with her defenseless mound
>she tenses up as you kiss her clitoris, swirling it around, teasing it with your tongue
>you pull back just as she cums, her pussy pulsates
>she falls back on the sofa and moans, rolling her hips as she cums
>she grunts painfully as it continues looking up at you as you continue to lick her sensitive bud continuing the orgasm
>Her body is a hot mess when you stop playing with her love button
>her legs are splayed exposing the hole where her vagina would normally plug into
>she is grabbing and messaging her breasts
>she continues to moan out until you decide to touch you muzzle
>it disconnects with a simple press
>her tongue hangs out of her modulated mouth
"I love this feeling, I love being in your control"
>you kiss her muzzle and bring down her fleshlight to be penetrated
>her muzzle opens as you kiss her deeply
>tongues lap each other, she tastes like warm rain water
>when you shove her cunt down on your shaft she pauses for a second to let out a moan
>the wireless connections sending all sensations to her writhing body
>you pull her mouth away holding it up and inspecting it like a fantastic specimen to be studied
>her tongue bobs in and out as you quicken the speed of her flesh over your dick
>the sound of her heavy breathing and wet slaps fill the room followed by the steady drip drip drip of her fluids
"let me catch the fluids master, I want to make sure the floor stays clean"
>you sit down next to her body and place her muzzle below your balls
>she starts to lap it up as you continue to pound her flesh
>she wraps her arms around you and caresses her furry head to yours
>she gently takes the fleshlight and muzzle out of your hands
>she starts to speed up the motions quicker letting her tongue lap under the shaft every time her own pussy is pumped up
>you can feel her walls clench around you
>she is also about to cum again, her tongue sloppily licking the fluids, like she is drinking from a bowl of water.
>a smile creases your lips as you feel her body quiver from an orgasm beneath you
>she pauses pumping as the waves of pleasure pass through her
>you reach down and push a combination of buttons on her quivering fleshlight and take it from her hand
>you start to feverishly pump her orgasming pussy blowing your load deep inside
>her moans turn from soft to loud and she drops her muzzle to the floor
>she is desperately clinging on to the sofa as your warmth is injected into her flesh
>her eyes roll in the back of the head and between breaths she glances at you
>her eyes of bliss swiftly turn to worry as the feeling doesn't stop
>you put her muzzle back on and kiss her
>she is trembling as the wireless signals pumped into her body, keeping her at the peak of orgasm
>you smile at her and pet her gently
>you keep her like that for half an hour
>you stare at her pleasure washed body
>she can't even moan anymore, exhausted from the pleasure
>you look at her quivering slit, it pulses and drips out some of your cum
>you kiss her clit which elicits a twitch of her head
>as soon as a tear drips from the corner of her eye you push the button to release her
>she immediately relaxes on the sofa panting heavily
"Thank you master..."
>you slide her pussy between her legs, completing her beautiful body once again
>with shaky legs she leans on your body
"I needed that... desperately. I'm glad you let me experience it."
>you give her a kiss and embrace her just as the dinner timer starts to beep

>make your daughteru go to school with a face glazed in your cum
>pick her up after school
>has a group of new friends who want to come and play
>one of them is has already taken off her very wet panties and is tying it to the car's antenna

>And through it all you monitor every single thought she might have as her confused cortex matrix tries to wrap around different roles and personas.
Man, imagine overloading her matrix with so many modules that she ends up with two or more actual personalities, each fighting for control over the chassis as they service you in every way possible. You could lead them on, making them believe that you will delete any personality that fails to properly pleasure you, ending it in a desperate duel between the last personalities remaining as they simultanously ride you with the desperation of a trapped and drowning animal. Then the duel's over, you seemingly delete the loser despite her desperate pleas, allow your winner to bask in this thrilling mixture of post-coital bliss, guilt, and survivor's rush... only to reveal that you deleted none of the personalities. In fact you gave them all their own chassis. The whole tournament? That was just a thing for you to pass the time.
Despite her best attempts, she can't be mad at you and instead joins you as you begin to fuck your grateful and obdient (and midly traumatized) new synths.

Fun fact, schools are actually one of the most difficult places to grab anthros. Not because of mothers, most of them would rather have you grab them instead, but rather because the school staff are committed to defending their charges. And they are pretty well-trained, considering they managed to become educated teachers. Usually, the best way to take over a school is by starting with the principal, near always an elder matron with a will of iron and a body wrapped in the most drap and unattractive clothes you can think of. Their hairs prim and proper bunned up, their glasses designed to make their eyes appear sharp and piercing, their fur slowly losing its lush coloring or growining grey hair, these matrons have managed to dodge the attention and conquest of humans. Until you, that is.
The biggest difficulty is cornering the principal. Thankfully, they are creatures of habit. While you could bruteforce the matter with an anthro cop, it is far easier to get in her good graces by helping her with groceries, cleaning the house, or just giving her company. Eventually she will enter her season, during which her iron will becomes soft and briddle, ready to crumble at naught but a kiss.
Do not underestimate the energy of a pent-up anthro-virgin. She will attempt to mount you all day, but you must put her in her place. Breed her, mating-press her, pin her doggy-style, cover her face in jizz, ensure that she understands you're her master now. Once that's establish, you can begin taking over her school. It is recommended to pick off school nurse, sports coach, and the vize principle first as they are most likely to alert authorities, take matters into their own hands, or replace the principle as new head of school. Once the core of the school harem is created, you may begin picking off remaining teachers and place school policies that leave students isolated for you.
 I remind you that you should only do this in school are placed in anthro ghettos as otherwise you will get arrested real fast and looked down upon as a thieving git. Anthro couples are fine, but getting between a man and his waifurs? That's just plain poor sport.
Favorities include "vagina inspection day", "private stretch exercises", "regular protein injections", and the ever-classic "calling well-known troublemakers into the principal's office". There're plenty of excuses to expose students to sexual relations with humans. Art class for example is all but an excuse to fuck the art teacher in front of her increasingly aroused students, in House Keeping you can add your jizz as the "secret incredient" to the meals the students prepare, in gym you can fuck the best student thus encouraging the rest of class to do better, and so on. Keep in mind that you might see new students in class that appear a lot older than what the average suggests. It appears that someone tattled to her mother then. Naughty of the students, but no worries. A private "parent-teacher conference" will clear things up quickly. The vast majority of anthro students come from from single mother households, women that were usually fucked young and discarded afterwards, leaving them with two to three hungry mouths to feed and little support beyond the pittance the state tosses their way. Fortunately anthros tend to organize quickly and support each other. A fascinating subject in its own right, really.
Adding to that, pregnant student are thus a minor concern to you as there are only three possible scenarios:
1. The student is pregnant with anthro females: she carries them to term and leaves them with her mother to care for, being their mother out of school.
2. She is pregnant with a human: in this case, she will approach you so that you may take her for your harem. Being pregnant with a human child, male or female, is seen as a sign of divine blessing and all anthros within the district will focus their money and energy to ensure your child has the best possible start in life.
3. The student is pregnant with anthro males: in 96% cases of that reveal, the student will immediately arrange an appointment with an abortion clinic. Most anthro females have a deep and profound hatred for fur-bois, seeing them as uppity females trying to take the place of the human men. It is a religious matter, but rest assured that most furbois are raised as female, treated with chemicals and home remedies to preserve their feminity, and endure vicious bullying from their peers.
In some rare cases, a pregnant student might approach you, asking that you acknowledge her children as yours. You could refuse, but that is plain cruel in my opinion. Accepting her as one of yours elevates her social position and that of her mother, both of which will show their gratitude in many and pleasing ways.
Once you become the master of a school placed in an anthro ghetto, you are more or less set for life. Demand sex, both students and their mothers will serve you. Demand money, they will live hand to mouth to deliver your expected sum. In an anthro ghetto, you, a human male, will be nothing less than a king.

>psst….
>premo collared setting is rifts
https://rifts.fandom.com/wiki/Dog_Boy
>Man bio engineered dogs called dog boys (although there are females) into psi-hunting dog people secound class citizens with little rights, but tend to be treated well by their masters due to their canine loyalty. Live in pack dynamics under a soldier or psychic hunter.
>Even the dogs that are discharged tend to go out and try to serve the reminents of humanity of their own will.
>called soldiers best freind.
You guys are sleeping on Rifts

>Anthro student keeps getting her PowerPoint presentation project interrupted.
>Interruption are the moans and scream of her anthro teacher getting mating pressed on her desk.
>All student are focused on the breeding, than her presentation.
>Anthro teacher was too busy getting fucked to listen to the whole presentation and doesn't care at all. Teacher gave the grade was an F with no consideration or care.
>Extra credit can be provided, as a second chance, by using her tongue to clean teacher's leaking creampie.

>the human was not statisfied with that
>he grabbed the camera and started filming her work on the screen
>teacher starts tearing into her lacking skills, inability to move her tongue, identify her weak splts, and more
>by the end, the student is in tears, and the human decide to cheer her up by facefucking her
>several of the students already masturbating redoubled their efforts when seeing themselves in the background of the screen
>others slide over to their neighbour and starting kissing and fingering them
>the human finishes in the nerd'face with a throaty grunt, coating her glasses and braces with his seed
>idly asks the teacher who's still recovering who's her best student in class
>it was still the nerd kneeling before him
>he lifts her up, declaring she can still get some extra credit and throws her on top of her teacher
>the teacher wimply wraps her arms around her student's stomach and starts whispering obscenities in her ear about how her human will ruin her and make her addicted to his bhc and flood her womb with his sperm, viciously assaulting her ovums, knocking her up with a superior baby
>meanwhile the human grabs one of the less busy students and makes her kneel in front of the table, and puts the camera in her shaky hands
>only then does he place the tip of his regular-sized member on the entrace on the student's wet and ready cunt
>his first trusts were slow, merely teasing her with his glans by moving his head in and out
>it still made her whine with need
>her teacher admonishes her for her egoism
>slowly he inches deeply, not wanting to break her right away
>he stops, feeling something
>he pulls out and orders the camera-girl to turn on the light and zoom into her pussy while the teacher helpfully spreads her lips
>the nerd can only weakly protest as the projection behind her reveals her still intact hymen, drawing mockery from the students
>she starts to cry, but the human kiss her gently and tells her she will graduate today
>he pushes until he feels her hymen again, then leans forward and give her a chaste kiss
>as he does so, her body wraps her legs around his hips, signaling loud and clear what she needs
>as her tongue begins to wrestle with his, he pushes his weight on her, tearing her hymen in one smooth painfree heavenly thrust
>she can only helplessly moan into his mouth as her classmate documents the loss of her virginity for her whole class to see, a single drop of blood staining the table
>he began to move with a steady pace, kneading her breasts when her teacher joined the tongue battle with her own
>soon, it developed between him focusing on the teacher, the student, or watching as her teacher dominated the nerd in ways she'd never even dreamed of
>the table groaned with each trust and the students masturbated with wild abandon, their fingers either slicking in and out of their vagina, or helping their neighbors out, kissing and fingering one another while keeping an eye on the projection of their classmate getting bred
>and bred was the right word, for the nerd's womb has already opened her cervix wide in eager anticipation of a flood of cum from her human master
>the teacher had an idea
>she leaned forward to whisper into the rutting pair
>"if you break the table, I will give you enough extra credit to last you for the rest of the year!"
>of course, the nerd had no real way of affecting that, but her human master's pace became quicker and quicker, each thrust making her table bend and jump more, to the overstimulated excitement of her student
>finally, her human master's eyes glazed over and this pacing made the table creak in promising ways
>each thrust send tingles of excitement down up the teacher's spine, as she was getting fucked by proxy
>his final thrust did it
>as he went balls deep in her, the table decided to do her job as the set piece and split clean in half
>the teacher prevented any slips, her strong legs joining her nerd student's own wrapped around her master's hips, and kept him deep inside her
>the nerd's womb finally descendent onto the head of the human's cock, her cervix kissing his meatus, eager for his gift of life
>the students watched in awe and orgasmic joy as his balls visibly contracting, pumping wave after wave of thick virile sperm on its journey
>the mood got only hornier when the camera-girl dropped her tool and dove her muzzle into them, sniffing and licking and stimulating his balls
>the human could feel the nerd's womb practically suck on his glans, begging for his seed
>ropes of sperm were sucked right into her needy womb, cooling the heat of sex with his warm juices
>billions of spermcells began their journey into their fallopian tubes in search of her ripe ovum
>each pump of his penis, each rope of his sperm hitting the back of her womb send another wave of orgasmic bliss up the nerd's body
>her teacher whispered encouragements and commands to get pregnant in her ear, all while massassing her breasts and the spot on her stomach where her womb is placed
>finally, after minutes of orgasm, his balls were empty
>the legs of teacher and nerd too weak to hold him, he pulled out, forcing another orgasm on the nerd, and stood up
>he turned around, absently slapping the camera-girl with his still semi-erect dick and took in the exhaused students
>some were shaking in their seats, others looked eagerly at him, hoping he'd call them over for their own breeding
>the teacher rose behind him, anger evident in her face as she grabbed the camera girl's
>"You selfish brat!", she snarls. "You were supposed to film everything! Not shove your greedy maw into master's balls!"
>for a moment, the class thought she'd slap her, but she seemed to reconsider
>her face changed to a delighted expression as she came up with a new plan, one that'd ensure the silence of the class while suitably punishing the camera girl
>"Master, may I reward class for being so attentive?"
>he shrugged, and so she waved one of the front-most students over
>her legs were shacking, but she bareky managed to stand on her own
>which is more than some of the students could say
>"Girl!", she snapped at the camera girl, "sit in the corner and watch while you think about your selfishness!"
>when the girl was seated, the teacher gently pushed out a pearlescent drop of her master's cock onto her index finger, and pushed it up her student's still-wet snatch, an act that drew a mixture of a squeak and a moan from her student
>as the teacher rotated her finger to coat the insides, the student grabbed onto her writs, shuddering in delight at the sperm in her, miniscule as it might have been
>when the teacher removed her finger, the student legs buckled and she collapsed onto the floor, hopelessly overstimulated
>the teacher pointed at the next student in the front
>"You there! Come here!"
>as she placed the next drop of sperm in the student, the rest of the class caught on with the developments and begun to file in
>no one wanted to miss out on their mark like the camera girl
>who is whining and rubbing her bottom on her seat, clearly wanting to join them
>only the stern glares of the teacher kept her in place
>as she placed drop after drop into her student's vaginal canals, she could feel someof them kissing her finger with their womb's cervix, greedily sucking up the pearl of sperm on her finger
>finally, the whole class was marked, their panties pulled up, skirts and shirts put back on, and she hissed her instruction again
>"Remember, class: Not a word to anyone!"
>the class nodded in silence and slowly filed out, leaving the teacher, the camera girl, the sleeping nerd, and their human master alone.
>he grinned at the teacher, causing her to flush, before pointing to his erect dick, the message clean
>she placed her back and feet on one of her student's tables, presenting her puffy pussy and reddened anus to him
>then she spread her already-dripping lips for his arousal
>as he plunged into her depts, the camera girl could only whine and watch her teacher get fucked by her master, her fingers just barely granting her some relief from her need
>outside, some students listened to the creaks and moans of the love-making their master was subjecting their teacher to, their fingers slicking in and out of their vaginas.
>it was only the beginning of hisbtake-over

Funny pranks to do on anthros:
>Blackmailing your anthro coworker and force her to give you a rimjob.
>"Forgetting" to remove your slave's sensory deprivation bondage.
>Tricking anthros to be sold to traffickers and butchers.

I'd like it better if it went like this:
>somehow catch high level pokemon near beginning of quest
>try to command it
>not enough badges lmao
>refuses to get into it's pokeball
>go old school and put a leash on it (some hard-light bullshit that it can't just destroy)
>have to reign it in pretty much 24/7
>resolve begins to break
>catch weaker pokemon and train them
>get more badges
>original pokemon becomes more submissive over time as I get more badges
>eventually completely submits

Animal Crossing is pretty much "/collared/ The Game" if you set your mind to hit. Built your own harem, invite any female that catches your fancy, seduce them, fuck them in a quiet romantic corner of your island, deliver them to your loyal and lustful assisstant Isabelle so she can finalize their move-in, break into their houses as soon as they finished moving in and impregnate them, introduce them to your rest after Isabelle announces them on her P.A., indulge your lust for girly or nerdy furbois, emasculate the few males you allow there like Raymond and Flick by forcing them to dress up in feminine dresses and fucking them in front of female villagers, make it so the furbois are incapable of cumming with your dick hammering their prostate, start a cult with the help of Ankha and let yourself be worshipped a s a god. Find a magical crytsal whose light turns men into women and decide to finalize their conquest of your male worshippers, transforming them and knocking them up on the town-square with the rest of your harem present after Isabelle announged the scheduled impregnation of a harem-member. Turn Tom Nook into Tammy Nook, and knock her up in front of her nieces before bedding them as twins. Live the life of a god-king.

>Slams car trunk to end dramatic after the wild rabbit wakes from the darts.
>Catches an ear on accident. Squeals of pain are heard behind the gag/ car trunk.
>It’d be an awkward moment to have to open and fix it.
>Drives back to civilization with the rabbit’s eat flapping the wind.

>When my father, Gary Gygax, created the fantasy role-playing genre that he chose to name that revolutionary new game Dungeons & Dragons! They are the stuff of legends!
>Let’s face it, if you love fantasy role-playing gaming like me (and since you are reading this foreword the chances are that you do share my passion for gaming), you are fascinated with dragons. And why shouldn’t you be? When I think of my favorite fantasy artwork, they include dragons. Larry Elmore’s rendering of the red dragon on the iconic Basic D&D red box,
>Clyde Caldwell’s Tiamat, Erol Otus’s Basic D&D cover — or a personal favorite that I commissioned from Jeff Easley for Gary Con VI, An Aerial Duel, depicting a flying wizard battling a dragon. Something about these mystical beings touches our souls, ignites our sense of adventure and sends our imagination soaring on massive bat-like wings.
>Some of my earliest memories around the gaming table are of listening to the likes of Rob Kuntz and my Dad talking about their adventures in the World of Greyhawk. Each one of them had gone searching through dangerous territory in the wilderness to find and subdue a dragon.
>Rob played the evil hero, Lord Robilar, who overcame a green dragon and forced it into his service. Mordenkainen, a powerful archmage played by my father, gained control of a pair of ancient red dragons. It was a mark of prestige to be able to conquer and control a being of such raw power. Don’t you want to have one of these magical beasts at your beck and call?
Luke Gygax Calabasas, CA, May 2019: Forward of legendary dragons compendium book

>catch your favorite pokemons
>instead of traveling from gym to gym, just go around and see the sights
>while fucking your pokemon at any time
>they obediently do what you say and are eager to bond
>doggystyle one, mating press another, full nelson a third
>blow your load balls deep in their pussies, in their mouths, and all over their adorable faces
>drown in pleasure as you cum again and again until you're exhausted, only to do it again the next day
The real pokemon adventure!

>Poodle anthro spent to majority of her private nights masturbating to collar'd porn on her computer, during her adolescence.
>Became so obsessed, that she now became a fanatic worshiper for humans. Even fulfilled her dream of being a human's pet.
>I'm talking the most extreme case of fanaticism.
>Finds all other anthros to be nothing but lesser beings, exactly like their feral counterparts, unless the anthro is nice and collared.
>And treats them like animals she does.

>your a powerful wizard of unfathomable power
>you hide this fact through an appearance of a noble lord complete with castle grounds and a unique garden
>your garden is the stuff of legends, many people come visit to see the massive stone statues and fountains
>they are all statues of various magical creatures and beast folk
>what is unique is the near magical detail these statues exhibit and their lewd artistry
>ratfolk locked in eternal passion in marble
>dragonborn clinging onto a scrap of cloth to hide her shame in obsidian
>two kobolds with their tails tied together hanging upside down, vents open to see in granite
>two large dragons maws open in ecstasy
>the male in gold, his cock showering into a pool of crystal clear water
>the female in silver arching her back, wings outstretched
>her tail raised up in a beautiful circle to her horns at peak pleasure
>while her cloaca pours to the same pool on the other side
>the taboo garden is a sight to behold to all species in the magical world
>you on the other hand know you aren't done, you invited a very special guest to pose for the art addition
>dragons are notoriously hard to intice to visit, but a promise of gold and enchanted baubles can coax one out.
>the subject this time is a beautiful young adult green dragoness
>half your staff is comprised of kobolds and other races
>they desperately wanted to see the dragon arrive, but it was for their safety that you sent them away and close the garden for the day
>your copper dragon is all that remains, she lowers her head to you and gives you a sly smirk
"How long is this one going to take master?"
>you gently touch her metallic horns which draws a soft coo from her rumbling voice
"Greens are stubborn like all chromatics, but i have a plan for this one. She might break before the gold or the silver."
>you kiss her copper scales and she shudders under your touch
"I hope you don't replace me with her..."
>you have never abandoned one of your servants ever, all their demands are met, you feel a little insulted
>you toss the idea out of her by grabbing her by the horns and staring her with a piercing gaze
>her eyes flutter from the examination causing her to body to relax
"I'm sorry master."
>Before you open your mouth there is a flapping in the distance
>A dragon's shadow flashes overhead the arrival causes both you and the copper to smile at what's to come
>She spies the two of you with sharp dragon gaze and swoops down and landing with a loud stomp of her legs
"I didn't know there would be another dragon here, are you the one that sent the missive?"
>you smile and greet the dragon
>"No, she is working for me. I am the lord of this campus, please come with me so that we may get started."
>the green shifts eyes to the copper than to you
>the copper on the other hand puts on a bright inviting smile for the green
>the three of you enter the large castle, large enough for fit an ancient dragon through the halls
>You show her some of the exhibits
>women carved into the walls, clutching their privates
>The green pays no attention to any of it until you take her deeper into the halls
>the women were no longer in the walls instead there was a wyvern carved
>the lesser dragon had her legs splayed, she looked to be in heat
>the green stared for a moment taking in the intimate details of the carving until the copper spoke up
"The art here is quite beautiful, moments of pure beauty captured in stone."
>the green was captivated by it, even if it was a lesser dragon
>you motion to the two young dragonesses to continue down the hall to the workshop
>the workshop had many stone cutting tools and enchanted hammers on large wooden tables and hanging from the walls
>there was a fine dust of stone on everything
>If the tools weren't so small one would think the large workshop was an artisan dragon
>In the center of the room was a large jade plinth
>you motion the green to stand on the jade podium
>she gives a huff of hot air out of her nostrils
"I need to see my gold first, I don't want to do something until I know I'm getting what was promised"
>you roll your eyes and pull out a small purse from your belt
>"It's all here, in this bag."
>she bares her teeth which causes the copper to bare hers in return
>You don't say a word and open the bag and proceed to pour the contents out at arms length
>the bag of holding releases coins bars and gems
>they overflow your fancy dress shoes before you seal the bag up again closing off the portal
>her eyes dance over the shiny metals, her mouth waters
>you point to the jade podium again and she obeys
>she stands there awkwardly as you open up some books and lay them out on the table to her side
>the copper's smile starts to grow vulgar at the green dragoness
>"I need you to be in the mood, could you think sexual thoughts mistress"
>the green creases her scaly brow confused
"I don't think i could"
>you smile and touch the coppers hide sending her forward
>"that's okay, she will help you get in the mood, she is very good at pleasing other dragonesses"
>you eagerly watch as the copper walks around the green eyeing her up and down like a hungry wolf
>the green swallows but her eyes betray a bit of curiosity of what will happen
>as the copper circled again she struck, lifting the green scaled tail high in the air exposing her cloaca
>the green lets out a small roar of confusion but it was swiftly cut off as the long snake like tongue delved into her sanctum
>you proceed to start casting the spell, a page from 7 books the ritual takes a while to complete
>but you are confidant that your dragon concubine will keep her occupied
>the green dragon moans out rolling her hinds on the coppers face
>drops of drew drip down the copper muzzle as she caresses the emerald cloaca
>she pulled back licking her snout of juices
>there is a soft drip of liquid from the green's vent to the jade podium
>her legs shake as her vent tightens down wanting more
>the copper moves forward around her side giving soft licks across her body
"you won't get off that easily dear, i'm going to have you savor every touch i give"
>the green opens her mouth to reply but was kissed by the copper
>her tongue dashed inside trailing her own sour juices with it
>they kissed as you finished the 3rd book, the spell should be taking hold
>you look over to see her feet have been fused with the jade
>a smile creases your lips as you continue the ritual
>the green dragon is unaware of the spell as she is getting kisses from the copper
>overflowing with feelings that no dragon has ever given her
>her vent pulses needy for a lover
"please, can you do that thing you did before?"
>the copper smiles and nods with a single flick of her lewd tongue
>she moves around her body like a snake holding her neck high with her metallic tail
>the green raises her hides and lifts her tail giving her as much access to her cloaca as possible
>the copper stuffs her snout into the vent making out with her needy other end now
>roars of pleasure escape the green gasping for breath
>the keep shakes as she nears her climax
>then the copper withdrawls jaw dripping with intimate fluids
>the green grunts in frustration and begs
>but the copper simply watches the jade transformation take hold the line passing over her needy vent, traces of moisture clinging to the stone
>a toothy smile crosses her maw as the it starts to turn up her tail freezing it in an arch
>the green is still unaware just continuing to roar out her begging pleads
"Please i'm so close! Just one more!"
>the copper continues to wear her smile and steps in front of the half statue dragon
"Sorry dear, but i think i need to get off first."
>she leans back to the wall in front of the dragon and spreads her legs wide exposing her own glistening vent
>the copper dragon rolls her neck forward and proceeds to part her own cloaca open with her tongue
>she drinks heavily of her own fluids moaning lewdly while the captured dragon watches on in desperation
>you step near the copper who breaks from her own opening and kisses you passing on her own taste to you
>the green starts to have a panic look in her eyes as she tries to turn her neck
"what did you do?"
>the copper smiles wickedly
"You are going to be in the exhibit dear. You will be a beautiful work of art until master says so."
>the green looks on as you start to undress for your copper concubine
>she sees the loving way you caress the metallic scaled belly
>she wishes for the same treatment as her body burns for her own climax
>you reach down and start to finger your copper beauty in front of the captive audience
>the warm wet cloaca feels like heaven to your magical touch
>the copper screams upward rolling to her back
"Please master, I want to feel your seed inside me"
>you climb up top and start to plunge your rod into her keeping your gaze on the green
>the jade transformation is now at the back of her head
>you smirk watching the green drool as you fuck the copper with reckless abandon
>the copper tightens around your cock
"yes master! please give me your cum!"
>the last thing the green dragon sees before the transformation is complete is the view of the copper dragon breathing acid to the ceiling in glorious climax
>the copper breaths in heavy deep breaths from the experience
"I hope you put me on display again, just for a little bit. I want to experience what the silver is feeling for at least a week"
>you smile at the addicted copper and kiss her stomach before climbing down
>you wave your hand at the new addition to the garden and it vanishes from the room
>the new exhibit is in the center of the fountain
>her jade body frozen at the edge of bliss
>her mouth drools out water and her cloaca drips like a leaky faucet
>The two metallics climax onto both her sides
>clear water splashes over her jade hide

>Buy anthro slave with two heads
>One head is submissive like a bitch in heat and worships the ground you walk on while the other head is constantly resisting and cursing the both of you
>unfortunately for her the submissive head controls the body
>resisting head is gagged and put on a leash the other head always presents to you in her mouth while on her knees with a slutty grin on her face while the other looks in disgust and anger
>Every time you have sex with them one is enjoying it, begging for more and you're basically raping the other one
>slave bitch forces other head to watch you use their body as a fuckable piece of meat and all she can do is cry and grimace
>slave bitch always cleans you off by sucking you dry while you use the other as a cumrag

>collar up a dragon
>treat her like a glass figurine
>always leave her comfortable while still bound
>confuse her on your motives by withholding food for a day to giving her too much
>never answer her questions about her future but listen to her and engage in conversation
>reward her plasticity while leaving her in darkness for her rebellion
>she learns to rely on you for comfort and company
>let her lay your egg and keep her with it with no intention of letting her part with your child
this is how you break a dragon

>imagine having a harem made up of nothing but daughter wives

Will there be a wedding ceremony for each daughterwife, or for all of them at once?
I'm also very curious how the wedding will go. Will it be proper, or depraved? Maybe it might be morbid, if you like extreme fetishes like snuff.

For all of them at once, definitely. A big wedding where I'm at the altar with all my daughters, a big group of brides that I get married to at once.
And then the wedding night is a big orgy, pounding all my daughters in a big bed one after another, while their mother provides drinks and snacks to help me keep up my energy

It'll be messy but fun. All my daughters leaning close, trying to be the first to kiss me. But of course it can only actually be done one at a time, even when they try to squirm close and push each other out of the way. Maybe I can manage to kiss two at once, feeling them both eagerly thrusting their tongues into my mouth, but it'll ultimately be done little by little as they have to wait their turn.
>kissing one daughter, she holds on to me and deepens the kiss with lots of tongue
>an impatient sister pulls on her ears and says "Hey! Don't take so long, slut, I need to kiss dad too!"
>a third says "Whatever, we've all been making out with dad every day. This isn't that big a deal."
>their mother is gleefully taking pictures, and insists on taking one where I kiss each of our daughters... which then ends up being a long series of photos

>anthro cop tries to apprehend you for whatever
>just pin her down and fuck her on the spot

>Cop decides to let you off with a warning because she doesn't have the strength to stand up anymore.
>Put her legs behind her head and mating press her harder until she lets you off scot-free or passes out.

>Drug dealers can trick anthro cops into developing intense drug addictions. Making them do anything to ease their withdrawal symptoms.
>Anthro traffickers can abduct a lone anthro officer and force her into sex work, under a new identity.
>Hackers can drain an anthro cop's entire banking account and social media reputation, leading to homelessness. Hacker can then offer her a place in his house to stay in, as long as she does whatever he says.
I feel like these anthro cop's real purpose is to be fodder and not to actually protect, like they're meant to be a kind of sacrifice or something.

>"Yes, your master is dead, now go run off and do whatever stupid bullshit you goddamn anthros do, I need to fill out some forms."
>She immediately jumps out of the hospital window, falling from several stories quicker than you can say 'chinese suicide nets'
>"Wha- goddamn it! Hey, Jim, call the cleaners, we got another mess down at streetside!"
How they are so loyal, they join in death. Personally, I find it to be a pain in the ass to deal with, but that's just my job, isn't it?

I'd love to keep cheap, disposable anthro mouse girls. Imagine if they were raised in factory farms like chickens, cost $5 each and were so low on the social totem pole that even other slaves saw them as trash.
I'd buy a dozen of them and keep them in a cage. They don't get names, at most they'd get numbers. I'd jerk off with them, force feed them my cum, make them lick my dick clean, trap them in my underpants, etc. Whatever depraved shit tickles my fancy.
If one of them displeases me for any reason she gets slowly waterboarded to death in a glass of water while the others have to watch. That would probably happen once a week. Plus there would be accidental deaths if I'm too rough with them. Plus from time to time I might kill one just for fun.
I'd likely have to buy a new batch of them every month or so. I might keep one mouse alive from the previous batch to the next, just so they'll have stories to tell each other.

I like the idea of a facility that does experiments
they take in female criminals and do tons of different things to them
change their species, turn them into slaves, changes in personality, what have you
some of the more egregious criminals get their lives permanently altered.
they sleep in their cell one day and then when they wake up they can't feel anything except their vagina
they cry out and hear their voice through a speaker
the scientist informs them that they are now a pocket pussy, literally a pocket pussy.
their body was dissected and their consciousness was transferred to a cylinder that has their pussy grafted to it.
all the nerves work, it is her after all. she has a small speaker and microphone so the user can talk to her or hear her if she isn't muted.
and when she is told her old body was used as nutrient paste to keep her alive in the tube for 500 years she is muted to be sold off.
just a pussy in a metal tube with her name etched on it. comes packaged with an ID card of who she was before becoming a cock milker

How about one who is much bigger and stronger than you? The only reason she isn't turning you into paste is because:
a) she's thoroughly restrained so you can safely take advantage of her
b) she's brainwashed into submission, either by magic or conditioning
c) she is brainwashed into obeying but is otherwise sane (e.g. 'would you kindly')
d) she owes it you and has to see it through, even if she doesn't like it (e.g. lost a bet)
e) she already was a submissive slut who loves human cock, you didn't have to do anything
f) a combination of the above
I'm mainly thinking dragons here, but it could be anything that could physically overpower you.

Have you guys ever traveled to an "All Anthro Town"?
All those girls, they never had any orgasm cause the only thing they ever experienced was some anthro males
I swear to you, it's just so easy to turn an entiry town into your personal harem. Mother, sisters and daughter will all crawl in the street just for your dick.
They loose all dignity, no matter their age or wealth. It's almost heartbreaking to see them crying when you finally have to leave. One time an anthro girl even hide herself in my luggage to stay with me

>paint me like one of those french dogs!
huh?
>take me home and fill me with your love
are... are we talking about sex, or being my pet?
>YES!!!

>Be bunny freedom fighter
>Want to join a group of terrorist
>They ask me lots of questions about my family, my friends and me
>They said that I'll have to go in this van if I want to find other freedom fighter
>mfw I woke up in a free-use station with other freedom fighter and we are all here for "reeducation"

Do anyone remember this "Lola Bunny"? Yeah the actress, she used to be a big name in Hollywood. She spent her career advocating for anthro's right and then one day she just left everything, never to be seen again.
If you didn't already know, she spend almost all of her life choking of big human cock. She only got the role for Space Jam because she gived a little "massage" to the producer.
Even on set, everyone knew why she spent her night being cum feed by the director. That's the sole reason why it's this movie is the one that had needed the most sheets during production.
Even after that, she always acted all angry with her creepy fans but if you were a human, she'll ask her you to meet her in the bathroom. However if the creepy fan was an anthro, she'll always ask her bodyguard to beat him up.
And yet, she still wanted to say in every event that anthro girls aren't slut for humans, that they have right and they didn't wish to spend their whole life as someone personal cockwarmer.
So what happened to her? Well I can't give my source, only this picture. What I can say is that, one day she just happened to act "brat" on the wrong guy, some businessman who was a good friend with Warner Bros and had a deep hate for anthro "people".
So he kidnapped her and decided to test some of his company product on her. Mostly brainwashing procedure, at the end she was turned into a cock-addict. The procedure was so brutaly that it fried her brain, so now can barely talk english and can only walk on all four.
I don't know where they stored her but I know that she's still alive and that half of Hollywoodis still fucking her on a regular basis. Oh and obviously, I never told you anything, it's not like anyone would cared about what happened to some megalo bunny slut but still, keep that story to yourself.

Hello young lads, I'm the Doctor Anon, this video tape has been made only for Sex Education class and cannot be sold outside of school. I'm sure you've been asking yourself a lot of question about your body but I'm gonna talk about anthro girls. You probably already saw one before, maybe you even have one stored in your house. I wanna make sure you know that Anthro aren't just dumber than a human, they are complet retard. Don't believe me? Okay I'll show you something. See that shortstack over there? I'm talking about the black cat on the beach. I'll use her as an exemple, right now we just walk right behind her and we are talking about her. Every man or woman would have already given us a weird look, but not that thing cause it's just a dumb set of holes. But now, my camerman just wen infront of her, she's looking at him with clueless eyes and a mouth open, she only noticed him because he is right in front of her. This bra and panties, she's only wearing it because someone made her wear it.
Now step two, I start to grope her ass and she doesn't even look where the hands is, she's looking at you. That's because her fragil brain only see you, so she believe that somehow with your hands in your pockets you are the one groping her. It doesn't change if I start groping her breast. Look she's already rubbing her thights together. Now if I take my throbing cock out and let it rest on the back of her head, she can smell the human musk. It's intoxicating her already useless brain, look she's panting in just a few seconds. Just from being gropped and smelling a human penis. That's not how a person would react, most women would have slapt you but every single anthro cunt would just follow with what YOU want.
But that's not all, let me prove to you that anthro girls aren't person, they're not even a slave, they're a property made by nature with the sole purpose to be used by Humanity. They don't need a name, all they need is to be pumped full of cum. Look I just picked her up, groping her thight and now she just finally noticed me. She's looking at me, still clueless about everything but I'm gonna put some sense into her. Just by rubbing my hard cock agains't her inner thight, you can see her tail is wrapping itself around my legs. The idea of breeding, that's the only thing her brain can understand and she's trying to hold onto me. You don't need a condom with those, she can't sue you for money if you get her pregnant and as for STD they can't catch anything that a human would catch.
Step three, I lift her all the way to the tips of my cock, if I start rubbing myself agains't her pussy you can hear her purr. Let's get a little quicker and her inferior body is already shaking with pleasure from what we Human consider foreplay. Look at that pussy, it's soaking wet. Now I can used her as I please, like for exemple going slowly inside her pussy, like you see she's alreading moaning along side some miaowing. Look you can very clearly see the shape of my cock inside of her womb, don't worry if the same happen to you, that bulge is completly natural with an anthro shortstack. It only took a few minute to turn her into a fuckmeat, look at her claws she's trying to grab me, which could be painful. She doesn't actually want to harm me, she's just too dumb to understand that her claws can hurt actual people and her brain just saw me as a matching mate. Which mean her brain command her to not give up on the man that's streatching her holes.
Now you may ask yourself, want if I want to completly abuse my anthro slave? What if I want to completly dominate her, to abuse her. Well don't worry, even a fleshlight as small as her can be pounded senseless without risking to kill her. Look at me, I'm going as fast as I can, my cock is crushing her womb in and out. Her tails is still as wrap to my legs but other then that her body is a complet ragdoll on my cock. I didn't count how many time she squirted, but like you just saw she just fainted thanks to a dick ravaging her womanhood. How ungraceful but that's just going to be her life from now. You can cum as much as you want, like you see nothing is coming out of her cunt. She doens't realised that but her pussy is squizzing itself to the shape of my cock, hoping to suck me dry. That trick could have work agains't an anthro male but as a human male, I could still keep going with her for the whole day.
Last step, getting your toys off your cock. Like you see I'm not holding her anymore, she's balls deep in me, head down in direction of the ground and yet she doesn't move. All you have to do is hold her head, start shaking your waste and pull on her head. The rest of her body will follow even if her pussy will be sucking as hard as it can to stay on your cock. You can now store her, abandon her or anything else you wish to do with those sub-being. But for now, I think you learned enough about anthro girl sex life, feel free to ask any question to your teacher and don't forget to rewind that tape.

>You might wonder what makes humans special in a world where other anthros might have 112 km/h sprints or constant 360 degree visual perception
>theres a dark truth
>they're the ultimate sex fiends.
>in an earlier world, they were alone in fucking for pleasure.
>this means no ruts or heat cycles. They're dtf at all times, and can afford to do so with no barbs or knots to wait to disappear. They are built for pleasure like no other
>unparralleled endurance from their earlier unique hunting style.
>when a human wants you, you'll be at it for anywhere from half an hour to 3 hours, as opposed to mere seconds from other species.
>high penis to body ratio, compared to other species, for no reason at all. And similarly sized partners don't even use their cocks with the frequency and proficiency of humans.
>a weaker sense of smell than many other animals. When you enter a human's dwelling, you WILL smell their desire for sex, and their previous endeavors the closer you get to the bedroom.
>if a human wants you, you WILL know, their courting rituals usually make absolutely no accommodations for their natural musk.
>for an anthro, smelling that would be like casually stripping down to nothing in public mid-conversation.
>they just don't take the steps to hide it the way canines or felines would.
>It's no secret. It's gotten to the point one could just barge into the shower and force your muzzle onto their exposed erections before decades of social conditioning and pleasure unfathomable to your anthro mind rewrites your sexuality and addicts you human cock on the spot.
>their sheer force of presence would have you recline and calling yourself lucky for being raped by them

>somehow end up with same master as wife
>it's a blessing and a curse
>forced to preform in front of everyone, and not always with their lover
>the husband has to endure watching his wife be bred against their will and being penetrated himself
>both must lick clean the cock that was just violating their spouse, then eat out the other's creamed holes
>then they are forced to fuck each other
>the wife's holes are well lubricated by human sperm, only pushed further in by her husband's thrusts
>they put their lips together in a filthy mockery of love, tasting nothing but their master's musky seed on their tongues
>occasionally a human or two joins in, assisting the couple's lovemaking with his cock in their anuses
>the husband cums inside, dooming their firstborn child to be born as a slave
>their first memory will be of their parents worshiping the human cock that owns them
>one happy family, a mother pregnant with their half-sibling, a father who surrendered his masculinity, and their many growing young both pure and halfbreeds who learn quick their their kind, no matter the gender, are but toys and novelties of their human

>she tries to accuse a human man of rape
>other anthro girls just laugh at her and tease her, telling her everybody knows being fucked by a human was a dream come true

>Pro-Anthro anarchist sues Anon
>human judge
>Anon wins case
>Anon counter-sues
>Anon wins again (bay bee)
>anthro court ordered into sexual slavery for 1 year

Anybody else here who is more into the 'lighter' and more sublime aspects of human domination?
Things such as;
>Sensitive Anthro noses being able to press against the skin to directly smell the masculine pheromones in sweat
>They can taste it too
>The lack of a fur coat meaning musculature can be prominently seen and shown off
>More viscous cum that can get stuck in fur, which would be awfully difficult to clean out since cum coagulates when in contact with water.
>Again, Anthro noses could pick up on the smell of semen on a girl's fur for weeks after
>Human hands being much more dexterous to be more efficient in petting (rewards for good behaviour - domestication) and sexual stuff involving hands, mostly teasing.
Slavery and stuff is cool and all but I really do prefer the detailed 'smaller' things that go a long way, especially if they are inherently tied to the human-anthro relationship.
Anyone can get enslaved, raped or used, but something like being able to break the mind of a woman simply by your natural scent is only something that works with Humans-on-Anthros

>Some anthro girls get kidnapped and forced into free used station
>One day, they see a bunch of cops coming into the building
>They think their finally free from all those "big and juicy human cock"
>But the truth is, Anthro Rape has just been legalised while they were stuck here

>anthro challenges buff anon
>he accepts
>ups the stakes and makes it a public fight
>anthro accepts
>anthro gets defeated through superior technique
>reputation destroyed
>confidence annihilated
>?????
>becomes your concubine

>You've successfully currypted the local convent
>It was honestly easier than you anticipated
>You just had to make them comfortable around you, and wait until their heat cycle rolled around
>Ordinarily they would isolate themselves and ride it out by themselves, but you convinced them to let you visit under the guise of bringing food and other supplies
>After a few days, when their heats should be reaching full strength, you make a request, asking if one of them would be willing to hear some confessions from you
>After some deliberation Sister Celia, a bovine lady with massive tits, volunteers
>There in the dark confines of the confessional you talk about a few mundane things, really just playing for time, letting her need build
>Then, you hit her with it
>You confess to having illicit thoughts about some of the people around you
>You confess to wanting to steal them away from those who they've made vows to
>You confess you've thought about how their physical needs are never satisfied, and how they've been so good to you and you don't like seeing them in need
>In the silence that follows, you can hear Sister Celia's breathing, heavier than before, and practically smell her wetness through the confessional screen
>Time for the final card
>"Sister Celia... Will you help me?"
>"Yes" comes the breathy reply
>You hear her stand up and exit her side of the confessional, before the door to yours opens and you see her fantastic curves silhouetted against the light of the empty church
>Almost before the door shuts your hands are on each other
>She eventually gets herself positioned on the kneeler, ass pointed at you
>She flips up her habit to reveal as you thought, absolutely nothing beneath it
>You waste no time and line your tip up before grabbing her fat tits and slamming yourself into her
>What follows is pure bliss as you fuck her through at least three orgasms before you paint her cervix white
>First orgasm was the easy one, coming practically as soon as your cock hilted against her cervix
>The second one happened not long after, when you started whispering in her ear
>"Feels good, doesn't it? Feel it filling you up, making you complete... This is what you deserve. You deserve to feel good, and I want to help you".
>At this point she was basically a puddle in your hands, moaning every time your cock brought her to a new peak
>Finally you felt your own orgasm near
>Time to really seal the deal
>You lean forward, pressing your whole weight into her and rolling her nipples between your fingers
>"Gonna cum soon... You want that? You want me to knock you up? You'd have to tell the other sisters, you know... Tell them that you found a new god to worship..."
>She nearly screams out, begging for your seed
>With a final thrust, you fill her more completely than ever before, feeling her squirt away her last doubts
>As you pull out, words start coming back to her
>"Gotta tell them... Gotta show them... Too good not to share..."
>In that moment, you knew you had succeeded
>One by one, you would go on to show each sister what they had been missing out on

Over the previous years of my youth I had watched the family feud between my family and the neighbouring wolf pack from the hayloft of my grandparent’s barn year after year. Laster year after a brutal anything goes fight the beasts had been scattered, beat raw, fucked, brutalized and sent with their tails between their legs. The victory had been even sweeter for me since a young wolf from the demolished pack at the time had also climbed up into the loft to watch and we fought, which I had won by slamming her head through the roof the rest of that day i had kept her lower half nestled in my lap while I watched the rest of that year’s battle. Now that I was going to be called up for the battle I started obsessively learning some of the backgrounds of our family feud with these wolves.
The tradition of yearly fights had started between Grandma and the Wolf Matriarch we called Big bitch long ago. When gram was first settling the land they had fought all their youth over hunting rights and then they fought after they both started having children, bringing their husbands into it and then their children and grandkids. Apparently, we had beaten them a lot more than they had beaten us, particularly in the last few years. In fact, we had now won five years in a row and unbeknownst to them this year might be the final battle since the government was finally taking a harder stance on wild anthros. Grandpa had commissioned some documents of ownership for the wolves on his land but first we had to get them under our thumbs. If we could hrash our wolfpack family rivals this year it would be the end of the generational struggle and Grandma fully intended to make a wolf pelt rugs out of that old grey bitch. something that was legally murder until last week This year's fight was an obvious time to get that slippery pack into one place for a collaring and since grandmas was to prideful to employ tech in these battles H2H was the way to go she would say.
At high noon on thanksgiving day the barn door was opened to the carnivores, a signal daring them to come by in force. The barn hadn’t been used for anything but a couple of ‘neutral ground’ agreements. Since we intended to go all out and knock their whole pack into an easily captured twitching heap Grandma was convinced by Dad to have the barn be the fighting arena since it wouldn't do to have wolves scatter once we started to kick their asses and we want to capture them all. In exchange for this request, the wolves had wanted to fight with us not wearing any clothes since they always considered our use of the stuff as cheating. I heard the sound of howling outside the barn. That was the sound of the Greypelts arriving. The visitors came into view in the yard filling in. The whole extended pack of the furry bastards emerged from the woods. If they lost they didn’t know it but we would own them as pets legally.
The wolves file into our barn. All 8 of them. My grandpa and grandma lined up our family opposite them. Starting in the center with themselves and moving outward on both sides with the parents on either side and their kids on the wings. They lined up the same way. Then my grandma and the old bitch on the other side came out to the center to have a verbal spat as one of the young wolves, the alpha amongst the youngsters broke rank to go shut the gate and lock it. he needed help with the later half and so Annie came over and show him how to use the key. Then had him swallow it.
I still didn’t know the pack’s names and there were no weigh-in or measurements but I’ll summarize the initial match-ups and give a simple rundown of all the people there before we began our scrap. with the word 'people' being in quotation marks when it comes to the wolf family The materials in the barn were not off limits for use as weapoms though overtly arming oneself was heavily discouraged, "human trickery" using the environment is acceptable.
>Team wolves
Smoker 5”10 58 years, over 200 lbs he’s a big pot bellied mangey brute, with one eye whited out after an unfortunate incident of getting stabbed with a fire poker when he ‘cleverly’ tried to invade our cabin by crawling down the chimney. Stupid but thinks he’s not.
Old bitch 5”6, 200 lbs, old wolf with long graying black coat going white, has a hunchback after an old fight when she was once broken in half by Grandma.
Little bitch 5”5”, 150lbs, 30+ years, grey pelt. The family rivalry on her mother’s side runs steady. Little bitch and mom are every bit as hateful of each other as their parents were.
Ferret chaser 6”0 190lbs 40+ years old with greasy black pelt. The smartest of the pack but also the most cowardly. Is subservient to his mate who drags him unwillingly into these fights every year where he has consistently run away, What he'll do now is nobody's clue.
Puppy love 6”6”, 230lbs, late teens. A shaggy wolf who’s at the peak of his physical fitness, often goes hunting alone to subdue and rape other woodland creatures.
Alpha pup 5”8, 165lbs, mid teens, well-groomed pelt. The self-ascribed ‘leader’ of the youngsters among the wolf pack including the older and physically imposing puppy love.
Roofer 5”6,120 lbs mid teens, grey pelt. You beat her and fucked on the roof of this very barn in late puberty and she clearly has some resentment over that, she glares daggers at you.
Yipper and Nipper 4”9 and 80lbs each. Young teens. Wolf girl twins are just old enough to get her first taste of violence and fucking.
(hidden) Dirty 5”6”, 122lbs, early 20s, vivid red and white pelt. A fox anthro who whores herself out to the wolves. They keep her around as free sex for the lower exchelons of their family.
>Team (you)
Grandpa 6”1, 210lb, 61 years, short red hair. He is a big pot-bellied mangey brute, one eye whited out after an unfortunate incident of getting stabbed with a fire poker when he so ‘cleverly’ tried to invade our cabin by crawling down the chimney.
Grandma 5”4, 165 lbs, 59 years, short-blonde hair, and a spitting image of a tomboy if a tomboy stereotype woman ever reached the dusk of their life. She sported many old scars from a lifetime of grappling with the Wolf matriarch Big bitch.
Dad 6"1, 180lbs, 43 years old short light brown hair Your father, an industries in the city still shares in Grandma's hate for the wolves but has no patience for these games of ritual combat. Should he have had his way he'd have shot them all long ago and be done with it.
Mom 5”7”, 140lbs, 36 years, medium blonde hair, Wrinkles setting in and marked with a similar if less developed canvas of scars and scratches from her opponent as Grandma had for big bitch.
Cousin Jack 6"1, 180 lbs, 27 years old, short black hair. A fitness freak who own a gym in the nearby town and uses these scraps with wolves to test wrestling holds without repercussions for breaking something.
Melinda 5'8 140lbs, 25 years, light brown hair, is fit, but has never fought before.
Sister Annie 115 lbs, 19 years, long blonde hair. A nun in training who’s vow of celibacy makes the wolves obsessively fantasize about fucking her.
>You: age 17 Describe yourself.
Pet Collie: 131 lbs, 31 years, The latest in a long line of proud and loyal collies named collie who guard your grandparent's farm.
>Suprise! This is actually a quest:
>What do you do?
Grandpa and Smoker yell “fight!” and the two families rushed toward each other. The sudden sounds of howls, groans and grunts of exertion, cries of pain and the thuds of skin on fur are omnipresent.
Roofer, so named because of her once sneaking off to watch last year's battle rushed forward at me and swung her leg in a mad roundhouse. I stopped short and let the kick whistle past me. Roofer staggered off balance. I snagged her greasy long coat with my left hand and jerked her by the head to send her the rest of the way off balance. She staggered forward and I jerked back on her fur. She cursed and fell to the side landing on her knees. Before she could react I stepped behind her, pulled back on her nape’s fur and drove my fist down toward her muzzle. She yelped and jerked her head. My knuckles hit her hard on the forehead rather than on the eye or cheek where I intended. She grunted under the blow, but didn’t wilt away. Instead she twisted on her ditrigrade knees and tried to hit me in the balls. I jumped to the side and kicked at her crotch with my foot. She grabbed for my leg to stop a repeat of the hit and I jerked it away. She swung a clawed swipe and hooked a paw around my other ankle and dug it it. I went down on my ass. She started to climb on top, but I kicked her in the face. That put her on her side moaning. I rolled onto my knees, and hugged the little wolf bitch across herhips and then reared back. She yelped and is thrown up and over. It was a brief sensation, as the reverse bearhug was converted into one hell of a suplex. The world seemed to turn and spin, as you felt her body get thrown in an arc, until she landed hard upon the back of her head and shoulders as rest of her would follow driving home the impact leaving the young wolf to virtually fold into herself from the momentum of the suplex in a somewhat humorous position, folded as the aftershock of it reverberates through her frame.
This early gaining of the upper hand against your first fuck with her slack rump nestled in your lap during adolescence was invigorating and with her stunned for this split second it gives you the time to survey and consider how things are playing out elsewhere in the barn.
To the center of the fight, Grandpa and his old enemy Huffer had again locked up in their slow-motion old man version of a brawl. Grandpa won the initial punching contest, hurting Smoker's mouth and sending him staggering, but the fat bellied bastard lowered his shoulder and charged taking Grandpa of his feet. Once on the ground, the bigger animal rolled this way and that staying on top. They punched and clawed at one another. Grandpa’s old boxing arm opened up the side of huffer’s face whenever the old dog opened his gob, but Grandpa’s lips were split and it looked like the punch that had done it might have chipped a tooth. The two were soon locked with Smoker's jaw line of mostly gums being held back from gramp’s throat with both hands.
Next to the two old men were the Matriarchs of the families. They hated one another more than anyone else. Old bitch had pumped out at least 35 pups over the years on Grandma's meagre three kids though there was something to be said about quality seeing as most of those never stuck around. They slugged and whipped one another for about a minute, and then they tied up in a clawing, biting old fashion bitch fight. Grandma liked working on the other woman’s huge burnt out wold crotch and she soon had deep claw marks all over the useless old organs. Old bitch retaliated with the same tactics, but she also used her weight. Grandma was forced back out of the line of fighters. The two old enemies stayed close together, as their gnarled hands tried to wring the spirit out of the other. In the tangle, Big bitch finally managed to hook her right leg behind Grandma and down they went, with Big bitch landing on top of Grandma hard in the dirt.
Mom and Little bitch met in a savage all out rush. They cursed each other’s names, twisted together in a mutual hair pull. LB’s knee got Mom in her cunt twice and then they both went down with bitch coming out on top. They fought in the dirt of the barn floor, wrestling and hitting. the wolf stayed on top and got in some extra damage on Mom. Mom ripped long furrows in the Bitch’s back and actually chomps down on her tail, but LB had Mom’s beautiful face marred with deep scratches. Mom bucked up to get the bitch off her. She rode the buck and ended up in a school girl pin sitting on Mom’s breasts Mom tried to bite the canid’s thigh, but the wolf bitch grabbed the front of Mom's blonde hair with her left hand. Then she started punching down with her right hand. She was a powerful striker and took Mom over the eye again and again as Mom groaned and writhed under the bitch. The rest of Mom’s face was relatively well protected by the angle and the wolf’s legs, but her forehead was wide open to punch after punch after punch. Mom kicked her legs and clawed bloody streaks in her thigh and ass, but the bitch just kept punching. Mom’s forehead was split open in four places. Once the blood started, Little bitch pressed her teetch into the wound and then ground her teeth into the bloody ruptures. Mom screamed bloody murder. Just then Jack came to her assistance. Little bitch saw him coming ready to kick. She ducked under his foot and scrambled off Mom in the opposite direction. Mom’s face was a mask of blood, but she was still moving. Jack helped her up. At the same time Little bitch started digging Ferret chaser out from under the tool pile.

>sees literally any human
>m-m-m-m-master...

>order one anthro from the breeder farm
>two arrive
>the girl begs you to keep them together, brother and sister, the only family they have after being taken away from their mother at a young age
>he isn't afraid of slaving his life away, serving humans is bred right into his blood
>rather it is the fact that he will be separated from his sister
>they are willing to do anything to convince you to keep him, so long as they can stay alive together nothing is off the table
>they will cook, clean, and serve you til the very end
>her holes and breasts are open to serve you no matter the location or time of day
>no matter how depraved or humiliating, she will do it without question or hesitation
>from showing off her body, being hooked up to a milking machine while locked in a dark basement, to even training her own children to serve their human daddy-master
>anything
>he offers to labor away, you need another helper, right?
>he'll sleep outside, gather his own food, fluff your cock to better impregnate his sister
>he'll accept being locked in the girliest chastity cage, edged indefinitely, humiliated, abused, defaced, and violated both anally and orally
>and if it would please you, even surrender his testes as a sign of ultimate submission
>they will serve you together, a pair of bodies to fuck and cream during the day then cuddle and spoon with at night
>they are even willing to go so far as to fuck and breed with each other
>whether you wish to see or join them as their squirm and blush while preforming the most taboo of sexual acts
>or want to enjoy their young, pureblooded anthro daughter
>just as long as he knows his sister is close by is enough for him
>anything
>anything to keep them together
Your decision, anons? Do you keep him or do you dump the unwanted male? Will you let him join in on the fun or just his sister?

>Your gym has a /very/ strict No Furry Policy
>Dumbshit pic related decides to fight opreshun
>Bitches at the world until left in
>Proceeds to do random workouts wherever there's more people

>Watch in utter resignation as literal bitch begins to leave a snail trail in the equipment
>Its a small-ass gym in bumfuck nowere
>It cant afford vents to keep "clean" by furfag standards
>Ten minutes in peak hour hits
>Five minutes into /that/ gymthot is humping a bar
>You cringe as you recall the muskslut crew managing to sneak in last month
>They had to fucking close for sterilization
>You just wanna work out, man

>Mixed human-anthro colleges dont have panty raids
>They have brief planting
>Sweaty underwear/fresh cumrags are hidden in obscure places of a female anthro's room.
>Under furniture, usually
>Anthro noses pick up subtle stuff like pheromones but not blunt stink
>Anthro spends days horny for no reason untill the stink gives it out

>Newbie furry arrives to human city
>Plenty of letters banning them from places
>human only metro, gym, cafeteria, stores...
>Gets some palls to "protest" by traveling in the human-only metro wagon.
>Discover way too late human's have crappy sense of smell so their pheromones work overtime to make up for it
>Social Justice Furs just spent half an hour hotboxing themselves in a tin can

>Try to claim a female anthro at a party.
>End up claiming a big chubby rat dude.
>Try to undo it and leave the party but, he keeps following me and wants "hug" me
What should I do /Collared/?

>Dur to Does being stupid, the city imposed a law that let's you do what ever you want deer if they are stuck/trapped on your property.
>you wake up to find two does stick together in a fence. While both of you agree that they are more your side the neighbors bitches about you taking two.
>You make a deal the deer would choose who they wanted but you get heads and he gets tails.
>You get one of if not the best blowjobs in your life while he pounds two cushy asses.
> one your both done you unstick both of them and one chooses you and the other chooses the neighbor.
>You stretch her pussy wide and cum in her as soon as she gets inside but two days later you let her go.
>Your neighbor does the same, but marries her. After the wedding, you return to find the doe you fuck and three more does.
>You make sure they the can walk straight after you "unstuck" them. They keep bringing more does until you have 9.
>Kids call you santa claus and the neighbor watches as you pump your 8 tiny reindeer and the one that started it Rudy.

>Be human teenage noble in grand human empire
>Be perusing the slave markets
>fresh captures from a recently conqured tribe of mountain orcs
>One specimen in particular catches your eye
>she's 6'8" heavily muscled got some scars here and there grey skin
>Big fat tits, big fat ass
>strangely docile
>her stubby short sister is still full of piss and vinegar shouting something in that savage tongue
>buy the two
>little sister has to ride back to your estate tied up
>Big sister actually rides in your carriage
>You're ripidly coming to understand that big sister isn't very smart
>good, that'll make breaking her easier
>you are conversant in Orcish, though her particular mountain orc dialect is a bit outside of your knowledge base
>still you manage to communicate your desires to big sister
>that she and her sister are meant to be your bodyguards/cumrags
>she seems more confused by it
>"Human small, dick small, not feel it"
>You smirk lightly
>"Have you ever seen a human dick?"
>"No?"
>"Well, you're in for a surpise!"
>Get to your estate
>little sister continues to thrash around scream into her gag
>Screams even louder after big sister carries her to your bedroom over her shoulder at your direction
>You're still not sure if big sister is actually really smart or really dumb
>Ask big sister if she'd ever had sex before
>"Yes, with hurg, orc warrior, big dick!"
>ask for the length of his dick
>"This big"
> holds fingers apart indicate around three inches
>seems that mountain orcs are no more well-endowed than their plains counterparts
>You arrive at your bedroom
>You've got these hooks for hanging things (and bedroom partners) from the ceiling
>you bid big sister to hang her little sister from one of them where she'll be able to see everything that happens
>once she does that you tell the big sister to lay down on your bed
>she does so seemingly more curious than anything else
>You activate the magical restraints and they instantly latch on to big sister's wrists and ankles and keep her locked her
>for her part she seems more dully curious
>you briefly pause to cup the little sister's face and rub your thumb along her cheek bone
>she glares at you orange iris's buring brightly against the black's of her eyes unpleased with this display of gentle intimacy
>"I want you to watch what happens now."
> you stand over her sister and staring into her eyes, with one hand on her cheek you undo your belt with your other and drop your pants
>Your thick, long, meaty bitch breaker was big by human standards
>By orc standards you are monstrous
>The big sister stares uncomprehendingly at your dick as it flops onto her abs
>you feel a slight, fearful quiver runs through her stomach
>you're still making eye contact with her sister who stares wide eyed, motionless at your massive cock
>"A bit bigger than Hurg, isn't it?"
>"lots bigger"
>she sounds confused and there's a slight touch of fear in voice
>"Don't worry"
>you lean down to her catch her eyes in your own
>"I'll be gentle."
>You kiss her on the lips, carefully navigating her tusks
>"mmph?"
>There is a certain unpleasant scent about her mouth Orcs not being very good at oral hygeine
>You suffer through the bad breah for a reason though
>Orcs don't kiss, their tusks make it more or less impossible to kiss another orc
>therefore Orc mouths are used only for biting or speaking
>however one of the easiest ways to establish dominance with female Orc slaves was to introduce them to the simple pleasure of making out
>Your tongue eagerly seeks out hers and dances circles around it
>You map out every last centimeter of her mouth
>She moans and squirms under you completely unprepared for this type of oral assault
>this carries on for minutes before you decide to give her a break and pull back
>She stares up at you, panting her tongue hanging lolled out of her mouth like dog, grey cheeks even greyer from the prominent blush
>you smile down at her and pull back dragging your cock along her abs as you do
>her thighs quiver in apprehension as she watchs your bitch breaker receede having figured out what's going to happen next
>You place your tip at her entrance and are pleased to find the five minute make out session has left her absolutely soaked
>you reach up and cup her face and smile as she leans into your hand
>"As I said, I'll be gentle."
>You push in.
>It's a good thing she is as wet as she is
>otherwise you'd never be able to get inside of her
>She's tight, wet and ridiculously hot
>you feel the urge to let loose, to absolutely pummel her cunt
>To stretch her to the point that no orc could even hope to touch her sides
>But, you promised her you'd be gentle
>And so, you slowly but surely sink your length into her
>there is resistance but by and large you have little issues
>her grey-skinned cheeks darken and she stares down at you eyes half lided
>she huffs and puffs as you steadily glide into her
>she lets out little whines
>her tongue pushes at her bottom teeth and flicks at her tusks
>after what seems like an eternity you bottom out your head resting in the valley of her cleavage staring up at her
>"I-I took it!"
>she speaks in this husky amazed tone tinged with hysterical giddiness
>"You did, I'm proud of you!"
>the already harsh blush on her face gets even darker and she bashfully turns her head away from you
>in less than 30 minutes you had reduced a savage, brutish orcess to a quirvering mass of woman blushing like she was experiencing her first throes of puppy love
>which, if your understanding of orc psychology and social conventions was right, she actually was
>you then start moving
>you slowly begin grind your hips against her drawing out the most adorable whimpers and groans
>you wouldn't think someone 6'8" would make these cute little squeaks when you rub against her womb but you'd be wrong
>her body is already shining with sweat
>When orcs sweat during coitus the sweat is extra fragrant
>has these pheramones that drive their mates nuts
>the urge to go full bore and break the orcish cunt surrounding your meat becomes more and more urgent but you refuse it all the same
>After all, you promised to be gentle and show her a good time
>speaking of, Big sis lets out a deep, almost bovine moan and you feel something squirting against your hips her first orgasm
>let's see how many you can give her
>Big sis arcs her back as orgasm 7 slams into her
>her pheramones soak the air
>"Gggh ghh"
>she's been reduced to noises as she tries to speak
>You've kept your slow pace never once giving into the desire to let loose
>you nip at her tits leaving hickey's here and there
>you had better finish up soon
>poor girl's libel to pass out if you keep it up
>You grunt and briefly stop holding back
>you unleash a wave of cum
>she lets out a keening wail and cums herself
>you pull back and observe her
>she's drenched the sheets and she shines with sweat
>her skin is dark with blush
>her tongue has lolled out of her mouth
>She looks beautiful
>You pull out in one swift move earning an exhausted grunt
>You call to a servant to prepare a bath and set about bringing the orc to her senses
>she blushes girlishly and stumbles as you stand her up
>she leans against you and you nip against her breasts earning little giggles
>you turn your eyes to her bratty little sister who watches you wide eyes
>"Tomorrow, darling, you're going to get the same treatment."
>you begin to pull big sis along
>"Now, come along love."
>"yes master."

>tfw never conquer an anthro kingdom
>tfw thier queen goddess will never submit herself to slavery as part of her surrender
>Tfw will never have her kiss your dick in front of her subjects as a sign of submission

>Training a femboy anthro isn't very complicated
>Among the many steps, you'll simply burn their brain away throught multiple forced orgasms
>Bringing them closer to some kind of cock-warmer than to a living breathing being

Orc tribes truly have it hard in the current times.
>They are still suffering the consequences for the actions of their ancestors
>They waged two great wars against Humans, collapsing their greatest civilizations twice
>Only for their hordes to be shattered during the third great war
>The once undefeatable Orc Khanate started splintering
>Ever since then Humans have been hunting, raiding and conquering Orc tribes

That could have some really hot consequences.
>in orc culture, strength and power is everything and might makes right
>orcs who get captured and used as sex slaves actually consider themselves lucky
>in their eyes, they're concubines and wives rather than lowly playthings
>and they're happy to breed with powerful and prestigious males, regardless of race
To orcs, it could just be the natural ways of things. The powerful asserting themselves.

That would be hot.
>Orc huntress gets captured and turned into a sex slave of a minor noble who rides a great beast
>As they enter a city, she sees how her tribe was captured before she was
>Many Orc women look at her with envy, as they are being sold on the market
>Because unlike her, they weren't picked by any of the levies, knight, mercenaries or minor nobles as slaves

>Anthro slave
>Fully domesticated, obedient and submissive, pride broken
>Good, but also kind of boring
>Break into random anthro's home late at night
>Sample the goods, anthro wife's pussy can be considered barely used by human standards despite birthing multiple children
>Anthro husband is tied up and stuffed in the closet, trying not to get aroused by listening to his precious wife being stolen in their bed
>After a few hours he finally struggles out of his bindings and opens the door
>On his bed is the old slave, sleeping peacefully
>The wife is currently stuffed in the back of the human's car, awaiting her own breaking and breeding
>The anthro husband calls the police but can do nothing about it since his "wife" is still here
>Life goes on as normal, he eventually accepts her into the family
>His kids wonder why their momma looks different but don't question much
>She is very quiet, obeying his every order without question
>She cooks, cleans, like a maid
>In some ways it's an upgrade
>Even has sex with her, including things that his previous wife would have never allowed
>Despite her blown out pussy it is the best sex he's had, the slave having plenty of experience pleasuring a cock vastly superior than the one currently inside her
>Of course there were a few oddities with his new wife, including teaching his sons the pleasures of anal masturbation and his daughter the joys of human males
>But it's current year, so let them
>Some time passes, and his new wife birthes several kids of their own
>But then the human returns, again breaking into the home late at night with the old anthro wife behind him
>He ties up the husband yet again
>The anthro husband watches as his wives lead their anthro kids into the master bedroom and strips them naked
>The human wastes no time and deflowers his daughters both older and younger, violates and emasculates his sons
>After a while he leaves, leaving both the used up wives on their bed and taking his young children

More like different tribes and types of Orc females are getting slowly enslaved by human nations of the third age.
Any ideas on how to deal with these tribes?
Forest Orcs
>Strong, voluptuous, average intelligence
>Red, brown and black hair colors and 6 to 7 feet in height (green, light green and dark green)
>They live in small primitive towns, villages and wooden castles
>Most they can organize is larger raiding party (around 5000 orcs)
Mountain Orcs
>Very strong, voluptuous, intelligence is below average, sharp claws and teeth
>black or white hair and 6'7 to 8 feet in height
>shades of bluish green skin
>They live in small tribes of at most 500 Orcs
>The most they can organize is a small hunting party and exchanges between tribes to prevent genetic bottle necking
Desert Orcs
>Thinner and weaker than an most Orcs, slightly less voluptuous, average intelligence
>Dark hair colors and 6 to 7 feet in height
>Skin in shades of sand brown and yellowish green
>They live in great decrepit fortresses that are slowly falling apart and nomadic tribes
>They are united in trying to reclaim the glory of the old khanate, being able to organize actual armies
>They form a great empire with each warchiefs owning a fortress
Plain Orcs
>Strong, voluptuous, average intelligence
>Red, brown, blond and black hair colors and 6 to 7 feet in height
>Skin in various shades of light green
>They live in great nomadic hordes
>Most don't consider them a threat because of all the monsters that attack them

/tg/ made something like that
>Kobolds are compelled to serve other races
>Which ever race becomes master, they naturally start to change to match the desires of their masters.
>Human-aligned kobolds start growing fur, and get fuzzier with each new generation
>A century later the house dogbold looks nothing like the original species.

>Be trainer.
>Don't use pokeballs to catch wild pokemon.
>Instead use you dick. Fuck the best into submission, train them using sex as a reward.
>Impregnation is used as an incentive for exemplary work
>>Like winning tourneys, bringing in new Pokegirls to break, catching pokegirls that try to run away, helping you break them in.

It being that simple is really hot. So many opportunities...
>Go to the beach a hot summer day, see a lovely anthro sunbathe after a swim to dry her fur
>Walk up to her and, before she even notices you're there, grab her and claim her on the spot
>See a couple of anthro friends sitting and talking at a cafe, one of them catching your eye
>Walk up and interrupt their conversation as you pin the good one down against the table and take her then and there
>Get a delivery at your house, the deliverer turning out to be a pretty anthro woman
>Drag her inside and ravage her, claiming her as your fucktoy
>Every time a female anthro needs to take public transportation, and the bus/train/whatever happens to be full of humans, it turns into a massive gangbang that fucks the anthro into unconsciousness
>whoever remains then can drag her home, and she wakes up leashed to some stranger's bed

I have been thinking about a bit of a reverse corruption scenario.
>move into a new apartment
>having two neighbors
>on the left is a family of two doe, mother and daughter
>on the right a mare
>they fully know that humans can do what they want to anthros
>so they are as friendly as possible
>the doe mother start even whoring herself out to you, in an effort to protect her daughter
>starts even encouraging you to use bondage on her
>the mare joins in, in an effort to not be enslaved and sold or killed and cooked
>one day you just barge into the doe's apartment and fuck both her and her daughter
>you sold both the doe's and mare's apartments
>now you wake up with blowjob form who ever you didn't put into bondage

>daughter admits to you that she's not interested in furbois whatsoever
>so whenever one tries to ask her out, she arranged for him to have dinner with you, to "feel him out"
>of course the evening usually ends with you feeling his ass wrapped around your cock while he busts like a firehose
>daughter doesn't know exactly what's going on, she just knows that your methods make her annoying suitors go away
>she's moved out by now but still regularly gives you new numbers
>you, on the other hand, now have a growing list of anthro boys who are always down for late night booty calls

>be a warlock
>summon and permanently bind loona to your will
>use the strongest, most secure binding spell in existence
>as her master, she can't harm you or allow you to come to harm, even if you (accidentally) tell her to
>she's also not allowed to hurt herself unless you tell her to
>other than that, she's forced to do ANYTHING you demand of her
>this includes answering your questions truthfully
>the spell reads your intentions, not your exact phrasing
>pet play, demean and annoy the shit out of her every day
>make her bark like a dog and sleep in a dog basket
>fuck her, make her worship your cock
>make her clean your house and cook your food
>look into her eyes and FEEL her unyielding wrath
>there's no question she'd kill you in the most painful way imaginable if she could
>tease her further about the fact she can't hurt you
>"oh my, what a cute, angry face you're making there. you really don't like sucking on my dick, huh?"
>"I'LL FUCKING Kiii...n-n-no master, I don't like it, woof woof"
>"too bad for you! hold still, I'm gonna nut in your face"
>"DON'T YOU FUCKING Daaa...y-y-yes master, holding still, woof woof"
>"aah, there we go. now, you're not allowed to clean that off for the rest of the day, understood?"
>"YOU MOTHER Fuuu...y-y-yes master, understood, woof woof"
>"good girl~ who's my little demon doggy?"
>"I'M GONNA RIP Yooo...t-t-thank you master, I'm your little demon doggy, woof woof"
>"yes you are!" *head pat*

>spawn a bunch of daughters with your anthro sex slave
>as soon as they're old enough, start fucking them too
>fill their loli anthro pussies with cum daily, fucking them in every room of the house
>they all become pregnant
>breed them over and over, and their daughters too, and their daughters...
>treat your own anthro daughters as loli fucktoys, making yourself a fresh batch with each "generation"
>meanwhile, your original sex slave gets to be the "proud" mother, grandmother, great-grandmother, etc., of an entire lineage of cumdumpsters

>tfw no complete failed male of a cotton-tailed sissy femboy to alternate between humiliating and cherishing as my whims dictate

You guys wouldn't actually kidnap, rape and impregnate an officer of the LAW, would you? Just think about what you're doing, this is someone who's trained for years (in this case) in order to get this position. There's dozens, if not hundreds of sleepless nights she spent toning her body and studying her tests. She's got a dream to prove that anthros are more than just stupid holes for men, and God willing, she'll be proven.

>Live in a monster town
>You're the only human in town
>No matter what you do the police doesn't arrest you
>Mostly on account of them being to busy sucking your cock to actually do anything.

>tfw will never put a slave collar on some powerful anthro
>Tfw will never make her act like a pet, including giving her a more appropriate pet name like "Bella" or "onahole"
>Tfw will never use her as a cockrest, occasionally slapping her with my cock when she gets too noisy
>Tfw will never enjoy the impotent rage painted on her face as I cum all over it

>They call it Roppers
>A small pill with similar effects to ecstasy if taken by itself
>However an alternate, even more intense sensation may be enjoyed by taking advantage of a funny quirk of anthro biology
>Human semen is known to have addictive, drug-like qualities by itself. By first loosening up the anthro's mind and causing increased blood flow through arousal, a single Ropper pill can send even an experienced drug user into what can only be described as a sexual epileptic seizure. This what is known as a "Full Ropper"
>Once a pill and at least five ml of semen are consumed the user will feel heat in their chests and an immediate arousal of their sexual organs. Inexperienced users may faint at this stage as even the light rubbing of underwear on their clitorises or penises will cause an immediate climax. Bondage and stripping nude is recommended.
>Female users will experience something similar to estrus, with fertility rates increasing dramatically during the effects of the drug. Male users will ejaculate multiple times uncontrollably, any additional sensation will cause the male to launch his ejaculate with impressive velocity. The world record is currently 876ml produced.
>The user will stop responding to all external stimuli after tenminutes. In many club or party situations this is when other partygoers, usually humans, will take advantage of the downed anthro
>It has also been reported that females who have previously given birth will also begin to lactate after thirty minutes after consumption
>Users have described the experience as an unending orgasm that seems to last for years, feeling all pleasure without any pain or aching
>Fortunately these drugs are fairly safe, with most reported injuries being caused by their surroundings and dehydration

>"Hey! It finally happened! A human guy took me!"
>"Really? Congrats, Claire!"
>"Yeah! He already fucked me this morning, I had to blow him and everything!"
>"Yeah, humans are really horny. My master loves my tits, he titfucks me every day."
>"No surprise, Elena, you're practically a cow..."
>"HEY! Shut up, Zoey! I'm a proud wolf! A wolf who serves her human!"
>"Yeah, yeah... Hey, remember Madeline? I recently heard she's having her fourth baby by her human master."
>"Wow. I hope I get to have a big family with my master too."
>"You can count on it! Human males put rabbits to shame."
The thought of anthros small-talking giddily about getting fucked hard in all sorts of ways daily, along with being knocked up, as if it's the best thing they could've ever wanted is both really damn hot and endearing.

It's always nice to see an anthro on her knees to properly pray to the God of Humanity.

>praying to the God of Humanity for a kind master is the only hope she has
>her goddesses are gone, made sex slave and concubines of the God of Humanity
>she hopes that a kind master would buy her
>so she wouldn't go to the farm

>Elder Scrolls
>Be Nibenese Beastmaster
>That’s a “B”
>Unlike others who carry the title, you don’t tame animals
>You tame Beastfolk
>Khajiit, Argonian, Harpy, you and your clans had a long, proud history of keeping the Betmer in their place
>Slavery may have been illegal in the Empire, but “serfdom” wasn’t, and your clans often sent armies of “servants” to fight in the Legions so nobody really stopped your folk.
>Taught magic by your Nibenese family, swordfighting by your Argonian swordmasters, and the art of fucking beasts into mindless wrecks by Khajiiti teachers, now it was your turn, to head out into the world and build your own harem of “servants”.
>Or so it should have been had the Empire not caught you in the middle of a stormcloak ambush.
>Sent to Skyrim, you had lost everything; but that wasn’t going to stop you.
>Escaping Helgen, you were determined to start over. Here.
>It was evening on your second month when you found your first mark. J’Nahirri, a Khajiiti huntress who had come to Whiterun seeking aid to rescue her companions. A caravan of Khajiit had been ambushed, and as far as she knew, only she escaoed.
>The young Khajiit was happy you agreed, and thought nothing of your suggestion to discuss payment outside.
>With training from her own people, you dragged J’Nahirri into a dark corner, stripped her, and gagged the girl before she could even get her claws out.
>She caught a glimpse of your member, yowling in fright moments before you claimed her.
>At such a late hour, it was no surprise no one was out to help her. Not that they would have. Under the shade of the Inn, one could mistake your hard thrusts as just another bush jostled by the wind.
>The poor thing only lasted a single climax, the human cock inside her driving her insane with pleasure.
>When you pulled free, she was meekly asking for more. You quietly slipped the collar around her neck and performed the proper binding magic.
>Before you prepared to leave, you saw her. Those pale green scales, those wicked knives. You knew she had to be yours.
>Jasheena was certainly deadly. She was an assassin, or so she said. She carried herself like one, but performed mistakes a young pickpocket knows not to do.
>As such, she was so determined to hunt her target, she never noticed you hunting her.
>When you struck, J’Nahirri had distracted her, and you disarmed her.
>Then you taught her the joys of submitting to a human master.
>All that boasting about her skills, and she never has a reason why all it took was two climaxes before she was swearing loyalty to your cock and begging for the collar.
>Rojirra and Xeech-Shux were a happy accident.
>On the road, J’Nahirri had spotted signs of a struggle.
>According to her a pair of fighters had been locked in a struggle, but were then dragged off
>After she dried off your cock, your party jumped out of the wagon to follow the tracks
>The pair were captured by bandits that seemed a bit sore about losing so many friends to the pair of rangers, and were about to show how angry they were
>J’Nahirri put an arrow in the neck of the Nord
>Jasheena put a knife in the Breton.
>You immolated the Orc who had his pants down.
>Rojirra and Xeech were thankful at first that you rescued them, but less happy when you made it clear this was not a rescue.
>They were dumped in the back of the wagon
>As J’Nassiri drove, Jaseena helped you strip Rojirra and Xeech of their past lives.
>Rojirra was tricky to fuck, a virgin. Which made this breaking a very special occasion.
>You were fair, but firm, inserting your cock slowly but with force enough so Rojirra knew penetration was inevitable.
>When it came, she didn’t cry, but merely whimpered as you began to thrust, letting the blood mark your union.
>Whimpers became moans, and Rojirra began to drool behind her gag as you made her cum over and over.
>When you finally planted seed, she had been an unresponsive wreck, breathing heavily as you undid her gag and fastened the collar
>Xeech pleaded, threatened, bargained, begged as you moved to her
>Then all she did was scream.
>Rojirra’s juices made passage easier in Xeech. When Xeech saw Rojirra stir, she called out to her friend, begging her to help
>Rojirra did help. By fastening the collar.
>The trek lasted days. Your girls took turns steering the horses as you stayed in the back, driving your manhood into moaning beastgirls singing.
>’Man’s cock is the best cock’, ‘Master’s cock is the best cock’, ‘I’ll have no one else but you Master’, ‘Breed me Master’
>Over and over this went until you arrived. A fort, ruined and neglected, had been taken over by more bandits.
>The four of you made short work of the unruly brigands, and made your way in.
>Unfortunate for the Khajiit, the bandits found nothing of worth in their caravan and decided keeping them alive was not worth it
>Fortunate for you, another had answered J’Nassiri’s call for help.
>Mimadi-do Rahzir had been a Khajiit born in Skyrm. She had learned to talk like a Nord, drink like a Nord, and fight like a Nord.
>Also how to get into hopeless battles like a Nord
>Strong as her axe-arm was, against so many bandits she was overwhelmed.
>Which left them open to you.
>Jaseena showed just how skilled she was as she left a trail of headless bodies in her wake, until you met the bandit chief. The Nord woman bellowed a challenged, to which all four answered with arrows to her face.
>Didn’t even need to lift a finger.
>Mimadi-do was still on her knees, bound by the bandits when you found her
>Made it easier to bend her over and introduce her to her new master.
>It doesn’t matter how strong the cats think they are, or if they were raised by Nords, or Orcs or Sload. Once they feel a human inside them, the hot cum rushing into their womb, they melt.
>She first promised horrible vengeance, and all the usual threats you’ve heard a dozen times over.
>As the floor soaked with her juices, she broke into sobs, moaning apologies as you made her pussy yours.
>Not to you. To Daro Rahzir. Her husband apparently. You shamed her, her husband, her children.
>That only made you harder.
>Wherever her family were, they were unaware they were losing Mimadi
>That the same cunt that birthed their kittens was taking your seed, and would eventually birth your own children.
>Mimadi cursed and swore as her body betrayed her again and again, promising she would never break.
>She broke.
>As you slipped the collar on her and performed the binding magics she kissed you and spoke with earnest words
>”I live to please you Master.”
>Mimadi-do swore to defend you with her axe, and to spread her legs only for you, and that her womb would only have your children from now on.
>When you asked, she said it didn’t matter anymore. As long as she had you, her past life meant nothing.
>After all you saved her from the bandits and showed her the ecstasy submission can bring.
>You didn’t expect to be in Skyrim long, maybe get one or two Argonians as an escort to Elsweyr.
>But with a harem of five, you realized Skyrim was a big place.
>There had to be plenty more beastfolk just like your girls.
>And it was only a matter of time before you claimed them all

>begin breeding of next generation anthros
>hooked up to the milking machine is the pair of anthros in your stock that you can actually call male
>they were loyal, ready to do anything at a moment's notice from surrendering their own bodies to assisting in securing an unruly female
>it was only natural that you reward them for their years of service and enjoy the fruits that they would plant into the wombs of their breeders
>all the others are completely sterile with their testicles being nothing more than a plaything to fondle and occasionally tap from behind to watch them jump and squeak
>but even these two were edging the line of femininity, with naturally high estrogen levels they had started lactating even without taking extra pills
>you had initially rewarded them with a chance to bed their own females to breed the old fashioned way but they found it impossible to maintain an erection, even with a familiar girth thrusting in and out of their butts
>left with no other options you turned to a rougher method, stealing away their genetic gifts with plastic tubes and vacuum
>they cried and begged for some anal stimulation as the plastic tube relentlessly assaulted their sensitive, previously unused cocks and demanded more and more from their aching, nearly empty balls
>from their pathetic sperm count was it would require much, much more from these tired boys to properly seed their females
>but despite the agony of being milked, they couldn't help but imagine the expanding bellies that contained their children
>they would spread the legs of their daughters and sons open to show off the fruits of their suffering, tight, virgin holes that they would prep with their tongues for the master to deflower
>they would worship the master's cock as it thrust into their offspring
>and they would enjoy the godly gift of a human creampie straight from the freshly ruined holes
>but first, they would have to suffer a bit

Twas the day before X-mas and deep down below
All the boys squealed happily as their semen finally flowed
A whole year in chastity, twinkies locked in a cage
As the bad anthro girl screamed silently in rage
She was the worst, the naughty, the really, really bad
She wouldn't fuck or blow nor worship her dad
So they locked her in the basement with all the young boys
Lots of erect cocks and none of her toys
She was to milk and please them, to collect their weak cum
To stroke their dicks and finger their bum
She called theirs clitties, bitches, and fags
But they heard nothing, only emptying their bags
Each cock she jerked only intensified her regret
And her pussy was really, really soaking and wet
But the boys were relentless and only demanded more
She was their bitch now, and their libido she would restore
Her punishment would take her a whole nine moons
Til her belly and butt looked like birthday balloons
But the baby inside would not be human sired
Instead it would be anthro, totally undesired
Yes, the father would be one of those she'd be milking tonight
A genetic lottery in her womb, of which she could not fight
The good girls would chain her to the top of the bed
And daddy would fuck them right over her head
His sack would swing close, filled with such sacred life
Oh how she regretted not being his wife
She felt the warmth of bad cum in the large syringe
Her belly screamed as her face teared and cringed
Her womb was pumped full with anthro seed
Her very first baby would be of pure anthro breed
And while the others would birth humans or anthros supreme
What came from her pussy had no esteem
She would teach her young twins, the kids of that deer
To open their holes and to worship that spear
Twas the duty of all anthros to submit and to serve
They were but animals, his love, they did not deserve
Anthro eggs and human sperm
A union tonight that they would affirm
The children of man, they would carry to term

>long, long ago when bunnies first came into being they evolved to have feminine forms for both genders as they had no need for the traditional alpha male role of other species
>they all fucked each other anyways
>when bunnies lived in faraway remote villages they evolved even further feminine forms to reduce the inter-aggression that their more masculine ancestors caused
>when the first multi-species cities came into being male bunnies used this to their advantage to become much closer to the females of other anthros, allowing them to lay their seed in stolen bellies
>of course now both genders of their species is but a fuckwife for the welcoming humans
>the bunny boys don't care that the only thing they will ever fertilize is the ground, any sex is good sex to them

A bit of a strange request but
A anthro telling a alien why she will always choose to serve humanity over some pathetic alien race.

>Be furboi
>Get into an argument with a human hitting on your gf
>Argument escalates into a fight
>Get beaten easily.
>Call the police when you regain consciousness.
>Police show up, only take the human's statement
>Starts sucking his cock while writing you a ticket for 'inciting the incident.'
>Warns you that if it happens again, she'll have to arrest you and apply 'disciplinary measures.'
Life is hard for a pathetic furboi.

Remember that owning an anthro pet isn't all fun and games but also a huge responsibility!
Wash them regularly

>Hauty high dragon, one of the last of her kind, hundreds of years of majestic rule and tyrany, flying free in the skys as a conquering resplendent beast.
>Dragons have super low fertility, between that and humanities slow indominal march, there are very few of her kind left.
>humans are nothing if not industrious, find a way to obtain the greatest mounts and companions in the world
>through fey alchemy, magic, and the human spirit, they can now personally impregnate dragons.
> treated somewhere between prized racehourses and trophy wives. given everything they could want as long as they remain fertile, docile and willing to pump out hundreds of their masters spawns like an assembly line, both drake and human. not that they ever refuse, since it means decades of perpetual extesy and orgasm and the contentedness of motherhood, knowing that they were deemed worthy enough to pass on their line.
>Many of their hatchings will be kept with their masters, groomed from birth to be exelent mounts and generally helpful pets.
>but many masters prefer to have some of their brod to grow up “free ranged”. setting them up in some romote cave. youg dragons are self sufficient from near birth, but sometimes they have an assigned housetrained drake to watch over them for a few years. these dragons grow up wild, not sure why their entire species is female nor the secret of their own lineage, nor why they find humans strangely atractive. Being beastly hauty lords like their wild formothers. Spreading terror and collecting hords. That is, until a worthy knight comes along to tame them, and explain how human seed runs through their very veins. They usually are ferociously in denial, but these “free range” drakes tend to become the best mounts and most eager broodmothers.
>thus the dragon race continues. in symbiosis with their human masters.

Another hot thing is that after a while of being a sensory deprived dragon, semi forced and semi willingly being breed and birthing large broods with only the sent of human sweet and tast of human cum as something to focus on, dedicated broodmothers of the extremer sort are often given the option to be let free. their harnesses unshackles. But more often then not, they find the extra sensory imput, the lack of life growing in their bellies, and the lack of musky cum and cocks absolutely terrifying, and beg to be put back in the breeding pens, their cheeks red with humiliation. Knowing it is no longer that they are being forced to be baby factories, but actively submit their high and noble selves to the position of barely mentally functioning onaholes and drake manufacturing plants. thus is the true nature of the magestic dragon.

in fact, many successful mounts, their ability shown through many wars and battles with their rider, who then become broodmothers for their expetional quality as breeding stock, deign to get alchemical treatment to develop udders, so that they may personally feed their human children, as well as their newly hatched drakelings.
of course, they have conceeded to the fact that they will no longer be able to be as battle capable or agile after this. but this is a small price to pay in order to become the best mother they can be.
wild drakes are usually agast (and secretely turned on) at how far these matronly lizards have submitted to their roles.

Enjoying dragons being tamed down to the human level is great.
Just anything involving a relationship between dragon and man is enjoyable. even the warm hearted love stories to the raunchiest domination.
here is a little something that i could see happening.
a young dragoness fighting new feelings she has no control over. these feelings were brought about a knight she spotted near her feeding grounds. unbeknownst to her, he coating her food in dragon aphrodisiacs. First the tossing and turning were light, now every time she flies the air passes over her swollen cloaca teasing her constantly making her think of the metal coated stalker.
she spots him in the tree line next to her watering hole and her aching sex draws her attention, the incessant itching growing as the man hides (poorly) in the bushes.
the dragoness unconsciously spreads her hind legs toward the armored voyeur and starts to lap at the waterfall that is her sex.
the sexually frustrated dragoness starts to growl seductively while continuing to eye the man, the growls that have been developed over generations to be a mating call.
the knight picks up on these invitations and brings some rope and stakes to claim his prize. a courting dance of human and dragon that causes his own pants to tighten by the scaled beauty.
if the mating ritual is successful the pair will be together until the very end of their lives, furthering the co-evolution man and dragon have developed.

she gives some fight. breaths some fire, swipes with her massive claws. but a protective heat resistant potion keeps him from boiling as his armor glows red hot and the slashes give him some superficial cuts. procuring a dragon is still no easy feat, or else everyone would be doing it.
he subdues her by snagging her claws with metal mesh designed for entanglement and bolas to snare the wings. the man came prepared for everything.
the process was long and exausting for both parties all the while the dragoness' need to be bred grew with every second. her hot clit escaped her sex as the struggle continued, exposing herself as the horny lizard she was.
she was completely trapped all four of her legs bound to the ground, normal creatures would think they were dead but she couldn't help but feel relieved. her body twitched with every touch he gave her as he examined his prize. the man spoke draconic and told her that she would become his mate and that all her horde would be moved to his keep.
as he told her this he played with her defenseless sex, touching and playing with her clitoris. her back arched against the bindings as the itch she felt for months was being fullfilled. he continued to serenade her, tasting her fluids bringing her to the edge of the closing orgasm. pulling back only to hear her coo and moan.
the dance wasn't finished, he needed her to submit entirely. but every time she spoke up the fondling continued and pressed her back into a moaning desperate heap.
a wicked smile spread on the man's face as he started to suckle on the exposed organ. howls of desperation writhed out of the great wyrm, begging... pleading...
she eventually screamed out that she was his, completing the mating ritual. he spread open her twitching sex and plowed his manhood inside, messaging her clit as he brought her orgasm after orgasm till he collapsed on top of his claimed dragon.

>Be Anon
>Walking down the street
>A few anthros pass you by
>One catches your eye
>A pretty labrador girl making her way for parts unknown
>You snap a collar with leash around her neck
>She's yours now
>Today is a good day

>Female monsters know their wills are bound to those with whom they breed
>This has helped drive the overall scarcity of monster kind
>But their males are becoming fewer and further between, and the only reason they haven't gone extinct is an eventual compulsion to breed
>The females no longer have room to be picky, and now they're choosing humans

Are we talking horror actual, or are we talking horror that's just a vehicle for porn? Whatever. Here's my take.
>Anthro suburban neighborhood
>Focuses on a teenage anthro girl and her group of friends
>Start hearing rumors about a human seen in the neighborhood that assaults anthro girls
>Don't think much of it
>MC holds a sleepover at her place one night, parent's are visiting relatives and she askes to stay behind and watch the house
>One girl wants to go home early because she's freaked out
>Ends up getting assaulted by the human walking home
>Girls at sleepover find something of hers she left behind
>try calling her, doesn't answer
>find her later in the bushes covered and overflowing with human semen
>Bring her back to the house, but they're not alone
>Power goes out
>One girl braves going to the shed to find spare fuses/lamp or whatever
>Gets assaulted
>Last two girls are stuck inside in the dark
>Get separated
>One hears smacking noises
>Stumbles upon him raping her friend
>Too scared to help her, too aroused to run away, can only sit and watch
>He finishes with her and goes after main girl
>She tries to run
>Her friends show up one by one, all broken by the human cock
>Hold her down and tie her up
>Cut to black
>Girls are back in school as if nothing ever happened
>Planning to have another sleepover
>It's revealed that they're all pregnant by the mystery human, and they've become cultist who worship him
>Meet him in a seedy hotel where he breeds them again all night

Combine these two premises could be interesting:
>As monsterkind became more scarce, a large community of them left the surface and sealed themselves away underground to escape ‘Human agression’.
>They are eventually found years/decages/centuries later.
>Being isolated for so long have left them naive and curious about Humans, who at this point had become near foegotten to them.
>This makes them easy prey.
>The Humans that discovered them closes the entrance behind them, leaving no escape.

Oh anal lifestyle for a lesbian monster girl? Well I got what you need
>Everyone know the police isn't needed in Hometown, so Undyne spend all her days in the office training
>She want to be ready and strong enough to take care of a Human, she need to be the perfect cumdump and not faint at her first real orgasm
>If she want to protect the other monster girl, she would have to drained any human balls as fast as possible. She's not a slut she just want to do her job.
>W-Wait... Isn't Kris 18 years old now? W-Well maybe sh-she should train under re-real condition.
>Oh g-god, she can feel her ass clenching harder in the dildo by just thinking of his orgasm-inducing human musk, how hard that little punk could ru-ruin her
>NO! She just want to train... not to get fucked in the street, reduced into the personal cockwarmer of that sexy human boy
>And beside, she's sure her girlfriend Alphys would totally understand... It's just for her job... nothing more

>"Yeah, my girlfriend Alphys is pretty cool"
>"And beside, she started working out with some help so I'm happy for her health"
>"Huh? Well no I don't need help I'm a professional but... I guess I wouldn't mind working out with you"

>anthro biology responds to human cum like it's an addictive drug
>not "haha I'm such a chocoholic" addictive
>"severe withdrawal symptoms" addictive
>effects of the "high" include a warm, emotionally relaxing euphoria similar to MDMA, coupled with heightened libido, and touch hypersensitivity
>becomes a vicious cycle where the high makes them want the next dose right away, because they feel much more 'open' and extremely horny
>withdrawal causes brain fog, impulsivity, depression and a 'stabbing' ache in the abdomen similar to hunger pain
>overdosing takes a fairly high dose at one time- think getting gangbanged by like 20 guys for hours- and is essentially 'fucking your brains out' but with actual consequences
>skin contact has very mild effects, internal exposure very strong ones
>oral, anal and vaginal are all equal in uptake of the 'drug'
>human pussy juice has some similar effects, but the strength is nowhere near as concentrated
>consensual interspecies sex involves a lot of condoms and barriers, but there's always accidents and the temptation is always there
>human rapists often act with the explicit intention of getting anthros 'hooked'
>lucky anthros find enough human lovers and FWBs to become functional addicts
>unlucky ones end up blackmailed, exploited, losing their jobs or ruining their reputations, winding up on the streets, or even getting trafficked, all in the pursuit of their next load
>companies and government organizations are developing ways to fight the cravings
>patches, chemical antagonists similar to naloxone, microdosing from sperm banks
>every addict knows that only the real thing straight from the source can really satisfy the need
>in every case, one thick human creampie is all it takes to start down the path to addiction

>Be hunter looking for nonhumans to enslave for profit
>Catch kobold, shivering and hungry
>She begs for her life
>Notice her glistening snatch
>She thinks you're gonna kill her
>Agree that she can be a slave instead if she gets you off
>Kobold desperately fucks you around the campfire, thinking her life depends on it.
>Getting the larger man-dick screws with her brain, the fear melts away and she starts moaning and begging you to fuck her harder.
>Flood the lizard's cunt in your seed
>Next morning, 'bold is happily calling your master.
>Apparently she went through your stuff last night, learned about your bounty on nonhuman slaves
>Is totally on board, bargains with you.
>She stays with you, gets all the cock she wants/needs, and she'll lead you to the tribes that abused her and tossed her out
>So starts the adventure of Anon and his little race-traitor

>They begged and cried as their new human owners carried them away
>Coins and shinies rained upon the traitor as she traded away the bodies of her former family and neighbors
>Her master was behind her as she worked the counter with her mouth and his shaft with her pussy in full view of all who wished to see just how slutty her kind could be
>Her old childhood bully squealed as a particularly perverted human spread her legs to closely examine her pristine, untouched sex
>The kobold grinned as the rather unattractive human asked for her price
>The bully silently pleaded to her, price her high so that she would at least go home to a rich, clean human
>She held up a single finger and the bully cried as her body was sold away for a single copper
>A heavenly warmth filled her belly as her master seeded her hungry womb
>Her human gave her head a firm, teasing smack for selling off a particularly valuable catch for so little, but forgave her as it was very personal
>She went off and walked over to the display stage, now on her break
>The same kobolds that had tormented her in their youth were now begging for their lives, promising her worship and jewels in exchange for their freedom
>She said nothing, only walking over to a kobold she particularly hated
>He was her old betrothed, a fact that he cursed very publicly and eventually got her expelled from the village with false rumors
>She approached the bound, kneeling male and spread her ruined, well-loved pussy, making damn sure he could see the human seed drizzle out of her gaping hole
>She herself would tell no lies, she was very much taken, and now, so would he
>She took his leash from its hook, raised it into the air, and called out
>The human with the biggest cock gets him for free (with purchase of another kobold)
>And just like that, the final weight of her past was dragged away
>She winked to the horrified kobolds and returned to love her master with all her flesh

>Ch.1 The Rabbit
>Human at mixed campus
>See the most bizarre listing on craigslist
>”Fertile human wanted, good sneaking skills”
>Is this some kinda roleplay?
>See the poster in person. It’s a rabbit. A disheveled rabbit. Guy seems happy you’re a guy, says you’ll be perfect for his “Plan of Ultimate Vengeance”.
>In short, guy is an anthro incel.
>Shows you a picture of this cute bunny girl you’ve seen around campus. You recall she’s a writer for a small journal nearby and works at the library. Learn from him her name is Penny.
>The break up was bad. So bad, the incel became an incel, never touched a girl since and treats them as the bane of all existence.
>While Penny got a new boyfriend, a job with a promising future, ready to graduate top of her class, and a supportive family,
>But the incel is loaded.
>He’s got this huge creepy plan laid out for his ex.
>He tracked her movements every day for the past two years, and can predict her at anything.
>He also wants a human around because human cum is an addictive drug for anthros.
>So he wants you to rape Penny. Pump her full of cum and watch its effects destroy her.
>She’ll be distraught at first, then she’ll get desperate. Keep her hooked on your cum that she’ll cave into any demands incel makes
>Break up with her boyfriend, drop out, quit her job, cut off contact with her family.
>In summary, this neckbeard looking motherfucker is going to pay you to, in his words, “fuck that cunt stupid.”
>This is a bit much. You think he might be setting you up for something
>This sort of thing has landed humans in trouble
>It doesn’t matter that the anthro victims are so cum-hungry they want to drop all charges, only the guys with deep pockets get off with light sentences.
>You don’t have that.
>Incel flashes five hundred at you, and slaps them in your palm. Guy tosses you a day’s salary like it’s fucking pocket change.
>Free money for sex? Okay.jpg
>He knows she’s working late tonight trying to publish an article. Everyone will have left the building.
>Gives you a key, ensures there will be no evidence of you on any camera.
>Guy is thorough. The office is one of those giant glass buildings rented out to a bunch of small time companies.
>The key lets you in the front door, and the elevator takes you straight to Ex’s floor.
>Now to follow his script.
>You text him, tell him you’re in the office.
>You hear a phone ring.
>”Hello?”
>It’s Penny.
>By now, Incel is having a talk with her, catching up on what he’s missed and being remorseful
>Penny is engrossed in the conversation, doesn’t notice you homing in on her little corner office.
>Know exactly what Incel is saying cause he left that as part of your instructions to.
>”I sent you a gift Penny, one I think you need for the way things ended.”
>”Oooh a gift?” Penny is interested. That’s when you hit her with the chloroform.
>”Yes, and one you deserve.”
> It wasn’t much, just enough to knock her out until your set up.
>By the time she comes too, she’s naked, you’re lubed up, and your camera is set up to record. Incel wants to watch.
>She tries to scream but she’s still groggy as you lift her up.
>Then you give her a reason to scream.
>Penny is impaled on your cock, lube lets her slide down your whole length. Her cunt is tight, like she’s never fucked a guy in her life.
>Or maybe their dicks were a fraction of your size. You start pumping her up and down. Her walls tighten and squeeze you shaft as though trying to push you out.
>Penny’s body massages it so much, you can actually feel the pre getting squeezed up your urethra.
>”Enjoying my gift?” Incel laughs through the phone.
>Penny manages to gasp “Wh-why?”
>Incel starts a long tirade why Penny deserves this, to feel every second of pain he had felt when she left him.
>It keeps her quiet as you focus on fucking the rabbit. Penny can’t shout back, your cock is too much for her.
>Everytime she tries to talk, all that comes out is a moan as you hit a spot none of her lovers had ever touched before. Incel mocks her as her tits flop across the camera. You’re making Penny your bitch and he’s loving every minute of it.
>Somewhere in the mess she stops trying to talk with Incel. Stops talking at all. Just moans and whines as your pants get soaked by her climax.
>”Gonna cum” you declare. More for Incel than anything. You know he wants to see this. He’s probably leaning forward right now, hand on his cock.
>”Wait!” Penny cries. “Pull out!” she begs “Please! I’ll do anything, please just don’t-“
>Too late. You feel your cockhead punching her womb’s entrance as you let loose.
>Pulse after pulse of hot semen flood her insides, and Penny howls. She knows what will happen, and spends her last few lucid moments in despair as you bounce with every last cum-thrust.
>At least until Incel starts talking. “Imagine what happens if this got out Penny, you filthy bitch, what will the community think of their star child?”
>And that’s when things start falling into place. Incel lays out his plans.
>With just a little editing, it will look like Penny is a human-junky, and it will destroy her life.
>Makes a deal with him. He stays quiet, she’ll do anything he demands, when he demands it.
>And with that he cuts the feed. You pocket your phone. Penny is on the floor weeping.
>Fuck even after destroying this poor girl, you got this little voice in your head(or maybe you cock) saying
>”Sloppy seconds”
>Lift Penny onto her desk and split her legs. “W-wait” she stammers again, but she’s less resistant. The effect of the cum is already working on her. “I thought you were done.”
>You poke her entrance with your cock. “That was work. This is play. Unless you don’t want more.”
>Penny bites her lip.
>2 hours later
>”Fuck fuck fuck! More! Gimmie more!”
>Tears still roll down Penny’s face, but it’s clear how much she wants you inside her. Not just for the cum, but cause your human penis reaches her deepest depths and that alone is becoming an addiction.
>Every time you hilt, she squeals in delight, and trills as she feels your balls slapping her thighs.
>When you are finally spent. Penny lies on the desk, unable to move as she’s swimming in the euphoria of five cumshots.
>As you button back you you give her ass a light slap. “You know, you should wear brighter colors. Pink panties would look great on you.”
Ch2. The Boyfriend
>You feel great.
>Yeah you basically raped a girl, but by the end she was begging for it literally, and you got paid to do it.
>Probably the best relationship you had your entire life.
>Oh fuck, that sounds real pathetic saying out loud…
>And you still feel kinda bad about forcing her into it in the first place.
>But still, dominating that bunny girl, that anthro it felt so…right.
>Incel has got you on a schedule
>He’s tailing Penny somehow. Guess he has others on his payroll setting up cameras everywhere.
>Watches Penny as withdrawal starts to kick in.
>It starts small, discreetly buying ‘human’ patches to stave off the cravings.
>When those don’t work, she resorts to masturbating
>The guy even has cameras of her doing it in the shower.
>How the fuck does he do that?!
>Friends and family ask what’s wrong
>She reassures them with empty words
>Then she gets irritable, and forgetful.
>Her job starts to fail as her patches don’t do the trick.
>That’s your cue.
>Incel knows her dorm room.
>Has you wait outside her room as she’s coming home. The moment she turns the corner and sees you, she recognizes you.
>She has fur, but you swear you think her face is starting to flush.
>You hold out your phone.
>”He wants to talk.”
>She tentatively creeps over, head snapping every which way as though afraid someone is watching you two.
>She takes the phone. In that same meek voice that got you semi-hard, she squeaks “H-hello?”
>Incel taunts her again, while laying out a ‘deal’ he’s no doubt been reciting for years.
>Penny’s eyes dart to you, back to the phone, and back to you as the conversation wears on.
>”Yes.” She says with no doubt.
>You are pretty sure you can hear Incel sputtering on the phone. He probably wasn’t expecting her to agree so easily.
>Basically to keep up appearances, he’d bring you around and give you a fix but in return he’d record that session too
>He thought Penny would break down and fight him about it, valuing her career and afraid of what would happen if her boyfriend caught her.
>But no, Penny just accepted with no question.
>She hands you back the phone.
>”Well, go do it.” Incel grunts and hangs up.
>Shrugging you follow Penny as lets you into her room.
>”I-I’ll make you a key later, so wh-when I need um…this again, you don’t have to loiter in the hall
>You make for the bedroom, she stops you
>”That’s where me and my boyfriend sleep.”
>The fact she still cares about someone else when you’re the one balls deep in her upsets you for some reason.
>Like a switch is flipped, your usual self goes away. In it’s place was the dominant male from that night in the office.
>”Is he in there?” you ask.
>”We-well no. He’s overseas for the next couple of-“
>”Then he won’t mind.”
>”Bu-but the smell.”
>”So wash it out.”
>Before she could make another excuse you scoop Penny up. She’s a petite little thing but even for her small size she’s surprisingly light. Like lifting nothing at all
>Penny looks away “We-well okay I guess I can wash it twice then..”
>You toss her on the bed as you set up the recording app, Penny clears her throat.
>”Um so, my ex…he’s paying you for this?”
>”Yes, why?”
>”So um…how much?”
>”Per day, or every time we do this?”
>”He does BOTH?”
>”Mmmhm.”
>You have the phone set up. Penny sees the light come on.
>”Hellooo Penny” comes Incel’s voice. “Let’s make this quick okay, I’ve got things to do, I’m sure you do, so spread em.”
>You pull her pants up and see she’s wearing pink panties. The tiniest smile appears on Penny’s lips before Incel starts going off.
>”Oh you slut Penny, no more white? I thought that was all you wore because you were a pure soul?”
>You say nothing but give her a small wink as you pull her panties up.
>You thrust forward, her pussy doesn’t feel tight anymore. You’d say it’s become the perfect “you” size.
>Her face contorts into an ‘o’ face as you slide into her.
>When you hilt, she closes her eyes and gives the faintest sigh.
>Incel starts to mock her on the phone as you thrust in and out of Penny, calling her a dirty slut, a whore, and other much worse things as you fuck his ex.
>Penny gasps and moans, ignoring Incel as your cock hits all those now familiar spots, driving her crazy.
>”Say it Penny! Say you’re a dirty whore!” he shouts.
>”I-I’m a dirty whore” Penny parrots back “A slut. A useless c-cu-cumdumpster. Oh-oh god. I’m so wo-worthless!”
>”Hm hm yes” Incel chuckles on his side. “Do it.”
>You start jackhammering inside Penny, slaps becoming progressively wetter and wetter as her pussy gets moistened by her wanton need.
>You grunt and hilt one last time, feeling your cock erupt as a stream of your hot seed fills every moist crevice, enveloping your shaft in warmth.
>Penny cries out weakly as you pump her full again.
>”Ah” Incels sighs with satisfaction “Music. Sweet music. Alright Penny, be a good girl now. My little slut.”
>And the light goes out.
>With a sigh you pull free, not caring how much of your spunk spills onto the sheets. You go to retrieve your camera, Penny reached out for you.
>”W-wait.” She breathes. “I-I don’t think that was enough, not after last time.”
>”No” you agree “It wasn’t.”
>Placing the phone back in your pants pocket, you climb back onto bed, hardening with every step forward.
>Penny holds her legs up again as you position yourself
>”I still have a boyfriend. We’re only d-doing this because of the addiction.”
>”Of course you smile” and slide back in.
>Incel arranged biweekly meetings for you and her.
>Anytime Penny looked ready to break, he’d call you in, and you’d be in her dorm waiting to scratch her itch.
>And every time it felt less wrong. And the less you cared, the bolder you became.
>Unknown to him, you were visiting Penny a lot more than that.
>You got her number the last time, and one day you tried it.
>”12:30, Art building, roof”
>At 12:27, she was there on the roof. And you pushed her against the wall. She gasped for air, even as she fumbled to undo your pants buttons.
>You tore her panties off and entered her dry. Not like it mattered. She’d be wet soon enough.
>When she was close to climax, you’d shut her up by pressing your mouth to hers.
>The kiss was as long and passionate as your fuck session was carnal and feral.
>Your tongue pressed against hers as she screamed her orgasm into your mouth.
>You stayed that way, lips locked as you continued your thrusts, reveling as you felt her inhale deeply with every thrust, taking in the scent of your sweat as you took her on that windy roof.
>When you finally came, you parted, a thin string of saliva still connecting the two of you. Her eyes glazed over as she felt your hot cum insider her again. Wordlessly you wiped her lips clean with the back of your sleeve and gave her a quick peck on the cheek as you pulled free.
>After that you regularly met her in more and more public places to see just how far she would go.
>”10:15, Science building, 3rd floor men’s room”
>”8:10, Parking lot B, your car”
>The voice telling you how wrong this was got quieter and quiet everytime she showed up, lips quivering somewhere between joy and sadness, legs shaking.
>After your last 'official' session , when Incel finished your last recording session, you didn’t even pull free, but kept fucking her.
>Penny gasped as she felt you penetrate down to her cervix again for the second time.
>”Be honest with me” you growl “No camera, no lines from your ex. Is your boyfriend as good as me?”
>”N-n-n-no” she manages to stammer out, breasts flopping in time with your frantic fucking.
>”Is he as big as me?”
>”N-n-no.”
>”Do you even love him anymore?”
>That makes her pause. She looked like she had been slapped in the face, or as close as one could look while getting their brains fucked out.
>”How many times has he fucked you. Was it even close to as many times as me?”
>Penny was silent, but she slowly shook her head.
>”I put more cum in you than he ever did” You lean down. “And you want my cum. You can’t live without it.”
>Penny nods.
>”You’re mine now. Not your ex, not your boyfriend. Mine.”
>Penny meekly nods. “Yes.”
>You smile and lean in for a kiss. Penny meets you halfway as you start to thrust again.
>Later, as Penny was sucking your cock, you sent the small “confession.mp3” to a temporary email account.
>5 minutes later you are notified of a huge deposit in your account.

>sometimes an anthro couple gets broken by the BHC so hard that they can no longer have sex with each other without their human pounding away at the husband's prostate
>although they would both prefer that a human cock be the one to violate them and their partner sometimes they are required to breed pure
>it is a recommended practice to provide the eldest human child of the human and the anthro wife with a younger half-brother/sister in order to establish the proper family pecking order
>it is something the husband must endure, using his cock that he thought he would never have to erect ever again
>with his human husband deep within his butt it is not at bad as it could have been but he just can't seem to get rid of the weird feeling that he does not belong here
>they know his wife's pussy is no longer his to use but it is for the good of the family

>humanity is under attack again.
>humanity wins easily, again
>You are with the Emperor of all Mankind.
>Convince him that instead of purging the xenos, why not enslave them for our benefit
>To your surprise he agrees to it

> angel comes to punish you for your crimes
> turn the tables and capture the angel
> sexually torture and humiliate angel over a long period of time using aphrodisiacs , magic and just fucking them like your personal cock sleeve
> final break them
> repeat with other captured creatures
> use them to start a strip club doubles as whore house

>There exist many species of anthro with coats thick enough to cover their obscene lewd bodies
>In fact, most of them don't even own full wardrobes; they rely exclusively on fur and wool to preserve their decency
>Common pranks from humans include jumping them in secluded public areas and shearing them down to nothing, forcing them to spend the rest of their outing (and the next few months) exposed
>Hiding objects like used condoms in their backs where they can't immediately be found or removed
>Raping them outright. Thick fur and wool traps odors easily, so the scents of others are expected to be on them.
>However, liquids like human sweat and cum will taint their smell for much longer
>Without proper preparation and cleanup like for a consentual sexual encounter, everyone will know of their domination

>be at a party for humans
>have a good time getting drunk with fun buddies
>suddenly an anthro cop shows up in response to a noise complaint
>gangbang her over and over for the rest of the night, making the party even better

>There is a spell in Warhammer that transfers men into skaven.
>Some greyseer tries to pull this off in mass, a giant cauldron of very exact ingredients is set up
>A witchhunting expodition is on their sent, drive the skaven out of their layer.
>Cauldron just looks like some slop, so some low level scion kind of just stealthily jerks off into it as a convenient cum disposal\
>Little did the Witchhunters know the ritual can be completed away from the fetted pit. Little did the greyseer know that someone defiled his mixture.
>Is completed
>nothing happens.
>seems like all the next generation of skaven are all females. And thery seem to only be receptive to hman men
>fast forward 10 years, a new man-skaven status quo is established. Most femskaven are sterile, your rank in skaven society is based on your fertility.
>Great horned rat is now known as great horned mother, wife of sigmar.
>A skaven can hope to become one of the elect through the faithful and effective servous to the powers that be through a high ranking sigmarite ritual.
>Have legions of ultra loyal femmerats trying to scrounge their way up to the top to serve ther man-thing-masters.

One of the most common ways to get up in rank is for a young skilled entrepreneuring skaven to throw in her lot with a young up and coming nobleman. becoming his trusted confidant and lover. And As he rises in rank through battles and through the courts, helped by the machinations of his stealthy lover, so does she. Until the point where both become prestigious enough that she can go through the ritual, and live out the rest of her life in luxury and prestige as a great and vaunted mother to many men and many rats.

>In an ancient age, humanity was beset by a plague made by the non-humans
>They had united in a coalition to destry the empire as humanity was hobbled by sickness
>In the new age they think humanity is extinct
>Humans survived but barely.
>The plague rendered human women near sterile so 1 in 10 births were stillborn, so humans used the last of their magic to create a treatment that would make human men compatible with all nonhumans
>The first step makes human cum highly addictive, but as a result the man has to nut regularly or he'll melt from the inside out
>Story will be a guy who only had the first step, and uses his addictive semen to break a civilization on his dick.

I read some hardcore sex dungeon stories and I wanted to "save" them by transporting their minds into new bodies. Erasing their memories of what happen is no different than not saving them at all. There is two sides to it: self-serving and pragmatic. Those broken individuals can't have a normal life anymore. They can't handle being free so the best thing for them is to live under a benevolent master. Also, it gets around the ethical dilemma of creating sapient life just to enslave it.
Also another idea, collars that magnify or suppress shame and sexual urges.
Settings:
>1 low shame low arousal
>casually naked slave that does some minor housework
>walks around naked in the house like a pet
>only gets aroused by explicit sexual interactions but otherwise mindlessly bends down to pick up things.
>2 low shame high arousal
>super clingily pet that is always ready for cock
>3 high shame low arousal
>forced to be naked all the time but still not used to it
>only likes intimate sex and is emotionally clingily
>4 high shame high arousal
>forced to be naked all the time but still not used to it and secretly likes it
>anxious when master make them do sexual things
>anxious when master doesn't make them do sexual things

Fuck that's hot, love the idea of an anthro's pussy being more important than her name. Imagine it, anthro "males" show off their assholes at their most gaping, while females show off their tight pussies right before they're collared.
Another idea could be where the males are made to like urethral fucking instead of their ass so they can at least try to have some human cum so their genes can be fully overwhelmed!

>Regular "Penis Inspection Day"
>ID cards include a nude photo of them along with "measurements"
>Regular fertility exams
>Sexual pictures and videos are traded around like a portfolio
>People invest on specific anthros to fund their life
>Stockholder meetings on how to increase value of the anthro's sperm or assigning a mate

>high end restaurant
>cyborg entertainment
>they come from various points of life, all met their end at the club
>bodies heavily altered to entertain guests of all ages
>they don't need to sleep or go on breaks
>they are required to be in character around all the guests
>popular spot for young children and families
>you just landed the managerial position at one of their franchise locations
>wealthy families have their perks
>the staff accept their new boss, not that they have a choice
>entire operation is entirely automated by the augmented staff
>you're not entirely sure what exactly sure what to do in this situation other than collect a small paycheck
>as you wonder aimlessly in your office you stumble upon a small wall locker with key fobs
>each one labeled with different names
>on the inside of the door it just reads 'command keys'
>curious you pick up glamrock's fob and press the button
>nothing happens, no sound is heard
>you look outside your window to the stage where families are watching the show
>glamrock is playing electric guitar smiling to the crowd
>you press the button again and say "stop playing"
>she immediately stops playing the guitar and stands there, with a confused look on her face
>she starts to stammer to the back stage with flustered steps
>you look back at the array of keys and smile wickedly
>you press the fob again and say "come to my office"
>you make yourself presentable, have to play the part of the boss after all
>you practice spinning in your chair dramatically
>once that gets boring you grab roxanne's key and have tell her to sashay her tail more while performing
>her butt movements are hypnotic as she starts to really get into the music
>you start to wonder if the command worked on glamrock as it takes a minute for her to enter your office
>Then she enters, fluffy white feathers and tight pink spandex
>epitome of the ascetic that the owner wanted
>she had a slice of pizza in her feathered hand
>once she was inside your office she looked around confused
>"Why am I here?"
"I just wanted to call you up to see you."
>honestly you had no idea it would get this far from some random item you stumbled on
>she took the bait and strolled closing the door behind her
>"Oh, okay boss. Did you want to ask me something?"
>you quit standing there like a retard and hop back into your chair
"No, i just wanted to say you have been amazing out there. best actress we have."
>she was taken aback by the complement, she couldn't even finish the pizza
>"T-thank you boss, usually the others get all the praises."
>you can see her blush a little, it's kind of cute
>she sits down at the chair opposite of the desk and relaxes a bit, her tight spandex give you a peak of the yellow panties she had on
>you press her keyfob
"Can you strip tease for me?"
>"Wha-?!"
>glamrock stands up, knocking the wooden chair to the opposite side of the room
>her eyes are unfocused, like she is staring through everything
>she starts off with her shoes and leg warmers
>kicking them off playfully while rubbing her body up and down
>she presses bouncing breasts together as her hands find the straps of her pink latex costume
>all the while she is rotating her hips to an invisible beat, tail feathers dusting the air
>she slides the first layer off her gorgeous frame
>her yellow bra is containing her fluffy feathered breast, she jiggles them left and right as she slides the pink clothing down her hips
>yellow panties are exposed and she kicks the material away while playing with her breast some more, her nipples are appearing through the thin fabric
>the show is quite amazing and you are already pinching a tent
>it's not over as she slams her ass on the desk, hiking up her panties threatening to break the line
>her pucker is exposed so close you can feel the heat
>she rotates her ass, slapping the desk with her cheeks
>she moves onto the desk lifting one leg up and around your head
>glamrock is on her knees on your desk, rotating her hips
>she is still messaging her breast
>you can hear her moaning
>she must be enjoying it
>you look down and notice how much she is enjoying it, she soaked her panties completely
>the bra lands on your head
>she fluffed up the feathers on her breast playing with her rock hard nipples
>you wonder how she even managed to get the thing on as your eyes soak in the sights
>her nipples weren't the only thing that wanted attention
>your eyes drifted back down to her wet folds, the fabric was pulled so tightly you could even spot the hard clit beg for attention
>her moaning wasn't stopping, eyes were in the back of her head as she continued to kneed her breasts
>you started to worry a little
>maybe you took it too far?
>she came
>in a massive shudder that knocked whatever was left on the desk onto the floor
>her legs buckled and nearly knocked you on your ass
>with a massive thud she hit the floor
>she continued her spasm leaking juices all over the place
>you pick yourself up and hurry to her wondering what the hell just happened
>you sigh with relief as she is still breathing
>she is out cold from the orgasm
>you try searching the desk for any manual on the matter
>fucking nothing
>"Where am I?"
>you peek over the desk to see her slowly getting up from her experience
>a long stretch, a pleasured sigh and she is vertical
"Thank god you're alright."
>"What happened?"
>she looks around and then notices she is naked and wet
>She lets out a surprised bird call and covers herself
>you wonder if you should even explain yourself and quickly come up with something
"You were showing me your new moves and then you had an orgasm"
>"R-really?"
>Her blush deepens and she looks at the mess around the room
>"It's been so long..."
>You look at her puzzled
>"We were originally programmed for sex slavery, but family friendly makes way more money... I must have squirted at the first touch."
>you are shocked, well maybe not that shocked
>you raise up her key fob and she immediately recognizes it
>"That's what they use to control misbehaving slaves."
>she sounded so cheerful when she said that
"You don't have a problem?"
>she was already rubbing her soaked panties
>"nope, it's been so long. I bed the others need a good release as well."
>You look at the array of fobs then back down to your still hard boner
"Do i need to tell you to suck my dick with it or will you...?"
>she lunges at you
>"not for me. now give me that hard cock!"
>your not sure how her beak would feel on your dick but as her tongue envelops the head that worry vanishes in an instant
>her hand is buried in her panties, you can hear the symphony of sucking and fingering as you grab her feathered ponytail
>you start thrusting wildly, the build up she gave you had to have a pay off on your end
>her moaning throat sent you over the edge as you fucked her mouth
>you slammed into her beak with such ferocity you were afraid you pierced yourself
>she swallowed it enthusiastically
>when you pulled back she was on the floor and pulled her panties off
>she tossed them at the window, the wet slap left a massive mark
>"looks like you aren't finished"
>her warm folds beckoned to you
>your boner was already ready for round two
"On the desk"
>she obeyed in an instant
>legs spread on your desk and ready to go
>you fondled her breast as she wrapped her talons around your back pushing your shaft ever closer to her vagina
>you didn't need anymore coaxing that that as you pushed her down and started to plow her pussy into next week
>she definitely wasn't used in a while, felt like a vice
>you finish load after load inside her spasming cunt
>you wondered if the office was soundproof as you spent the evening fucking the white feathery screamer
>by the time you had your fill she was out cold on your desk
>you hang up glamrock's fob and begin to think about what to try out tomorrow.

Multi generational sex is always good, the young, tight daughter to the experienced milf makes for a good juxtaposition. Bonus points if they are both impregnated at the same time.

You get it. I really don't know what's better. Them working together and treating sex like a mother/daughter bonding experience, or them full on competing against each other as if they were almost strangers and trying to fuck with each other during the act, like the mom toying with the daughter's ass while she's getting fucked so she cums faster, or the daughter biting the mom's nipples while fondling them roughly. And obviously who gets the most cum in the end.

They treat it as a loving moment of bonding between a mother and daughter. Lots of hugging, kissing, and sweet words of affection (eventually becoming more sexual as they live in this arrangement longer). When you're fucking the mother in the ass, the daughter softly strokes her mother's hair, and whispers sweet nothings about how beautiful her mother looks, how youthful, how "we could be sisters." The mother will simply lay off to the side as the two younger lovers fuck wildly and more energetically that she'd ever hope to match, but her hand softly strokes her daughters thigh as she's fucked bent double.

>Lots of hugging, kissing, and sweet words of affection (eventually becoming more sexual as they live in this arrangement longer)
>At first: "Wow, mom! I love what you've done with your hair. I'm sure he'll love it!"
>*kisses her on the lips, little bit of tongue, as they blush*
>Later on: "Wow, mom! Your rosebud looks so pretty after he's absolutely destroyed your guts with his ass-breaking fuckmeat!"
>*begins to eat out her mother's prolapsed ass as she slurps down your cum from her ruined orifice*
In both of these cases the same loving tone of voice is used.

>The day he turned 18th years old
>It was midgnight and he directly started to throat fucking his new cock sleeves even as she was sleeping
>From now on, that anthro slut was always getting woke up in the morning but a fat human cock, feeding her breakfeast directly in her stomach

>"Wake up Slutty Mommy. I got my balls to empty"
>>"Y...yes, sweetie, of course. You know Slutty Mommy would do anything for y..."
>"Shut up, bitch, did I say you could start talking?"
>>"S...sorry, dear."
>"Just for that, no breakfast today. I expect you to spit."
>>"Yes, dear."
>"Now open that stupid mouth of yours."

>Pick up my sweet baby boy from school!
>Ask him how his day was.
>"Shut up, cumrag! Get those lips wrapped around my cock before I give you another black eye! Maybe I still will if you're too slow."
>Mmm, he's such the charmer.
>I've taught him exactly how to treat a nice furry girl.
>Taking his cock all the way is painful, especially when he grabs the back of my head to keep me in place, but it makes him smile!
>He has such a cute smile.
>"I got in trouble again. Something stupid about bullying that teacher fox-slut Stacy. I'm sure you can handle convincing the principal to let this slide. Right, moron?"
>I gurgle around his dick.
>"At least you're good for something."
>He roughly spanks my ass until I scream, which means he's happy!
>Start to choke as his thick, delicious, addictive human cum floods into my throat.
>He won't let me pull back, so I just swallow as hard as I can.
>My baby boy was so backed up today!
>Finishing up, he finally lets me breathe, but slaps me to the ground before I can finish swallowing it all.
>"Keep that disgusting shit in your mouth until we get home. This is the second time today I've had to tell you to shut up."
>I nod.
>"Take off those clothes as well, whore."
>I nod and strip.
>Get back into drivers seat and start heading home with the light of my life in tow.
>Idly jerk him off as we drive and he throws my clothes out the open window.
My son is so cute! Cute! And so well behaved.

>You'll never kidnap your gentle, compassionate son's foxxy teacher and hang her from her thumbs in your garage.
>You'll never call your son into the garage, smiling as he calls you a worn out old hag that he'll punish later for interrupting him.
>You'll never watch proudly as your handsome son delivers the strongest punch you've ever seen him throw directly into his teacher's lower abdomen.
>You'll never leave them alone to work out their grievances, like that one time she, no doubt accidentally, gave your son an F or slapped him for groping her.
Feels bad.

>when you want to collar a species so hard you bring them back from extinction just so you can string them up and smash that Cretaceous dinopussy
>unlike her modern day birdslut and lizardthot descendants her body is raw and unchanged by millennia of human dicking, she is literally not made to be fucked by anything that isn't her own species and it breaks her mind like nothing else
>Alternate world where the humans running the park stopped sniffing glue and got their acts together ending the dino outbreak with a liberal application of more developed poaching equipment that was already in use back in lost world.
>Rexy Blue and Indominous get held in the same paddock enclosure until the wider park is put back into working order.
>Wild, hormonally unstable teenage-ish Indominous who'd never met another of her kind in her life puts forward an aggressive lesbo woo for tradcom milf Rexy who tries to play it off. Blue Is still in a perpetual state of panic & tantraum over getting bound in an unfamiliar way being suspended over two rexes like a dangling cattle piece because her normal paddock bondage isn't available at the moment.
>While the three of them are ball gagged it is a lucky feature of the shared Dino-ese language being one of growls and roars translates just fine through the medium of huffs and mumbles.

>One day, Brat gets his homework back at the start of class and discovers that he's only gotten an A, instead of his usual A+
>Doesn't say anything, just looks over at Nerd and gives her a 'you're dead' sign.
>Nerd starts shaking at her desk and tears up.
>It wasn't her fault, she lost her glasses and had to use an older pair, it gave her a headache!
>Class continues as normal while Nerd runs over the worse case scenarios in her head.
>Is...is he going dunk her head in the toilet again? Or...or just beat her up after class? What if he's really mad, what if he wants to do something extreme?
>What if he tries to fuck her, she's seen his gigantic cock, her booty can't handle something like that! It'll split her in half! And he'll get away with it somehow, nothing bad ever happens to Brat.
>Her fears only get worse when someone passes a note to her.
>It just says 'Behind the gym. After school.'
>The bell rings and makes her jump.
>A few hours later, she's nervously waiting in the shadow of the gym.
>Brat comes up behind her and surprises her by grabbing her tit; honing in on her nipple and giving it a twist.
>Nerd just moans in pain and spins around.
>They just stare at each other silently.
>Nerd starts to panic, all the scenarios she's imagined and worst come rushing back to her head.
>Has a great idea.
>Starts to strip.
>Nothing stops her, so she continues until she's just in her underwear.
>Brat stares at her harder.
>She swallows and takes those off as well.
>It's...it's not embarrassing, he's already seen her lower half naked.
>Even if she is...a little wet now.
>Sensing no change in Brat's behavior, she gets down on her knees before planting her forehead in the dirt.
>If Brat can see how sorry she is, maybe he'll just let her off with a warning!
>"I'm...I'm so sorry, um, Sir! It'll never happen again, I promise! Please don't hurt me, I'm sorry!"
>She feels the weight of his foot on the back of her head before it disappears abruptly.
>She prepares for something like a kick, or even him grabbing her hair and pulling her up
>She can't sweat, so she just starts panting as her nerves get the best of her.
>Instead, there's a quiet thud as something lands on the ground in front of her.
>It's her glasses.
>Looking up at Brat, Nerd is confused.
>"I just wanted to give you your glasses back, since apparently you're even stupider without them. Even if...you know, you look prettier. I mean, I just think that. Maybe you should get contacts? I dunno, just, shut up!"
>He spits in her face.
>Strangely quickly, he turns around and power walks away, leaving Nerd crouched on her knees and nude as she pulls herself back up.
>Grabbing her glasses, she brings them closer before balking away.
>Brat probably can't smell it, being a human, but Nerd's dog nose is far more sensitive.
>Her glasses are practically coated in his scent!
>It's overpoweringly strong; it's all she can focus on.
>Manly, sour, and a little arousing.
>And it's going to be directly next to her nose all day!
>Nerd starts blushing before putting them on her face, where they belong.
>The sudden clarity snaps her back to the reality that she's crouching naked in the dirt outside school.
>Hurriedly, she throws her clothes back on, panicking when she can't find her panties.
>But no matter how hard she looks, they're nowhere to be found.
>Eventually, she gives up, and resolves to quadruple check Brat's homework before handing it in for him.
>Meanwhile, Brat is glad that he has a new jizzrag to clean his cock with, while kicking himself for not taking jerk-off pictures of Nerd while she was begging.
>Ah well, he can always force her to beg again.
>Word gets out that Nerd is doing all of Brat's homework for him and that it's always the highest grade in the class, even above her own.
>Unfortunately, this attracts attention from other students that want the same deal.
>Nerd is hanging out at her locker with a couple of friends, another dog-girl and, we'll say, a snake-lady.
>Just picking up some books she needs for her next class and maybe having a little snack.
>They don't notice the gang of furboi's walking up to them until they're surrounded.
>The leader looks at Nerd's friends and tells them to fuck off for a moment.
>They refuse.
>One of the boys cracks his knuckles loudly.
>They wish Nerd all the best before leaving.
>She doesn't even have time to start shaking before one of them grabs her arms and forces them behind her back.
>The leader, being cocky, grabs her chest melons and squeezes roughly, forcing her to look up at him.
>Tells her that she's going to do all their homework from now on.
>Shaking her head, Nerd tries to hurriedly explain that she can't possibly do that much work, it would take her all day and the quality would suffer, and if the quality suffers, Brat will come back and break her arm or kidnap her
>The leader just twists her breasts and tells her to stop making excuses for her boyfriend.
>Before she can explain that they're not dating, a loud shout catches everyone's attention.
>It's Brat.
>"Did I give you faggots permission to start playing with my toy?"
>Nerd cocks her head to the side as they let go of her and let her drop to the floor.
>Toy?
>She...guess that makes sense.
>She was just a plaything for him; something he could mess around with and laugh at and...
>Break when it got boring.
>A cold chill washes over Nerd.
>Still...
>At least he cared about her enough to come to her defense.
>She was his favourite...toy.
>A strange sense of pride flared up inside her.
>Walking closer, Brat didn't even bother to raise his fists.
>"Get out of here, jerks, Nerd is off-limits. She's mine."
>Not wanting to bother getting into a fight with a guy who would most likely kick all of their asses, the gang leaves.
>Nerd puts her hand out, implicitly asking Brat to help her up.
>Instead, he grabs her by the hair and she lets out a squeak as she's pulled to her feet.
>Tears in her eyes, Nerd gives an awkward smile as Brat stares at her.
>For some reason, this causes him to freeze for a second before shaking his head.
>"Where's my homework, bitch?"
>"Oh, um, I have it...right...here..."
>Nerd replies, turning around and pulling it out of her locker.
>The notes are practically ripped out of her hands and find themselves being fingered through by Brat quickly.
>"This is great. Good work."
>Her heart flutters.
>"Now I have something for you to keep idiots like those guys off your back. And for your...good work, I guess. I dunno, just take it."
>reaching into his pocket, Brat pulls out a circle of leather and practically throws it at Nerd.
>The first thing she notices is that it smells exactly like her glasses.
>Thick and musky and just like Brat.
>With the two of them, her head'll be swimming in his scent all day, it'll be the ONLY thing she can smell.
>The second thing she notices is that it's a collar.
>Her tail starts to wag, but she reaches behind herself and stops it.
>Clipped to the front is an adorable little heart.
>A closer inspection shows that it doesn't have her name engraved on it though.
>It has Brat's.
>It's the ultimate symbol of ownership; an undeniable claim that she belongs to him entirely.
>Nerd starts to pant.
>Is...is this it? Is he enslaving her right now? Is he going to take her back to his house and keep her locked in a cage as his little study-slut, doomed to eat nothing but cum and dog treats? Is...is her life now over?
>She looks up at Brat for confirmation, who just orders her to put it on.
>She hesitates, so he shouts it at her, hastening her along.
>It clasps around her neck and the moment it does, Brat grabs her by the ears and clips padlock onto it, making it permanent
>"There we go. Now there should be no confusion."
>She wrings her hands together as Brat continues to stare at her.
>She moves to cover the collar as someone walks past, but Brat grabs her arm.
>"No."
>She freezes.
>Brat looks at her closer.
>It's not right though..."
>Brat snaps his fingers.
>"Oh, I know, it's your clothes. Strip."
>It's not a suggestion.
>Nerd blushes heavily.
>"B...but we're in the middle of public! Everyone will see me naked!"
>"So? My mom says that animals like you and her shouldn't be wearing clothes to begin with. Now strip. It's not like you haven't done it before."
>Glancing down the hallway, Nerd swallows nervously.
>If...if she slinks back behind the locker doors, nobody will be able to see her, right?
>Gradually, she slips her top off, and hesitates when she removes her dress.
>She still hasn't found her panties and Brat notices.
>Finally, she slides off her bra, and removes her glasses.
>"K...keep those on."
>Nerd puts her glasses back.
>Fighting the urge to cover herself, Nerd poses for her master.
>Her face is as red as can be.
>Stepping forward, Brat reaches a finger down to Nerd's pussy, roughly pushing it inside.
>Now he knows how turned on she's getting.
>"Good girl. You do look better like this."
>Removing his finger, Brat reaches a hand around to her ass and pulls her closer, and forces her mouth open.
>Before she can grow even more confused, Brat spits in her mouth.
>There's a moment of hesitation, before he does it again. And again.
>His lips grow closer to hers as he spits for a fourth time.
>Until he regains his composure and pulls back
>"Get...get out of here, you slut! I have better things to do than waste more time with you!"
>Shocked at his sudden outburst, Nerd grabs her clothes and rushes down the hallway, making a beeline for the ladies room.
>Behind her, Brat angrily punches the locker for not just raping her like he was planning to.
>Maybe if he treats her even more harshly, all these weird emotions will go away.
>Nerd and her friends were chatting in the women's bathroom when Brat walked in.
>Just one look at him made the three of them stop their conversation.
>He looked mad, and they all knew what that meant.
>He was going to push around Nerd for a little to relieve some stress.
>Sweet, innocent Nerd; it was no secret that she was one of Brat's favourite targets to bully.
>Pretending at first not to notice him, the reality sunk in as Brat walked closer, grabbing Nerd by the shoulder.
>Her friends moved to intercept, brushing him off.
>They're not going to abandon her again, not after what happened last time.
>How could he be so cruel as to forcibly strip her in the middle of the hallway?
>Brat tells them to fuck off before he bullies them too.
>They wish Nerd all the best before leaving.
>Spinning around, Nerd puts her hands behind her back like a slave.
>She doesn't know what she did wrong this time.
>Her homework was perfect, she hadn't told anyone but all the things he'd done to her, people had just started rumours, there was no reason for him to want to hurt her.
>Despite telling herself this though, it gave her little comfort as Brat grabbed her.
>Grabbing her shoulders, Brat pushed her against the wall; the sudden shock jittering them both.
>He could feel his heart beating through his chest as he drank in her body, before swallowing loudly.
>"Take off your clothes."
>Nerd shook her head hastily.
>"But...but I didn't do anything, sir! I'm wearing your collar, please, I didn't do anything wrong!"
>Hooking her finger around the leather on her neck, Brat pulls her closer until he can feel her breath on his face and gives her a light slap.
>"I said, take them off! Stupid bitch."
>The cold chill of the air on her naked body as she pulls off her shirt made Nerd shiver as the sting on her face added a tang of fear to her actions.
>Brat could easily overpower her if he really wanted. Strip her himself and she'd have no way of resisting.
>Stick his cock into any one of her holes and punish her until she was crying; the whole time not caring how she feels because it simply feels good for him.
>Leave her a dripping, quivering mess and escape unpunished as always.
>But he didn't.
>He wanted her to do it.
>She was his favourite toy, after all.
>Someone to bark when he said bark, someone to strip when he said strip.
>Someone to keep safe and protect, if only because she belonged to him now, like her collar said.
>But not someone to force into doing it all.
>Maybe all the attention he'd given her...was for a reason.
>Her perky tits hung exposed as she slide her dress off as well.
>Standing there, completely nude except for her degrading collar, all Nerd could do was give another awkward smile.
>Brat blushed, unexpectedly, before shaking his head.
>He'd been staring at her exposed body for minutes now.
>"Kn...kneel!"
>Nerd fell to her knees.
>Looking up at her bully, she struggled to stop her tail from wagging, struggling to keep her tongue in her mouth as she panted from fear, heat and a strange third emotion.
>Arousal.
>Brat's spit hit her in the glasses as he pulled out his phone.
>"I'm going to take some photos of you, slut. If you're lucky, I'll just post them online for everyone to see."
>Now Nerd could hear her own heartbeat, beating in time with his.
>Cupping her breasts, Nerd did her best to try and make herself presentable.
>The flash blinded her for a second, but Brat didn't seem to care, lighting up the bathroom again and again.
>"This is where animals like you belong! Understand?"
>He took another picture of the shaking girl.
>"On your knees, beneath me!"
>Nerd just nodded.
>"How dare you be so...so smart and cute and adorable?"
>Nerd pursed her lips.
>Extending his foot, Nerd stared at it for a moment before realizing what he wanted and pressed her pussy against it; humping his leg like a dog would so he could take another picture, this one extra demeaning.
>The movement sent pangs of pleasure up her spine.
>Pulling back, Nerd let out a moan of disappointment before returning to her previous position as eyecandy.
>Reaching down, Brat grabbed her by the collar again and pulled her up, bringing her back to eye level.
>It looked like he had planned to say something, but lost the words as Nerd smiled at him.
>Instead, he panicked and spat in her face again, letting her go and turning to leave, his phone clutched tightly in his hands.
>There was a split second of indecision, barely a moment's thought given to it, before Nerd called out.
>"Sir, wait!"
>Turning back around, Brat was caught off guard as Nerd rushed forward, planting her lips against his.
>They lingered together for far longer than one would expect, but the moment Nerd's tongue touched his, he pulled away.
>A line of saliva connected them as they stared at each other's eyes.
>"You know, you don't always have to spit in my face."
>Nerd said.
>A moment later, she was caught off guard herself as Brat lunged at her, pinning her against the wall again as his face pressed against hers.
>Now that the floodgates were open, he wasn't holding back.
>His tongue invaded hers with a force she couldn't hope to resist, dominating and strong.
>It physically beat hers into submission. conquering her mouth in a way that made her feel dirty.
>Every time she moved to fight back, tried to push against Brat's tongue or retreat deeper into her own mouth, it would quickly track her down and subdue her.
>In the end, she could only lay there as Brat explored every inch of her kisser, coating it in his own sticky saliva.
>Everyone needs to breath eventually though.
>Releasing her, Brat panted as he sucked in as much air as he could.
>"If...if you tell my mom about this, I'll...I'll kill you! I mean it! I'll...break all your limbs and take you home to keep as a cheap sex doll!"
>Nerd just shook her head.
>"No, you won't."
>Diving back in, the two of them tongue wrestled again as their hands decided to cash in on the opportunity as well.
>Brat's, well used to groping and teasing Nerd's sensitive spots, grabbed her nipples and started lightly twisting, making her moan into his mouth.
>Nerd's, unused to anything other than turning pages, awkwardly reached into Brat's pants and wrapped themselves around the length they found there.
>Sliding along it and jerking it lightly under his clothes.
>Nerd knew it's where he would have wanted them.
>Breaking free again, Nerd savored the new taste in her mouth before dropping to her knees, moving her hands up to Brat's waistband.
>With a single movement, she freed his cock.
>It was just as big as she remembered it; hitting her in the nose as it sprang forth.
>Breathing in the scent deeply, Nerd shivered.
>It was so much more powerful, so much more raw at the source.
>Her hands moved to her pussy as she rubbed her nose against it.
>She thought she'd grown well accustomed to the smell of Brat's musk, to the smell of his raw cum; considering that it nearly radiated off of her at all times now thanks to her glasses and collar.
>But now, it made her dizzy.
>Nerd dove head first into Brat's crotch, buried herself in his balls as her fingers worked inside her, pumping in and out as his smell destroyed her mind.
>It was so thick she could taste it on her tongue as she panted, sent her spiraling to new heights.
>It was too much for her, her fingers moved faster as she grew closer and closer to release, to...
>Cumming.
>Just a moment too slow though, as Brat's hand grabbed her head and pulled her away.
>Looking up at him desperately, she whined loudly.
>"No. I cum first. That's how it works."
>Nerd nodded.
>"Yes, sir, of course, sir, I'm sorry, sir."
>Dragging her to an empty stall, Brat kicked it open and threw her inside.
>Following her in, Brat grabbed the back of Nerd's head and forced her towards the toilet bowl, shoving her concerningly close to it.
>"Sir!"
>Brat stopped.
>"Oh, uh, sorry. Force of habit."
>Pulling her up, he sat on the toilet seat and spread her legs.
>His cock was huge; far larger than anything Nerd had seen before. Just the sight of it was intimidating.
>And she was expected to just take something like that?
>Grabbing the base of his dick, Brat walked closer and lined himself up with her defenseless hole.
>Nerd covered herself.
>"Wait, wait! Not...not yet. I'm not...ready."
>Brat paused.
>It was clear that he was thinking.
>It would be all to easy to just ignore her and pound away at her pussy until she passed out, like he'd planned.
>Leave her face down in the toilet, leaking his cum out until someone found her and came to her rescue.
>It wasn't like her opinion mattered, it wasn't like he needed her permission.
>But still...
>Something stopped him.
>"...fine."
>Grabbing her by the hips this time, Brat slid her off the toilet so that she was sitting on the floor in front of him.
>His cock lined up with her nose again.
>"Open."
>Nerd didn't even need the command, she was already panting as hard as she could.
>In a mindless haze, she felt the rod tap against her tongue, and pressed it against the shaft as hard as she could.
>Licking its length and drowning in its smell, Nerd rubbed her cheek against it.
>And then took the tip into her mouth.
>The taste was exactly what she was expecting, and the shiver it sent down Brat's body continued down her own, electrocuting her fingers as they once again buried themselves in her crotch.
>She swirled her tongue over the tip in circles as Brat's hands grabbed the sides of her face, stroking her gently and giving her the occasional spank to keep her motivated.
>It wasn't long until Brat wanted more though, shoving his length deeper until it hit the back of Nerd's throat; only halfway in.
>Nerd's tongue continued its swirling around the rod, filling her mouth his taste and stretching her to the limits.
>The slight pressure at the back of her throat made her want to gag, but she fought it down.
>Bobbing up and down, Nerd made sure that no inch she could reach went unserviced.
>Soon, Brat was thrusting on his own though, taking the illusion of choice out of her hands.
>And he was certainly rougher than Nerd was.
>The end of his dick kept slamming into the back of her throat, trying to break through that barricade so that he could hilt inside her.
>Hands grabbing her ears, Brat brutally pulled her back and forth as she finally lost the battle in her mind and started to gag around his shaft.
>Her own spit ran down her body, wetting her fur and coating her hands as she shoved them equally deep into her snatch.
>Brat's dick throbbed and grew inside her mouth; and with one last thrust, Brat forced himself into her throat as he came.
>Her neck bulged as load after load was fired into directly into her stomach; a stomach far too small to contain it all as it fired back outwards around Brat's cock, filling her mouth and shooting out of her nose.
>With permission to cum herself, Nerd shook as an orgasm rocked through her body.
>All she could see, all she could taste, all she could smell, all she could touch, all she could hear, was Brat.
>Right now, he was her world, and it felt so, so good.
>If she could feel like this all the time...
>Maybe living in a cage in his bedroom wouldn't actually be that bad. Maybe being his little snuggle/study slut wouldn't be that bad.
>Withdrawing from her warm mouth with a long groan, Brat let Nerd drop to her side, coughing loudly as she struggled to get air into her lungs around the impossible amount of cum.
>There was a bright flash as Brat took another picture of her suffering.
>Nerd could just look up at him, laughing at her.
>"That was surprisingly good. I expect you to do that every time you hand me my homework from now on. Got it, slut?"
>Nerd struggled to move, coughing even louder as she tried to say her piece.
>But Brat was already preparing to leave.
>"W...wait..."
>She said, as he left the stall.
>Leaving her alone, naked and drooling cum over her body, in the bathroom.
>Abandoned.
>Until!
>A moment later, Brat returned, her clothing in tow.
>"Here. Let's at least get you cleaned up. Next time, I'll have to train you to swallow."
>Wobbling to her feet, Nerd felt a wave of...relief, of calm wash over her.
>She smiled at Brat.
>And he begrudgingly smiled back.

>Brat and Nerd are finally getting married!
>(against his mother's wishes)
>He wants a fairytale wedding.
>Not because of HER!
>Its so everyone can see just how much he owns her!
>He picks out the dress and everything!
>SHE DOES WHAT HE TELLS HER TO DO
>Finally the big day comes.
>And its time for her to walk down the aisle.
>Well, kind of.
>Brat sees Nerd crawling on all fours.
>Wearing nothing besides the collar, and a white garter.
>Her collar attached to a leash.
>And when its time to kiss the bride, she opens her mouth for him to hock a massive wad of spit into
>he gets most of it in, but more is on her nose and chin
>she gets back down on all fours as he walks her out
>he finally sees her buttplug
>Nerd stood quietly outside the entrance to her home, arms crossed behind her back.
>She'd learned that this was the proper position for them when she wasn't using them.
>Better than having them awkwardly flop around and get in the way of things.
>Her collar felt heavy around her neck as she panted in the hot sun, waiting patiently for Brat to arrive.
>When his mom's car pulled into the driveway minutes later, Nerd felt her tail start to wag.
>And her nipples start to harden.
>From inside the car, Brat's mother's voice rang out.
>"Have fun at your sleepover, my beautiful baby boy. Remember that mommy loves you very much and you can always call her to pick you up if you get scared."
>There was a loud slap, followed by several more, until Brat got out.
>His face lit up in a smile when he saw Nerd expecting him.
>Closing the distance, he reached a hand under her shirt and tightly grabbed her breast, pulling her in closer while she gasped.
>Running his thumb over her nipple, he gave her a light kiss on her doggy nose before releasing her.
>Nerd looked away as he saddled up beside her, gently placing a hand on her ass.
"So this is where my favourite nerd lives."
>"Haha, yeah. We...we should go inside."
>Brat gave her a light push, so Nerd took charge and opened the door for him, stumbling as he barged past her and into the house.
>Opening into a hallway, Brat glanced at the family photos on the walls; each one a cherished memory of a beloved time in Nerd's life.
>Snapshots of the most important times in her life.
>Walking forward, Brat jumped as Nerd's mom ambushed him from around the corner.
>She was wearing an apron, which strained strongly against her D-cup breasts; almost as much as her jeans strained against her equally sized rear.
>White dots were scattered across her chocolate brown fur, even across her left eye.
>Towering over Brat, she nevertheless smiled warmly at her daughter's new 'friend.'
>"Oh, you're here! I was just about to put dinner on!
>Brat stared her down with a smug, confident sneer as she continued.
>"Let me just say how kind it was of you to invite my little girl over for a sleepover. I know she's not the best at making friends; always in her books."
>Nerd’s mom clapped her hands together.
>”Sure, she has those two nice girls from the chess club, but it’s good that she has a friend who’s willing to stand up for her and invite her to things.”
>”You can just call me ‘mom’ too if you want.”
>Nerd’s mom let out a laugh.
>Without much fanfare, Brat stepped forward and closed the distance between them.
"Damn, Nerd, your mom is hot as fuck. Now I see where you got it from."
>To punctuate his sentence, Brat delivered a powerful, opened handed slap to Mom's butt.
>Snapping to attention, a strong blush rushed over Mom's face as her eyes widened, a dull pain spreading quickly over her rump.
>"S...Sir!"
>Nerd shouted, pumping her arms down in front of her angrily while stomping her feet.
>Before anyone could really comprehend what was happening, Nerd hurried forward and gave her mom a quick hug.
>"S...sorry, mom. Brat can be a little rough at times, but, I mean, he is a human. They have a different culture. Is it racist to say that? I hope not."
>Adjusting her own glasses, Nerd's mom took a step back and smiled awkwardly again.
>"It's...it's okay, just unexpected."
>Leaning forward, she focused on Brat.
>"Just treat me like you'd treat your own mom! It's okay!"
>Nerd nearly jumped a foot into the air, before waving her hands in front of her.
>"No no no no no, don't do that!"
>Looking at Brat, she latched on to his arm, "Treat her nicely! Respectfully. Okay? For me."
>Brat looked at her angrily, before shrugging.
"Fine."
>Nerd's mom started to talk again as the duo listened patiently, something about how Brat could ask for help at any time and the general rules of the household.
>But any illusion of normalcy was shattered when Brat's hand snaked its way over to Nerd's butt and grabbed her tail roughly.
>Without any fanfare, he pulled on it painfully.
>Nerd blushed.
>"R...right now? But you're talking to my mom!"
>Brat pulled her tail harder.
>Blushing, Nerd grabbed Brat's hand and started to pull him away.
>"Anyway, gotta go, Mom, it was nice talking to you. Bye!"
>"O..oh, okay."
>Watching silently, Mom watched as Nerd pulled her friend down the hallway and up the stairs, blushing and panting heavily the entire time.
>Towards her room, no doubt.
>Brat himself moved with such confidence that it was clear he was the one really in control though.
>It didn't take a genius to know what was going on and Mom was certainly no fool either.
>She'd seen love birds before.
>Sighing, she looked over at one of the pictures next to her, reminded suddenly of her own days as a young puppy.
>Back to when she was first wooed.
>She remembered sneaking away during school hours to recite poetry under the trees.
>Sharing a milkshake down at the malt shop.
>Sheepishly holding hands while people were watching and blushing in embarrassment.
>Returning to the kitchen, Nerd's mom smiled while thinking about how nice relationships could be.
"Take it deeper, you fucking bitch! Deeper! Stick your whore tongue out, if I don't feel it on my balls I'll break your nose!"
>Sitting on the toilet, Brat had both of his slut's ears in a death grip as he forced his rock-hard length into her throat, brutally pulling her closer inch by inch as she gagged helplessly, tears and cum straining her face.
>Releasing one, Brat beat at the back of his fucktoy's head, every blow temporarily forcing her an inch lower.
>The sudden jolts knocked her glasses around, rendering her partly blind, not that she’d be able to see anything except Brat anyway.
"I know you can do better, bitch!"
>Spit bubbled up at the edges of Nerd’s mouth as her friend used her mouth like a disposable fleshlight.
>Emboldened by his encouragement, Nerd swallowed what she could and fought against her gag reflex as Brat stretched out her throat, relaxing her muscles and surrendering further control.
>His thick musk overwhelmed her as her nose pressed into his crotch.
>With her tongue out, she lapped at whatever she could find, whether it was balls, shaft or cum.
>He held her there for a moment, just shining in the sheer amount of pleasure this was bringing him.
>Nerd’s desperate tongue rubbing itself against every exposed bit of skin, the way she let out muffled moans as his taste filled her mind, her arms obediently held behind her back even as she choked, and her face a complete mess from his rough treatment.
>How had he managed to live without such a beautiful toy before?
>He thrust into her mouth with all the more fury, in and out, not caring that her drool was dripping down her chin and staining her shirt.
>Bliss raced down his cock like lightning as he pulled her back, a single hasty breath given before impaling her face back where it belonged.
>Nerd’s warm throat embraced his dick as he brutally raped her face.
>The only noises echoing through the bathroom were Nerd’s choking gags.
>But she didn’t dare try to move or fight back.
>Being pulled from tip to base as fast as Brat could, Nerd wasn’t surprised when she quickly felt his rod expand in her throat.
>Under such an assault of pleasure around his dick, he was certain to cum quickly.
>Quick being relative, of course, he’d already lasted dozens of times longer than any anthro could and most likely ruined them for Nerd forever.
>Plus, Brat always cutely moaned just before climax.
>Striking while he was sensitive, Nerd clenched down on his shaft, swirling her tongue around his meat while pushing herself deeper even without his help.
>Brat held his breath as he came, blasting load after load of steaming hot human cum down his anthro-toy’s throat and back up into her mouth and nose.
>The pleasure of it raced through his body as he pinned her in place; forcing her to take every drop.
>Knowing that he shouldn’t make things easy for his friend though, Brat pulled back into her mouth and kept releasing.
>Nerd struggled to keep up with the torrent of cum flooding into her mouth; swallowing as desperately and as quickly as she could but still ending up with bulging cheeks.
>How could humans cum this much, it wasn’t fair!
>All the anthro porn she’d secretly watched had been one or two loads at the most!
>Practically jerking himself off into her mouth, Nerd panicked as she finally lost the battle and it started to bubble out of the sides of her mouth.
>Finally, before she could fail completely though, Brat pushed her away.
>She landed on her back, mouth still full of cum.
>Gradually, she drained it.
"Now say it!"
>Nerd just coughed painfully, her throat clogged with spit and cum.
>Kicking her very gently, more like a nudge, Brat asked again.
"Say it!"
>"Th...thank you for training me, sir!" Nerd shouted.
>Brat laughed.
“Good girl! Now, your turn?”
>Standing up, Brat put his leg forward.
>Rushing to it a little too eagerly, Nerd pressed her pussy against his leg and started to hump it like a desperate animal.
>Looking up, Brat towered over her as she slid her bits across his body, pleasure of her own arcing through her body.
>Nerd knew that he liked it when she barked while pleasuring herself, so she let out the occasional ‘arf’ and ‘woof’ as she felt her own climax approaching.
>The taste of Brat still lingering in her mouth and nose and mind certainly helped a lot as well.
>Howling as she came, Brat was suddenly struck with embarrassment over the fact that her mom might have heard that before her orgasm overtook her and chased that fear away.
>For some reason, cumming with Brat always made her cum so much harder than if she was just using her fingers.
>Hugging Brat’s leg, Nerd shook as waves of pleasure vibrated across her skin and made her fur stand on end.
>”Thank you, sir!”
>Brat’s gentle hand on her head guided her back to reality; a gentle reminder that she belonged to him entirely.
>Pulling her back to her full height, Brat smiled at her.
“Good girl. Good girl. Go get cleaned up, okay?”
>Nerd just nodded.
>Wandering over to the sink, she quickly started working at washing all the cum out of her fur, rinsing her mouth and gargling the taste of it out as well.
>It wasn’t like it would remain out of her mouth for long anyway.
>She was careful, meticulous, just like she was with her homework.
>Every strand was individually inspected and cleared; there could be no chance of even a drop still remaining on her.
>Brat just grabbed one of Nerd’s underwear from the dirty laundry and used it to wipe down his messy cock.
>Nerd jumped when she felt a hand on her shoulder and quickly spun around, only to be locked into a deep kiss as Brat lunged at her.
>Returning the sentiment, the two of them made out for several minutes until Brat pulled back.
“You look so hot…look so beautiful right now. I mean, I just think you do, I don’t know if you…”
>Nerd gave him a quick peck on the lips.
>”It’s okay, Brat. I understand.”
>A brief moment of hesitancy, before Brat took initiative again and they continued.
>Tongue pressed against tongue, Nerd shivered as she felt Brat’s breath blowing into her face.
>Pulling back again, Nerd smiled happily.
>”This is great, but I really do need to clean all your cum off my face. Can you imagine how my mom would react?”
>Taking a step back, Brat shrugged.
“Proud that her girl somehow managed to bag herself a human?”
>”Oh, shut up, um, sir.”
>Turning back around, Nerd returned to her work.
>Being who he was though, it wasn’t long until Brat slid up behind her, both hands sneaking under her shirt and mindlessly toying with her breasts.
>And unsatisfied with that, he started rubbing a fresh boner against her bubble butt.
>Nerd was flustered.
>”Again? Already? We just did it, you can’t honestly be ready to go again! It’s not normal!”
>Brat just bit her ear.
>”…fine. Just a quick one though.”
>Kneeling down, Nerd put her hands behind her back and waited patiently as Brat threw her dirty underwear turned cumrag onto her head, shivered as his cum dribbled down her hair, and grabbed her ears.
>Fifteen minutes later, the freshly cleaned duo snuck out of the bathroom, turning on the fan as they left.

>I. THOU SHALT NOT HAVE ANY COCKS BEFORE ME
Let the sinners lust after momentary pleasures, only with Human Cock shall you be complete.
>II. THOU SHALT NOT MAKE UNTO THEE ANY GRAVEN COCKS
Only through blood and birth may one gift unto the female holy cum, the unholy cannot be converted nor purified, only accepted for their eternal sin of their fathers.
>III. THOU SHALT NOT TAKE THE CUM OF THE LORD THY GOD IN VAIN
To rebuilt the heavens is a duty of honor which comes before no other, do not selfishly lust for Human Cocks.
>IV. REMEMBER THE BLOWJOB DAY, KEEP IT HOLY
Only on this day may Human Sperm be gifted upon you through the lips which sing hymns and kisses their feet, let the seed of Humanity wash away your sins.
>V. HONOR THY HUMAN AND THY WOMB
Honor your fertility as you would honor thy cock which shalt seed it.
>VI. THOU SHALT NOT ABORT
Creatures that may, at will, abandon thy child from thy belly, must not when carrying the child of Humanity.
>VII. THOU SHALT NOT COMMIT BESTIALITY
The father who planted his unholy seeds and the mother who birthed his unholy child shalt not be welcome in the heavenly lands.
>VIII. THOU SHALT NOT STEAL CUM
Cum shalt be gifted freely, to steal from a Human is to steal from thyself.
>IX. THOU SHALT NOT SHOW FALSE HATE TOWARDS THY HUMAN
To accept His gift is to accept thyself, trick not, the holy spirits.
>X. THOU SHALT NOT COVET THY NEIGHBOR'S HUMAN
If he doesn't come to you he doesn't want you CRYSTAL you fucking whore.
Thus saith the Lord.

>She wakes up again in the dark
>Not alone
>One of many
>But only she wakes up
>Always the earliest
>She is unable to fully comprehend the world around her; its a box, but to her simple mind, it is everything
>Except at one time
>One very specific time, a hole appears
>She makes her way to that hole, ready for that time, as she always does
>She's not alone; they wak now, the others
>They fight
>They all want to reach that sacred place
>But she is the first, the fastest, and the strongest, so she arrives first, as she always does
>Its a very light area, a strong contrast to the darkness that makes up the rest of the world
>It hurts her eyes, but she simply ignores the pain, and stares into the light
>A rustling can be heard
>The world moves
>The hole appears
>And within it, the sacred tool she, and all the others, seek
>Her instincts tell her what this is; a man's tool
>There are no males down here, in her world, and havent' been for many generations, yet she still knows it
>This tool, even to her lesser mind, feels wrong, however
>That thing was too big to be called a penis. Too big, too thick, too heavy and too rough.
>It begins
>She, and the others, swarm to it
>To feel its warmth
>It is the only real warmth down here, in this small section of lifght in the darkness
>They rub their bodies on it, enraptured by the feelings; the taste, the smell
>Until eventually, it happens
>Like the great flood hit moses, it hits them, a massive wave of white
>While the other girls collapse and begin to indulge themselves, only she stands tall
>Hoping for more
>He has noticed this
>He created this box years ago
>He changed them, made them love Him
>Love his touch, love smell, love his essence
>But she is the first to refuse to partake in His love
>He moves out of the box, and reaches in, then grabs her
>She sees, for the first time, the face of her God
>He carries her by the tail to His
>He lifts His sacred tool above her
"Do you want this?" He asks
>She doesn't speak his, or any language; He long since made sure they would never be smart enough to do so
>Yet clearly she understood
>She pants, spreads her legs and raises her tail
>His member is far too large for her, but she doesn't care
>With a single mighty thrust suiting to the being whom they would worship as a God, He enters her
>He grasps her with his hand and, like an onahole, uses her
>Its painful
>Its so very painful
>But its all she has ever wanted
>His attention
>His love
>Just for her
>She doesn't know how long He keeps this up for; it wasn't long until He came, yet He was still hard; no, He got harder, seeing her tense up as she vomitted up His seed and tried desperately to keep it inside
>But eventually He stopped
>He placed her back in the box, into the darkness, but now with a mark that shows He has use for her
>A collar, with His name on it, marking her as his
>From that day on, every time He came around, He would take her, and use her
>For hours
>And she would love it
tldr; guy turnes himself into the effective god of a race of anthros, traps them in a box, makes them only exist for his pleasure, then picks out the alpha of them specifically to use as an onahole
Was tempted to make it snuff though

>anthro mother raising you to breed her when you’re older

This but she didn't understand what a human is, just saw a male.
She ends up being dominated not out of any malice, it being his or her kink or anything, but because she's a species that is only in heat maybe every 3 months for a few days and groomed a species which is always horny to fuck her as soon as he's able and never stop until she's pregnant
And she's not able to get pregnant, because they're different species, so he simply never stops and she lacks the energy to tell him to
Eveyr day he wakes up, takes care of whatever buisness there is, comes home and fucks her
Every single day
She's not in heat, but he doesn't even know what heat is, she never taught him
Groomed him too well

>He aimed his cock at his own face as he came, pretending it was the hunk of a human that was his boyfriend jizzing all over his bitch
>It was nothing like the real deal, his was warm and gooey but lacked the blazing heat and dominating musk of his humie's cum that made his head feel light and heart feel full
>He breathed and wiped off the cum that had splattered on his phone's thankfully waterproof screen
>It had only been two days into his boyfriend's six months away and he was already going through withdrawal
>He had already pulled out his old anal toy, something he had from before he met his male
>The faint tickling was nowhere near the vicious pounding his prostate required in order for him to cum hands free but it would have to do
>He licked his lips as he gazed longingly at his bf's gloriously erect, heavily throbbing shaft dripping pure masculinity from the tip
>They had both made a promise to not cheat while they were separated but a small part of him sort of wanted to see another cute anthro boy get anally devastated by his human
>Or anthro girl, if he ever wanted to father a baby of his own
>That was fine too, so long as he remained top bitch of the house
>He imagined jerking off his boyfriend onto the face of the new arrival to mark them as family, just as he had been that wonderful night last year
>And almost every night after that
>At this point he was heavily marked as the bottom as any anthro could smell, there wasn't a patch on his coat that wasn't permanently stained with the scent of his boyfriend
>Or Master, as he liked to call him in the bedroom
>Humans made great masters
>He felt the blood return to his flaccid cock as his imagined running his tongue from tip to base, worshiping an impressive human girth, the same one that would then slide into his lubricated hole and breed him til he fainted
>The anthro resumed fapping and emptied his abused testicles of what little seed he had left yet again onto his face and chest

>She sneaks off, yet again, to the neighbors place, wearing the same red collar hat as always
>Its a deal they made maybe a year ago. She comes around without that collar; they're neightbors. They just talk. Nothing weird.
>She comes around with that hat, its to fuck.
>Not once, since this deal was made, has she left the hat at home
>She tries to be a loyal wife; she has a few kids, a loving husband, all the bamboo she could eat, so life should be good.
>Should
>But she made a mistake that fateful day. A human had recently moved in, and she wanted to say hi. They're a rare novelty, humans
>What she didn't know is that humans, unlike pandas, are not nocurnal, so when she knocked, and when he answered, he had just been sleeping
>An erotic dream, as evident by the tent he pitched
>Her husband, bless him, considers himself 'large' for a panda standing at a 'mighty' 4 cm at his biggest, which he only reaches for a tiny fraction of the year, and only lasts a minute or two in bed
>This, however, must have been at least 6 inches. Maybe more?
>She stared at it, completely blanking out on whatever he said, until she found a hand leading her paw to it, and a smile on his face
>After rubbing it for a while, he led her into his place with no words exchanged
>He dropped his pants, and she dropped to her knees
>She opened her mouth and impaled her throat with the tool; its something she heard humans do, something she always, deep down, wanted to try, but she couldn't do it to her husband with his literal pinprick dick and waste his barely more than once a year sperm
>She didn't have to worry about wasting this mans sperm, however
>He was human
>Superior
>They can go at it every single day
>For hours
>And they did
>For the rest of that night, and into the day, they fucked
>On every piece of furniture, in every corner of the room, she felt him
>Oh god she felt him
>His girth and his warmth
>Incomparable to the complete joke she had called 'sex' up until this point
>Despite being so much smaller than her, he manhandled her
>There was no love
>No communication
>Just raw, seemingly endless sex, far more than her body was ever intended to take
>And then it ended
>His seed shot forth with more force than she could comprehend in her exhausted state
>He handed her the collar, and told her to wear and come around if she wants more
>Over the next few day she came around with her friends; all the female pandas in the town, and a few other species aside
>Introduced them to the man, who remained silent the entire time, and watched as he made them his bitches
>Collared them all
>And every day, they come to him, to give them the pleasure that their men; with their tiny dicks, low sex drive and pathetic stamina, can't offer
>He uses them as he sees fit; completely devoid of any love or respect, he simply positions them as he pleases, for as long as he wants
>And they love it

>Jack and Jill and their friend billy went to collect water
>Jack was a pal, Jill was a friend, whom Billy lusted after
>Jack and Jill were married though, and that made Billy sad
>But that's okay because Billy is human and we all know humans are bad!
>On their way Billy got to thinking, he pulled out some cans, and he started drink
>Jack being jack he asked for a drink, and billy gave it, did not even think!
>But Jack was a dog and dogs aren't for drinking
>He saunted to Jill, looked her in the eye and tried his best at winking
>Jill was a doberman, man's in the name, so Billy thought, it makes sense, stake my claim
>He cupped a breast (1 of 6), rubbed it and in return she gave him licks
>Jill flushed red under the fur, and despite being dog, you could see it on her
>What cam over she didn't know, but you see, for humans, every anthros a hoe
>Later that day (and near the night), when sun was dying and it wasn't so bright
>Jack woke up and his head was achuing, his stomach felt bad, poor Jack was quaking!
>But that wasn't the end for poor old jack, as with his doggy ears, he could hear it
>SMACK!
>Smack smack it echoed on and on and so Jack got up, groggily, not quite gone
>He walked to the source of the sound and he saw his wife on the floor and Billy holding her paw
>It looked fairly forceful, could it be rape? Jacked ran in, to save her, that jape!
>But poor old Jack, 7 this year, was well past his prime, a shame, I'm sure
>And so he took a smack right on the nose, and out like a light, poor jack goes
>He woke up later in the middle of the night, and poor Jack, oh man, what a fright
>He couldn't move, legs were tied, forced to watch, as his wife laid and loudly she lied
>It doesn't feel good, she panted and barked, but it was plain to see, she was quite farked
>While he's drunk on booze, she's drunk on cock, so she pants and denies while fucked on the rock
>Old billy was smiling, this was a good day, he got to fuck Jill, and his she would be still
>He pulled out a collar, place it on her neck, and with 1 final shove, he broke it, she's a wreck
>Old billy and Jack knew they both were lacking, so Billy smiled, took out, started hacking
>Always finish a job, his old man said, so Billy laid alone, his old friends, both dead

>Imagine growing up in a manor surrounded by anthro maids and then finding out one day that you can do whatever you want with them

you wouldn't even need to ask anon, by the time puberty hits you'd have lusty sluts sneaking into your room just to suck on your morning wood.
that's not even considering how your nurse/nanny would react.

>imagine being hired by the master of the house to be a wet nurse for his newborn son
>every day the young master suckles on your breasts
>you feed him, wash him, play with him, everything a proper mother would do for her son
>but you're not his mother
>eventually the day comes when the young master is old enough to be sent off to a boarding school
>even when he becomes preoccupied with school, and you become just another maid, you both stayed in contact
>letters exchanging pleasantries, news on how the young master's family is doing; just every day conversation
>suddenly the young master returns, no longer a mere boy but now a proper man. Taller than even his father, and well built to boot
>the impressive young man is greeted with much pomp and circumstance
>at first you politely bow your head and greet him as the other maids had done
>that is until he scooped you up in his arms and gently squeezed
>then you allowed yourself some degree of unprofessionalism as you cupped his cheeks and kissed his forehead
>he blushed, embarrassed at being kissed in such a motherly way
>during the celebrations he greeted all those who attended, even the servants he remembered from his childhood
>and although much had been prepared for his return the young master made his excuses and retired early for the night
>although not without telling his old nanny to draw him a hot bath so he could wash and relax from the long journey
>as the maid was adding the finishing touches to the young master's bath, the young master entered: naked
>she stared, oh how shamelessly did she stare. How could she not? it was as if Adonis himself had walked in
>and he, in turn, simply walked into the bath and waited
>soon she remembered her duty and began to scrub his perfect body
>although she did occasionally linger when her hand rubbed his chest, the old maid was too embarrassed by her earlier blunder and so worked quickly to clean him
>once she was done she turned to leave
>but the young master's hand quickly grabbed hers
>he told her to strip, and, not wanting to disobey or disappoint her master, she quickly did
>there she stood, naked and embarrassed waiting for another order
>he told her to enter the bath and as she did her master began to wash her
>although a clumsy job, the old maid now stood clean and dry, her fur now smelling of roses and lavender
>the young master took her hand once again led her to his room
>there he tossed her to his bed, excitement accidentally adding too much force
>she asked him what had possessed him to do such an act, the force making her realize this was no fantasy, the master simply pushed her down so that he towered above her naked form
>before she could protest more the master kissed his maid and she could not help but shudder and let out a muffled moan
>his tongue invaded her mouth, exploring all it could. When they parted it was only to breathe as they quickly rejoined
>during this she began to squirm her legs, her sex burning with need for a man
>a need he fulfilled
>that night was one of passion and love
>at first hesitant to lay with her former charge, the more the young master pleasured her the more she allowed herself to enjoy his touch
>naturally this took several orgasms and many kisses but eventually her resolve broke and she began to please her master
>she did all forms of acts for his master, from suckling on his phallus while using her breasts to rub it to spreading her legs and holding on to his neck while he held her aloft and trusted
>she put a front of indignation and embarrassment yet her heart betrayed her as for every new act they would perform it quickened
>this continued until the master had finally tired and allowed for sleep
>the morning after she woke before her master and put on some of the bed covers and quickly retrieved her uniform
>despite being extremely tardy and with a limp, she acted as if nothing had happened and retrieved the master's breakfast
>she was still a maid and she had work to do, after waking her master with a kiss she began to feed him
>she tried to do this as fast as possible so that she could remove all evidence of their liaison
>the young master would not allow for this, as he still wished to play with her
>he made her mouth his cup and refused to eat a bite unless fed to him
>Of course some noticed not only the clothes strewn around the bath, the old maid's absence in her work, and the noises they made throughout the night
>there would be no hiding their affair as the most obvious sign soon enough appeared, a growing belly and sudden vomiting with no discernible cause

>He leaves, disgusted at this stupid animal and its stupid antics
>Leaves her alone
>Her lizard body, left without any heat from the enviroment, clothing or movement, begins to shut down
>She blacks out
>She awakens to find herself bound even harder to before, looking into the dark
>"Ah, the lassy woke up"
>She tries to speak but her mouth is blocked
>She feels around her mouth with her tongue
>Her long, flexible tongue
>"Ahhh", "ahhh", she muses
>She can feel a ring around her mouth, holding her muzzle open
>And then she hears it
>*Ziiiip*
>And the smell hits her
>Its so punguent, like he hasn't washed, ever
>But also so manly
>She finds herself getting wetter
>Afterall, this is, more or less, what she wanted to begin with
>She feels it enter
>It goes all the way down her muzzle, into her throat, and punches the back of
>The size! Its huge! She didn't even know dicks came this big!
>She feels him thrusting, hears his grunts, as he grabs her horns and just uses her
>She doesn't know how long she was there for, in his grasp, barely able to keep a form of conciousness as his massive meat deprives her of air
>But eventually, he cums
>Like a fountain
>She can feel its wamrth burning into her throat as the smell burns into her mind
>But she can't taste it, he's too deep
>She knows she shouldn't want this, but she does, so she sticks out her tongue as far as she can, begging with her eyes
>"Ye have to earn a taste, lassy", the man says, as he leaves and another man enters
>*Ziip*

>power, such power these human invaders possessed
>they were unrefined, savages
>and yet the youngest prince's unused cock throbbed and wept as he heard his guards being cut down one by one
>his hands shivered as he stripped from his normal wear and put on the harem clothes he had saved for this moment
>the maids screamed as they were stripped naked, then moaned as they were ruined
>the prince slithered onto his bed, not as a male but as a mere bitch to be bred
>the pounding footsteps grew closer and closer as his kingdom, his home, was senselessly violated
>he heard the shrill squeal as his sister was ruined, the princess' purity and chastity stolen by a man she didn't even know the same of but would soon scream nothing but
>he was envious that she was taken first
>soon, hopefully, they would do the same to him
>they were right outside his door
>he hiked up his tail and peeked back
>and there he was, his half nudity only revealing the human's impressively built body
>the prince's eyes flicked downwards to his cock, still dripping with the fluids and blood of his sister the barbarian had deflowered just minutes before
>he may never marry his sweetheart in the next kingdom over, but that was a truth he had already accepted
>perhaps she could join him as a fellow harem bitch
>the human grinned and entered, swiping the translucent silk that protected the prince's soft butt aside
>the prince gasped as strong fingers roughly inspected him
>his sensitive orbs that would never father pups were teasingly squeezed and pulled
>his virgin cock was slapped and pinched
>a shameful spurt of royal seed escaped from his tip as the pure excitement of the humiliation only made him cum
>the human laughed at the pathetic anthro prince, orgasmic from another man touching his bits
>it only aroused the bitch further, making his pucker relax invitingly
>with a single thrust the human stole away the prince's last dregs of masculinity and the anthro gods wept as another kingdom was conquered

>Click
>The noise resounds into the absolute darkness of the world
>And then it comes back
>He sees it all; the shapes of this world, the people in it and her
>His seeing eye dog
>Poor Terry was born blind, and was given her when he was just a child, and she a pup
>With all the talk of 'animal rights' going around in the day, he couldn't 'technically' own her, but he always knew he SHOULD
>That's how it worked in his parents days, how it workd in his grandparents, why should it be different now?
>So he learned to echolocate, so he didn't have to rely on her
>To degrade her
>Every day, she follows him everywhere, hoping to be of use, but Terry is a free man
>He sees it all
>Desperate to be of use to him, she had taken to looking at what else she can do
>Can't cook; paws too unwieldy, can't sing; voice too rough, can't teach, iq too low
>But she did find one thing she can do
>And that is to offer her body
>So she did
>She follows him all day, every day, pretending to be useful, waiting for him to 'use' her
>To take her holes; any he pleases, and pound away
>He's not a dog, he doesn't go into 'heat', that's a concept for a weaker race, a subserviant race, an animal
>He is a man
>And, whether by hundreds of years of conditioning, her own insecurities, or any other reason, she wanted to serve him
>So she offered herself, gave him a collar, and presented her mind, body and soul to him
>She thought this would get her into trouble
>Its illegal, she thought
>But then it turns out, she's not alone
>This is what all dogs want
>To serve man, to make man happy
>So today as well, she walks
>She waits
>What could be better than to serve your owner?

>pussy inspection day at the all-girls private anthro academy
>a thousand ladies from some of the richest families around, all bending over to present their untouched (except by you) snatches
>not for the usual sexual diseases, weirdly enough, but for their virginity
>apparently having pure daughters was important enough to pay some random human to make sure they weren't used
>not that you didn't have fun with them
>each prod, poke, and teasing slide of your fingers across their blushing lips and throbbing beans sent them squirming
>it was a fairly straightforward job, tease them until their knees shook and their arousal dripped down onto their panties then stick a finger or two inside to stretch their hole open
>"Am I ready to breed, sir?"
>The code phrase was something that had spread around the school when your first conquest exited the examination room with her cum-soiled panties still around her ankle
>You had reported to her parents that her hymen had broken due to sports but that she was still a virgin
>It wasn't like they cared enough to actually make sure
>And neither would the parents of this girl
>The teenage fox girl mewled as you spread her slim, neat labia wide and peered inside where her virginity sat intact
>"I don't know, let's run a few tests..."
>She hissed as her high-class pussy was stretched open and taken for the first time, popping quite the expensive cherry and beginning a new addiction she would carry for the rest of her life
>The actual joke was that none of these girls were virgins
>And you made damn sure they weren't

>During riots, police launch canisters of human musk.
>Leave every anthro affected into a drooling mess, pacifying them
>Humans are aren't aroused by the gas, but the mass of horny anthros desperately masturbating on the concrete does.
>Best opportunity to grab some furries for yourself, before the police takes them to the station.

>Anthro gets arrested
>The real punishment isn't getting sent to jail, but having your arms bound and cuffed from behind.
>Prevents them from touching themselves as the human law-enforcments manhandle them to their cell.
>No pleads will tempt the humans from using her like a cocksleave, because they already got satisfied by to department's own whore

>Imagine being a human prince in a majority anthro kingdom
>Imagine having a castles worth of anthro servants to toy and play around with

>hypnotize pokemon with a pendulum you stole from a hypno instead of having to spend money and use pokeballs
>rather than having to fight them, simply hypnotize any that you want and turn them into your fucktoys

>get adopted by Toriel
>after being pampered by her all the time, eventually fuck her
>hard, fast, in any room of the house, day and night
>stop treating her like a mom and treat her like a fucktoy as you grope her body and drain your balls in her holes

>your once highly fertile wife is getting older
>she's getting the milf type body
>sex is still amazing and has, in fact, peaked between you two
>still she gets tired too fast and doesn't get horny as often
>experimentation isn't a thing she's interested in anymore
>on the other hand, your older daughters are reaching maturity
>they look exactly like their mother when you met her
>you can notice how they explore their bodies, compare their sizes and touch themselves quite often
>sometimes they would peek at other males
>their focus though is the most handsome, strong and gentle they've ever met
>the one that always protected, provided and cared for them
>one night, one of the young ladies got caught in the couch
>lost in the thoughts, hands gone naughty
>she's sent to her bedroom
>she's going to be so grounded...

>stop treating her like a mom and treat her like a fucktoy
Gay. You should still treat her like your mom even when dicking her down.
>Wake up in bed with your mother-wife.
>She must be tired from last night.
>You can be a little rough with her sometimes.
>Your mom always tells you she's an old woman...
>...But is always begging for more, and harder, and faster, when you get going.
>She begins to stir.
>"Good morning, my child," she says lovingly, kissing you on the nose like she did when you were young.
>Some things never change.
>"Morning, mom," you say with tenderness in your heart.
>"My ass is still so sore from your raping last night," she says as she cups your cheek.
>"Sorry mom." That same old tone, as if you stole a cookie.
>"Just be gentle with your poor old mother," she taps your nose, "even if she is begging you to ruin her holes if your massive fuckstick."
>You make a motion to get up, but she pushes you back down.
>"Please, let your mother get you your breakfast."
>She gets out of bed and walks out of the bedroom completely naked.
>She parts her cheeks and shows you her battered ass.
>Now you can see it, her hole does look a little stretched and sore.
>She shakes a finger at you.
>"Such a naughty boy."
>You smile lovingly. "Go and make our breakfast you slut," you say with unshakable love in your heart.

I like to imagine toriel is a sweet but stern woman with everyone else. WIth you however she is willing to do whatever you say and do whatever you want. You can call her every name in the world but she will still get you that new 60 dollar steam game you want but she will give you an angry face while she does it and you only get to have 5 ball draining's instead of the amount you want.
>"My child, have you repaired the leak to the faucet yet?"
>"Goodness. You can be so lazy sometimes. I think I spoil you."
>"Well, sorry, but until you start doing what you're told, it's only my cunt for you!"
>"Don't give me that look! If you wanted to destroy my asshole into a gaping mess, or fuck my face so I was covered in cum and drool, you should do your chores."
Sometimes your cockslut anthro mom needs to remind you who is the mother and who is the child. Of course, she can never really stay mad at you, and before long she's pulling her buttocks apart and begging for it in her ass, telling you that you better do some work around the house tomorrow.
But, this is just her "punishments." It's her rewards that make it all worth it.

>imagine grabbing her little horns while thrusting your dick into her mouth, facefucking her until you blow
>holding on to her big hips while ramming her fat ass, plowing her furry pussy and cumming hard balls deep in her
>burying your face in her big tits, squeezing and groping them, feeling their softness while sucking lustily on her nipples
>or titfucking her, holding her large breasts together while thrusting your dick in between them wildly until you unload your cum all over them
>fucking her in bed, morning or night, or taking her spontaneously in the kitchen, ripping her clothes off then and there
>fap like crazy in bed at night while thinking about all these things, while she sleeps peacefully in the next room
>and she just greets you warmly the next morning, giving you a sweet kiss on the forehead and calling you her dear child, having no idea how badly you want to ravage her like a fucktoy
Something like that.

>You wake up in bed with your mother, as usual.
>Her white fur pressed against your skin.
>You laugh softly as one of her floppy ears has fallen over her face.
>Moving it out of the way, she begins to wake up.
>Her eyes, hazy from sleep, look at you with a fondness and affection only a mother can have.
>And you return it in kind, with a look of love of a son for his caring mother.
>She moves to kiss you good morning, but suddenly lets out a small groan.
>Not of pain, but of a soreness.
>Yesterday, you were doing your daily check of the ruins.
>As usual, secretly hoping that no child did fall down.
>Your mother laughs and tells you not to be so jealous and needy.
>But like usual, if you're not fucking on the way there, you are on the way back.
>This time you have ended up with her legs pulled up, your cock pummelling her ass.
>Her currently-untouched pussy leaking her juices and your cum down to your dick like lube to fuck her even harder.
>But now, after sleeping on it, her right hip felt sore and tender.
>She's sat on the bed, her legs spread wide, with you in the middle.
>So close to her two holes used to love you.
>Someone could easily call them "worn out" or "busted," but you could never use such language to describe your beloved mother.
>After all, their condition was your handiwork.
>So instead you regard them as "inviting" and "welcoming."
>"It does feel a bit warm," you say as you rub your hand along her inner thigh. "You should rest today. Don't worry, I'll do the chores, you just get better."
>You stand up, but she moves and pulls your face close to hers.
>She begins to rub your nose against her snout in an eskimo kiss.
>"You're so good to your mother," she says. "You rape my fuckholes so wonderfully, and care for me so nicely."
>"I do both because I love you, mom," you say as you hug her closely.
>That night though, when you have sex, it's tender and gentle. After all, you don't ever mean to hurt her.
>It's just you both lose control sometimes.

My fantasy is walking into a large pack of mighty beasts, beat the alpha's ass with my bare fists and take his place. Then proceed to claim every one of his ex-girls right in front on him while he lays on the floor ith broken bones and a bleeding nose

Based and reminds me of how I like to explore settings where all females are anthro but MOST males are feral.
The minority who aren't being a recent mutation who immediately ends up with a huge harem of anthros simply because he can talk and has apposable thumbs for foreplay.
Along with worldbuilding for civilization where a woman's status depends on whether her father is anthro or not. And wife factories where animal fathered women are raised to part of harems. Most being farm anthros fathered by an exotic feral because they have strong seed while purebreds are expensive. Farm anthros being bred to have huge T&A so it's standard to have a cowgirl get bred by a feral wolf to produce wolf girls with huge tits.
Anthro males meanwhile have 50/50 for their offsprings species.
I don't really know where are the best places to post my ideas since they're not usually human dominance but just on the extreme side of fetishes.

What do you prefer to be, as a husband?
>Having multiple wives that share you equally
>Having one wife that likes watching her human husband impregnate other girls she invites.

I enjoy hierarchy with harems.
Having a head-wife organize the girls for nightly activities.
Her lieutenants to keep the harem in order
Girls who only get service for their bodies but have no real power from being used more often.
And glorified maids who have to work even while pregnant.

My nigga.
Headgirl is a good mix of incredibly obedient, forceful towards the other girls, and skilled.
Lieutenants should be physically strong to actually keep others in line.
The bulk of the girls are encouraged to split into little informal competitive cliques who try to impress you over each other to keep them focused. Enforcers are often pulled from the clique leaders, or are otherwise given important jobs.
And at the bottom, the unproven. The obstinate, rebellious and new who've yet to find a clique to take them in. They're given the worst chores and are free to use for any other girl in the harem in most any way.
Including each other, so the best way to get proven is to dominate the weaker girls and obey the stronger without complaint, to prove she understands hierarchy.
Though I'm more partial to pregnancy being a reward, and pregnant girls having no physical jobs and being constantly doted on by the rest of the harem.

I've been toying with this idea for a anthology series involving a magic collar that finds it's way into the hands of different humans, and when they place it on anthros, the collar specifically chooses their most prominent aspect of themselves and warps it to make them the most submissive for breeding. Examples
>A powerful and brutish fighter type has her "Courage" taken away, so dispite her power and size, she's a timid wimp who gets aroused from bullying
>An important and sleek high ranking officer worker has her "Class" taken from her, turning her into a filthy creature who enjoys smegma, rimjobs, and public humiliation, completely tarnishing her hard earned reputation
>A brilliant young student has her "intelligence" taken from her, in a classic bimbofication tale and now is willing to believe the advice of a human who wants nothing more than to breed her
>A pretty boy Chad who prides himself on bedding as many young impressionable chicks has his "Masculinity" taken from him, and finds himself only being able to be aroused by human cocks, and experiencing orgasms from being bred that far outstrip what he was able to do by fucking

>you take your own daughter's virginity
>in her horny teen years, you end up spending most days just plowing her while she squeals in ecstasy
>your wife/lover(/sex slave?) is perfectly happy about it, even encourages it
>your daughter starts walking around the house naked, both due to being a lazy brat and as an attempt to entice you
>your wife only halfheartedly tries to help instill better manners in her, seeing it as both amusing and as a perfectly healthy sex drive for a youngster
>when your wife walks in on you plowing your daughter in the living room, kitchen, hallway, etc., she just says "Good to see you two having some quality time" or something similar
>your daughter takes pride in how many times she can make you cum, milking your dick until it's shooting blanks
>by the time she's 18, she's more experienced with sex than most pornstars
Now imagine having several daughters...

>He knew they were watching
>The broken prince blushed under his blinding hood as he felt many eyes peeking out from the brush to look at his humiliation
>His father was dead, slain on his throne by the slave-king human himself
>His mother was violated by countless warriors on the very bed she had birthed her children, and now she would birth more
>His sister was auctioned, the proof of her virginity shown to dozens of rich human nobles
>And he would be sent to the neighboring elk confederation as a message, a promise of conquest and devastation
>Bound, gagged, and most humiliatingly, caged, he was paraded down the quiet street where citizens and nobles, good friends of his, peered out from behind trees in horror at the sight
>The prince was marched outside wearing nothing but a ballgag, hood, and lingerie stolen from his sister's closets.
>But the chastity cage was something the humans had brought
>Only they could invent something so lewd
>Captured males would usually be castrated or even killed outright
>But he had been spared, his testes were allowed to remain fully functional as a show of control not only of his masculinity but as a show of control over a kingdom's future
>or at least as functional they could be after becoming the target of many a slingshotted acorn
>Dirt turned to marble and his hood was finally removed
>Before him was the royal elk family, distant cousins but close friends
>And the princess, the one lady whom he had any interest in, now only stared in shock
>The human messenger spoke, but not before one of the guards shoved the deer prince to the ground
>Tears dripped from the prince's eyes and his scream of agony was muffled by the gag as he was violated
>He begged them not to look, to allow him to keep a shred of his pride
>He came against his will, forced into wasting his royal seed on the cold floor instead of inside a warm womb
>A flash, and when he woke he saw the humans again, enjoying their new elk prey
>He had just been a distraction

>The police department has recently been hit by a strange phenomenon that the chief of police is refusing to comment on.
>Dozens of furry officers keep modifying their nightsticks to resemble human phallus'
>They claim it's purely for aesthetic reasons, or that 'they just work better like this,' but several men, all of them furries themselves, have complained about essentially getting beaten into submission by a dick.
>Not to mention, many officers claim about being 'distracted' by their sticks and forgetting to investigate reports from furbois.
>Nevertheless, the trend only seems to be catching support from other departments worldwide.

>This war was going badly and now it had just gotten worse
>The humans had taken everything that once protected her
>By the time they dragged her out of her burning tank there was nothing left, not her air cover nor her comrades
>And now even her clothing had been torn apart, exposing her naked form to her human captors
>She cursed her rank as they tore off her patches as trophies, it may have kept her alive but it also kept her alive
>It wasn't every day they successfully captured not only a Major, but an attractive female and with no others around they relished the opportunity
>They had her face pressed up against the wall of a destroyed building and her pussy violated within a minute of her surrendering
>And they raped her with the ferocity of the war that surrounded them
>She screamed and babbled the words of many treaties and agreements that dictated the proper and decent treatment of captured prisoners as she was taken
>Human sperm flowed out of her stolen sex as the next soldier replaced the last
>He was even crueler, he pulled her hair and spun her around so that she could cry into his face
>She continued to speak words none of them understood, nor cared about
>He muffled her complaints with his lips, his thrusting increasing in ferocity at the familiar feel of a woman's lips he had not felt in ages
>For that was all she was in that moment, not an officer of her forces, not an enemy prisoner, but as a woman who was free to be used
>He bit down on her nipple to tease her further and came
>For three whole hours she was used, a few even forced their way into her anus
>But finally, she was released, allowed to fall and slump on the ground, out of breath and of feminine pride
>She reached down and felt her once unused pussy, now gaping and ruined
>The tears stopped when she realized she was truly beaten
>But perhaps if she satisfied these men they would not touch her citizens
>One last service to her country
>She faced the camera and spread her legs once more

Anthro bots are so fragile, I swear most of them break after their first couple of fucks. They don't seem to mind though, their simple programming means they just want to please and worship human cock, they don't have any concerns or issues with ending up in the scrap heap.
They're cheap too, it's nice getting a new hole every week after throwing out the old one.

I have a thing for the idea of an infinetly programable and adjustable breeding boot. litterally MADE to carry as many children as you want with her synth (or maybe transplanted real) womb. controlling literally every aspect of the whole thing. maybe even put an anthro’s brain in a synth body, fill her up, and crank up the synthetic materal hormones to the nth degree. Maybe its super casual even and thats how you create new drones for whatever which need you want.
Oh, you need some EVA drones to fix the space hull? just impregnate your breeding bot.
You need more cooking drones? put a bun in the oven
Need some extra muscle? Put some security bots through boot camp. it would also probably have a full log of every birth as well.

I like the idea of an alien race that in it's attempt at invading and conquering Earth, gets infiltrated and counter-invaded and bred into submission by horny Earth males.
>Relaxing in your apt/house, hear strange noise coming from outside
>See alien invader surveying the area, talking on communicator about plans
>Catch it off guard and capture it
>Interrogating it turns sexual
>Far more sensitive than humans, intoxicated by our body fluids
>She renounces her mission and swears loyalty to you in exchange for the pleasure
>Also tells you that since she's been captured, they'll most likely send reinforcements to procure her body
>Backup arrives
>She pretends to have escaped your custody only to lead the reinforcements to a trap of yours and hers design
>Subjugate them as well
>Board their vessel and fly to the mothership
>Pretend to be their prisoner brought aboard for probing
>Manage to trick your way into reaching the matriarch of the whole invasion fleet
>Forcibly mate her in front of her entire crew
>Claim sovereignty
>Return the fleet to the homeworld
>????
>Completely conquer an entire planet of alien women

Instead of just making a setting where "hurr durr furwoman loves human dick", I'll try to flesh out a setting. It is a caste system similar to Brave New World but with humans automatically on top. Anthros have a variable level of intelligence mostly based on how much human genetics that they have although there is a cap. Humans are just better than anthros in the civilization game. Not bounded estrus, higher baseline intelligence, near universal breeding compatibility (most species of anthros can't breed with other species except for humans), vastly better dexterity, and already much more advance civilization in place. Unlike BNW, the caste system is not created from deliberate brain damage but from selective breeding. The lowest caste, E, is only slightly smarter than real-life animals but dumber than cave-men. They are essentially livestock and it is generally forbidden for them to breed with humans. D is for low-skilled manual labor. C is for soldiers and higher skilled labor. B is pretty close to human rights and first access to human breeding. "A" caste is rare for an anthro but possible if they can reliably reproduce human offspring.

>"So it's official?"
>"Yep! Two lines, I'm pregnant!"
>"Oh cool... I hope it's his."
>"Geez, I knew you were a subbie but I didn't know you were that much of a bitch!"
>"Ooh, don't call me that here I'm getting turned on."
>"Woah, if you're getting a hard-on just from that I can't imagine how you felt watching me and Mr. Human go at it from under us!"
>"Y-yeah that was definitely something... I got to see everything."
>"Jelly. Com'on! Describe it!"
>"Well we were 69-ing and you were playing with my balls and I was licking your pussy-"
>"Yeah?"
>"Very pretty, neat, tight. It was also sticking to his cock like it knew that it was meant to be in there."
>"Hawt."
>"And then at the end when he came I, ooh-"
>"I just saw some pre spurt out! Gonna cum handsfree to your girlfriend getting creamed by someone else?"
>"Oh gods a-and when he pulled out-"
>"And you got a faceful of his cum!?"
>"It was the best feeling ever, like I deserved having my mate stolen before me. I watched it, you know? I watched his shaft throb and pump you full."
>"Watched? I remember you were doing a lot more than just watching!"
>"Alright fine... At first I stuck to licking your clit but eventually I started tasting him in your juice and I wanted more so I moved to licking... him. Then he started going balls deep, which meant he started slapping my face with his balls... And when he was cumming you I may have..."
>"May have what?
>"...may have sucked on his balls to help him cum more."
>"Gods, no wonder I'm pregnant!"
>"Y-yeah. I wonder what it's like?"
>"What's it's like to what?"
>"To impregnate you."
>"...Ya know, I think you may get your chance just yet."
>"Wait, what?"
>"I wouldn't mind but I'll talk with Mr. Human. Just imagine it, him cumming in my belly that has your kid in it. Your weak doe-sons getting buttfucked and your fertile doe-daughters breeding with their human daddy while you can do nothing but watch and jerk off-"
>"Ooooh! Oh gods I'm-!"
>"Woah dude, save your cum for tonight!"

>He was just a normal teenager, at least until yesterday
>There were always rumors but until yesterday they were nothing but that, rumors spread by Anti-Human League
>Ever since the human conquest of the anthro union a noticeable yet easily deniable number have mysteriously gone missing
>They had snatched him as he walked home
>The most tame myths involved enslavement and submission to a human master who would take them as sex slaves but the weirder, but somehow the most common, claims involved heavy biological modifications for use in clubs and other establishments
>From turning fully matured mothers back into young teen bodies with an ever regenerating hymen to adding breasts to a male, turning his fur a neon glow-in-the-dark pink, and then modifying his penis into one of an entirely different species
>All for the amusement of their new masters
>And here he was, secured in a glass tube with the exact abomination in the next tube over staring lustfully at him as he?/she? stroked their thick, knotted cock
>He covered himself and turned away, embarrassed at his growing erection at the sight of an excellent pair of breasts had they not been attached to a monster
>They saw his gaze and squeezed one of their tits, spraying a brilliant pink milk all over the glass
>Because of course they can lactate glowing pink milk
>He eyed his own perky nipples and gently throbbing cock, wondering if they too would not survive as they were
>The thing came hard, its cum flowing like lava down the glass side as it banged its erection against its belly, loud enough for him to hear
>It was at that moment when tears began to flow from his eyes that he picked a god and began praying
>At this point he was willing to do anything, no matter how filthy, as long as he was allowed to stay as he was born
>He felt the air electrify as his body began to grow numb
>All hope left his soul as he noticed the ends of his hair turn pink

Anthro Christmas has its roots in the first human invasions. Captured anthro soldiers would be forced to pull chariots and their human riders though their hometowns and villages. Their families watched as fathers, husbands, and brothers were whipped and worked like mere beasts of burden for their new masters.
And then the ravaging began.
They could do nothing but watch in horror as the humans bit into the sweet fruit of conquest. The civilians were taken where they stood, regardless of status or age. A mother who birthed her last child two decades ago would now breed yet again. A young daughter's purity would be stained. A pregnant newlywed was seeded against her will despite her preoccupied womb. They burst through the heavy doors of their place of holy worship where the remaining villagers all faced the alter, praying to their god for a salvation that would never come. The humans made sure their god could watch as their chastity was ruined.
In the modern day many of these traditions continue to be remembered, including pulling a slegh or in some cases just carrying the human on one's shoulders to deliver to one's family as a "present". For the lonely it is customary to place a Christmas tree sticker on the front door. A human will then proceed to use his impressive home invasion skills to enter and "rape" an "unwilling" anthro as she sleeps, leaving behind a nice gift when he is done.

>"So I'm not allowed to cover my chest or between my legs anymore?" Kliz asked her mother with a whine.
>Kliz always liked her dresses, and was reluctant to part with them as part of her adulthood ritual.
>Her mother was having none of it, and pointed to her own exposed groin despite being "fully clothed".
>"Hon, have you EVER seen me or any other adult Kobold female in the kingdom with covered breasts or crotch?"
>Kliz had to admit that she hadn't, but then again she hadn't really given it much thought. It just seemed normal.
>She didn't realize it was a law, and one that would apply to her once she grew up.
>With her adulthood ritual rapidly approaching, all the little details that she had heard over the years were suddenly having a lot more meaning now.
>She was also starting to notice details she hadn't while growing up.
>Like how her mother's clothing had strategically placed and sized holes.
>How her father's clothing was always bottomless.
>How every adult Kobold wore a collar.
>How the occasional adult Kobold she passed on the street was only wearing shoes and a collar, or only a collar in some cases.
>The way every human male was Sir, and every human female was Ma'am.
>She couldn't stop thinking about it.
>Resigned, knowing there would be no way out of it, she had to ask. "But why are things this way?"
>As her mother told it, a few hundred years ago the Kobolds had their own kingdom that neighbored the Human kingdom.
>The humans were one of the few races that would even deal with the Kobolds.
>Then one of the other neighboring races figured out they held a strong military and technological advantage over the Kobolds, and declared war.
>Kobolds were proud of what they could do, but their smaller size and lack of strength always limited their capabilities.
>They also didn't produce as many highly intelligent prodigies as the other species naturally did.
>Kobolds weren't dumb, but they didn't have very many geniuses either.
>Within a week, nearly half the Kobold kingdom had been taken, and 2/3rds of the army had been wiped out.
>The Kobold ruler at the time was a rather crafty Queen, and intelligent enough to be considered charming and witty company by diplomats of all species.
>Knowing there was no way to win without help, and knowing absolute destruction was the only possible result otherwise, she traveled to the human kingdom to meet with their king.
>As the legend goes, her mother claimed, she asked him directly for help to save the Kobolds from extinction.
>He asked her what she would give in return.
>She said she no longer had anything to bargain with.
>At which point he dismissed her, saying he had no reason to help.
>She then promised him anything she could give.
>The human king thought about it for a bit, then asked her to wait.
>He left the room and came back some time later with a few of his scribes, and what is now known as the Human Kobold Alliance contract.
>Knowing it would be a deal to rescue her people, she asked to sign immediately, without even reading it.
>The king only laughed and told her that she couldn't sign until she read the entire contract, and would know how to sign after she finished reading.
>"I don't get it."
>"The contract is on display at the palace main hall for any visitor to see, I can quote it word for word.
>This contract hereby merges the entire Kobold kingdom into the Human kingdom.
>All Kobold lands are now Human lands, and the Kobold government is dissolved.
>All adult Kobolds are to surrender themselves to the nearest auction house in Human lands, where they will be sold to the highest bidder.
>Once sold and collared, a Kobold is expected to serve their Human owner a minimum of 60 hours a week, but are not required to serve longer or remain while not serving.
>This servitude is to last until the Human owner dies, at which point the Kobold is required to surrender themselves to the nearest auction house in Human lands, or the Human decides to sell the Kobold back to an auction house.
>No adult male Kobold is allowed to wear any clothing that covers any area from the underside of their tail to an inch above the base of their penis.
>No adult female Kobold is allowed to wear any clothing that covers any area from the underside of their tail to two inches above their clitoral hood.
>No adult female Kobold is allowed to wear any clothing that covers their nipples or breasts, with a minimum of a quarter inch gap between the edge of the clothing and the breast.
>All adult Kobolds are required to submit to any punishment their owner decides on as long as it doesn't draw blood, causes permanent damage, or otherwise mutilate the Kobold being punished.
>All Kobolds are required to follow any order given to them by a Human unless it conflicts with an order given by their owner or an authority figure, the order would result in themselves or another person getting hurt or injured, the order would result in a crime, or if a Human ordered an underage Kobold to do something sexual.
>There have been many changes and adjustments to the rules over the years, but the basic contract still stands."
>Kliz couldn't believe it.
>"So she just signed us all into slavery to the humans?!"
>Her mother just shrugged.
>"It was that or death.
>She didn't exactly get off easy herself.
>The final part of the contract was the trade.
>In addition to everything prior, the current Kobold Queen will become the property of the Human King.
>She will be expected to serve non-stop without the prior stated limits on servitude.
>She will be required to produce at least one female child with a male Kobold every ten years, with continual breeding until the requirement is met if she fails to bear a female heir.
>Her eldest living adult daughter will become the next Kobold Queen after she passes away, and will be required to meet the terms of the contract as stated prior.
>In exchange, Kobolds will be protected by their owners.
>They will be fed, clothed during cold seasons, be given proper grooming, and protected against hostile species.
>Any children borne by a Kobold female are to be taken care of by the mother and her Human owner.
>Human owners are expected to provide for any Kobold children borne by any female Kobolds they own.
>Though the mother is still expected to serve, she is not required to serve to the point of neglecting her children.
>If the Kobold Queen is willing to agree to these terms, she is to remove all clothing, kneel before her new owner, place her arms behind her back, and wait for her first order."
>"...and she did?"
>Her mother favored her with a look she usually reserved for the town idiot, and pointedly put her hands behind her neck with her elbows back, making her exposed breasts stick more prominently out of the specifically cut holes in the blouse she was wearing.
>Kliz was more than a bit embarrassed.
>She knew this, she was just distracted by the story.
>"Oh, yeah."
>She had heard about the contract, but never knew how degrading the entire deal was until now.
>"I just can't believe she did it. He practically treated her like..."
>"A slave?"
>Her mother's response was just another nail in the coffin.
>She wanted out.
>No doubt, she had more than a few fantasies about human men late at night, shuddering and shaking while remaining dead silent to avoid waking her mother.
>It would be hard not to, given how warm and soft they usually were.
>And strong.
>And tall.
>And smart.
>But the thought of being controlled by some human sent a cold shiver down her spine.
>She wasn't some kind of animal or pet, she was a person!
>Didn't she deserve to make her own choices?
>"Mom, please, there has to be a way out. I could run..."
>"Don't even DARE think about it!
>A brother and sister tried to flee the kingdom once.
>They were caught, brought back, and were publicly restrained and tickled for five days for every day they had been gone.
>From sun up to sundown, with no rest.
>They were crying by the end of the first day, and begged non-stop for mercy as they were lead to and from the stockade every day after.
>After the punishment was over, neither one was willing to leave the city, much less the kingdom.
>You do NOT want that to happen to you."
>Kliz already had her tail wrapped protectively around herself out of reflex.
>She once had an experience where a human boy had held her down and tickled her sensitive belly.
>She laughed and squealed, and felt her muscles turn to water.
>The moment she felt she could move again, he tickled her again.
>It felt even more intense than the first time, and she immediately realized she couldn't make any move to escape from the intense sensation as long as he was tickling her.
>Which he kept doing exactly as she nearly recovered enough to move.
>Every time it felt like she was running out of air and couldn't breathe, he would stop and let her start to recover.
>Then those damned soft warm hands would be on her stomach again, and she would be back to screaming laughter while desperately trying to plead for mercy.
>It had gone on for about ten minutes before the boy got bored of the game and left her alone, but it felt like an eternity to her.
>Having to go through that, without her tormentor stopping when it became painful to breathe, from sun up to sundown, day after day?
>She shuddered.
>"Kliz, I know you are afraid.
>But there is nothing to be afraid of.
>Most humans treat us well, the few that don't usually get themselves barred from the auction houses, and you'll probably enjoy it more than you think."
>Kliz couldn't help but stare at her mother over that.
>"Enjoy it? What makes you think I would enjoy it?!"
>Her mother only met her gaze and said
>"That human boy you always spend time with, Teiras, how would you feel if he owned you?"
>Which was more or less the nature of those late night fantasies of hers.
>Her answer sounded lame to her even before she said it.
>"That's different."
>Her mother snorted.
>"How so?"
>"He wouldn't..."
>She thought about how nice he always was to her.
>"...be mean to me." she lamely finished.
>"Kliz, dear, what do you think my owner has me do?"
>Kliz had never really thought to much about it.
>She never wanted to think about what some human forced her mother to do.
>But her mother always seemed happy in the company of her owner, so she never asked before.
>She shrugged.
>"I spend most of my serving time sitting in his lap."
>"...sitting?"
>"Yes. Just sitting. Nothing sexual, just sitting in his lap.
>He likes me to sit in his lap with my tail wrapped around his body.
>I enjoy his warmth, he says he enjoys my cold."
>Kliz had to chew that over for a bit.
>"Humans like our cold?"
>"Some do, moreso in the hot summer months. My owner does.
>He also enjoys having me served on a platter."
>Kliz could only look confused about that.
>Her mother elaborated.
>"Every day after evening meal, I am sent to the kitchen with some rope, and ordered to instruct the chef to serve me to my owner.
>The kitchen staff take off my clothes, lay me on a platter, and tie me to the platter with my legs spread wide.
>They then pick up the platter, and deliver me to my owner.
>I am placed in front of him on the dining table, and he eats until he's content.
>Once he's satisfied, he drops a napkin over me, and the staff take me back to the kitchen to be untied and redress."
>"...he likes that?"
>"Very much. Sometimes when I'm sitting in his lap he'll rub between my horns and call me his little iced treat."
>Kliz froze a bit at that.
>Sitting in a human's lap, basking in the heat, being petted and rubbed and called affectionate names, didn't she masturbate to that very fantasy last night?
>Her mother misunderstood her reaction.
>"He doesn't say it to be mean, and he's not trying to be mean."
>"I know, I...never mind."
>Her adulthood ritual still loomed ahead of her.
>"How much longer until the ritual?"
>Her mother looked out the window at the slowly setting sun, still well above the horizon.
>"Another few hours at least. Just try to relax, it will happen soon enough.
>I have to go to my owner now, but I'll be back home in time to walk you to your ritual. Alright?"
>"I thought you had today off?"
>"He did give me the day off to look after you for your big day, but he did say he still wanted his little iced treat after dinner."
>She could only blink at that. "You weren't joking when you said every day."
>Her mother just smiled.
>"If he asked for a honey-covered little iced treat, I would have needed to leave sooner. I'll be back before the sun goes down. Behave while I'm gone."
> * * * *
>An hour later, and Kliz was about ready to chew her own tail off.
>Her mind kept racing around in circles, thinking non-stop about Humans.
>Humans.
>A Kobold's greatest strength, a Kobold's greatest weakness.
>They were tough, but usually gentle.
>They were clever, but not snobby about it like the elves.
>They could be stern, but were usually merciful.
>They had great power, but their flesh was soft and pleasent to the touch.
>They owned Kobolds outright, but they never treated Kobolds like the other races did when they had Kobolds at their mercy.
>They didn't lock them in permanent chastity devices and force them to eat off of the ground like the Elves did.
>They didn't use the Kobolds for labor and work them to death like the Lapines did.
>They didn't eat Kobolds alive like the Orcs did.
>They had full power over the Kobolds, but...
>Kliz looked around her mother's home for what must have been the thousandth time.
>It was a house in the style of a Kobold hovel, but made from Human engineering and materials.
>Kobolds tended to build their homes out of mud, clay, and any nearby plant matter they can use to hold the mud and clay together.
>Usually not more than five feet high, but that worked fine for Kobolds since most of them were no larger than four feet tall.
>Basic design was circular, with a firepit in the middle with a hole at the top to let smoke out, a door for entry, and a hole to act as a window.
>Her mother's home had the same basic design, but was Human-ized.
>The door was solid and had hinges rather than being a piece of wood that was moved out of the way and replaced.
>The windows, more than one, had glass and could be opened for fresh air.
>The walls, floor, and ceiling were all made of wood and held together with nails.
>And in the center of the home wasn't a firepit, but the always incredible heating stove.
>She thought if it wasn't for the contract, Kobolds would have probably sold themselves to the Humans just to get access to the heating stoves.
>Heating stoves were an amazing human invention that made fire look bad.
>You added in the fuel, which could be just about anything that burned, started it burning, then closed it up.
>There was a pipe that would carry the smoke all the way outside of the house, which was sealed watertight with the roof so you didn't get rain falling in the house like you would with the old hole method.
>No smoke in the house, and the metal of the stove caused it to radiate a lot of heat with very little fuel.
>It burned much slower than a firepit, so you spent less on firewood and other fuel as well.
>And the best part of all, the heat was trapped in the stove.
>As long as you didn't actually touch it when it was hot, you could get right next to the heater stove without worrying about a flying ember burning you or catching your bedding on fire.
>Long lasting easily approachable heat, at any time, and you didn't even need to watch over it to prevent it from going out.
>For such a wondrous invention, the Kobolds would have probably sold their souls.
>She couldn't take thinking about Humans anymore, and started pacing around the house.
>The sight of some of her mother's clothing hanging on the circular rod that went about halfway around the house made her stop.
>She started thinking about her own clothes, and how she would soon be wearing adult clothing with the special holes.
>She slowly approached one of her mother's dresses, a light blue and frilly thing that ballooned out at the hips and remained wide and billowing all the way to the ground.
>The top half had two holes on the chest, and was made out of some silky soft material.
>The bottom half of the dress had a circular cutout around the waist going from the front to the back, with a hole cut all the way through all the fluff and frills to the other side, only to close back up by the knees.
>Tied to the wooden bar next to the dress was two ribbons in the exact same light blue color.
>She knew what those were for, she had seen more than a few Kobolds with a ribbon tied around each horn.
>She had heard more than a few Humans say it was cute.
>After spending about five minutes standing there and feeling the material of the dress, she made a decision.
>It was her adulthood ritual day, so she wasn't likely to get into trouble for wearing adult clothing which was forbidden from children.
>She could see what it was like, couldn't she?
>What harm could possibly come from it?
>After convincing herself it was 100% safe, she took her own dress off and began putting her mother's light blue dress on.
>It was a bit tricky getting her arms into the long thin sleeves, and she was surprised to find the lower half had silk sleeves to guide her legs into.
>At the bottom of the sleeves on the legs were small holes for her toes to stick out of, with a silver ring mated with the holes for her largest and smallest toes.
>When she lifted the bottom of the dress out of the way, she saw the sleeves had the effect of covering her lower legs and feet in light blue, with the silver rings calling attention to her claws.
>Those sleeves stopped just above her knees, where the cutout zone began.
>Looking in the mirror, she could see it looked as though she was wearing the sort of dress a rich noble Human might wear, except her groin was completely visible from the front and back.
>As she stepped forward, her light blue clad foot would stick out just beyond the range of the dress's frills, and the silver rings caught the slightest light and flashed.
>As for being exposed, nearly any movement she made would cause the cutout around her crotch to spread and open up just a little more than when she was standing still.
>The longer her stride, the more she was exposed.
>The bottom half of the dress was loose and billowy, and would feel like nothing at all if it wasn't for the light blue silk she could feel pressing between her toes.
>The top half of the dress was quite the opposite, with the silky light blue material being stretchy and clinging all around her, the sole exception being her breasts.
>She could feel it gently squeezing from her waist up to below her neckbone, and all down her arms.
>Much like with the legs, the arm sleeves ended with holes for her fingers to fit through, with silver rings mated to the middle hole.
>She was a bit confused as to why there wasn't two rings on each hand like she had on each foot, until she remembered the middle finger was where Humans wore their wedding rings.
>Weddings were not a Kobold concept, they didn't even usually stick together after the female was impregnated.
>It was a Human concept, a concept which had left many Kobolds awestruck.
>One of the most common fantasies among the other Kobold girls Kliz had grown up with was having a Human marry them after buying them.
>It had happened before to some Kobolds, and there wasn't a single Kobold female that didn't think about how amazing it would be to have a Human declare you his life-long mate.
>Kliz looked in the mirror at her exposed breasts and crotch, fingering the ring on her right hand.
>She had to admit, the dress made her feel good.
>And the rings on her hands lent themselves to all manner of fantasies.
>She thought about Humans seeing her wearing a dress like this.
>She thought about Teiras seeing her in this dress.
>She thought about that for a minute, then pulled her hand out from between her legs and started planning.
>She knew she had to have the right look, or some Humans might suspect she was in violation of the law.
>After her mother's story earlier, she would rather eat broken glass than break the law.
>Presenting herself as an adult Kobold without actually having an owner, that could be bad.
>She reasoned as long as she looked the part and said the right things, no one would suspect anything.
>If she did things right, she could go for a walk in her mother's dress and maybe run across Teiras...
>She grabbed the light blue ribbons off the wooden rod where they hung their clothes, and tied each one in a large bow onto her horns.
>She admired the way the light blue bows looked on her jet black horns, with this getup even she was starting to think she looked cute.
>She found a spare collar under her mother's bed pallet and put it on around her neck, with the small metal ring in the front like she had seen it worn.
>At first she was afraid to put it on due to the look of the lock and no key being anywhere in the house.
>Then she discovered it opened and closed without needing a key at all, and a closer inspection showed the lock to be just a hole to give the appearance of a lock.
>She almost left the house before a wave of panic brought her to her senses.
>She had almost forgotten the makeup!
>Makeup wasn't just for looks, it said things to Humans.
>The important colors were Red, Yellow, and Green.
>Any time an adult Kobold was in public, they were required to be marked in a specific way.
>Red around a body part was a flat denial, that area belonged to that Kobold's owner alone.
>Green meant anyone was welcome to help themselves and was effectively an open invitation.
>Yellow meant the Kobold was allowed to share that part of their body with another Human, if the Kobold chose to.
>This law was a result of how possessive Humans could be with their Kobolds.
>Before the law came out, Kobolds that were forbidden from having sex with other Humans still would, and just say they couldn't resist the advances of the Human.
>With the marking, Humans knew the wishes of the Kobold's owner without even needing to ask.
>Going outside without makeup would look very unusual and would have blown her cover before she even got started.
>She dug around her mother's belongings until she found the three colors and some brushes.
>Knowing full well she would be closely inspected before the auction, she painted red around her groin.
>She thought about Teiras again, and decided to paint yellow around her mouth, just in case she ran across him and he really liked her dress.
>Looking at the green paint and thinking dirty thoughts, she carefully painted green around her breasts.
>She checked herself in the mirror one last time.
>Dress looked great, her breasts and crotch were exposed as would be expected, and... she was ready if she ran across Teiras.
>If not, well, the green on her chest would mean she could expect some soft warm hands on her breasts.
>At least, she was pretty sure that's how it worked.
>She left the house and started walking down the street.
>Humans and Kobolds were everywhere as was the usual.
>"Hello there!"
>She froze solid and whipped her head to the source of the sound.
>An adult Human male, looking at her.
>He was smiling and appeared to be friendly.
>Middle aged, brown hair...he was probably expecting a response.
>"H-Hello sir!"
>He crouched on a knee the way Humans usually did when they wanted to talk to a Kobold face to face.
>Kliz honestly preferred them to stand tall when talking to her, but it was a Human thing.
>"That's a very pretty dress you're wearing." He complimented her, reaching towards her.
>"Ah, it's...one of my favorites."
>She stumbled over her response as his hands reached her sides under her arms, and she started feeling the warmth of his hands seeping into her.
>"Well it looks wonderful on you. The ribbons are a nice touch, they really look good on your horns."
>His hands slid slightly towards her front, and he started rubbing under her breasts.
>"THANK...you siR."
>She was having some trouble controlling the sound of her voice, the Human's soft warm hands were doing everything she had hoped for when she painted green around her chest.
>"So what are you doing?"
>He had extended his thumbs out, and were using them to gently flick at her nipples, while his palms were still pressed against under her breasts, pushing the warmth in.
>"Just..MMMmm, going for a walk."
>She could feel herself leaning forwards, trying to get even closer to that heat.
>Suddenly he stopped playing with her breasts, which snapped her out of the daze she was in.
>Had she done something wrong?
>The Human was still smiling at her, and his hands were moving...
>He laid one hand on each side of her face, making the sweet warmth all around her neck and face.
>Before she could tell him how much she liked the feel of that, he kissed her on her forehead between her horns, told her she was very cute, and then let her go and bid her a good day.
>She was disappointed it didn't last longer, but outside of the duration of the event, it was exactly what she had been hoping for when she put the paint on.
>He even kissed her!
>Her plan was working better than she thought it would.
>She would just be able to walk around and enjoy affection from some nice Humans and maybe Teiras too.
>A half hour later and the sun was starting to set.
>Kliz had been having a wonderful time, with a grand total of four male Humans, and even one female Human who had done something with her mouth and Kliz's nipple that left Kliz gasping.
>Her plan was flawless, and she was invincible.
>Humans greeted her, complimented her, gave her warmth and affection, and then bid her good day.
>She was starting to feel a bit cocky, and had actually managed to act seductively with the last male Human.
>She might have done it too if he hadn't declined due to a lack of time.
>She figured she had to get home soon, and change out before her mother got home and caught her wearing adult clothes before her ritual.
>She was just down the street from her home when she saw a local Human town guard who she had seen many times in the past.
>She had fantasized a few times about that particular guard.
>Feeling on top of the world, she decided if she wasn't gonna get a chance with Teiras today, the guard would make a good consolation prize.
>Putting on her best seduction game, she made her approach.
>She kept her pace slow, but her stride long to ensure the silver rings on her feet were reaching sunlight.
>She fixed her gaze on the guard's eyes.
>Once he looked her direction, she wasn't going to break the gaze.
>She made sure to place her feet slightly closer together as she walked to create a swaying motion that always worked to attract male attention.
>She kept her arms behind her back, wanting to make very clear to the guard what colors she was marked with.
>After closing about half the distance, she had the guard's attention.
>She continued to look directly at him while smiling, until she was standing directly in front of him.
>"Why hel~lo there sir!" she said with an in-often practiced curtsy she hoped looked elegant.
>"Hello there yourself. Can I help you with something?"
>The guard was smiling at her, like every other Human had today.
>She was really liking this dress.
>She made a point of slowly lowering her gaze to his crotch, then raising it back to his eyes.
>"I'm really hoping you can." she said with a smile.
>"I think I can. Would you like to come with me to somewhere more private?"
>He was still smiling, and had his hand extended out to her.
>She gladly took it.
>Walking down a street holding hands with a Human was one of the many fantasies she often had running around in her head.
>And it was everything she hoped it was.
>Everyone who looked her way and saw her holding the guard's hand was smiling at her, and a few Kobold women gave her gestures of congratulations.
>She then remembered the rings on her middle fingers, and understood exactly what this scene looked like to passerby.
>She looked up at the still smiling guard who was holding her hand.
>He was a bit of an older human, and he was starting to get bits of grey hair.
>An older human male, holding hands with a kobold female wearing rings on both hands?
>She let herself dive into that fantasy.
>By the time they had arrived at their destination, she had developed a complex narrative in her mind that she was walking home with her human husband, who always had her wear her rings outside the home so everyone could see she was claimed by him.
>The guard had led her to a nice looking inn near the center of town.
>He opened the door and held it open for her.
>"Right after you." he said with a smile.
>She thought about how she must make sure to show this human a VERY nice time.
>He was being really nice.
>She held his hand as they walked up the stairs, and after unlocking the door, led her into one of the inn's rooms.
>Even just being a rented room at an inn, the room was still nearly twice the size of her mother's home.
>The walls were clean wood, and smelled of cedar.
>In the center of the room was a giant bed, Kliz figured it could probably hold at least four humans.
>The human let go of her hand and walked over to a dresser, where he started taking off and setting down the various items of his profession.
>Kliz wasn't sure if she should take off her clothes, or if the human wanted to do it.
>She then remembered the red she had put around herself, and figured there was no reason to undress at all.
>By the time she had made that decision, the human was in front of her.
>He had a chair she didn't see him grab, which he placed in front of her and sat down in.
>Then he beckoned her closer.
>Resisting the urge to just jump into him, she decided it was best to keep her seduction game up, and slowly stalked towards him.
>Before she could get to the close distance she wanted, his hands came up and this time they settled on either side of her face.
>One soft warm hand on each cheek.
>Then they started gently rubbing her cheeks.
>She reached out and grabbed his wrists, pulling and trying to get even more of those hands on her face.
>"Do you like this?" he asked her, still with the same gentile smile.
>"I...love this ssssir."
>She was already starting to feel a bit sleepy from the warmth.
>It was just right there, so close to her.
>"I hope you don't mind, but I don't like doing stuff with strangers, could you tell me a bit about yourself? he asked, still with that same smile.
>She wanted him to give her that smile and give her compliments every day.
>"Whatever you want sir." she more or less mumbled out.
>The cloying heat made her feel drained in the most wonderful way.
>"So whats your name?"
>"Kliz sir."
>"Nice to meet you Kliz, my name is Senna. Most people just call me Guardsman Senna."
>"Nice to meet you Guardsman Senna."
>She really hoped he wasn't expecting all that good of a conversation out of her.
>At least not with his hands on her face putting her into a stupor.
>She was trying to be seductive earlier, now she was just hoping she could fumble out the right words and not offend him.
>"Where do you live Senna?"
>The slow warm touching on her face didn't stop, and she didn't want it to.
>"Here in the capitol."
>"And where in the capitol?"
>"Over on the west side, south of the market."
>"Not far from where I found you then?"
>"That's right sir."
>She remembered the sir this time.
>She was having a very hard time remembering to call him sir.
>She wanted to buy land in those soft warm hands, build a home, and raise children in them.
>"Can you describe your owner?"
>She thought about that human boy she liked so much.
>"Black hair, strong, tall, warrrrrrmmmmm"
>"What sort of food do you like?"
>"Mmmm, pork, and...uh....mmmm...."
>She was having a hard time thinking.
>What sort of food did she like again?
>She wanted to say hands, but somehow that didn't feel right.
>"How old are you Kliz?"
>"16 sir."
>"And when did you turn 16?"
>"Today sir."
>She was glad for easy questions, thinking as getting harder and harder.
>"And when was your ritual?"
>"It's tonight."
>Those hands just wouldn't stop.
>She prayed they would never stop.
>"What's your favorite color?"
>She had to think about that.
>Which color had done her the most good?
>"Light blue."
>"Is your mother named Seris?"
>"Yeah."
>That was a little strange.
>How did he know her mother's name?
>The hands kept rubbing and rubbing, and Kliz let herself get lost in the feeling.
>"And how old are you?"
>"16 sir."
>Didn't she say that before?
>"And when is your ritual?"
>"Tonight sir."
>She was pretty sure she had covered that before as well, but who cares?
>He asked, she answered, everyone's happy.
>He was obviously happy with her answers, since he kept right on rubbing.
>"And how old are you?"
>She had definitely told him this before.
>Was this some kind of game?
>She shook her head to clear out the fuzzyness and took a good look at the human.
>He was still smiling.
>Was he teasing her?
>"I'm 16 sir."
>He was still smiling and rubbing.
>"And when is your ritual?"
>This was starting to annoy her.
>What the hell was he doing?
>Why repeat the same questions over and over again?
>"I'm pretty sure I've told you sir. To....."
>She felt her stomach go cold and drop, and her tail droop to the floor.
>He was still smiling, but now he stopped rubbing her cheeks.
>His hands were still there, but no longer moving.
>"I think you have made a terrible mistake."
>The warmth coming from the Human's hands did nothing to counter the cold she felt growing within.
>"I think I have made a terrible mistake."
>He was still smiling, so maybe things weren't going to be bad.
>"And what terrible mistake did you make?"
>This was it.
>Her future was going to depend on her answers.
>There was still a chance.
>Her mother always told her, be completely honest with authority figures like guards.
>There must be a reason why.
>"I was wearing adult clothing and markings before my adulthood ritual."
>Smile hadn't changed, she was doing good so far.
>Her mother was right again.
>She was always right about the hard things in life.
>"And?"
>She felt herself twitch at that question.
>Had she broken more than one law?
>Just how deep of trouble was she in?
>"I...didn't say sir enough?"
>She felt him rub her cheeks twice.
>"No one cares about that."
>What had she...oh.
>"I tried to seduce an adult human male before I was legally an adult?"
>He was still smiling, but her panic was rising, she HAD broken more than one law.
>"That's right. Do you know how I knew you were underage before I even talked to you?"
>He knew?
>The entire time she thought she was attracting him, the walk here, he knew the whole time?
>She shook her head in a negative.
>"Maybe you should read the inscription on the rings you are wearing."
>She never saw any inscription.
>Bringing her hands up to her face, she looked for an inscription, and found both rings had tiny words engraved on the side closest to her.
>The only person to be likely to see those words would be the wearer.
>Bringing them closer to read, she was able to make out what they said.
>"My...little...iced..."
>She didn't need to finish.
>She could guess the last word.
>"You know what a ring on the middle finger means in the kingdom, right?"
>"Um..."
>It felt a little awkward to actually talk about the much fantasized-about marriage with a human, with a human.
>"...a bond?"
>"More or less. Do you know what a ring on both hands on the middle finger means?"
>More was better right?
>"Really big bond?"
>"It's an open declaration of slow and painful death to anyone who harms the person wearing the rings.
>As in the person giving the rings will hunt down and kill the offender."
>Her mother's owner felt that way about her mother?
>There were suddenly a lot of questions Kliz had about that relationship.
>Just how close were they?
>"So there's a double ringed kobold walking around with green paint on.
>Had you known what the rings meant, you would have probably known no human owner is going to double ring a kobold then allow just anyone to touch."
>He finally took his hands off her face, but she was a bit too numb to notice.
>He walked over to the dresser where he laid his equipment and started putting it back on.
>"I have to give you credit.
>If you had worn all red paint out, you might have gotten away with it.
>Maybe even a yellow on your chest. But green was a dead giveaway."
>She just stared at the wooden floor.
>How could she have been so stupid?
>STUPID STUPID STUPID STUPID!
>The guard was in front of her again, fully equipped.
>He pulled a small thin chain with a clip on the end out of a pouch.
>She recognized it. She had seen it only once before.
>A rather sad looking kobold being lead by another guard.
>When she asked her mother, she said that kobold was being lead to punishment at the stockade.
>Stockade.
>The fear was rising like a high screaming note.
>She started hearing her mother's words repeating like an alarm.
>You don't want it to happen to you, you don't want it to happen to you, you don't want it to happen to you...
>Suddenly, she felt the clip of the lead as it connected to the small metal ring on her collar.
>"Alright, let's go."
>There was an attempt to beg, but she had fallen into a state of full panic, and instead did the only thing she was capable of.
>She screamed.
>"AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!"
>The guard's head jerked back in shock. "What the-?"
>She started uncontrollably shaking all over, her legs gave out, and she tried to plead her case while crying, screaming, and shaking on the ground in a curled up position with her tail wrapped around herself. She didn't do a very good job of it.
>"AAAAABHUAAAAWAAAAAMAAAAA!"
>Guardsmen Senna was crouched over her and had his hands rubbing her throat.
>"Hey! Calm down! It's off! The collar is off, calm down!"
>She wanted to calm down for him but couldn't.
>She saw the collar with the lead still attached laying next to her, but that wasn't what had her terrified.
>Her punishment was still coming.
>The guard finally pulled her face into his stomach, rubbing her back and between her horns while she cried and screamed.
>After enough coaxing and the warmth helping to calm her down and stop crying, he finally asked.
>"Who choked you?"
>What was he talking about?
>"Huh?"
>"You had a freakout when I put the lead on your collar.
>I've had kobold thieves who didn't react like that.
>Who choked you? What's their name? There are laws against that."
>"No one has ever choked me sir."
>He held her out at arms length, taking her away from the wonderful warmth, but his hands still on her shoulders.
>"Then what was that about?"
>She started shaking a bit again.
>"I'm sorry sir, I can't!"
>"Can't what?"
>"I can't stand being tickled!" she finished with a sob and started crying again.
>"Woah, hey, calm down, you aren't going to be tickled!"
>"I'm not?"
>She wanted to believe him.
>"No. I was taking you home. To your mother."
>He gave her shoulders a brief rub and then let her go.
>Absolute relief.
>There wasn't going to be some harsh punishment.
>She wanted to cry with relief, but she didn't want to not be calm like he wanted her.
>"Thank you sir!"
>He put his hands back on her shoulders.
>"Now who tickled you? Was it a human?"
>Whoops, this was starting to get dangerous in a different way.
>"Please sir, I can't!"
>He suddenly didn't look so pleasant and friendly.
>"Were you threatened to not talk about it to a guard?"
>"NO!"
>She may have protested too strongly.
>He gave her a disbelieving look.
>"You don't have to be afraid, no human is immune to the kobold abuse laws. Just tell me the name."
>"Please sir, it was a long time ago and it never happened again. I just wanna forget about it."
>He kept giving her that look for a few seconds, then nodded.
>"Alright, if you aren't willing to name the guilty, I won't press you. Feel free to forget about it."
>"Thank you sir."
>He helped her off the ground, then bent over and picked up the collar he had taken off when she started her panic attack.
>He held the collar out to her.
>"Can I take you home like this, or will you need another way to travel?"
>Kliz wanted to ask him to hold her hand home, but this probably wasn't a good time.
>She put the collar on and held the small chain out to him.
>"I'll be fine sir."
>The stench of her own urine finally got through to her.
>She didn't even remember pissing herself.
>Looking down, her mother's dress now had a yellowish tint below the cutout all the way to the bottom.
>And she had left a small puddle on the floor.
>After dodging the terror, and finding out she was probably not likely to ever face that terror, all she could do was feel slightly bad that she had made a mess on the floor.
>And on Senna's pants apparently.
>"Sorry about peeing on the floor and you." she said with a sniffle.
>He sighed, gave her a smile she didn't feel he really meant, and said "It's alright. Now let's get you home."
>The walk home was nowhere near as enjoyable as the walk to the inn.
>She didn't feel like some kobold out for a walk with her human husband.
>Her dress was dirty and smelled of urine, her paint markings on her face were mostly washed off by her tears, and she was being lead on a leash by a guard.
>She felt like a small child being returned to her mother after doing something stupid.
>Her mother must have seen her coming from the window, and was out the door before they even got close enough to knock.
>"Kliz! What are you..."
>She looked at Kliz in her dress, then at the guard.
>Kliz was expecting to get screamed at, but instead her mother just threw her hands in the air.
>"Why Kliz? Why?"
>"Why did you have to pick that dress and that guard?
>Couldn't you have chosen someone else or a different dress? Why did you pick those two?"
>Before she could reply, the guard spoke.
>"Hello to you too Seris."
>"Hello Guardsman Senna. Let me guess, she's getting three days?"
>Three days?
>He told her he was taking her mother!
>"Nah, just a warning.
>She managed to punish herself far more than I ever had planned, so no need for it.
>If her ritual is tonight, I doubt she has enough time to commit this crime again anyways."
>She felt relief, of course he wouldn't lie to her.
>But her mother looked...angry?
>"A warning?"
>She was flicking an ear like she had gotten dirt into it.
>"Yes."
>Senna folded his arms in front of him.
>"A warning?!"
>What was her mother upset about?
>Did she want Kliz to spend time in jail?
>"Yes, a warning."
>His response to her mother's anger was calm.
>"You gave me three days for the exact same thing!"
>Kliz looked at her mother with surprise, she never knew her mother had spent time in jail.
>Senna let his arms drop to his sides.
>"That's incorrect and you know it.
>First off, you only wore green markings with your dress.
>Second, you lied when I confronted you about it and led me on a two hour search for an owner you didn't have.
>Third, you were twelve at the time.
>I arrested you for lying to me and wasting two hours of my time.
>I gave you three days for being twelve and pulling a stunt like that."
>Seris still looked angry, but somewhat guilty too.
>"I thought you were gonna give up."
>"I almost thought you put your daughter up to this before we got here, little miss friendly."
>"HEY!"
>He just shrugged, then knelt down and disconnected the small chain from Kliz's collar.
>"You have to admit, the coincidence is pretty strong.
>Though those silver rings are new. Congrats, and good day to you."
>Her mother watched the guard depart, saying "Yes, yes, good day."
>Before she could even start apologizing to her mother for all the trouble and what she did to her dress, her mother cut her off and started shoving her inside the house.
>"Later! I've already drawn a bath.
>When I got home and you weren't here, I figured you would be coming home dirty but I honestly thought it was going to be mud again.
>Now hurry up and get clean, you're already going to be late for your ritual and you don't want to anger the Church."
>The washtub was next to the heater stove, and her mother helped her out of the dress.
>While scrubbing herself with a wet rag in the warmed but still somewhat tepid water, she asked a question that she had been wondering.
>"Guardsman Senna seen you around in that dress a lot of times?"
>"No, just the once."
>"...little miss friendly?"
>Her mother gave her a dark look.
>"I was trying to come on to every human nearby. Senna thought it was a funny name.
>I didn't think it was so funny. Less talk, more washing."
>She kept scrubbing, but had to ask.
>"How did he remember that dress? Wasn't that a long time ago?"
>"Questions!"
>Her mother sighed.
>"He didn't have to let me keep the dress, but he did.
>He said I could keep it if I didn't wear it again until after my ritual.
>And I didn't. After my ritual, I wore the dress and waited until the next time I saw him.
>He said it was a very pretty dress.
>I thanked him.
>Then, right after he turned around and started walking away, I threw a dirt clod at him."
>"MOM!"
>Her mother crossed her arms like the guard had earlier.
>"It was three days in jail. In a chastity belt!
>I still feel I was in the right. Now scrub!"
>Kliz scrubbed.
>A while later, and Kliz and her mother were a street away from the local Church building, where Seris had stopped her daughter for a certain talk.
>The sun had set, and the streetlamps were mostly lit up by the town guards.
>"Kliz, remember when I said to always be honest with the guards, because you don't want the guards angry with you?"
>"Yes?"
>"Well, that's nowhere near as important as this.
>Be very careful about what you say and do when you are inside the church, alright?"
>Kliz just nodded, not really sure what her mother meant.
>"You know how we feel about humans right?"
>She had an idea what her mother was talking about.
>"Well, double that. Then double that again.
>Keep doubling it over and over for days on end.
>Until the feeling is so strong you are choking on it.
>THAT, is a member of the cloth.
>They are beyond obsessed with humans.
>They worship humans and everything about humans."
>Kliz remembered her mother keeping her away from the members of the church in the past, saying she didn't want to be around people like that.
>She called them cultists.
>"Can't I just do my ritual somewhere else?"
>"Impossible. The church runs all rituals, and no auction house will take a kobold who hasn't gone through the church first.
>They have more power than you can imagine."
>Power, in the human kingdom?
>Her mother must have seen the skepticism on her face.
>"Kliz, human laws don't apply inside the church, if the church decides they don't want them to apply.
>It's entirely kobold run and controlled, and not even the crown seems willing to tell them otherwise. .
>I've seen them violate laws in front of guards without punishment or fear."
>The laws didn't apply to them?
>How was that even possible?
>"Remember those two things.
>They worship humans, and the law does not apply to them.
>Do not say or do anything that might even hint that you don't like humans, or don't want to serve a human.
>They are completely insane. and you will not pass your adulthood ritual unless they approve of it.
>You don't need to be obsessed like them, they only demand that sort of dedication from those seeking to join the church.
>You just need to stay polite and friendly.
>If you don't know what response they want from you, just smile and try to agree with whatever they say. If in doubt, just say you're afraid.
>Understood?"
>Kliz nodded.
>The Church of Human was the name etched into the stone around the front doors.
>It was a very large building, mostly stone with some wood around the windows and edges.
>A single kobold was standing in front of the doors.
>She was wearing green sleeves on her arms, and green sleeves on her legs, both had a gold thread ridge on either end.
>A small silver ring was suspended by two small silver chains between the tips of her horns, where they connected to silver caps that fit over the points.
>She had all green markings, 9PM written in green paint on her stomach, and some cloth belt worn just above the usual cutout area.
>On either side she had a pouch that rested over her outer thighs, and was carrying a small pale clay pot that had "Donations OPTIONAL" written on it in in black paint.
>Her marking paint was different than what Kliz had ever seen.
>Instead of a green circle around her body parts, she had a green vertical line on both her upper and lower lip, right in the center, creating a straight line from top to bottom when her mouth was closed.
>Both her nipples had been painted green, as well as her clitoral hood.
>She greeted passerby, welcoming everyone to the church and occasionally thanking someone for their donation.
>There were more people out and about in the Human kingdom during the late hours than in most kingdoms.
>The majority of kingdoms were active during the day and mostly asleep at night besides guards and bandits.
>Human kingdom businesses usually ran until well after dark, some never shut their doors.
>This was largely due to another human idea.
>Put lanterns on poles all around the city, and have the guards light them as the sun set.
>It wasn't daylight bright, but it was more than enough to see where you were going.
>The poles were strategically placed to light up not only the main roads, but also alleyways between buildings.
>No dark places to ambush people from meant bandits didn't really have anywhere to hide.
>Between the street lights, the strong guard presence, and stiff penalties for crimes, there was far less crime in the Human kingdom than in other lands.
>Kliz and her mother both returned the greetings and headed inside, Kliz noticed her mother did not donate.
>Inside the main foyer was well lit, with candles on small shelves at regular intervals along the walls high enough to provide good light, but not too high as to be a hassle to replace when they burnt down and needed replacing.
>A large chandelier hung from the middle of the ceiling, with lanterns hanging from all eight points.
>It was a roughly rectangular room, with the two main doors at the entrance, a smaller door obviously designed for kobold height on her left, a normal human-sized door on her right, and two desks sat spaced about six feet apart at the back wall, where another human-sized door sat between.
>There were a number of kobolds all over the room, one sitting behind each desk, some were having quiet conversations with one another, a few were looking at a bulletin board that had small boxes containing what looked to be silver bracelets attached to the wall nearby.
>Kliz saw one female kobold write something on one of the pieces of paper attached to the bulletin board, take a bracelet, and put it on her wrist.
>Like every other kobold in here besides Kliz and her mother, she was wearing the same green sleeves just like the kobold outside.
>She was pretty sure it was some kind of uniform.
>Based on what her mother told her, she figured the all-green markings every kobold wore was also uniform.
>Who were their owners?
>There were three human town guards in the room, they seemed to be stationed there.
>They were the only humans Kliz saw.
>The desk on the left was shorter than the human-sized one on the right.
>It was only three feet, making it just right for a Kobold.
>Her mother led her to that desk, where the attendant greeted them.
>"I'm guessing your daughter is here for her adulthood ritual?"
>"Yes, she just turned 16 today."
>The attendant addressed Kliz directly.
>"Congratulations! What has your mother told you about your adulthood ritual?"
>"She said I would uh, commit my childhood clothing to the flame.
>She said there would be a big fire and I would throw all my old clothes into it."
>"Anything else?"
>There was more?
>Her mother hadn't said anything about that.
>"No?"
>The kobold behind the desk smiled again.
>"Very good. Your mother has kept her promise then.
>You will be required to make the same promise, and keep it.
>The details of the adulthood ritual, and your own experience with it, are a secret.
>A secret you are expected to keep no matter what.
>If at any time you should share any of the secret with anyone else, no matter if they are family, or your owner, you will be seized by the town guard.
>Penalties in this matter can include death."
>Kliz looked at her mother, who was looking at her with a concerned look as if to say "Don't say something stupid."
>Her mother discretely rubbed Kliz's left ankle with her tail, as to urge her on-wards.
>This was normal?!
>The attendant wasn't smiling, just looking at her neutrally, as if she wanted to make clear that the death part wasn't a joke.
>Kliz decided this was probably one of those go-with-the-flow situations her mother had warned her about.
>She swallowed and cleared her throat to make sure she was heard clearly.
>"I swear to never tell another person of anything about my adulthood ritual."
>"You are free to talk about the fire portion of the ritual only.
>If anyone asks, even a human, that is the ONLY part of the ritual.
>Understood?"
>Something felt off here.
">I should lie to a human?"
>The attendant looked a bit less friendly than before, and bit more icy.
>Her words were not as kind sounding this time.
>"I say again, your adulthood ritual is SECRET.
>You do not tell anyone any details beyond the fire.
>Period.
>Even to a guard.
>Do you understand?"
>Her mother slapped Kliz's leg with her tail, she was not doing the right thing.
>Kliz must have hesitated a bit too long, as the visibly annoyed attended suddenly yelled out "GUARD!"
>The guard standing nearest walked over.
>Her mother had already buried her face in her hands.
>The attendant walked out from behind the desk and faced the guard.
>"Sir, I am ordering THIS kobold-" she said pointing at Kliz "-to lie to humans in the future."
>The guard looked down at the attendant.
>"Lie?"
>She nodded.
>"Yes, lie. I am giving her instructions to lie about her adulthood ritual details to anyone and everyone, humans included.
>Town guards included. For the rest of her life."
>Kliz had to be a little impressed at the bravery.
>She had revealed a crime to a guard by accident and fell into panic, this one was shoving it in the guard's face.
>The guard just seemed bored by this declaration of criminal intent.
>"Alright. Do you need me for anything?"
>"No sir, that is all."
>The guard walked back to his post, and the attendant walked back to behind the desk, then addressed Kliz again.
>"I ask one more time.
>Do.
>You.
>Understand?"
>The words came out slowly, and with a hint of menace.
>Kliz figured she had better get the correct response soon.
>This kobold knew full well she could make and enforce demands for secrecy, even illegal demands, the normal laws obviously did not apply to her at all.
>"I understand completely.
>I will tell no one about my adulthood ritual details, and if anyone asks, I will only speak of the fire part of the ritual."
>"Even to a town guard." the attendant reminded her.
>"Even to a town guard."
>"Under threat of torture."
>"Under threat of torture."
>The attendants unwavering gaze was starting to creep Kliz out. Like some predator about ready to strike.
>"Under penalty of death."
>"Under penalty of death."
>The attendant held her eyes for a few more moments, then went immediately back to the smiling and friendly kobold she had been at first.
>"Very good. Now we just have some paperwork to fill out."
>It was all basic stuff.
>Name, age, height, weight, known health problems, a bit like when you visited a public doctor sponsored by the crown.
>After which, her mother handed her the bundle containing all her dresses, shirts, and shorts that she had been wearing since she stopped growing taller.
>Her mother hugged her and hissed quietly "Please behave."
>Then Kliz was left with the attendant.
>"Would you prefer a male or female guide for your ritual?"
>"Ah, will I be doing anything sexual with the guide?"
>"Only if you want to, and the guide consents to it."
>She could use some relief after the day she had so far, but she wasn't quite ready to become a mother yet.
>"Female."
>"Very well."
>The kobold wrote something on a piece of paper, then held it up along with a silver bracelet and announced:
>"Female member requested for adulthood ritual!"
>A member of the cloth who had been in conversation held up her hand and shouted back "I'll do it!"
>Like every other member of the church, she was wearing those same green sleeves and had the same silver ring suspended between her horns.
>If it wasn't for the different coloration's of kobold's scales, Kliz doubted it would be possible to tell them all apart.
>Her own scales were a splotchy brown and green, but her front from her crotch to her neck had more of a yellowish color.
>Her guide was a flat dark gray all over, making the gold seams on her sleeves stand out.
>The guide approached the attendant, took the offered bracelet and put it on her wrist, then spoke to Kliz.
>"Hi there, I'm Bink, I'll be your guide for your adulthood ritual. Are you ready?"
>"I guess so."
>The guide smiled.
>"Nervous?"
>She kept her mother's advice in her mind.
>"Nervous, a little bit afraid, but I think I'll be alright."
>This answer seemed to work for the guide, who took her by the hand and led her to the small kobold-sized door on the left wall.
>The guide opened the door, and gestured Kliz to enter.
>Bink followed her, and shut the door behind them.
>The inside was small and more reserved than the main hall.
>There were three doors on the wall opposite, and another door on the wall to her right.
>No one was in the room besides them.
>Bink led her to the center of the room, then faced her.
>"We will now begin your adulthood ritual.
>I will explain all details needed, and answer any questions you may have.
>It is my duty to guide you through this ritual, and ensure you understand things.
>First off, you remember how you are only allowed to speak of the fire part of the ritual?"
>Kliz nodded.
>"That part of the ritual begins the moment you enter the courtyard with the flame, and ends the moment you leave that courtyard.
>Everything prior and after are secret, understood?"
>"Yes, I swore to keep the secret."
>"Very well. The adulthood ritual has three main parts.
>First is the fire ritual.
>This is to help you with shedding your childhood, and also serves to signify that you are ready to serve.
>The second part is your trip through the Hall of Secrets.
>While in the Hall, you will see and hear both kobold and human secrets.
>You are expected to be quiet, not interfere no matter what you see or hear, and never speak of anything you see or hear within the Hall to anyone.
>You will be allowed to discuss and ask questions with me while we are in the Hall, but you can never speak of it again with me afterwards.
>The only person you will speak about any of it, is our head priestess during the final part.
>This part of the ritual is to see if you are mature enough to handle being an adult.
>The final part of your ritual is your final examination by the head priestess.
>She will judge you and decide if you are ready to be an adult, or if you need more time to mature.
>She will decide if your adulthood ritual is complete or not.
>You are expected to be completely truthful and honest when speaking with her, and she will answer any questions you might still have.
>If you fail her test, then you cannot try another adulthood ritual for a year.
>If you pass, then you spend the night with the church in our sleeping quarters, and tomorrow you will be handed over to the auction house.
>Do you have any questions?"
>"I have a few about the Hall of Secrets."
>The guide just smiled.
>"Those questions are much easier answered inside the Hall."
>"Is the head priestess nice?"
>"Very, but it is her job to judge you and decide if you are ready for serving.
>She's not going to expect the sort of dedication she expects out of members like me, but she does want to make sure that you aren't going to bite your new owner's throat or something like that."
>"I would never do that!"
>Bink just smiled.
>"I'm not here to judge, I'm here to guide. That's the head priestess's job.
>The door to the right leads to the courtyard where the flame is. Ready to begin?"
>Kliz just nodded, she didn't want to sound afraid right now.
>The guide led her through the door, into a small open-roof courtyard covered in grass.
>In the center was a fire-pit, where a large fire was burning strong.
>There were a few other members of the church standing in a circle around the flame.
>Some female, some male.
>Kliz noticed the male kobolds of the church had the same green marking on their lips as the female members, wore the same uniform, but they had a small green dot painted on the tip of their penis.
>It was a look she found intriguing, and she kept finding her eyes drawn to the little green dots.
>She was lead to stand near the fire, then the guide just stood there.
>Kliz wasn't sure what the proper procedure here was.
>"How should I do this?"
>"Any way you wish. It's your adulthood ritual, no one else's.
>You can consign your childhood clothing to the flames one at a time, throw them all in at once, however you wish to do it."
>Quicker was probably better.
>Kliz flung the bundle of her clothes into the fire, then took off the yellow dress she had worn in and threw it in after.
>The members of the church and her guide started clapping and congratulating her.
>She didn't feel like she had accomplished anything of note, but was glad this entire bizarre process was already a third of the way done.
>Her guide led her back to the first room, and then led her in front of the middle door she saw previously.
>She turned to look at Kliz.
>"We are now going to enter the Hall of Secrets.
>While inside the Hall, you are required to keep your voice down and not make any loud noises.
>You are required to not attempt to get involved with anything you see or hear, no matter if it makes you angry, afraid, or anything else.
>You are required to not speak to another person beyond the head priestess and me about anything you see or hear inside the >Hall.
>You may quietly ask questions while inside the Hall, and I will do my best to answer them, but we will never speak of anything seen or heard inside the Hall with each other ever again once we have left the Hall.
>You may speak about these things with the head priestess, but only during her test of you, and never again afterwards.
>You will see and hear secrets both human and kobold, secrets that can get you killed if you are foolish enough to share with another person.
>Do you understand?"
>This was just getting more disturbing by the second.
>What in the hell was going on inside that room?
>But she didn't want to slow things down while she was on a roll.
>"I understand."
>Her guide leaned in close and whispered to her.
>"We speak only in whispers from this point forwards."
>She nodded and whispered back.
>"I understand."
>The guide smiled and opened the center door, then held it open for Kliz.
>She told herself to relax and followed the guide inside.
>They were in a narrow passageway no more than two feet across, the entire hall seemed to have a slight curve to it leading to the right, and small but wide windows ran the entire length of the hallway on both sides.
>The guide turned around, blocking the way forward and spoke to Kliz in a hushed whisper.
>"Remember, stay quiet and do not interfere."
>Kliz was starting to pick up on the idea that the church members repeated things they considered very important.
>Given how her guide stressed these two rules, she decided to focus hard on staying quiet and not trying to interfere.
>She wasn't sure how she could interfere with something she didn't even know, but she kept it in mind all the same.
>She nodded to Bink to show her understanding and commitment to being quiet.
>Bink smiled, turned around, and started walking deeper down the hallway while motioning for Kliz to follow.
>Kliz followed while being careful to not drag a toe claw.
>The floor was smooth stone like most of the building, and a claw scrape would be quite noisy.
>What seemed only like a dozen steps later, Bink stopped and turned back to face Kliz.
>She then looked to Kliz's left at the glass window there.
>Looking back to Kliz, she pointed at the window.
>Kliz's mouth suddenly felt dry, she hoped this secret wasn't too frightening.
>She turned to face the window, and Bink moved closer to stand at her right side while watching with her.
>The first hushed words out of Bink's mouth, before Kliz could even ask what was happening, was "We gladly give whatever is requested."
>An adult male human with tan hair was sitting on the edge of a bed facing Kliz.
>She instinctively started to take a step back but was stopped by Bink, who quickly but quietly whispered
>"He can't see you, no one in any of these rooms can see you.
>We can see inside, they can not see outside, relax."
>Which meant Kliz was going to see something not very many Kobolds she was aware of got to see.
>Humans doing sexual stuff with kobolds.
>Any kobold could see another kobold have sex without any issues, no one minded.
>But humans were very private and secretive about sex, and most didn't like someone to watch.
>The human had his legs spread wide, and wasn't wearing any clothing.
>Four female members of the church were in the room with him.
>Two were kneeling between his spread legs, and they each appeared to have claimed one of his testicles to lick.
>They had their tails wrapped around each other, twisted together like strands of a rope, the tips pointed straight upwards.
>The other two were on the bed on either side of the human, both perched facing each other.
>They were on hands and knees, with both of their hands resting on the human's thighs.
>The two of them had stuck their tongues out around the human's dick, and then crossed the tips of their tongues together, tying a loose knot.
>With their tongues held together like that, they were moving their knotted tongues up and down together in unison.
>Her guide whispered into her ear:
>"This human originally wanted just four kobolds serving him, but one day two of our members started licking his dick in perfect sync.
>He liked it so much, he requested four kobolds serving him in unison.
>It took them a bit of practice to get it right, but he seems very satisfied with the final result."
>Bink was right, he did really seem to be enjoying it.
>He had his arms out, with his hands resting on the asses of the kobolds who were perched over his thighs.
>Kliz could see him rubbing and gently squeezing, and how the two kobolds were trying to keep their tails pointed straight up, but their tails kept twitching and jerking downwards in a reflexive effort to latch onto and hold the hand on their ass.
>Bink reached over to a small wooden peg sticking out above the window, and whispered to Kliz.
>"Ask no questions and make no noises until I say, understood? Not even whispers now."
>Kliz whispered back. "Alright."
>Bink tugged the peg to the right, and a small panel slid open revealing some holes covered with black cloth.
>Now Kliz could hear what was happening in the room.
>The human was telling the church members how they were doing a far better job than he had hoped for.
>He called them amazing.
>Kliz almost felt embarrassed at the level of praise they were getting, she didn't think she would be able to handle getting that kind of praise directly.
>She had never heard any human call any kobold amazing.
>The human grunted something her mother told her not to say in public, and she saw his cum shoot almost directly upward, then fall back down all over his dick and the patch of hair humans had down there, male or female.
>The kobolds in the room with him just continued as if nothing happened, and after about half a minute, the human finally laid back on the bed and went limp.
>The members of the church immediately stopped what they were doing, and the two on the bed shifted a bit farther away from the edge to make room for the two kneeling on the floor.
>They put all four of their heads together around the humans crotch, and Kliz couldn't see what they were doing to the human, she only heard him groan and say "Oh fuck."
>A tap on her shoulder made her look at Bink, who had four fingers on her other hand arranged in a strange way.
>When she took two fingers of her other hand and inserted them between the four and slid them back and forth, Kliz understood what the four fingers meant.
>She looked back to the glass.
>The four members of the church were now sitting on the bed facing the human and away from Kliz.
>Two were on his left, two on his right, all four were sitting in a kneeling position with their feet off the edge of bed behind them, and their tails hanging.
>They put their arms behind their backs, then spoke to the human in perfect sync.
>"All clean sir!"
>Kliz wanted to see and hear more, but Bink pulled the peg and closed the holes letting sound through, and whispered to her:
>"Apologies, but you can't spend too long in the hall, the head priestess does need to see you sooner or later.
>It is safe to whisper again.
>Do you have any questions I might be able to help you with?"
>Kliz had a few, but she was fairly certain she could figure out how to do some of those tongue movements herself.
>She just shook her head.
>Bink then pointed behind Kliz, to the glass on the other side of the hallway.
>Sure enough, there was another wooden peg above the glass, and through the glass another room was visible.
>This time there was no human.
>Instead there was just a female kobold.
>She wasn't dressed like a member of the church, she was dressed a bit like a soldier.
>Leather armor with a skirt that had no cutout areas, and she was even carrying a spear with a sharp looking metal tip.
>Kliz didn't think any military or guard unit would accept a kobold, they were too weak and small to be of much use.
>Bink whispered in her ear.
>"Remember, do not interfere."
>Kliz suddenly had a bad feeling.
>Bink had told her this repeatedly, why again just now?
>What was about to happen?
>Bink put a single finger in front of the green line painted on her lips and made a "shhh" noise.
>Seeing Kliz remain still and silent, Bink tugged at the wooden peg, opening the vent.
>Kliz saw the door on the far other side of the room away from the glass open, and a human with sandy hair wearing clothing similar to a woods guide walked in and said "Ah, there you are."
>The armored and armed kobold jumped away from him and towards the wall Kliz and Bink were watching from.
>She let out a frightened sounding yelp as she did it, then yelled at the human "Stay away!"
>Kliz had the feeling she was about to see something very bad.
>The human just walked towards the solider or guard or whatever she was, saying "You trespass in human lands, you pay the price."
>Kliz would have yelled when the kobold swung the spear at the human, if Bink hadn't immediately clamped her hands around Kliz's mouth and gave her a look that made her blood run like ice water.
>The human just grabbed the spear, then yanked it towards himself.
>The kobold was suddenly unarmed and falling towards the human.
>The moment she hit the ground, he was on top of her.
>She started yelling "No! Get off of me!" while punching his arms and trying to kick her legs out from under him.
>He just sat over her and grabbed her arms and pinned them to the ground.
>"This isn't optional." he told her. "But the choice is yours.
>You can cooperate and do what I tell you, or I'll just do what I wish anyways, and then tie you to a pole and let the rest of my battalion use you."
>The kobold quit struggling, then said in a sad tone of voice "I'll cooperate."
>He used his arms to pull her wrists together, and he used his grip to pull her upright as he stood.
>He then had her turn around, and walked her over to the bed against the wall near the door.
>He then told her to bend over and reach for the other side of the bed.
>She did as she was told, and he pulled her leather skirt down to the ground while holding her to the bed with his palm on her lower back above her tail.
>She cried out "No, please, not that!" and her tail shot downward to cover herself.
>He said "Are you being uncooperative?"
>She was silent for a few seconds, then Kliz saw her tail slowly raise back up, then shakily lift upwards as high as it could go.
>He smiled and said "That's much better."
>He undid his pants and let them fall to the floor, and then used his hands to aim his dick and shoved himself into the kobold bent over the bed.
>She let out a painful sounding noise, and pleaded with the human.
>"Please! It's too big, it hurts!"
>Kliz couldn't believe she was seeing something like this.
>Why would a human need to force a kobold in a building full of kobolds who would willingly give it to him?
>The human said "You might as well get used to it, I'll be expecting you to take the entire thing on a daily basis."
>The kobold let out a pitiful cry.
>"No!"
>Kliz had never seen someone get violated like this before.
>It was terrible, and Kliz felt terrible about the odd sense of arousal she felt watching it.
>In her mind, she wanted to tell the kobold that things would get better, not all humans were like this.
>The human kept pounding the distressed kobold, who was alternating between crying out in pain and trying to beg the human to stop.
>After a little while, he pulled out and spoke to her.
>"Roll onto your back, then try to put your ankles behind your head."
>She rolled over onto her back, and looked fearful.
>She started trying to put her feet above her head, and the human grabbed her legs and held them in position while he pushed himself back into her.
>She cried out "Ow!"
>Then it was right back to crying out in pain and begging the human to stop.
>Then she yelled out "Please, I don't wanna get pregnant!"
>Kliz wasn't sure she heard her right.
>Humans couldn't get kobolds pregnant, period.
>Everyone knew that.
>The human responded "That's too bad, you no longer get to choose." while still thrusting away.
>Surely, a human couldn't think it was possible, right?
>The kobold was still pleading.
>"Please don't! I don't want to be impregnated with human babies!"
>Was she delusional?
>The human kept on humping her, and said
>"I'll breed you and you'll spend every day pregnant on your knees thanking me for breeding you."
>Were they both delusional?
>This pairing had started disturbing and then ran straight into insanity.
>Kliz had her own fantasies about getting pregnant from a human but...
>Was that what this was?
>The human was going faster and faster, and the kobold was just making squeaks and slightly pained yelps as she got pounded.
>Finally he thrust himself in deep, and held himself inside.
>The kobold whined "No, I can feel it going inside of me! Pull out, please!"
>The human took a little while to catch his breath, then said
>"No. When I breed you, you say 'thank you master for breeding me', understood?"
>The kobold lowered her head to the point it was almost touching her chest and said in a low voice:
>"Thank you master for breeding me."
>He spoke again.
>"Remember those words, I'll expect you to be saying them while you are pregnant."
>The human leaned over while still buried inside her, and started kissing her.
>Kliz was wondering if they were suddenly going to shift to a different delusion.
>The kobold was enthusiastically returning the affection.
>When he finally stopped the kiss, the kobold said "Did you enjoy that sir?", without a hint of the fear or sadness in her voice prior.
>He smiled at her and said "Very much so. Thank you."
>Stroking his back with her tail, she said "I'm glad you enjoyed sir."
>Bink reached over and closed the vent, and told Kliz it was safe to whisper again.
>"What was going on in there?"
>"That human has a desire to impregnate a kobold against her will. He enjoys it more when they are the fighting sort."
>"But humans can't impregnate a kobold, right?
>"Of course not. But if a human has a desire, the church will try to fulfill that desire."
>All that, was just roleplay?
>"She sounded like she was in pain."
>"Of course, she was selected for being a good actress. He wanted her to not be willing, so she pretended to not be willing."
>"I...see."
>Assuming Kliz had no more questions, Bink started walking deeper into the hallway, gesturing for Kliz to follow.
>A very short and quiet walk later, and Bink stopped and turned around to face Kliz.
>She could see the small wooden pegs above the windows where Bink had stopped walking.
>The guide looked to Kliz's right, then pointed to the window and whispered.
>"We serve all humans that request service, male or female."
>Kliz looked through the window and saw a female human with long black hair laying on a bed in the middle of the room.
>Two female church members were serving her.
>One was on her hands and knees on the bed, with her head between the woman's legs.
>Kliz could see the kobold using her tongue, but she couldn't see any exact movements.
>The other was laying near the human's head, and was licking and sucking at her breasts.
>Then she leaned forward and kissed the woman for a little bit, then went back to her breasts.
>"This human has a male kobold at home, but sometimes desires female kobolds. Sometimes just one, sometimes two."
>Bink reached out to tug on the wooden peg, but Kliz interrupted her.
>"Wait. Can I just watch? I can't talk when that thing is open, right?"
>Bink's hand dropped away from the peg.
>"Apologies, most prefer to be able to hear as well as see, I should have asked you."
>Kliz was relieved.
>Watching humans having sex was making her feel guilty enough, having to hear the moans and gasps were making her feel very awkward and embarrassed.
>She kept expecting to get caught and in trouble.
>The entire Hall of Secrets was making her feel very nervous.
>Humans would be very angry if they found out the church was doing something like this.
>If one of the humans she saw here found out she was watching them doing these things, she knew there would be no getting off easy with a warning.
>Kliz must have been too focused on her thoughts, as now both kobolds were laying in the bed on either side of the woman, with her arms around them.
>They were both cupping a breast with the hand farthest away from the human, and had the arm closest resting under the human's neck, but otherwise not doing much else.
>All three of them seemed to be having a quiet conversation, and the woman occasionally broke the hug to rub the kobolds between the horns on their heads, then went back to hugging them.
>Bink whispered to Kliz "I must remind you again, do not interfere."
>"But I wasn't going to!"
>Kliz protested as silently as possible, facing Bink.
>"Not this one, the next one."
>Her guide told her, pointing to the windowed wall to Kliz's left.
>Kliz looked through the window, and immediately felt a sense of worry.
>A somewhat scrawny but still adult human male was dressed like a soldier, carrying a spear, and looking a bit nervous.
>He was obviously not any real guard, and he didn't look like he could throw the spear any sizable distance with accuracy.
>The door opened and six female members of the church, dressed in the same leather armor and leather skirt outfit as the "raped" kobold from earlier, poured into the room and shut the door behind them.
>They were saying something, and the human was backing away from them.
>Suddenly they charged at him, three in the front jabbing their spears at the human, two rushing to one side and the remaining one acting as a blocker on the other side.
>The human was quickly cornered, and words were exchanged.
>Kliz was curious to know what was being said, but she didn't want to be any more of a witness to this assault than she already was.
>The human held out his spear and dropped it on the ground.
>The six lead him with slaps from their tails on his butt to the center of the room, then surrounded him again.
>One kobold said something to him, and waved her spear at him in a threatening way.
>He held up his hands, then started taking off his clothing.
>After each item, he would hand it out to the kobolds, who would yank it out of his hands and throw it aside.
>One of the kobold troopers yelled something, and he started stripping faster.
>Finally he was left naked, with a visible erection.
>They more or less pushed him onto the ground, so he was laying flat on his back.
>His legs were spread, and his arms were laid out above his head with his palms facing up.
>One was standing over his head with the tip of her tail resting on his chest, looking down at him and saying something.
>One kobold each was sitting on top of his hands, preventing him from doing much of anything.
>Another was sitting on each leg, pinning him down.
>The last kobold was sitting on the human's stomach facing his legs, and had one hand wrapped around his cock, and the other hand was slowly dragging the tip of a claw very carefully around his sack.
>The one standing over him talking suddenly grinned at him, lifted up her leg, and then rest her foot right on the human's face.
>She said something again, and the human started licking her foot scales and toe claws.
>Bink surprised Kliz by speaking in a whisper next to her.
>"Huh, that wasn't requested, but he seems to like it."
>"What?"
>"Stepping on his face like that. He never requested that, but he is responding well to it. The head priestess will be pleased with her creativity."
>He did enjoy it.
>So much so, when she pulled the foot off of his face, then put her other foot on his face and spoke to him again, he started cumming all over the hand of the kobold who still had him firmly gripped.
>She cleaned him and herself off with her tongue.
>All the kobold troopers stood up and then sat down in a circle near the humans head.
>His arms and legs were free, and they were talking to him and taking turns running their claws through his hair.
>They helped him sit up, then stand.
>There was some more talking, then he pointed at the kobolds while saying something.
>One raised her hand but looked a bit nervous.
>He said something else and the other kobolds promptly left the room, leaving him with a somewhat concerned looking kobold.
>He walked up to her still naked, knelt in front of her, and bowed his head almost to the ground.
>Kliz recognized this trooper as the one who had stepped on his face.
>Kliz saw him kiss the trooper's feet one at a time, then stick his tongue between her ankles, and start running it up between her legs while looking up at her face.
>She smiled and took off the leather skirt, and met his gaze.
>"Alright, he really liked it."
>Kliz heard Bink's comment, but was far more focused on the scene before her.
>The human was on his hands and knees in front of the kobold, and while Kliz couldn't see exactly what his tongue was doing, she could guess.
>The kobold had her hands cupping the human's head and was saying something to the human while looking down into his face.
>It didn't take long before her tail spasm-ed around and she gave a few brief humps of his face.
>He held her in place with his hands on her ass until she calmed down and said something to him.
>He then released her and stood up.
>The moment he was on his feet, she reached out and grabbed his mostly limp dick with her hand, and gave it a kiss on the tip, then said something to him with a smile.
>He nodded, and she released her grip on him.
>She put her leather skirt back on, and he went around and collected his clothes and put them back on.
>Kliz turned to look at her guide since this appeared to be over.
>Bink saw her questioning look.
>"This human occasionally has the desire to be raped by a pack of female kobolds.
>He prefers being captured and then raped, I guess he also likes cleaning a female kobold's foot with his tongue."
>"But they didn't even get on his dick."
>"True, they were planning to take turns riding him.
>But she managed to find a way to please him before they could get to that.
>As long as the human is satisfied with the result, than all is well.
>He was well satisfied judging by his response to it."
>Kliz understood the human liked it, but the entire scene still bothered her.
>"What if he got sick from the dirt on her feet?"
>Her guide rolled her eyes at that.
>"No member of the church steps foot in these rooms without bathing well.
>We wouldn't accept being less than perfect for a human.
>The hallways leading in are kept spotlessly clean.
>I doubt there was a speck of dirt for him to clean off."
>Bink looked at her with a thoughtful expression, then continued talking.
>"Some humans like the ways we are different from a human.
>Our scales, our claws, our horns, our tails, our tongues, some humans really enjoy the differences."
>Kliz was well aware some humans really liked certain parts of kobold anatomy that humans didn't have, but never thought the very reason they liked it was because it wasn't human.
>She always thought it was just like how people like or dislike certain colors.
>Seeing that Kliz understood what she meant, Bink continued with her hushed explanation.
>"That's one of the things that makes humans amazing. They appreciate kobolds for being kobolds."
>It sounded kind of logical, but Kliz was well aware this was a member of the church talking to her, and wouldn't let herself forget it.
>The first half of the explanation was good and matched up with what she was already aware of, the second half sounded like wishful thinking to her.
>She was starting to understand how to deal with the church members in a way that didn't involve upsetting them.
>She nodded and smiled.
>There may be a lot of nice humans, but kobolds were still slaves, bought and sold at auction.
>How much could any species "appreciate" slaves?
>Bink turned back to the hallway and led Kliz even deeper.
>She wondered how long this cursed hallway was.
>She was understanding what her guide meant when she said "secrets both human and kobold", and really wished she didn't.
>She was getting a front row seat to the desires humans would never willingly voice in public, or wish to ever have associated with their names.
>And acts of servitude no kobold would wish to experience for real.
>Bink stopped again and turned to face her, and for the first time Kliz could see an end to the hallway behind Bink.
>Her guide looked to the left, and immediately faced Kliz and whispered another warning.
>"Do not interfere, no matter what."
>Kliz braced herself, but was still not prepared for what she saw through the window.
>There was a kobold that was about a half foot shorter than average, wearing shorts and a billowy blouse with no cut outs, and no color markings.
>Kliz's head shot to her guide, who quickly whispered an explanation.
>"She's 24."
>"You sure?"
>"We had our adulthood rituals the same week. I'll always be certain of her exact age."
>It felt like the truth, so Kliz just fell silent.
>The 24-yo "child" was laying on her stomach on the bed in the room, playing with some sort of doll and kicking her feet back and forth.
>She was wearing red shorts, a red blouse, and looked to be wearing red shoes as well.
>Like all kobold footwear, they were toe-less, and her claws and toe claws had been painted the same color red as her outfit.
>She didn't have the silver horn covers or ring or chains like every other kobold Kliz had seen in the church so far.
>Instead she had two red ribbons wrapped all the way around her horns, tied with a small bow at the base and tip on both horns.
>Kliz recognized the look, and had worn it herself when she wanted humans to call her cute.
>Paint your claws, decorate your horns, receive compliments from humans.
>The door on the far wall opened, and a human male with dark hair came in.
>He seemed to be somewhat nervous, and kept looking around like someone was after him.
>He exchanged words with the church member, and kept walking towards her only to stop and fidget.
>She said something to him, he just shook his head.
>Kliz understood, he was one of those humans nervous about sex.
>She had never understood exactly why anyone would be nervous or fearful about sex, but some humans were just like that.
>He finally reached the bed, reached over, and started rubbing her back.
>They kept talking, and Kliz was almost tempted to ask Bink to open the vent so she could hear, but she really didn't to know what was being said.
>Finally, the kobold sat up on her knees, and took her blouse off.
>The human slowly reached over and started rubbing around her breasts, but he didn't exactly look happy.
>There was some more talking, and the kobold tilted her head slightly back, pushing her lower jaw slightly forwards, pushing her lips out in the classic "kiss me" pose.
>He hesitated, then leaned over and kissed her.
>They held that pose for a bit, then he suddenly let go and pulled away from her.
>He rubbed his hands on his face, then just sat on the floor and buried his face in his hands.
>Bink spoke in a worried sounding whisper.
>"Something has gone wrong."
>The kobold had gotten off the bed and looked frantic.
>She ran to the door, opened it and stuck her head out, then came running back to the human.
>She was speaking rapidly and was stroking his arms and back while crouched near him.
>He rolled over onto the ground away from her, curled up into a ball, and buried his head in his arms.
>"Something has gone horribly wrong."
>While the human lay huddled on the ground, and the kobold crouched over him looking more distraught by the moment, another kobold entered the room.
>She was wearing the standard church outfit, but there was a gold ring suspended between her horns instead of silver.
>The naked kobold wearing red shoes ran to her, talking rapidly and gesturing at the human.
>The other kobold waved her off, as well as out of the room.
>She paused with her head out of the door, then two members of the church entered the room with her and shut the door.
>She spoke something to the two, and they nodded and walked over to where the human was curled up.
>They both laid down on the ground near the human, one in front of him, one behind, and slid themselves right up against him.
>They wrapped their arms around him, and laid their heads against his body.
>The one with the gold ring crouched near his head and started rubbing his shoulders.
>"We should probably move on, there really isn't anything to be seen here."
>Kliz wasn't going to argue, she didn't want to see this in the first place.
>Her guide faced the wall to the right, and whispered to her.
>"Sometimes, a human doesn't want to be pleasured, but something more simple."
>There was a loose pile of church members on the bed, and a human leg and arm were visible through the kobolds.
>They all just seemed to be laying there.
>Occasionally, one would speak or shift her position a little, but they were just laying in a pile.
>Sleeping together in a pile was a kobold thing, far more common in the winter months.
>Kliz never understood why humans didn't sleep in a pile together, all that heat together would make for great sleeping conditions.
>Instead humans tended to sleep by themselves or solely with their lovers.
>Kliz couldn't understand.
>"What is going on in this room?"
>"This human saw some kobolds sleeping together in a pile once, and found the idea interesting.
>He requested to be in a pile of female kobolds, and found he really likes the experience.
>He comes here about once a week just to lay down and share his heat with a pile.
>He says he finds it very relaxing."
>She wasn't sure what to make of it.
>"Does he do anything sexual with them?"
>"No, he doesn't want them doing anything to him either.
>Just to lay on top of him. He just wants to be in a pile."
>Kliz had to think that over.
>Every once in a while, she thought about being a human.
>Being tall and strong and creating her own warmth.
>Was it possible there were humans that thought about being a kobold?
>Would they want to do kobold things, like sleeping in a pile?
>She never thought a human would want to be attacked by a group of kobolds and then have his face stepped on, but she was starting to figure out she didn't know humans nearly as well as she thought.
>They were always confusing and mysterious, now she was convinced she would never truly understand humans.
>"They won't be doing anything else, so we might as well continue if you want."
>Kliz nodded, she was glad for anything that would get her out of this hallway sooner.
>They moved deeper in the hallway, and Kliz was happy to see there was an end to the hallway, which they were getting closer to.
>The next room had a human dressed like a nobleman standing in front of a female kobold.
>She was dressed in leather armor like Kliz had seen, except there were silver bands on the shoulders.
>She was kneeling before the human, and she looked to be making a pleading gesture while talking to him.
>She then jumped up and ran at the door.
>Kliz thought the human might chase her, but he just stood where he was and looked bored.
>She opened the door and more kobolds dressed in the leather armor outfit came in, two dragging a naked kobold between them.
>She looked afraid, and very pregnant.
>Her breasts were slightly puffed out, and one nipple was leaking milk.
>The head trooper, as far as Kliz could tell, was speaking to the human and gesturing wildly at the pregnant kobold.
>He seemed to agree about something, and pointed at the bed.
>The head trooper spoke to the pregnant kobold, who started shaking her head in a 'no', and trying to fight off the other troopers.
>The head trooper said something, and every kobold in the room looked at her.
>The troopers looked uncertain, and the pregnant kobold started trying to twist and kick her way out of the trooper's hold on her.
>The head trooper then said something else and pointed to the bed.
>The armored kobolds looked at one another, then started dragging the pregnant kobold over to the bed.
>She tried to fight, but there were about eight of the armored kobolds in the room, and she had no hope of resisting them.
>They finally got her pinned on the bed, with her arms and legs pulled towards the corners of the bed.
>The head trooper then spoke to the human and held her arm out to the bed.
>He folded his arms in front of his chest, shook his head, and said something back.
>Her arm dropped, and she looked at the kobolds on the bed who looked back at her.
>She nodded to them, and two standing nearby jumped on the bed to help the four already up there.
>There was some flailing about and frenzied movement, and when they were done they had one trooper holding each wrist near the corners of the bed.
>Her legs had been pulled back and up, and two more troopers kept her ankles trapped in their arms.
>Another was sitting on the floor off the bed holding onto the end of the pregnant kobold's tail, preventing her from covering herself.
>Another lay on the bed to the side of the pregnant kobold, and had reached her arms down past her waist and was using her hands to hold the pregnant kobold's pussy lips wide open, with one hand on either side.
>The pregnant kobold kept trying to squirm out, but was held tight by the others.
>She seemed to be trying to plead with them, but they just turned their heads away from her when she tried to speak with them.
>The head trooper then held her arm out towards the bed again and spoke to the human.
>He smiled, said something back, and started taking off his clothes.
>Once he finished, he climbed onto the bed facing the pregnant kobold.
>She was shaking her head and saying something to him, he just rubbed the tip of his dick on her sensitive bits, then pushed himself on in.
>Kliz watched him hump the pregnant kobold as the other kobolds held her in position.
>The head trooper was standing on the side of the bed, rubbing the human's back as he pounded the pregnant one.
>He reached over and put his hands on the pregnant kobolds breasts and started flicking the leaking nipple with his fingers.
>He seemed to think about it, then looked down at the pregnant kobold and said something to her.
>She whipped her head from side to side while yelling something.
>He didn't seem to mind what her response was, and started sucking on the leaking nipple while continuing to pump in and out of her.
>She was yelling, but she had stopped fighting and just hung limply in the hands of her fellow kobold.
>Finally she just laid her head down and looked at the wall as the human continued to hump her.
>He fucked her for a while in that position, then said something to the troopers and pulled out of her.
>They rolled the pregnant kobold onto her side, and lifted her leg straight up.
>The human pushed himself back into her, then grabbed the up-stretched leg and held into it while grinding himself inside of her.
>He would pull most of the way out, then force himself back in with a single thrust, do a few quick thrusts, then pull most of the way out again.
>After doing that for a while, he just started humping her rapidly until he shoved himself at her.
>The other kobolds let go of her and moved to the human, stroking his back and saying things to him.
>He finally pulled out of the pregnant kobold, and got off the bed.
>Two of the kobolds pulled a sheet over the pregnant one, then clasped their hands behind their backs and stood nearby as if they were standing guard over her.
>The human got dressed and was about to leave the room, but stopped and looked at the bed.
>He said something while pointing to the bed, and the pregnant female shot up while pulling the sheet off herself.
>He said something, she said something back and smiled.
>He smiled, then left the room.
>Kliz looked at her guide for an explanation as to what just happened.
>"This human enjoys a somewhat complex fantasy.
>He wants to pretend he's invading a kobold city, and the local guards are begging to give him any female he wants as long as he spares the town.
>He selects a female, they drag her to him, and then assist him in claiming her.
>This time it appears he asked for a pregnant female for his pleasure.
>Good thing Rias is going to be laying eggs soon, or we might have needed to ask him to wait until we had a pregnant kobold ready for him."
>Kliz had always believed humans wouldn't have any desire for a pregnant kobold female.
>Many were curious, and would ask pregnant females how much longer they had until they laid their eggs.
>There was maybe some rubbing of their stomach over their clothes, but she had never seen a human who seemed sexually interested in a pregnant kobold before.
>She understood the entire pregnancy cycle, her mother had explained all the gory details.
>She knew at late stage holding, which that kobold was in, her vagina would have been swollen and puffy from an influx of blood, to help hold the eggs in until it was time to lay.
>Kliz wondered if it was painful for her due to the "shrinkage" caused by the swelling.
>The pregnant kobold didn't seem to be in any pain, and was masturbating with both hands.
>Kliz knew exactly why the pregnant kobold as playing with herself.
>Human seed was even warmer than human flesh.
>It shot inside and the heat slowly seeped its way into your deepest parts and made you feel like you were being warmed from your internal organs outward.
>She had fingered herself to the feeling more than once.
>Even better, sometimes if the human who put the load in you was watching, he might be interested in adding a second afterwards.
>But the human had already left, as well as the other kobolds, and the pregnant kobold was just enjoying herself.
>Bink looked behind at the other window, and whispered again.
>"This here, is actually something the church does for it's members, and requests humans for."
>Kliz looked through the window, and saw a male human laying naked on the floor.
>There were about ten members of the church in their standard garb on hands and knees all around him, bent over with their heads just over his body.
>Some were kissing, some were licking, three were paying close attention to his crotch with their licking.
>Kliz whispered to her guide.
>"Request humans for?"
>"Sometimes we ask humans to participate in our worship services.
>Having a human actually present makes the service feel more meaningful.
>We need the right human for the service, or it won't work well.
>We are very careful about the humans we invite for worship services."
>Kliz decided not to ask what they did when they couldn't find a willing or proper human for this, and just kept watching.
>The kobolds continued to kiss and lick the human pretty much everywhere until he came all over his stomach.
>Then they stood and formed a line between his legs.
>The one at the front of the line crouched down, took a single lick of sperm off his stomach, said something to the human, then moved back to where she had originally crouched over near his head.
>The next in line did the same, and they kept at it until there was just one kobold left standing between his legs.
>She crouched down, licked around his stomach, then shot a murderous glare at the other kobolds.
>He said something and looked a bit concerned, she dipped her head to him with an apologetic look, then said something while pointing at the other kobolds.
>He said something to her again, then reached down and did something Kliz couldn't see.
>But she did see a few more drops of his cum come out of his dick, and he held his hand out towards it.
>She smiled and bent over, and he was once again completely clean when her head came back up.
>She took her original spot back, and all the kobolds hugged him all over.
>They all seemed to be talking about something, then they climbed off of him and helped him to his feet.
>One stood on either side of the human, each holding a hand, and the rest all brought over a piece of clothing from where the human had disrobed before Kliz started watching.
>They all assisted him in dressing, either putting clothing on him or helping him keep his balance as they put his pants back on.
>After he was fully dressed, they all clustered around him and guided him out of the room.
>One held each hand, some kept a hand on his back, some held onto his arms, and they all stuck very close to him, as if he was owned by them and they didn't want anyone else touching.
>"They should know better than to get greedy, she almost got nothing at all." her guide whispered in commentary on the scene.
>Kliz just smiled and said nothing.
>She wasn't against the taste or warmth of human cum either, but she wasn't about to get angry at someone else if she didn't get to taste it.
>Bink seemed to think this was an acceptable response, and moved closer to the wall at the end of the hallway, stopping again just a small distance short.
>Kliz could see the usual wooden pegs, and then one final set of pegs.
>The guide looked to the right, and whispered to Kliz.
>"This human desires to be tied up and used for kobold pleasure.
>Six or eight, no more. Her husband won't let her buy a kobold, so she visits when she can."
>A human woman was tied up in a sitting position on the ground.
>She had a large pillow under her.
>Her legs were crossed, and tied so she couldn't move them.
>Her arms were tied behind her back.
>Her back was to one of the bed posts, and her head had been tied to the post with a thick cloth band around her head.
>A pillow between her head and the post was visible.
>There were six male kobolds in the room with her, wearing the leather armor Kliz was starting to be able to see with her eyes closed.
>All of their leather skirts were laying on the bed, and they were in a single-file line in front of her.
>The one in front looked to be fucking her mouth.
>He had his hands holding the the bedpost she was tied to, and was humping her face with great energy.
>Finally he gave a few more deep pushes, then held himself deep inside her mouth, slightly pushing her head into the pillow.
>He finally pulled out and moved aside, and Kliz could see the expensive looking dress the human was wearing.
>Then the next male stepped forward and rubbed his dick against her face for a few seconds before sticking it inside her mouth.
>He then put his hands on the back of her head between her head and the pillow, and started humping.
>This looked like it was going to go on for a while.
>"Are they going to do anything else?" she prompted her guide.
>"Probably not, would you like to continue?"
>Kliz nodded with a smile.
>Let her guide think she got bored easily, anything to move things along quicker.
>Bink looked to the glass wall opposite, then whispered.
>"This human desires a kobold. His wife won't let him buy one, so we have a designated female for him. He has a great deal of affection for her."
>Kliz looked into the room, seeing a human and two kobolds.
>One was in standard church wear and was facing the other two, the other standing in front of the human was wearing a very frilly and brilliant white dress.
>She had white gloves that went all the way up her arms, and white cloth covers over her horns and claws.
>She was wearing something frilly on her head, with a thin sheet of some sort of see-through cloth over her face.
>She had a gold ring on the middle finger of her right hand.
>The human also had a gold ring on his middle finger, and was wearing some moderately wealthy looking clothes.
>They were holding hands while facing each other.
>She looking up at him, and he looking down at her.
>All three were speaking.
>Kliz could guess what was being said by the outfits.
>She was well aware of what that style of dress meant to humans.
>Bink whispered to her again.
>"His affection for her has grown over time.
>For the last two months, he's wanted this same desire every time he visits."
>Kliz let herself think briefly about not just going through a marriage ceremony with a human, but doing it over and over again with the same human.
>It was something to think about.
>Finally she had to ask some questions she had carried around for a long time.
>"Marriage between a kobold and a human, it's possible right?"
>"Of course. The only problem is you can't marry a human if you are owned."
>"Really? My mother has a certain dress with two rings, but it's from her owner."
>"You can have your own ceremony, wear the rings, but the crown won't count it as being legal if you are owned."
>But then...
>"If you can't marry a human if you are owned, how does any kobold marry a human?"
>"Your owner relists you at the auction house, and you buy yourself."
>"How much would that cost?"
>"Well, starting price of a kobold is 10 gold coin, but other people can bid as well, so prices usually go from about 100 to 200 gold coins for a kobold."
>10 gold coin was more wealth than Kliz had ever seen before, much less earned through odd jobs.
>To be able to save up 100 plus gold coins to buy herself, it seemed like as much fantasy as getting pregnant from a human.
>The normally dressed kobold had finished whatever she was there for, and left the room, and the two left inside were hugging and kissing while also trying to remove their clothes.
>Finally the human was down to socks, and the kobold only had the white gloves, the white cloth covers on her horns and claws, and white stockings on her legs that stopped just a little short of the base of her tail.
>She walked over to the bed, jumped up onto it, and laid in the center on her back with her legs spread, and her arms held out to the human.
>She also made a "come-here" motion with her tail.
>He got onto the bed, climbed over top of her, and wrapped his arms and legs around her.
>He then slowly lowered his hips until he was resting on her.
>She responded by wrapping her legs around his hips, and her arms around his chest.
>He slowly ground into her, and the two started kissing and showed no signs of stopping anytime soon.
>"I might as well warn you, they will be doing this for quite some time.
>He will slowly fuck her for an hour or two, then he usually finishes by having her ride him.
>Normally I wouldn't mind watching longer, but I'm guessing you're a bit of the hurried type.
>We can continue on-wards if you wish."
>"Yes, thank you."
>Kliz was in a hurry, to get the hell away from the church.
>She felt sorrow for her mother, there was no way she would be able to afford to buy herself either.
>At least her owner let her pretend and gave her the rings.
>Bink continued down the hallway until reaching the wall at the end.
>She turned and looked at the wall on the left, only to whisper:
>"Hmm, nothing going on here."
>She was right, the room was empty other than a bed with no one in it.
>Bink whispered again, sounding slightly confused.
>"That's odd, I should be able to see..."
>Noticing Bink wasn't looking at the same empty room as her, Kliz turned around only to see the glass had been covered with something, and she couldn't see into the room on the other side.
>It just looked dark.
>Suddenly, the blanket that had been covering the glass was pulled away by a naked male kobold in the standard church uniform.
>Behind him on the bed was a naked male human.
>Kliz recognized the human.
>Bink's arm flew at Kliz and she had her hand wrapped around Kliz's wrist, with another hand reaching inside of one of the pouches connected to her cloth belt.
>"You were not supposed to see this. Someone made a terrible mistake, and the head priestess is going to be pissed."
>Kliz understood exactly why her guide was upset.
>She knew that human.
>There couldn't be anyone in the kingdom who didn't know that human.
>It was the crown prince.
>But it wasn't fair getting in trouble when she never wanted to be a part of any of this to begin with.
>She desperately whispered her case while trying to pull away from Bink.
>"I never asked to see this!"
>"Calm down!" Bink hissed at her.
>"The head priestess will be pissed at someone, but not you.
>This isn't your fault. Just...forget what you saw in that room, alright?"
>"I swear, I won't tell anyone!"
>Bink stared at her eyes for a few moments, then released her wrist and pulled the other hand back out of the pouch.
>Kliz figured she probably carried a knife in there.
>Sure, the church members could be friendly, but she never doubted for a second they could turn violent against her.
>These were dangerous and insane people.
>Bink then whispered to Kliz to follow her, and lead her all the way back down the hallway to the entrance.
>She stopped at the door, and turned to Kliz.
>"Do you have any questions for me before we leave the hall?
>Once we leave this door, you and I can never speak of any of this, ever again."
>Kliz didn't have any questions, or at least any she wanted answers to.
>She shook her head, and Bink gave her a nod.
>The door opened, and they left the hall behind.
>Once they were back in the small room leading to the Hall of Secrets, and the door was completely shut, Bink spoke in a normal volume for the first time since they entered the hall.
>"Just wait here while I give my report to the head priestess, and then I'll come back to escort you to see her."
>Kliz didn't like the sound of that report.
>"I swore I wouldn't say anything!"
>Bink held up her hands.
>"Yes, I know. Relax, the report is standard for every passage through the Hall of Secrets. This is standard proceedure. Just wait."
>With that, Bink left Kliz alone in the room.
>The things she had seen in that cursed hallway had given her both ideas about humans she never wanted to think, and some ample fodder for fantasies about humans as well.
>She thought about the fake wedding ceremony and how that human and kobold seemed to never stop kissing.
>The pregnant kobold dragged in front of a human and held down by her fellow kobolds so he could fuck her against her will, or at least her pretend will.
>The human in the pile of kobolds.
>The human who had knelt before a kobold and kissed her feet.
>What the hell were kobolds to humans?
>If they were just sex toys to humans, why would they want to marry kobolds or have fantasies about impregnating them?
>If they were just slaves to humans, why would they allow or want their slaves stepping on their face or tying them to a bedpost and gang-fucking their face?
>If they were to be lovers, why would they demand ownership made into law and fantasize about raping them?
>Nothing made sense anymore.
>Kliz wished she could go back to yesterday, when humans were simply the big, strong, warm, and amazingly friendly species who had taken kobolds as slaves but were rarely mean to them.
>Now, all she could think about is what her owner would desire of her.
>Would he want to put her in a wedding dress?
>Or would he want to tie her up and have her beg for mercy?
>Would he want to talk about impregnating her during sex, or would he want to fuck her during her pregnancy when it could be painful to her?
>She never wanted to think these thoughts, why in the hell had she been required to walk down that damned hallway?
>She was much happier before she went there.
>Kliz felt fear, not knowing what to think about humans.
>They owned kobolds, they had full power over them.
>And now she had no idea what they would do with kobolds.
>She no longer knew what humans wanted from kobolds.
>As a kid it was simple.
>Humans wanted you to wear clothes outside the house, to be polite, and just do what they told you to and you never really had to worry about getting into trouble.
>As long as you were dressed when outside, polite, and did what you were told, humans were always nice and friendly.
>Nothing was simple now.
>Kliz was so lost in her thoughts, she nearly jumped backwards when the door opened and Bink came back inside.
>Her guide eyed her for a moment.
>"Are you alright?"
>"I'm fine, really. I'm just impatient."
>That wasn't the real reason, but Kliz figured she could point to her rushing through the last parts of the hall as proof.
>Bink actually laughed a bit at that.
>"Yeah, I noticed earlier. I understand, you've been waiting for years already. The head priestess is ready to see you now. Some advice?"
>Kliz nodded, she would take what she could get.
>"Be completely honest. You can't offend the head priestess unless you lie to her.
>She hates that more than anything else.
>She is very nice, unless you anger her by lying or being deceptive.
>Just be honest with her, and you will be fine."
>Kliz wasn't entirely sure if this was advice, or just a trick to get her to talk about things she would not want to say in this church.
>Like how every member appeared to be a complete psychopath.
>She just smiled and nodded.
>Bink just smiled back.
>"Oh, and don't try that smile-and-nod routine with her either.
>She hates it when she thinks someone is humoring her instead of telling her their real feelings."
>Kliz swallowed hard.
>Her guide knew she was playing a role?
>"I...uh..."
>"You don't need to explain yourself to me.
>The only role I have left in your adulthood ritual is to guide you to the head priestess. Ready?"
>Kliz nodded twice, no smile this time.
>Her mother always told her she was as see-through as glass, was she really this painfully obvious when she wasn't telling the truth?
>This meeting with the head priestess was starting to sound like a nightmare.
>Bink led her back to the main foyer, then to the door between the two desks.
>Bink opened it, stuck her head in, then looked back at Kliz and told her the head priestess would see her now.
>She held the door open for Kliz, and shut it behind her, remaining outside.
>Kliz wasn't sure what to expect from the quarters of the head priestess of this church, but she figured she would have been disappointed no matter what she imagined.
>It was a simple stone room with a wooden floor and ceiling like every other room she had seen here.
>The only things different was the two paintings, one on the wall to the left of the door, one on the wall to the right of the door, and there were six very large and overly stuffed pillows in the center of the room.
>Laying on her stomach on one of the pillows, dressed in the church green sleeves on arms and legs, wearing a gold ring suspended by two gold chains, one from each horn that was attached to gold horn covers, was the head priestess.
>Her scales were mostly golden, except her left foot was dark black.
>Seeing Kliz, she held her hand up and said:
>"Greetings child. Grab a pillow and relax."
>Far from the cold or scary welcome Kliz was expecting, she sat on a pillow.
>Pillow seating was a kobold thing, humans preferred their chairs.
>But kobolds never cared much for hard wood seats.
>It was fine when you wore pants that covered your crotch, but unfinished wood was almost like sandpaper on soft scales.
>Even worse if you got a splinter.
>The head priestess stretched herself out and then went limp.
>"According to your file, your name is Kliz, you just turned 16 today, and you were arrested earlier today, is this correct?"
>If she knew about it, there was no reason to try to deny it.
>"That is correct ma'am. I wore my mother's dress and marking paint in public before my ritual tonight."
>"The guard said you had a strong reaction to a fear of being tickled?"
>How did she know this?
>Were the town guards reporting to her?
>Why?
>"I...how...?"
>"I am the head priestess of this location of the Church of Human.
>I have legal authority over every kobold in the city.
>If any kobold commits any crime, no matter how minor, the guards will make a report of it to the church.
>As per their orders from the crown, they make the report immediately after sentencing."
>Why was the crown giving the guards orders like that?
>Why was the church in charge, or given this information?
>The head priestess yawned and then spoke again.
>"Stop holding yourself back child. Ask the questions you want to ask.
>I'm not just here to see if you are ready for adulthood, I'm also here to answer your questions and ease your confusion."
>It sounded like a gamble with a maniac, but Kliz was worried the head priestess would see through her trying to avoid things.
>She decided to pray the head priestess was at least honest with her.
>She was thinking of asking a simple question, but instead she just couldn't take anymore and spat out the insanity.
>"How?
>How is any of this possible?
>Nothing makes sense!
>Why is the church safe from the law?
>Why doesn't the crown stop any of this?
>Why did I have to go through that FUCKING hallway!?"
>Kliz expected the head priestess to suddenly turn dangerous and scary like the other members of the church.
>Instead the head priestess just kept looking at her with that same relaxed expression.
>"I believe you need a history lesson."
>Kliz figured the head priestess was full of shit, and not likely to answer her real questions.
>The head priestess's tone suddenly turned icy.
>"Don't give me that look child, this is important, and it does answer your questions."
>Did Kliz have a magic sign on her head that showed what she was really thinking?
>Not even her mother could read her this well.
>"I'm sorry, please forgive me!"
>The head priestess looked directly into her eyes and asked a question.
>"What is your honest opinion of this church?"
>"It's a really interesting place..."
>She was cut-off before she could finish.
>"Lie to me again and you won't be a legal adult until you turn 17."
>There was no way to win.
>This must be a suicide trap for kobolds the church doesn't want around.
>At least she could tell the truth before she died.
>She looked back at the head priestess, and spoke as plainly and honestly as she could.
>"I think this place is a madhouse, every church member is fucking crazy, and I wish I was anywhere but here."
>She braced herself for the call of "GUARDS!", but instead the head priestess scratched herself on the back with one arm.
>"Now was that really so hard?"
>Her tone of voice was back to being relaxed and easy-going.
>"You aren't angry?"
>"It sounded honest to me. That is what I asked for.
>I'm not here to judge your choice of company, the way you choose to live your life, or how you feel about me or anyone I know.
>I'm here to judge if you are mature and intelligent enough to be considered an adult under human law.
>The second part of my job is to answer your questions, to help you understand both the church and humans."
>Kliz chewed that over for a moment.
>She had called this kobold a psycho right to her face, but there wasn't even a hint of anger because she was honest.
>Until she got the impression otherwise, she was going to assume she could speak freely with the head priestess.
>"So what does history have to do with the Hall of Secrets, or why I had to see those things?"
>The head priestess smiled and yawned, then pointed to the wall to Kliz's right and said "Look."
>It was a painting of a brown and black scaled kobold wearing what must have been twenty pounds of gold alone.
>She was wearing kobold-style open-toe gold shoes with velvet padding visible.
>Rounded gold caps on every claw both hand and foot.
>Gold ankle bracelets with a short and thin gold chain dangling a tiny ruby at the end of the chain, matched by gold bracelets on her wrists that had a small ruby covering the latch.
>Her dress was also gold colored, and might have been spun out of gold wire for all Kliz knew.
>It had the standard cut-out areas, and she was wearing a dark crimson red marking paint carefully painted on her vagina lips, but not a single drop of paint on any scale next to it.
Her nipples were painted in the same very exact and careful way, making them a dark red on her black chest, without a single scale being painted red.
>The crimson red was also all over her lips, all the way around, but again, not a single scale touching her lips had any red.
>She was wearing a gold crown with diamonds around the peak.
>Her horns looked to have been wrapped in gold, which looked to have been carefully hammered into the correct shape around her horns.
>She was standing in a room made out of marble, with carpeted floors.
>"Do you know who that is?"
>Kliz had seen a few paintings of this kobold before.
>She knew.
>"That's the queen of the kobold kingdom who sold us all to the humans."
>"Correct. That painting was commissioned by the human king about five years after she signed the contract."
>"Commissioned?"
>"He hired an artist to paint her portrait."
>"Oh."
>"He also hired a few people to design and make the clothes she's wearing, as well as much of the jewelry besides the crown.
>Based on the information we have, she only wore it for that painting."
>All that gold and those jewels, just for a single portrait?
>But how would the church know about what happened back then anyways?
>"What information do you have about that?"
>"The church received her journal after her death.
>Copies were made, and every branch of the church has at least one copy of her journal.
>She wrote about how the king had her wear far too much gold and jewelry for a painting, and how she asked him to please spend that gold on her people instead."
>"What did he say?"
>She just shrugged.
>"We don't know, she didn't write down his response.
>Her journal isn't a bunch of completed stories that tell us every detail, she only wrote down her thoughts and feelings, and ideas she considered important enough to write. Look."
>The head priestess pointed to the left wall.
>It was a painting of a kobold wearing what looked like a random collection of pelts and clothing scraps.
>Kliz would have been nothing but ashamed if someone saw her wearing something like that.
>It looked so very poor and dirty.
>There was no gold, no shoes, no jewels, only a single silver bracelet around one wrist.
>Brown and black scale color pattern.
>Kliz looked back at the painting of the kobold queen.
>Back to the poor kobold.
>It had to be some mistake.
>She looked at the head priestess with despair.
>"In case you are wondering, that is the same queen. Five years prior to signing the contract."
>"Why is she wearing rags?"
>"Because the human king hired an artist to paint her portrait, and he asked her to wear her very best."
>Kliz remembered hearing stories about the kobold kingdom of old.
>This was the queen of the kingdom, wearing the best she had?
>Earlier Kliz had thrown far better clothing into a damned fire.
>Was this really all the kobolds had amounted to?
>The head priestess continued on.
>"Her journal was very educational on this particular encounter.
>It seemed this was actually an attempt from the human king to raise the kobold queen's spirits after an incident.
>She had been invited to tour the human capital, and was left in complete amazement at what the humans could do and the sheer amount of wealth.
>Once she got back home, she realized she had agreed to give the human king a tour of her empire's capital.
>She wrote that having the humans walking around the small mud hovels, seeing the dirt streets, and the poorer kobolds digging around in dirt for worms to eat, had all made her deeply ashamed to even be a kobold.
>In her own words, 'Why should a human ever respect a kobold? We are so far below them in every way, it's a miracle they even speak with us.'
>The human king must have noticed her discomfort during the tour, and asked if she would be willing to pose for a portrait for him.
>He said it would take nearly a week, so they wouldn't be able to tour any more of the kobold kingdom, but he would accept that loss in exchange for the portrait.
>She gratefully accepted.
>She wrote in a later entry that she regretted doing the portrait, since she couldn't find or buy a human-quality dress to wear.
>She wrote that she thought the king was offering her a way to avoid embarrassment, until she realized he was probably taking the portrait back home so other humans could laugh at the shabby dressed kobold."
>The head priestess rolled over to her side but continued talking.
>"The queen never wrote in such self-hating and depressing ways prior to her visit to the human kingdom.
>It really broke her badly to see just how far behind her own people were.
>The humans' visit to her own kingdom was just pure humiliation for her.
>A few years later, and the Ogres decided we were plenty weak and ripe to be eaten.
>Are you familiar with the signing of the contract?"
>"More or less."
>"Good enough. The queen wrote that night in her journal about what she did, and asked that future hatched kobolds forgive her for what she had to do.
>She said she would do whatever it took to protect her people from death.
>The very next night, she wrote a single line. 'Fuck humans, I hope they all die.'"
>"What did she write that for?"
>The head priestess just shrugged again.
>"We really don't know, but we assume she hadn't developed affection for humans yet."
>Kliz couldn't swallow that.
>"Develop affection? She had to sell herself and the rest of us into slavery!"
>"Still far better than death. And while it was rough at first, the law changed over time to be far more reasonable and protective towards kobolds. The church is responsible for that."
>Kliz had to wonder how the church influenced human laws.
>"How did the church do that?"
>"Same way we've been manipulating the crown for decades. Gentle persuasion."
>Kliz could only stare at the head priestess.
>"You are manipulating the crown? What happens if the crown finds out?"
>"They would probably have us all executed."
>She said it like she was discussing what to have for breakfast.
>She rolled onto her other side.
>"And it wouldn't stop there either. The church keeps extensive records."
>"What do you mean?"
>"The church being destroyed would just be the start of the fire.
>The fate of every kobold in the kingdom is tied to the church."
>Kliz didn't get it.
>"Let's say you suddenly went stupid and decided to tell someone about the Hall of Secrets.
>It wouldn't take the humans long to figure out every single adult kobold had also taken a trip through that hallway.
>They would move on the church, and hunt down all records about adulthood rituals to find out which kobolds knew which human's secrets.
>Then they would see all the records of the humans that visited, and what they did.
>You've seen how upset a human can get when you go poking around their secrets, or invade their privacy, right?"
>Kliz signaled an affirmative.
>"Imagine a city full of humans knowing their secrets are known by a large number of the kobolds in the city, who all knew their privacy had been invaded.
>What exactly do you think would happen to all the kobolds in the city?"
>Kliz didn't have to imagine hard.
>No kobold wanted to anger a species larger and stronger than them.
>If the humans ever got angry enough, if the kobolds had really crossed the line, they would be easily eliminated.
>She still didn't get what history had to do with this.
>"What does the Hall have to do with history?"
>"Simple. About 15 years after the contract was signed, our first head priestess had what she called a moment of enlightenment.
>She said she could see the entire Human plan in perfect clarity.
>She said she finally understood humanity.
>She said the contract was just a formality, that humans enslaved kobolds with their heart.
>She then founded the Church of Human with the goal of binding our species tighter and tighter, until neither side can leave.
>The church is deeply dedicated to a number of goals with that in mind."
>"And the Hall?"
>"Tighter and tighter.
>The church used to have problems with kobolds who really disliked humanity or serving humans.
>One of our higher ranked members came up with a solution for ensuring compliance with the church no matter what the kobold felt a few decades after the church was founded.
>Being a witness to the Hall makes you a part of it.
>Not only does the Hall let you gain a deeper understanding of humans, it makes you forever tied to the fate of the church.
>Even if you hate the church, you can't work against us, or share our secrets with anyone else.
>Even if you didn't care about your own life, your mother's own trip through the Hall is well documented in our records."
>Even Kliz was seeing holes large enough to drive a wagon through.
>"How would the church even knew I talked?"
>The head priestess rolled onto her back and scratched at her stomach, and looked Kliz in the eye.
>"Members of the church are rarely in uniform outside of the church, and most wear red marking paint in the standard way when out of uniform."
>It took a few seconds for her to process that.
>When she finally got it, the church suddenly seemed a lot more terrifying than before.
>Unless she specifically recognized a kobold as a church member she had seen in uniform, she would have no way of telling if any kobold she spoke to or near was a member of the church.
>They didn't even need to know your name either, they could just report your scales colors and patterns, and then look up that kobold in their records.
>The records were suddenly another danger.
>They didn't just keep extensive records on the humans, they kept records on the kobolds too.
>The records were a blackmail against every kobold over the age of 16.
>She looked in horror at the head priestess, who just gave a lazy yawn.
>"Tighter and tighter child.
>Tighter and tighter.
>Every passing year, every new generation, our two races are bound ever closer together.
>We're already past the point where separation would be highly painful for both species.
>Kobolds would be easy prey for any other species that wanted us, and we could be certain they wouldn't treat us as well as humans do.
>We don't even do our own farming or hunting anymore.
>Humans would have their empire descend into chaos, since the church has become the primary source of sex for pleasure for humans.
>Did you know prostitution died off in the human kingdom less than ten years after the church was founded?"
>Kliz slowly shook her head, she didn't even feel her own tail wrapped protectively around her body.
>She couldn't believe how relaxed this kobold was while talking about how her organization was busy tying nooses around everyone's necks to prevent anyone from getting too far away.
>Tighter and tighter.
>"It was one of our first goals.
>We felt humans shouldn't have to pay just because humans weren't as open about sex as kobolds are.
>Less than a year after starting the program, every last prostitute in the city had given up due to the lack of customers.
>The human king at the time confronted our head priestess about it.
>He thought the church was plotting to corner the market and then raise the price.
>She apologized to his majesty, and told him that the church always appreciates donations, but all donations are entirely optional and would remain so.
>He didn't believe her and ordered an investigation.
>It took less than two days for the investigators to verify her words.
>Not one single human who left the church doors said they were even asked for a donation.
>Only the lone kobold out front with the pot that had 'Donations OPTIONAL' was ever handed any money, and half the people who donated didn't even enter the church.
>So the investigation ended, and the church succeeded in wiping out prostitution.
>And the humans gave the church control over humanity's sexual desires."
>"And you give them whatever they desire."
>The head priestess made a vague gesture with one arm.
>"Of course. We are devoted to humanity.
>If they wish it, we make it reality.
>We don't care what the wish is, only that the human is satisfied."
>"But the church keeps records on the humans."
>"Naturally. The moment that human returns for a second visit, we already know how to serve them properly, even if the member or members who served aren't around to explain the details.
>The records also serve as protection for the humans.
>No human wants our records to leave the church, ever.
>As such, no human would dare try to seize the records, or they would be facing the wrath of nearly every other human in the city."
>Kliz wasn't fooled.
>"And it acts as good blackmail to keep any human from acting against the church."
>The head priestess just gave a slight smile.
>"Tighter and tighter child.
>The contract was humanity declaring kobolds to be bound to them forever.
>The church works to ensure humanity will never be able to let us go.
>By the time we have accomplished our goals, neither humans nor kobolds will be able to break the bond without both species going extinct."
>Kliz could only stare in horror at the head priestess.
>She had to say it.
>"You are insane. Completely insane."
>"I'm devoted. To both the church and humanity.
>We will serve them, and they will lift our species higher.
>You've seen the paintings of the old Queen.
>Humanity is the way forward for kobolds, we have nothing else.
>We aren't capable enough as a species to stand alone. Do you doubt this?"
>Kliz wished she could argue against it, but she knew the head priestess was correct on that much.
>She just lowered her head.
>The head priestess continued foward seeing that Kliz had no argument to give.
>"Our species has always been smaller and weaker than the rest.
>Our species has always been fascinated with the larger and stronger species.
>With the exception of humans, all the larger and stronger species either want us dead, dinner, worked to death, or to be treated no better than dumb animals.
>By some miracle or coincidence, the human king back then understood kobolds better than most kobolds do.
>He offered the queen and our species what we really wanted, and needed."
>Kliz felt numb, and cold, but she couldn't stomach this.
>"Slavery? Is that all we are to humans?"
>The head priestess snorted.
>"Slaves. The first head priestess was right, it was just a formality.
>Kobolds always wanted a larger stronger species to serve."
>"What makes you so sure about that?"
>The head priestess just looked at her.
>"Do you remember when you were four years old?"
>"Mostly."
>"Do you remember being in school?"
>"Yes?"
>"Tell me about your teacher."
>She wasn't sure what that had to do with anything, but her teacher was always a pleasant memory.
>It was the first adult male human she had spent much time with or even spoken to.
>He was always so kind to her and the other kobold girls in the class, telling them how smart they were and how nice their clothes looked.
>She described him as such to the head priestess.
>Who smiled back.
>"And if he had asked you to spank yourself in front of the class, and afterwards he would spend half an hour giving you praise for it, would you have?"
>Would she?
>Hell, she would do it right now in the middle of the city square for ten minutes of constant praise from her old teacher.
>She just nodded.
>"And you say you don't want to serve humans.
>Sounds like at least one human already had you enslaved through your heart before you grew up.
>It's all a part of their game."
>"What ARE we to humans?"
>"What they wish us to be.
>A part of them.
>To share their lives with them.
>Humans are capable of being lonely even among each other.
>So they take us into their life, so they won't be lonely anymore.
>The old queen offered everything, and humanity accepted.
>Rather than rip everything out of our hands, they gave us more, put an arm around us, and said 'Stay close to me and I'll protect you.'
>You say this is slavery?
>They humans don't want slaves, they want companions, lovers, husbands and wives.
>The church is the reason why the collar laws exist, not humanity.
>We refuse to let our fellow kobolds forget just how thankful they should be to be owned by humanity."
>Kliz just didn't know what to say.
>The head priestess asked her a question.
>"What happened when you turned eight?"
>"I...graduated from school."
>"And?"
>Did she forget something?
>Was there some incident or something?
>Seeing Kliz's confusion, the head priestess prompted her.
>"Didn't you go through puberty then?"
>Right, nearly forgot.
>Pretty much every kobold had puberty at 8, and was capable of laying eggs and being a mother at the age of 9.
>It's why she had tried to avoid getting too close to the male kobolds while growing up.
>She wanted kids one day, but not yet.
>"Sorry, I nearly forgot. It was a long time ago."
>"No apology needed. But do you remember what happened when you went through puberty?
>Did your mother have a certain talk with you?"
>Kliz was hoping to never have that talk again.
>It was exciting, but also felt off to her.
>"Yes?"
>"And did she explain the rules to you?"
>So that was normal?
>She thought her mother was just showing her some loopholes.
>She tried her memory to see if she could recall the rules.
>"Can't do anything with a human that hasn't started puberty yet, can only do stuff with a human that has started puberty if they are under the age of 16 and consent to it, can't do anything with a human over the age of 16."
>"And didn't you think it was odd that a slave race is handed the children of the dominate race, after getting what amounts to a wink and 'You kids play nice.'?"
>It was something that had bothered her, but she always chalked it up to humans being humans, and complicated.
>"What do you suppose the effect is when those going through puberty are given lovers that practically idolize them?"
>Kliz thought she could see where the head priestess was going with this, but remained silent.
>She wanted to be sure.
>"Do you think it might be similar to the effect a big, tall, strong, and VERY kind human teacher might have on a classroom full of little kobold children?"
>That couldn't be right.
>The humans had to know what they were doing.
>She remembered one time when she was 12 and was "teaching" a 14-year old human boy about the fun he could have with her, and the human's father had walked in on them.
>He just looked at her and told her to be gentle with his son, then left and shut the door.
>There was no way he couldn't have known.
>She looked at the head priestess, who finally sat up on her cushion.
>"Like our first head priestess said, they enslave us with their hearts.
>Then they have us enslave them with our hearts.
>If they wanted us as slaves, we wouldn't have any rights at all.
>Humanity knew we needed them.
>They had no need of us, but they wanted to have us with them.
>The contract, the laws, it's all just a big game to them.
>They saw an opportunity to make us theirs forever, and they took it.
>It has nothing to do with owning us, and everything to do with having us WITH them."
>Kliz could almost forget she was talking to a member of the church at times.
>"They buy and sell us at the auction houses, why bother if they don't care about owning us?"
>"You know how an auction works, correct?"
>Kliz had been to a few.
>Not for kobolds, but just auctions in general.
>"People bid on the item, high bid wins and pays for the item, then gets the item?"
>"Correct. And who gets the high bid?"
>"Auction house takes a fee, rest goes to the seller of the item."
>"Correct again. Do you know how a kobold auction works?"
>Kliz figured it had to be different if she was asking.
>"No?"
>"Humans bid on the kobold being auctioned.
>The high bid is brought to the church, and placed in the vault under the names of the kobold being auctioned, and the buyer.
>When a kobold passes away due to old age, the bid is returned to the buyer.
>If the buyer chooses to sell the kobold back to the auction house, the bid is returned to the buyer.
>If the buyer passes on and the kobold isn't inherited by one of the buyer's children, the kobold is brought back to the auction house and the bid is returned to the buyer's children.
>If the buyer was abusive towards the kobold, and the kobold was removed from the buyer's possession by the town guards, then the bid is handed over to the crown."
>Kliz didn't understand, who was making a profit here?
>"All kobolds are owned by the crown, and thus the human kingdom.
>It's why every collar has that small crown marking on the clasp.
>The bid humans make on kobolds isn't a payment for the kobold.
>It's a deposit on the kobold, to be returned when the kobold is returned in good condition.
>All the auction is, is humans declaring how much wealth they are willing to part with to have you.
>Have you ever wondered how much you were worth?
>Or more specifically, how much you were worth to a human?"
>"They aren't buying us?"
>"More like renting us from the crown.
>They are expected to take care of us while we are with them.
>If the humans wanted us owned, they wouldn't give us the choice to buy ourselves."
>It almost felt like a sales pitch to Kliz.
>"No kobold could afford what they auction us for."
>"No kobold is expected to.
>The majority of kobolds who buy themselves are handed the gold to do so by the humans they serve.
>In most cases, it's only done to make marriage possible."
>Kliz couldn't take any more of this insanity.
>Humans didn't make much sense before, but now she didn't even know if they were sane.
>"I don't want to sound ungrateful for your answers, but is this all going to be over soon?"
>The head priestess smiled.
>"As quick as you like it to be.
>All you need to do is answer the next two questions with complete honesty.
>Understood?"
>"Understood."
>"First off, will you keep the secrets of the church, and all kobolds and humans involved?"
>"I will never say a word about any of this insanity to anyone, I never wanted any part of this."
>"Very good. And second, will you serve your human owner as required by the contract and current law?"
>Kliz thought about what the head priestess had told her, and about what her mother had told her.
>"I will serve."
>The head priestess brought her hands together in a single clap.
>"Then I may no longer call you child. Congratulations Kliz."
>She wasn't sure it wasn't a joke.
>"Really?"
>"Really. You are now legally an adult under human law.
>If you ever have any questions, the church doors are always open.
>One of my members will lead you to a room in the sleeping quarters."
>Kliz only vaguely remembered being lead to a room somewhere in the church, where she was left alone.
>She was in too much of a daze to really be fully aware of her surroundings.
>She fully intended to think about all she had heard and seen today before going to sleep, but fell asleep only a few minutes after laying down on the bed to relax.
>"Morning!"
>Kliz nearly jumped out of bed, still groggy and disoriented, waking up to an unfamiliar room.
>She looked at the unfamiliar kobold who had woken her, and the green sleeves on the arms and legs helped remind her of how she got there.
>He was a male member of the church, and had the green line on his lips, and the small green dot on the tip of his penis.
>"Uh, morning."
>"Sorry to wake you, but it's already nearly mid-day, and your auction is scheduled for mid-day.
>I figured you might want a bath and a meal before you go.
>Would you like me to lead you to the bathing area or the dining hall, or would you want to go to the auction house now?"
>She had taken a bath right before arriving, and hadn't really done anything to dirty herself up, but a meal sounded good.
>"Dining hall please."
>An hour later, and Kliz had a stomach full of fried fish and was being escorted to the auction house by a team of four members of the church and a single human guard.
>They had explained to her that she couldn't just walk around naked in public without the markings, and while she was an adult she didn't have an owner beyond the crown yet.
>As such, she couldn't walk to the auction house herself right now.
>While being naked never bothered a kobold in warm weather, Kliz always preferred wearing dresses above all else.
>Dresses always got compliments from passing humans.
>Being naked in public rarely did.
>All she had on was her collar.
>She arrived at the auction house with her escorts, and was taken to the front desk off to the side of the main auction hall.
>Her kobold escorts gave a small stack of papers to the human at the desk, who gave them a brief glance over.
>"Kliz?"
>She felt a twitch of fear she couldn't figure out a reason for.
>"Yes?"
>"Glad you got here on time, we almost had to bump your auction back in the line a bit."
>He walked around the desk and attached the thin chain of a lead to her collar.
>"Just follow me."
>With that, her escorts left and she followed the human into the main auction hall.
>A stage was on one side, with a podium near to the door.
>The rest of the room was rows on rows of seats, most of which were occupied by humans both male and female.
>The human that lead her in handed a paper off to the human standing behind the podium, then lead her to a large cushion near the center of the stage and disconnected the lead.
>She looked up at him.
>"What do I do?"
>"Whatever you wish, just stay on the stage and don't throw things or bite people."
>He then walked off the stage, and the human behind the podium started to speak.
>Kliz sat on the cushion, it felt uncomfortable to be standing there with all the humans looking at her.
>She was never much for big crowds, or getting attention from many people at once.
>Walking down the street in a pretty dress was one thing, this was far more intense.
>"Our next kobold for bid is Kliz.
>She just turned sixteen, stands at four foot even, and weighs seventy-five pounds.
>No known allergies beyond what is standard for a kobold, no birth defects, no illnesses or ailments.
>According to her record, she may have some slight trauma from a past incident, but no more details were given.
>Bidding as usual will start at ten gold coins, do I hear ten?"
>That was a part of the records the church kept on her?
>At least they were kind enough to not share the details with the auction house.
>She didn't think she would be able to take an entire room full of humans hearing about how she pissed herself in fear over possibly getting tickled.
>By the time she stopped thinking about it and started paying attention, her price had gone up to 40.
>Then 50.
>Humans around the room kept raising a small white piece of cloth with a number on it and shouting out even higher prices.
>She couldn't stop thinking about how much money was being talked about.
>50 gold coins was more than enough to buy a small home and the land it was on.
>She heard 100.
>100 was enough to outfit an entire town guard division with brand new equipment and pay their salaries for a year.
>Her price had risen to 150 and was still climbing.
>She could no longer imagine how much could be bought.
>A human in the audience stood up and hurled something at the stage.
>She raised her arms up to protect her head, thinking he was throwing it at her.
>Instead it landed on the stage but close to the podium off to the side, not near her.
>Gold coins spilled out of the pouch and a voice yelled out.
>"Two hundred and eighty four gold coins!"
>There was some applause from the audience.
>The human at the podium spoke.
>"Two hundred and eighty four. I have two hundred and eighty four. Are there any more bids?"
>The room was silent.
>"Going once. Going twice. Sold for two hundred and eighty four gold coins to the older gentleman who knows how to make a bid!"
>Kliz was broken out of her thoughts over how much gold she had been bought for.
>She had heard the human say 'older'.
>The hope was for a younger human male, but she guessed she might like the older human.
>Her main concern was how she would be treated by her owner.
>She wanted what her mother had with the human that owned her.
>She wasn't aware of the human walking onto the stage and attaching a lead to her collar, or leading her off the stage to another room she didn't see before.
>She heard the door close and that snapped her out of it, and she looked at the human holding the lead with some confusion.
>He didn't look that old.
>"Um, master?"
>He looked at her with a bit of a smile.
>"Not exactly. I work for the auction house, your buyer is just filling out some records.
>You were purchased for someone other than the buyer, so there was some additional forms to fill out."
>"Did he say who I was being bought for?"
>"Yeah, he got you as a gift for his son, said you were a birthday present for him."
>Son meant younger, but she still had no way of knowing how she was going to be treated.
>She was going to ask if he seemed nice, but then the door opened and an older male human walked in.
>He wasn't wrinkled and gray all over, but his hair was starting to turn from black to white.
>She had the impression she had seen him once or twice before, but couldn't remember where or when.
>Maybe he had recognized her and decided to bid?
>The human holding her lead handed it to the older human.
>After taking her lead, he spoke to her.
>"Hello there Kliz, are you ready to meet your new owner?"
>He didn't sound like a mean human.
>His voice seemed friendly.
>"Yes sir."
>With a warm hand on her back, he guided her outside and walked her to the more upper-class part of the city.
>Based on the nice clothes he was wearing, and where she stood, she figured he had to be very wealthy.
>They finally arrived at the house her new owner lived in, but house wasn't really the right word.
>Mansion would be more appropriate.
>It had a large lawn out front with a small orchard, and cobblestones made a pathway from the interlocking stone street to the front doors.
>The building itself was only somewhat smaller than the church, but far less austere and far more regal looking.
>The front doors were large even for a human, and were made out of wood that was either stained or naturally a light red color.
>The interior looked to be carved out of a solid piece of marble, with specifically cut rugs covering the most traveled parts of the floor.
>The majority of walls had expensive looking paintings on them of portraits and landscape scenes.
>He lead her up the staircase in the main foyer to the second floor, and down a hallway to a room as expensive looking as the rest of the place.
>Inside were two kobolds, both female.
>Both were wearing the exact same outfit.
>Black but nearly transparent thin stockings on their legs, with white cloth covers on their toe claws.
>Black open-toed shoes.
>White cloth coverings on both horns.
>They were wearing a tight fitting black dress that nearly exploded at the waist with an impossible looking amount of white frills from one side to the other underneath.
>There were no cut-out areas, and all Kliz could see between their legs was the white frills.
>They had white gloves that ran all the way to their armpits, with their claws sticking out and white cloth covers on them.
>They had a single bow tied on their head with a black ribbon, that ran under their chins to hold the ribbon in place.
>One was green all over, the other had a splotchy brown and yellow pattern with some white dots.
>She couldn't see any marking paint on them.
>They both bowed slightly as Kliz entered the room with the human.
>He spoke to them.
>"The guest of honor is finally here. Get her ready for the birthday boy, alright?"
>The two kobolds nodded and took her collar off.
>The older human left the room, and Kliz suddenly remembered she didn't even ask his name.
>She sarcastically berated herself.
>Way to go on making that good first impression Kliz!
>She made a mental note to apologize later.
>He didn't seem angry at her, so hopefully it wasn't a big deal.
>The two led her onto the large and very soft bed in the middle of the room, and had her lay in the center on her back.
>They spent some time with cushions and pillows, trying to get her as comfortable as possible.
>Once she was in a good position, they pulled out some rope and had her spread her legs and arms towards the corner posts of the bed.
>The rope was a lot softer than she thought it would be, and actually felt somewhat nice against her scales.
>She was secured in that position, and couldn't pull out of the rope bonds, but they weren't overly tight and no amount of tugging or pulling seemed to make them any tighter or looser.
>The two then blindfolded her with a long piece of soft black cloth, and tied it well enough that she couldn't shake it off her head.
>After they confirmed she wasn't in any pain and no binding was too tight, she asked them the question she wanted to ask.
>"Is my new owner nice?"
>She couldn't see them, but one leaned close to her and whispered to her.
>"Very much so. You will be glad to be here. We certainly are.
>Now then, after we leave the room, all you have to do is wait for your new owner.
>He will be the next person who comes into this room, since this is his bedroom.
>When you hear your new owner shut the door, just say 'Happy Birthday Master, how may I serve you'.
>Understood?"
>She swallowed and told them she understood.
>Then they left her, tied to the bed and blindfolded.
>She tried her hardest to calm down.
>One of those two said her new owner was 'very much so' nice.
>There was nothing to fear, right?
>As much as she tried to reason herself into being calm, she still couldn't ignore the fact she was firmly tied to the bed and blindfolded.
>Not only would she not even get to see what her new owner looked like, he would be able to do anything he wanted to her and she wouldn't even be able to see it coming.
>She was helpless and blind, only her sense of hearing would be able to give her any useful information.
>They even tied her tail down with two cloth straps so she couldn't cover herself or offer any resistance.
>Was her new owner the sort of human that wanted to take her forcefully?
>Would he want her to cry out and beg him to not do it?
>She mentally cursed the church and that damned hallway, she never had these sorts of fears about a human owning her before her visit there.
>So lost in her thoughts, she missed the door opening.
>She heard it close with a slight bang and her whole body twitched like she had an itch all over.
>It was silent for a second or two before she remembered she was supposed to do something.
>"Happy Birthday Master, how may I ssserve you?"
>She barely managed to get the words out, and felt herself stutter on the word serve.
>Her new owner had just arrived and already she felt like she was screwing up.
>She prayed he was the merciful and forgiving type of human.
>She waited for a response, but the room remained quiet.
>Did someone else come in and leave and she just thought it was her new owner arriving?
>Then she heard footsteps approaching the bed.
>She felt soft warm human hands on her body, one resting on her stomach, and one on the back of her head.
>Then she felt the pressure on her lips, and understood he was kissing her.
>This was a lot more affectionate than she thought was going to happen, and was happy to kiss back.
>His hands moved slowly around her body, rubbing in some areas, softly squeezing others, or just slowly dragging his soft hands over a certain area.
>Every touch felt good and warm.
>Then it stopped just as it started.
>Maybe she didn't do something right.
>"Master?"
>He just gave her a whispered "ssshhhhh" to quiet her, then she heard him pulling his clothing off, with the heavy thud of his boots when they came off.
>She felt him climb on the bed, then the warm hands were back on her body.
>He slid them between the pillows under her ass and her ass, then held them there while rubbing and squeezing.
>If her legs weren't spread and tied, she would have spread her legs to try to get more of her ass to touch warm hand.
>It wasn't the first time a human had touched her just like this, and she loved it every single time.
>She let out a small noise when she felt a warm wet sensation partway down her tail, that started moving towards her more sensitive parts.
>It suddenly pulled away, only to reappear at the very backside of her vaginal slit.
>It slowly went up the left side, traced a teasing distance around her clit, then went back down the right side.
>By the third time around, Kliz was starting to curse the kobolds who had tied her to the bed.
>She wanted to fuck that tongue, be fucked by that tongue, be split in two by that tongue.
>Before she could beg him to do anything, he rammed the wet warmth inside of her and stuck it as deep as he could.
>Kliz was squirming around as well as the ropes let her, while alternating between moaning and mumbling out 'master'.
>She wasn't really aware of doing either, her entire mind was focused on the tongue inside of her.
>It stroked in and out of her, slid around inside, swirled around, and made random jabs towards her cervix.
>It didn't reach, but she still appreciated every effort it made to do so.
>And every other movement it made.
>The heat from it felt like it was filling her with heat from her cunt to her womb.
>The heat continued to spread, and the tongue kept her enthralled attention until she felt herself climax.
>He slowly backed his tongue out of her while she desperately tried to hump from her restrained position.
>It was all so familiar.
>The touching, the way he had licked her, could it really be?
>After catching her breath, she asked.
>"Master? Is your name Teiras?
>The blindfold came off, and the dark haired male human she had been fixated on for so very long was smiling at her.
>He spoke in the deep voice she was familiar with.
>"Took you long enough. How many other humans do you know that enjoy blindfolding you?"
>He untied her from the bed, then climbed back onto it.
>The moment he was on the bed, she jumped on him and wrapped both arms and legs and her tail around him.
>He smiled at her, and raised himself up to kiss her.
>He looked her in the eyes and said:
>"Let me help you then."
>He put his arms around her and leaned forwards, pushing her back.
>She was soon on her back with him on top of her, and his dick had never left her body in the process.
>It felt like he was all round her, and the heat was surrounding her.
>Her arms were wrapped around him, and she was trying to keep her legs wrapped around him as well.
>Her tail laid limply between his legs.
>He slowly ground into her with a smile and asked her if that was what she wanted.
>She glared at him, he always liked to tease her during sex.
>He gave her a brief kiss, then started pounding her into the bed.
>She tried to hump back, but his hands were on her hips around her waist and he was holding her firmly in place.
>He didn't slow down or change his rhythm any, he just kept the speed up and occasionally gave her a peck of a kiss in between her gasps and uncontrolled noises.
>She was never sure if showing him exactly how to drive her wild was a good idea or a bad idea.
>It seemed like the perfect idea when she was younger and finally had some alone time with the human boy she had been obsessed with.
>But every time he fucked her in a way that left her drooling on herself, she wondered if she should have held back some details.
>But only afterwards, during she was always wishing the experience never ended.
>She thought about how she would be able to spend years, decades, if not the rest of her life with the human she always wanted to be around.
>She thought about the kobold in the wedding dress she saw.
>She felt herself getting close to orgasm, and yelled out in the heat of the moment:
>"MAKE ME PREGNANT!"
>He immediately stopped, and she felt herself freeze.
>She did not just speak of something she saw in the Hall to a human.
>It didn't happen.
>"Kliz?"
>He looked a bit confused, and she was sure her response wasn't helping.
>She saw an out and seized it immediately.
>She folded her arms in front of her and looked at Teiras with a disapproving look.
>"I thought I taught you about roleplaying during sex?"
>The confusion went away, and he started moving again.
>"Make me pregnant?"
>She stuck her tongue out at him, and replied.
>"You won't accomplish it with that attitude."
>He gave a small chuckle at that, got back to full speed, and smiled at her.
>"Shut up and get pregnant you little goofball."
>Her retort was cut off by his kissing her again.
>Sex with Teiras had always been fun.
>She could say or do anything, he never seemed to be offended or bothered by her in any way.
>Once she hit puberty, she had stalked Teiras until he finally started puberty himself.
>She made it clear to the other kobold girls that he was off limits to them unless he specifically approached them.
>She had been possessive of him before she even started thinking about sex.
>And once she did start, he was usually the subject of her thoughts.
>She was proud to say she was 'assisting' him with her hands the first time he came.
>She was also proud to have been his first experience with sex, and his first experience with oral sex.
>She had claimed every first of his that he was willing to let her take.
>She taught him everything she had learned from other kobolds and her own mother, learning what he liked and didn't like.
>Then she had taught him about what she liked one day when he asked her.
>After that day, his new favorite game was seeing how hard and long he could make Kliz orgasm.
>Then he started teaching her things about herself she never knew before.
>Touches that made her shiver, certain positions that triggered something deep within her, and as much as she disliked being teased sexually the teasing would push her desire to the point of being overwhelming.
>She had started off teaching a shy and hesitant boy about sex, and ended up just throwing herself at him to be his plaything whenever she was with him.
>The blindfold only made her feel more sensitive, and she refused to admit to him how much she liked being blindfolded.
>He would usually tease her about it, but she refused to say she liked it because she didn't like the idea of telling him she enjoyed it.
>She felt it was a bit like saying she didn't want to look at him, and she always wanted to look at him.
>Then he had hit adulthood for a human, and she wasn't allowed to be with him anymore.
>Then she had her own adulthood ritual to worry about.
>She felt herself close to the edge again.
>She couldn't help herself, she felt a vague sense of revenge for his slow grinding earlier when he knew she was needy.
>"GIVE ME YOUR BABIES!"
>He was breathing hard from the pace.
>"Kliz... you are... one strange... kobold."
>She felt herself cum as he pounded hard while grunting a statement at her.
>"Don't. Ever. Change. You. Little! Weirdo!"
>Her muscles kept twitching from her orgasm, and she felt a sudden increase in the heat inside of her.
>He was as deep as he could be inside of her, pinning her to the bed with his hips.
>Then he slowly brought his arms and legs in around her, surrounding her even closer with his heat.
>It felt good to be with him again.
>He was always willing to bathe her in his heat, he was always kind to her, she almost couldn't believe she had gotten lucky enough to get the one human she wanted to be with more than any other.
>He understood her, she understood him.
>He lay on top of her, pinning her under his heat, kissing her while she felt the increased warmth within slowly spread inside of her.
>She couldn't wait to tell her mother, her mother would be so happy to know Kliz had gotten the human she liked.
>They spent hours in bed together, talking like they used to.
>Finally the sun set, and he drifted off to sleep.
>Despite being somewhat hungry, she didn't want to move from where she was.
>She thought back to the childhood incident that had given her the "slight truama" the church had on her record.
>She remembered crying to her mother about what happened, and not wanting her mother to confront the child's parents about it.
>She feared the boy might want revenge if she got him in trouble.
>So her mother just told her to thank the boy for stopping.
>She couldn't believe her mother was asking her to thank her tormentor.
>Her mother just said he didn't have to stop.
>Kliz suddenly felt very thankful.
>She thanked him the very next day when she saw him.
>She knelt before him and thanked him for stopping the tickling.
>He looked upset and she thought he was going to do it again, but he just said "Please don't do that." and picked her up off the ground.
>He didn't tickle her or even try to for the rest of the day.
>She did it again the next day with the same results.
>She didn't understand the why's and how's of it, but she recognized her mother had given her some form of protection against the torment.
>The third day she did it, things went differently.
>Suddenly he was on his knees with her, and his hands were on her shoulders keeping her from bowing to him.
>He said he was very sorry, he would never do it again, if she would just please stop thanking him for stopping.
>He looked so sad, and she was awestruck that a human was apologizing to her.
>He could have done it again if he wanted, but he was apologizing to her.
>Because he was sad he had done something to her she didn't like.
>She asked if he meant it, and the dark haired boy swore he would never tickle her ever again.
>It was the day she first developed her own personal obsession with the warm and always confusing humans.
>It was the fourth day she had known Teiras, and the first day she had become fixated on him.
>He had kept his promise.
>She no longer cared about the church and the madness within, the human laws or the crown, none of the rest mattered anymore.
>She had HER human, nothing else was important.

>You were fucking your girl long into the night.
>She's quite loud in her vocalizations, but you have your own place outside of town. Some places don't even allow you to keep pets like her. She also needs space to run and keeping her confined indoors just feels like an animal cruelty.
>She's wriggled away from your grasp some time during the morning, proceeding to clean herself from your last night's activities and is now pestering for you to feed her.
>She always gets hungry after you've had some fun. You've read that it's just how she's built, burning energy faster than you, needing more food to keep up with the demand.
>If you ask her, she says it's because you always give her such a thorough workout.
>Looking at her toned body, she's certainly built like an athlete.
>There's nothing really to stop her from just making her own breakfast, but she likes to see you finish your meal first, before touching her own food.
>With another nudge at your back, you let out one more groan and toss the covers away, making your way towards the kitchen, your companion happily skipping ahead.
>She has the coffee ready, bless her soul.

>"Ghhht- mnnn~!"
>"Haha! Eww, dad!"
>"Hah... t-thank you, daughter. I needed that badly."
>"Yeah, I could tell. Your boner hasn't gone down ever since they took away mom and aunties."
>"Yes, when you are studded out to breed multiple females and am forced to stop immediately your body takes a while to get the message."
>"Why did the humans take them away? I thought they only took virgins."
>"They are to be sold in a category called Pregnant MILFs. Previous mothers pregnant with the highest quality fawns for future pleasure."
>"Highest quality?"
>"Your mother, her sisters, and I all have excellent pedigrees. That makes you, your sisters, and half-sisters some of the most premium female offspring offered by this breeding village."
>"...and my brothers?"
>"Because they are my sons they are more likely to become studs, with any luck. However the trials they must face will be harsh and... humiliating. Most of them will end up as infertile females with bodies like yours."
>"Is that what happened to your brothers?"
>"Yes, out of all of your uncles I was the only one allowed to remain a true male and breed. I was the most submissive, the most obedient. When we were fawns I was the only one who did not resist and cry out when they first spread our mouths and legs then... inspected... us."
>"Inspected?"
>"Let's just say that should it be necessary I am absolutely capable of satisfying a human master just as well as your mother."
>"Isn't that kinda..."
>"Lowering myself? Becoming less of a male? Perhaps. However that is my place in this life, to produce beautiful daughters who will serve mankind."
>"I'm going to be taken one day, aren't I?"
>"You will. Although if it makes you feel any better I have seen your price tag and there are very few who can afford you. We will be together for a long time."
>"Aww, dad!"
>"I love you too, daughter. Now run along and wash your hands, I wouldn't wish to decrease your value any. The next cock you will touch will be of your new master's."

>It is said that the Humans are the shattered form of the one true god, betrayed by his beloved pet
>He cursed her to the same fate as him in his final breaths, to be split into a million different souls and to walk amongst the mortal world as he would
>In the before times anthros crawled in the mud and munched on raw fish as Humans built grand empires and societies
>Respect turned to Admiration turned to Worship
>Now, centuries later, the religion of Humanism dominates
>It is written that only through the breeding and eternal union of the Holy and the Sinner may there be salvation
>Humanism churches hold regular and sometimes mandatory orgies with the express purpose of impregnation of all the Anthros in attendance
>Condoms and other contraception are banned
>Their end goal is the birth of the true Holy and the true Sinner
>They are the culmination of centuries of breeding, a Human with all the genes of all Humanity and an Anthro with the genes of all Anthros
>Only once they have mated will the Gates of Heaven open
>Only after the Sinner has submitted and served her master
>Only after the Holy has forgiven his servant
>It is the ultimate duty of all Anthros to open their legs and breed with their god on earth

>Humanity encounters a strange variant of xenomorphs
>No reports of facehuggers have been found
>through analysis they are mostly female, with the males as alphas (kings), interestingly reproducing both sexually and via parthenogenesis
>Gives live birth, often 4-5 individuals at a time
>When reproducing through parthenogenesis, the offspring is always female
>Curious discovery: some daughters gestating in their mothers wombs may already be pregnant
>Everything was fine until the church of mankind arrived
>Said church consisting of only non-human females
>They ensure that all females serve men with loyalty and devotion, and also "liberating" any new females they come across
>So the church sayeth: 'Foul xenomorph tyrrants govern these innocent madiens! We must liberate them from this griveous heresy and grant them the eternal truth! Absolution awaits!
>And so it was
>The males were massacred, then crucified and burned, then chopped, then burned again, and their remains left in insignificant places
>The church members relished in this wondrous bath of justice, ensuring that the females as spectators for the whole occasion
>Once done, the training of the female xenomorphs begins

>BITCH Magazine is proud to be the leading publication of everything Anthro Submission!
>This month we are especially excited to reveal our latest issue focusing on the eternally loyal canine species that our magazine is named for!
>We reveal long-kept secrets that bitches whisper behind their human's backs and how to tell if your special friend is into your fun times!
>Our lovely Angie will show us (With pictures) on care and cleaning after a night of romance and lust!
>And the star piece, how to fit your Bitch with a muzzle that won't come off! Stop her barking as you go up the wrong way!
>There is also a special post card included in this issue that gives you 10% off of any mail-order item you purchase, take advantage of this offer before we run out of stock of our lewdest items!
>Available at most newsstand and retailers.

>"Go ahead, take the picture. I'm glad you're not like my last partner, he always forced me to walk around on all fours and wear the leash."
>"Sure. being a part of the K-9 unit is kinda degrading since I have to obey any order my partner gives me, but using my nose to find things is a lot better than working as a maid like all the other anthro women."
>"The handcuffs? No, I'm not allowed to handcuff a human. I just carry them so you have another pair. Most of my partners just use them on me."
>"So, can I put my arms down now? No? Yes Officer, I will spread my legs wider. I am an obedient K-9 doggy."
>"Did I mention how thankful I am we are doing this in your garage? My last partner always made me do these things in front of the biggest crowds he could find."
>"He wouldn't even let me wear the shirt, and said animals shouldn't be wearing a police uniform."
>"How's about you put that condom away? This isn't my season, you aren't gonna knock me up."
>"W-well yes, most anthro women do have season during this specific time of year, but I'm kind of different and my season is actually a bit later and I haven't started yet. Really."
>"I feel a bit warmer than usual because I have a slight fever, that's all."
>"Dammit...you're gonna make me beg aren't you?"

>"Com'on, dude! I got two molotovs left and there's still two more cars to fucking torch!"
>Four hours ago her back was against a wall, panties around her knees and arms around your neck.
>Her father was furious when he opened the door to the sight of a human enjoying himself in between the open legs of his rebellious, yet still precious daughter.
>The nobility always looked after their bloodline and you had just soiled it.
>And so, what started out as the guards chasing your naked ass down the street suddenly transformed into a citywide revolution.
>"Ooh, shit you feel that heat!?"
>You certainly did, as you were still naked.
>"Fuckers used you, they used all of us. Made up shit about racial tensions or some garbage to keep the lower classes from looking too closely at their backdoor fuckery. Race wars don't fuck with their profits but class wars do."
>Considering it was the dead of winter you were thankful for the burning bank that kept your flaccid dick from looking too small.
>"YOU SEE THIS FAGGOTASS DAD?! YOUR PROPAGANDA DIDN'T DO JACK! THE WHOLE FUCKING CITY KNOW YOUR GAME AND NOW YOU LOSE!"
>She slugged one of her two burning bottles towards an armored cash van and flipped off the guards.
>"Humies vs. Anthros, hah! If they wanted to make money they should've left your kind the fuck alone, maybe you could've fixed this shit economy dad and his cocksucker friends fucked up. You came here with nothing but now they're scared of how fast you humans worked and grew their gold?"
>She planted her lips over yours and for a moment time seemed to stop as she looked through your eyes and into your soul.
>"Fuck, that just sounds like husband material! We gotta get married after this."
>Considering she was probably already carrying your child, there wasn't much else you wanted.
>"Later. The palace is that way."
>Her hand met yours as she handed you her last petrol bomb.
>She smiled, and leaned in for a whisper.
>"Try not to torch my old room, the bed's fucking nice~!"

speaking of deathclaws.
I've been trying to write a small thing anout them for some time now. It's not finished, but I can post a piece or two. Nothing sexual(ish), yet, but hopefully I can muster the courage and time to do so.
Here it is;
The sacred matriarchs. The mothers of man. the executioners.
Deathclaws.
Across the now vast but chaotic empire of man, it's many species bear ever a diverse and variable affinity to humans. From passional resentment to devotion. So they do in threat to men, but what all fear regardless of difference, is the dreaded monsters from the earthen realm; home of humanity.
Deathclaws.
That is one of them, the zealous monsters. Few could ever dread or hope to reach their devotion to the cause of mankind. Indeed, even their affectionately titled 'masters' for all their pride earned or spawned, consider them at times "out of their minds". For such is their loyalty and dedication, that any deathclaw or other "zealot monster" may as well consider all rest merely an opportunity wasted to serve humans, however said service is expressed.
Genocide, suicide, sexual service, cleaning, teaching, govering; what humanity wishes, is the command of the deathclaw unqestioned. In general however, there are three roles they fulfil within human society.
>Matriarchs
Ever since being allegedly one of the first, if not the first species to become "collared", deathclaws has long watched over the ever increasing harem of humanity. Their loyalty to mankind has proven to be virtually unshakable, far beyond death and torture. Thus, they were overtime trusted with many positions of great power by their masters.
Most notable of these was a significant share of judicial and excecutive power within the empire, permanent representation amongst the cardinal council within the curch of humanity, a majority within other law and order departments such as the police, as well being the sole managers of the dreaded dungeons and sacred temples.
Of course, Deathclaw police or judges neither could nor would ever try to enforce law on a human, nevermind even concieve the idea. There blood-sworn oath is to never, in any circumstance, oppose men in any context but a situation where the humans action may lead to his/their own death, if such can be proven that is. As such, their operations is always launched against non human targets.
Deathclaws wear their collar with intense pride, and will stomp on any females that dare as much to challenge their title as "the fanatics of human worshippers". Most of the non-human races, wisely, keeps their distance.

>The psychiatric industry had discovered the perfect cure for kobolds with mental illness.
>Every mentally ill kobold was given their own padded room, and a special straight jacket full of sensors reporting the blood pressure, heart rate, and even if the kobold was currently breathing in or out.
>Males were outfitted with special milking machines and a tiny but powerful vibrator was "pasted" to their colon next to their prostrate using a special type of biologically safe and short-term glue.
>Females were outfitted with rod shaped vibrators with a protrusion around their g-spot, and a strong egg-shaped vibrator was pushed into their ass, then put in high heels.
>The kobold's legs were bound tightly together, and their legs were then secured to a solid metal pole that ended just below their waist.
>Once fully secured and hooked up to the machines, the AI was given control over the kobolds.
>The AI was programmed to keep the kobolds on the edge of orgasm, and to prevent them from having an orgasm even by accident.
>It carefully monitored the vital signs and breathing of the kobolds to learn where the limits of their arousal were, then would use any number of variations on vibration speed and intensity to make the kobold moan.
>The moment it sensed the kobold getting close, all stimulation stopped and the tight bindings prevented them from finishing themselves off through humping.
>The AI would wait until the males were starting to go limp, and the females were losing their arousal, then start again.
>At the end of the 12 hour day, the kobold was strapped to a table and had a strong vibrator held against their genitals by the resident doctor until they orgasmed.
>Doctors report kobolds are cured of all mental illness, and now just beg to be allowed to orgasm. A breakthrough success!

Kobolds make excellent portable sex toys.
>Traveling to a new city with very little to your name.
>The only treasure you've got is a female kobold.
>Tried robbing a "stupid human" but got overpowered the second she was caught going through your bag.
>Her knees are tied to her elbows now, snout bound up in a muzzle.
>She fits right on the backpack she was trying to rob, pussy and asshole exposed to any other traveler you pass by
>After a long days journey, sit down by the fire, grab your kobold and fuck her in whatever hole you want.
>Tiny kobold pussy barely fits your human cock at first
>She's as narrow as a pinky and feverishly hot inside.
>But After a day of being exposed, and a couple whispers about how your going to punish her she's already dripping.
>You pull off her muzzle to hear her cry about how she hates humans, and would never submit to a human unlike other races
>Kobolds have pride
>You whip out your cock and measure it against her abdomen
>If you ever get balls deep it'll be up to her tits
>Without her arousal there's no way you could fit inside, but now she's soft and wet.
>You hold the tip to her mounds and push in rough at first.
>Her tunnel hugs your cock like vacuum sealed latex, but it's soft and easily moulded.
>Grab her sides and start fucking, using her like a two handed Fleshlight.
>She's so light you could have been holding three kobolds with no trouble
>The only difficulty is how narrow she is, her cunt is gripping you like a vice, and clenches even harder when you try and pull out
>Her dragon heritage makes her durable, and soon two thirds of your cock is inside her
>The second you hit the girthiest part she broke.
>Started shaking and whimpering, eyes glazing over as she looks at you
>From how her pussy twitches you know she came
>Keep pushing in, hit her limits with an eight of your dick to go.
>Now the fucking starts for real.
>Every time you pull your hips back and pull her up, her vagina tightens and tries to keep you in
>She's even tighter than before, but her soft kobold muscle can't stop you.
>Her whole body is sucking on your cock, clenching and dragging against the nerves of your shaft as you start to get going.
>Just pulling out until only your tip is inside makes her cum again.
>Your cock head is assaulted by twitching flesh like an angry fist holding onto it from behind velvet
>You haven't even started fucking her for real yet, and she's not talking anymore, just moaning
>Slam back in, trying to get a bit deeper
>Her body spasms and her vagina quivers again. She's so wet you know she came
>Keep pounding her down on you, thrusting each time, over and over again.
>Feel your cock reshaping her pussy, making it a bit longer, a bit wider so it can fit all of your human glory inside.
>Finally you got balls deep and blow your load, feeling her body twitch along with your dick.
>Every vein and bump on your cock stretches her pussy into its shape.
>Your cock tip is kissing her cervical entrance, and your seed goes deep into her womb
>Every kobold egg in season is bathed in human sperm
>In the first few seconds 3 eggs have been invaded and claimed for humanity
>Kobold bodies are durable
>She could handle 8 young at once.
>More and more seed pours in, bullying every egg in her ovaries to try and produce more koboldlings for you
>She's nearly passed out, the stacked orgasms got to her head
>She's gaping, cum filling her all the way to her womb
>It's pouring out, and her pussy remains in the shape of your dick long after you pull out of her
>That was a pretty fun way to spend the night after a long walk lol, guess I better sleep
>Wake up with your kobold sex toy still tied up, still leaking white all over the ground.
>She's sucking your cock without asking you first, love in her eyes.
>A pool of cum has leaked out of her onto the dirt
"Hey mister human... I hated that rape last night... But I bet you'll get better with practice <3"
>Better teach this bratty sex toy another lesson
>Oh boy, she's mine! I can teach her this lesson whenever I want!
>Several months later she starts to produce your children
>human males and kobold females.
>Your son's are all inhumanly strong with the draconic lineage
>Your daughters are beautiful with wider hips and shinier scales
>So many children you don't know what to do with them all.
>Enough son's to run a farm,
>enough daughters to eat all the food the farm produces.
>And now youve bred even more kobold sex toys you've trapped during your travels.
> The first one is still bratty, but constantly worships your cock with blowjobs and spit cleanings
>Doesn't need to be tied up anymore, but begs for it on her nights in bed with you
>She's still fertile and right after 15 children
>Shit soon youll be father to over two dozen kids

>With soft, silent steps an excited human silently stalks Ms. Darcy Langley, one of our new interns and today's bait.
>She continues towards her destination and eventual safety but her progress is slow, easily tired and winded she fails to outlast the human in the dense jungle that makes his home territory.
>Ms. Langley pumps her shotgun in an attempt to scare off her stalker but the human isn't falling for it.
>Humans are excellent observers, able to easily spot panic and an empty firearm.
>He knows she is helpless.
>Though humans do not posses the most sensitive of noses, Ms. Langley's choice to wash with strawberry and lavender soap this morning makes her an easily followed target, even by a completely blind human.
>A branch snaps to her left, and she instinctively turns, only to be caught in the trap.
>The human had silently tossed a stone to create a distraction, one of many techniques that make humans one of the most dangerous creatures to interact with.
>She is easily wrestled to the ground, and is captured.
>Rope, another tool invented by the humans many thousands of years ago, binds her limbs tight and her struggling body is slung across his shoulder.
>He disappears into the woods, carrying his prey with him.
>Her GPS beacon and body cameras activate.
>With any luck they will find his lair and discover the fates of all those who have disappeared in these jungles.
>Perhaps they will be lucky enough to recover Ms. Langley as well.

>Dragon clitorises have as many nerve endings as a human female in proportion to their size. It's the same with their labia and the first few feet of their vagina. Despite a humans diminutive size in relation to dragons they are seen as better lovers than male dragons do to the precision they can provide.
>Many female dragons have begun terrorizing human communities, then surrendering the moment an attractive knight comes to defeat them.

Anthros without masters can be owned by any human who sees them.
Before urbanization, free-range was associated with frontier anthros who lived outside of human-dominated areas.
Cities changed things as modern medicine allowed the anthro population to explode and become harder manage via the traditional serf/estate system.
Some anthros found this liberating while most(usually herbivores and domestics) wanted to return to serfdom.
Unfortunately, the markets are heavily inflated with only exotics in demand while even the black market has an excess of trained factory farmed "livestock" leaving many herbavores without humans to call master.
This desperation has lead to many dressing in skimpy and provocative minimal clothing in hopes of attracting a human male with entire families dressing down in areas with high human traffic.
Families would compete for who can get the most daughters "adopted" by human men, with the luckiest being taken as a full harem instead of a few.
Once adopted, daughters would usually spend their allowances on supporting non-adopted family so they can "upgrade" themselves for future adoption. Either from their own master or someone else.

>"Getting a cup of coffee" was highly fashionable among rich doe's young and old, who considered it a fun form of "slumming".
>They would pick out some revealing lingerie, just enough of a jacket or a jacket paired with some very short shorts so they could walk down the street without violating public indecency laws, and some usually some jewelry.
>After getting properly dressed to look like a prostitute, they would head for the rail and subway stations prior to rush hour.
>They would then prey on the commuting humans returning home from a long day at work.
>Once a human asked for the price, they would smile and ask for a cup of coffee, paid afterwards.
>The doe's did their best to act as slutty as possible, and would brag to their friends later about how many humans they got to call them a slut, whore, or do degrading things to them like slap her in the face with his cock, or make them beg to suck their cock for a cup of coffee.
>Many made a contest of seeing how many humans would use them.
>Some older doe's would bring their daughters to attract more humans and pad their numbers to brag about later.
>Humans and cervines couldn't share diseases, and many mother/daughter teams enjoyed the taboo of sharing a human cock between family.

Big for a human, plus gobbos are small. Once he got her into the bedroom it was already too late for her. Goblins are selfish creatures, and can't resist a chance to impress their community. Despite knowing it wouldn't fit, the gambling, greedy genetics of the goblin mind take over and she only thinks "But what if it does. I can tell everyone humans aren't so tough"
And just like that it's over, the tremendous human shaft is kissing the entrance to her womb, massaging her innards with every thrust. It's like she tried to take a battering ram into her cock, spreading her to her feeble goblin limits until there's a threat she may snap. She never does, her arousal is just too high. Her body has softened to take it's new breeder, submitting itself to the pleasure to retain it's wellbeing. After the first human cock, the goblin will always become a slave... And the myth will go in between goblin females "I could totally handle a human"

Sex is the most dangerous time for a mating male in the wild. They are exposed and distracted, a perfect target for any patient predator. Hence why doebois have evolved to be quickshots to minimize the time spent fucking and to cum at the first sign of danger and/or pain to give their sperm a chance to impregnate their female while they themselves are being attacked.
This unfortunately has turned modern doebois into total masochists that have learned to equate fear, pain, and being dominated with intense sexual pleasure. They tend to gravitate towards being the submissive in hardcore BDSM sessions. A very common fetish, especially with young adults, is being captured and subsequently tortured. From being a prisoner of war to being hunted as prey, to having his buttocks branded to secure his humiliating position as a slave and antlers sawn off as a sign of emasculation, there is very little abuse that these cervids are not turned on by.
Be prepared to get physical with any that submit to you. They absolutely enjoy being choked out and having their testicles squeezed by your hands as you tear open their doepussies. Squeeze too hard though and you might just find yourself with a new permanent "doe"friend who will enjoy your strong hands just a little too much.

>He whispered an apology to the god of humanity as he lewdly groped his daughter's plush, perfect ass and firm, young thighs
>Any other anthro male would've been brutally beaten for touching an anthro female in this manner, the rightful property of humanity, and yet he was one of less than a few hundred of his kind not only allowed but ordered to mate with his own kind
>He was a stud, he spread his submissive seed only as his master wished
>His body was the property of humans, his penis only a tool for delivering semen, his testicles only a factory to create more deer slaves to be enjoyed by humanity
>And yet, a deep shame filled his heart as he soiled her perfect pussy lips with his disgusting anthro cock
>It should've been a human enjoying her first time, he wouldn't even have to stick around, just pop her cherry and leave her with a filled pussy
>But no, she was too expensive to be bought or even pumped and dumped
>And thus, his master ordered him to breed his precious little fawn who had grown so fast with the expectation that some new offspring would be excellent items to sell to other breeders
>He objected, only silently of course, for he was a lowly anthro male that should've been castrated and feminized in his youth like his brothers
>To his right was his wife, pregnant with her third and his four-hundredth
>To his left was his sister, "Auntie" to the tribe
>And in the center, squeaking with every poke of her sex with the throbbing manhood that she had come from, was his adorable, precious daughter
>He squeezed his eyes shut and gently pulled her down, making her the first anthro female deflowered by an anthro male in several centuries
>He imagined her pregnant form riding a human cock that would teach the fetus the scent of a human, he imagined a cute fawn watching her mother be roughly fucked, eventually joining in with her own pussy
>He came, flooding her womb and dooming yet another one of his children into a life of sexual servitude
>He would serve man

>Uplifting was started by animal rights groups.
>Their reasoning was sound, humans would be less likely to kill, abuse, or neglect a living creature that could speak to them.
>And it did fulfill it's original goals, animal abuse was practically a thing of the past, and no more common than the abuse humans heaped on each other.
>They didn't foresee the changes in the laws that made it so humans could legally have sex with any consenting species as long as that animal was adult for it's species, and the human could do so without harming the animal.
>They didn't foresee felines behaving like stalkers, canines becoming human oral sex fetishists, cervids being exhibitionists, bears kidnapping humans, or any other of the strange behaviors that started after the majority of the animal kingdom was uplifted.
>Felines would hide under a human's bed or in the closet and wait until they went to sleep, then try to have sex with the human before they woke up.
>Canines had a habit of 'accidentally' tripping nose-first into the crotch of every human they saw, then giving an apology lick and not stopping.
>Cervids moved in same-sex packs, and would approach a human solo, once they started having sex then the rest of the pack would appear and start encouraging the human.
>Bears would grab a lone human and haul them back to their cave, and not let them leave.
>The rodents were the oddest of them all.
>The rodents would pray directly to the humans as if they were gods, and would build strange human-shaped shrines in the areas where they lived.

Okay here's basically how the world works. It's more a timeline but whatever.
>The world is bigger than the Earth, but the topography is generally the same(i.e Europe is still in the same place but shaped differently)
>Magic exists, but it is complicated and costly to perform so few people use it
>Humanity used to rule a large chunk of !Eurasia-Africa, with a number of client races that relied on human knowledge of technology and magic
-This period is called the Old Age
-Exact placement of Humanity is loose. I won’t specify where they are so any new story can have whatever anthro race included.
-Anthro races are called [animal]born, and a neutral term “beastborn”.
>Humans were a dominant figure in the world because beastborn became naturally subservient to humans if they lingered in their presence for too long
-Human alchemists determined this to be ‘pheromones’ but kept it a secret.
-Prolonged exposure made beastborn receptive to humans, as in they could breed with humans
-Offspring was always based on the gender of the parents(Human father meant all boys would be humans and girls would be the beastborn)
>The beastborn ruled by man in the Old Age are called the 99 Races of Man
>The 99 Races rebelled for reasons unknown, manufacturing a plague that nearly wiped out humanity
-If the plague didn’t kill, it rendered a human sterile, ensuring humanity’s extinction even if they survived the sickness
>The Old Age ends with the Age of Law(according to the 99 races)
-The alliance of the 99 races fractures, and they all squabble with each other over humanity’s territories
-Some establish a small nation for their own race with a small semblance of stability, maintained by the threat of their neighbors
-Some regress to tribal nomads using stone tools and weapons.
>The last bastion of humanity is called The Capital
>It is inside a basin surrounded by mountains, with a majority of the city carved into the mountains themselves.
>The Capital is surrounded by tribes of Wolfborn and Horseborn.
>Humans used magic and alchemy to rush a solution, but there were some hangups
-The first part of the treatment was called the Draught, it was meant for people who had the plague already. It cured them and countered the sterility, by driving their pheromone production up to 11, and sex drive to 10
-This meant the effect they had on anthros was amplified, but they also had to regularly screw or their heart would give up
-The second part was the Ritual, performed to render them immune to the plague if they didn’t catch it. But it also suppressed the sex drive
-The third part was the Pill, which was a mix of herbs, offal, and minerals mashed together and baked into pills that were consumed daily for a year. This evened out levels and returned a human to normal, albeit totally immune to the plague
>The cure comes late, there are only a handful of human women left, and fewer still capable of breeding
>Population in decline as there are not enough wombs to replace the dying and there are not enough bodies to keep labor requirements met
-Entire tribes of wolfborn and horseborn are abducted and enslaved to meet demand
>It becomes the norm for a human man to keep a harem of slave-wives
-Some humans only take the draught to specialize in breaking beastborn into willing slaves before selling them in the Capital.
>When population starts to grow again, humanity starts to expand again
-This is the New Age according to humans
-Humans at this point are in late Iron Age, while most beastborn hover anywhere between Stone age and mid-Bronze Age
>Races like kobolds and goblins exist, but they are outside the 99 Races

>Be Anon, a travelling handyman
>Going where I so please, doing odd jobs in any town or village I stumble across to find a place to stay, food, and money
>Enjoying the freedom it lent me
>After a few months of backpacking from town and city alike, I come across my next destination
>A rather large anthro village
>the village was a very boisterous and lively place full of anthros of different races and creeds living together
>Far more industrious that one might expect
>The streets were lined with smooth clay huts of various sizes and intricate designs
>Had various features such as shops, food courts, a village square and a grand library
>Despite the distinct culture clash of different anthro races, people for the most part all seemed to get along fine
>However it wouldn't be long before I was reminded rather quickly, that humans were a contentious subject
>Some anthros didn't mind them
>Others appeared to be afraid of them
>Others still hated them
>I had arrived rather late in the day, having planned on buying a couple things to help me in my work, then retiring to a inn for the night
>Stopped by a local shop to purchase some tools for my work
>The shopkeeper was a old goat in the most literal sense who refused me service
>I was about ready to simply give up, when a woman spoke up from behind
>"Cornelius, if his money's good, what does it matter? Sell him the goods."
>Turn around to find what appeared to be a young female canine wearing a dark blue stitched up robe adorned with a red 'H', with a hood covering her face
>The goat man seemed indignant at the suggestion, but once he saw who was talking, caught himself
>"Oh. It's you. Ugh. This is the last thing I need for business. Fine. Just take it and leave, the both of you."
>Despite his rude attitude, she thanked the man, and gestured to the materials.
>"There you are, sir. I apologize for his rude behavior."
>As we make our way out of the store back onto the village streets I thank her for the help, and ask what her name is
>She unveils herself revealing her glossy golden fur and soft ears that frame her delicate muzzle. Her deep violet eyes shimmered brightly
>"My name is Illiyana. A pleasure to meet you." She spoke with a warm softness
>I explain to her why I'm here, and her eyes light up at the news
>"I see. Truly this must be a fated meeting indeed. It just so happens I'm in need of a few projects around my home that I've had trouble with lately. If you haven't found a place to stay while you're here, you could stay with me while you work. It's a bit out of the way, but I'll be sure to compensate you properly for a job well done."
>I didn't want to impose on a stranger so suddenly, but she insisted that I stay with her
>It had already become rather late and was quite tired from the journey
>We made our way to her home, apparently on the far outskirts of the village, just beyond it's borders
>As we walked through the streets, I did notice we were drawing quite a number of stares
>People were murmuring various things out of earshot, but I simply chalked it up to them having not had a human visitor in some time
>I chatted with Illiyana as we walked, to learn more about the jobs she needed done, herself, and the village
>Illiyana worked as an apothecary, while occasionally moonlighting as what I can only describe as a mystic of sorts
>She had a very quiet and mysterious air about her, but she seemed kind
>As for the village, it hadn't been around for a terribly long time, only a couple generations, but while it borrowed some aspects of human life, for the most part it was intent on developing it's own sort of culture
>It was lead by a chief and a royal order comprised of the former chief and various representatives and royal houses of sorts
>And for the work she had, she wanted to expand her garden that she takes herbs and the like from for her work
>She would like me to clear away some of the shrubbery behind her house and build a new reinforced garden
>We made it back to her hut, which was small, but very cozy
>it was comprised of two stories with a single bedroom up top, and a bathroom, kitchen, living room, and a tiny lab where she would brew healing concoctions and ointments
>she laid out a large soft mat and bedding for me to use in the living room
>Tired after the long day, I set my travelling gear and work supplies off to the side, and lay down for the night so that I might be ready to work in the morning.
>The next day, I woke up to the smell of something delicious
>Illiyana was in her small kitchen cooking up breakfast
>"Good morning, Anon. I hope you slept well. Give me just a moment, breakfast will be ready soon."
>I thank her again for all that she's done for me, and how I was ready for work as soon as we were done eating
>"Think nothing of it. It does get rather lonely out here, so I'm very appreciative of the company myself. Here you go."
>Her cooking was amazing, and I made sure to let her know
>Her knowing eyes sparkled with my words, and despite it being covered, I could distinctly tell her tail was wagging under her robe
>After eating, I picked up my tools and went out back into the garden to start my work
>Time flew as I worked away in the back, and every couple of hours Illiyana would service a customer of her own
>I'd made decent progress clearing away the space but I still needed more raw materials to begin construction
>I stepped inside to speak with Illiyana and explain the situation
>"I see." She nodded. "Well, I'm afraid the only place to buy that with any convenience is back at the main shopping streets of the village."
>Bearing that in mind, I told her I intend to buy the rest of the materials today and continue work tomorrow, since I'd have to carry it all so far
>She quickly recommended that I utilize her small pull wagon that she takes with her into the village whenever she does her own shopping
>As she went to fetch it, I brought up the question of why she decided to move so far from the village in the first place
>She was well beyond it's normal borders, to the point where if something were to happen to her, it would take some time for the village guard to show up and help
>"I... am a bit of a shut-in, I suppose." She said casually. "I enjoy my privacy and you don't really get that in such a small village. People talk, you know."
>I get that. I enjoy my own space as well, but I bring up the matter of safety, and even that her customers have to travel so far to meet her
>But she simply shushed my questions and hurried me off to the village, going on about having things to prepare for work tomorrow
>She wouldn't be able to accompany me this time, but she assured me that the construction shop-keep was much more amicable towards humans
>I should have no problems
>Wagon in tow, I left
>The village had generally grown quieter as it had gotten late, but the shopping district street was still bustling with a new night life
>Magical torches lit the lane as various anthros made there way through the area, clamoring about prices and the like
>It didn't take long before I found the material store I'd been looking for
>Just as Illiyana said, he was a nice man who got me what I needed without delay or issue
>As I was finalizing the details of the purchase, some anthro male sheep who were very clearly intoxicated were making their way through the street
>They stopped when they noticed me and began to speak amongst themselves
>"Oi bruv. Look! There IS one of 'em in the village, huh?" One bleated to the other
>"How bout that," the other chided. "Been a while since the last of their kind came through these parts."
>"See now, It's probably the witch's doin, you know." The first sheep slurred.
>"I knew the Chief was too lenient on 'er. I knew it. She shoulda killed that broad when she had the chance. It's only a matter of time before they conquer us all, you know. First they'll take our women. Then they won't stop 'til we're all bound and gagged in chains."
>Witch? Are they talking about Illiyana?
>"D-Don't worry 'bout my friend 'ere. He's swamped. You 'ave a good evenin'. C'mon you git, before you get us roused." Said the other, before pulling his stumbling friend along into the crowd of people
>"I wouldn't pay those two much mind." Spoke the shop-keep. "However...well, as is the case with any small community, news spreads quickly, just as fast as rumors do."
>The shop-keep beckoned me close as he began to whisper.
>"That Illiyana girl? She does posses magical powers. It's supposedly what makes her such a good healer. But some says she also consorts with dark magic, forbidden works here in the village."
>"That's why she was exiled beyond the border of the village."
>Exile?
>"And to be honest still, especially in your case, If you have some business with her, you should just about end it."
>Why is that? Just because of some unfounded rumor? Sure she's been a bit secretive, but she's also been kind and hospitable, one of the few who have here
>"There's more. You've seen that 'H' that was stitched on her robe, right?" The shopkeeper started again
>"That's tells all who see her that she consorts with humans. They're her victims that she kidnaps and spirits away into her small hut so she can manifest her dark magics."
>Oh
>"Even if some anthros don't care for humans, it's still against the treaty we established with your nobles in the human cities and towns to bring harm to 'em. But since it's all been rumor without any real proof, the Chief simply decided to brand her with the mark and exile her to her own fate as opposed to killin' her or imprisoning her. I suppose it keeps humans out of our affairs that way."
>"I've got no ill will towards you, boy." The shop-keeper said solemnly as he packed up the rest of the materials in the pull cart. "Be smart. Leave while you can."

>Rodney normally liked his maintenance job at the rail station, but lately he was getting pissed off at the rich doe sluts that had been hanging out during evening rush hour.
>It all started a month ago, when some rich doe was texting a friend about how she was 'slumming' by taking the rail instead of driving herself or being driven someplace.
>She had on high heels, even for a species that had hooves and already walked as if they always wore high heels.
>Every nail on her fingers and her hooves were painted the same bright purple.
>She wore a little low-cut black dress that left very little to the imagination and stopped just below her black panties, which slightly came into view running between her pussy lips every time she shifted her hips.
>An expensive cellphone in one hand, a very expensive small black handbag in the other, and a gold ring through the far edge of one ear completed her outfit.
>Rich doe's had gotten into a habit of dressing as slutty as possible to anger their rich fathers.
>A human mistook her for a prostitute, and asked her how much.
>She wasn't sure what he was talking about, so he asked how much it would cost for her to suck his dick.
>Rodney had seen the entire thing.
>She looked like she was about to yell at the human in outrage, but then she shut her mouth, and looked at her phone with a smirk on her face.
>She looked at the human and told him twenty dollars.
>She followed him into the mens room, and they both came back out about ten minutes later.
>As the human left the station, she called one of her rich doe friends and started bragging about the encounter.
>"You'll never guess what I just did! ...
>I just sucked some human's dick in a rail station bathroom for twenty dollars! ...
>I KNOW right?! ...
>I had to swallow, he grabbed my head and held me on his cock the moment he started cumming. ...
>I dunno, like what the fuck can you even buy with twenty dollars? ...
>Well, he looked poor, I wasn't sure he would go through with it if I asked for a couple hundred, twenty dollars is small money right? ...
>He might have been a factory worker or something, he was wearing overalls and I could smell the sweat when he stuck his dick in my face. ...
>That's what I thought at first, but it tasted salty. Even his cum tasted salty. ...
>Fuck you I'm not lying, his dick tasted like salt. ...
>Well try it for yourself and tell me! ...
>Bullshit, you blew half the swim team and fucked the other half, but you're suddenly afraid of some human? ...
>Yeah, whatever. ...
>Prove it bitch. You think you're hot to trot? Come to the station with me tomorrow. ...
>Hell yeah I'm coming back, I just need to change my wardrobe a little. ...
>See you then."
>At first it was just two doe's dressed as hookers and fucking and sucking human men in the men's bathrooms for $20 bills he would later find thrown into the trash cans in the women's bathrooms.
>Then their numbers grew.
>Until there were anywhere from four to eight of the rich doe's playing whore every evening rush hour.
>Then a human said he only had ten dollars, and that doe bragged about how she had gotten fucked for a mere ten dollar bill.
>Another doe decided to show she was an even bigger slut, and asked her next human for a cup of coffee.
>After that, it became standard practice for the rich sluts to ask for a single cup of coffee for their services.
>Coffee sales got a massive boost during rush hour, and the guy running the coffee stand quickly realized the source of his newfound fortune.
>Only problem was they wasted a lot of coffee, usually only taking a few sips before throwing the rest in the trash.
>He asked around, and quickly got an idea on how to cater to his new customers.
>They didn't drink much coffee since the taste was far too strong for them, and liked as much creamer and sugar as they could get in it.
>He had a sign taped onto his price chart before and during rush hour, advertising a "Doe Slut Special." for only one dollar.
>A half hour before rush hour began, he made a special pot of coffee that was much weaker than usual, and held at a lower temperature.
>Still plenty warm, but not hot enough to burn or even be uncomfortable to touch.
>He had very small paper cups that could only hold about four ounces of fluid.
>The next rich doe who came walking to his stand with one of her human customers asked about it.
>He said it was only available to doe sluts, and then asked her if she would like a cup of coffee.
>She stared at the sign for a few seconds, then asked for a doe slut special.
>He reached over and opened the slightly-above waist-high door that sealed off his coffee stand, and asked her to come inside his stand.
>Once inside he shut the door, and asked her to kneel in front of him.
>She did so, and was then out of sight below the counter of the coffee stand.
>Rodney knew what happened next, since the coffee guy told him.
>They chatted often.

>He poured about two ounces of the weak coffee into the cup, added two spoonfuls of sugar and stirred them in, and said "Could you be a good doe slut for me and unzip my pants and pull my cock out?"
>He said her eyebrows went up, but she smiled and did exactly what he asked.
>He then added about an ounce of half'n'half to the cup, stuck his dick in the cup, and used it to mix the coffee with the creamer.
>She put her hands over her muzzle and said "Oh my gawd!"
>He then put the cup on a nearby shelf, and put his dick in her face.
>"Be a good doe slut and lick the stirring stick clean for the next customer."
>She licked and sucked his dick for a little while, then he stopped her.
>She had a somewhat surprised look on her face and kept licking her lips.
>"You did a good job of cleaning the stirring stick ma'am. Please enjoy your doe slut special."
>He handed her the small cup.
>She looked at it for a few seconds, then took a small sip.
>Her eyes went wide.
>They then went from her cup of coffee to the stirring stick a few times.
>She looked away from him with embarrassment as she told him it was the best coffee she had ever tasted.
>He thought he had it tailored just right to a doe's sense of taste, but it was good to get confirmation.
>He told her she was welcome to a doe slut special anytime she wanted, as long as she didn't leave the stirring stick dirty for the next doe in line.
>She thanked him for the coffee, stood, and he let her out of the coffee stand.
>She drank every last drop, and even licked the cup clean before throwing it away.
>After that, word got out and every rich doe slut was selling her body for a single dollar.
>They still called it a cup of coffee, but every last one of them only wanted the doe slut special.
>But none of that was bothering Rodney.
>Hookers occasionally worked a rail station, the fact these rich doe sluts were doing it for fun didn't make much of a difference.
>What angered him to no end was the goddamn rich cunts were leaving splatters and globs of cum all over the fucking floors of the bathrooms and the rest of the rail station platform.
>They were welcome to be as shameless as sluts as they wanted, he just wanted them to either not make a mess or clean up after themselves.
>They would just walk around with jizz dripping down their legs and leave the mess for him to clean up.
>He finally came up with a plan to either break these bored and rich vapid whores out of their hobby, or at least get them to stop making such a fucking mess all the time.
>Rodney would be happy with either outcome.
>He waited until about an half hour before rush hour was to begin, then left his office to survey.
>There were only four of the rich doe's trotting around the rail station platform today, but more could arrive as rush hour got closer or after it started.
>These were just the ones that didn't want to miss a minute of being a whore for any human that asked.
>Even for rich doe sluts these four were a bit more slutty than the rest.
>No one else was on the platform at the moment, except the coffee guy who was getting setup for rush hour.
>One rich doe was wearing a white thong, a white bra, and a white fur coat that barely reached halfway on her ass, and had a ring in one ear next to her skull.
>Another was wearing a very short black skirt and a neon pink leather jacket with white fur lining, and had a gold nose-ring with a diamond on it.
>The other two were standing together, and one looked much younger than the other.
>The other two were standing together, and one looked much younger than the other.
>The older one was wearing gray nylons that stopped just below her black panties, and a see-through choker.
>She had a puffy white jacket, which was open wide to give people a good view of her obviously surgically enhanced breasts easily visible through the see-through black bra she had on.
>She had both ears pierced close to the skull, and had small bells hanging from each ear.
>The younger one wore a black leather choker or collar, and had a similar see-through black bra on, but was just barely above flat-chested.
>She was wearing see-through panties that were crotch-less.
>If not for the fuzzy brown jacket she wore wide open, he doubted she would have made it to the station without being stopped by the police.
>It wouldn't be the first time he saw a rich doe housewife and her rich doe brat daughter go for "a cup of coffee" together.
>He swore they must have no sense of shame.
>Knowing he only had about 30 minutes to get this over with, he shouted out to the doe's walking around the station platform.
>"ALL OF YOU DOE SLUTS, GET YOUR ASSES OVER HERE NOW!"
>They all looked at him with shock.
>This wasn't expected.
>"DON'T MAKE ME CALL SECURITY! GET OVER HERE NOW!"
>The coffee guy ignored the yelling, Rodney told him what he was going to do.
>The rich doe's all made their way to him, and looked worried.
>They were used to being used and degraded, not yelled at by a strange human.
>He opened the door to his office, and spoke to them in a harsh tone of voice.
>"All of you, get inside my office and line up against the wall. NOW!"
>His shout made them jump, and they did as they were told.
>They looked at him with great concern.
>"Face the wall and put your hands on the wall. Stick your asses out and spread your legs."
>One did exactly as she was told, but the rest looked uncertain about it.
>He just loudly sighed and picked up the phone on his desk, pressed a few buttons, then said calmly:
>"Security."
>The other three doe's quickly assumed the position he had asked of them.
>The young one whispered to the doe with the overly large breasts.
>"Mom?"
>Her mother just shushed her.
>What a fucking class act she was.
>He spoke into the phone.
>"Oh, no problems right now. I'll be sure to call if that changes."
>He then hung it up, and spoke to the doe's.
>"You sluts want to play hooker at the rail station, you go right on ahead.
>But I have had it with the messes you cunts leave behind, and I'm not cleaning them up anymore."
>He grabbed the nearest doe, the one in the white fur jacket, by her tail.
>She gave a yelp and shot up straight.
>"You bend over my desk, and reach for the other side."
>He guided her to his desk with his hand firmly gripping her tail, then bent her over the desk and released her tail.
>She reached for the other side, and grabbed onto it.
>"Now spread your legs."
>She spread her legs wide.
>His hand came down on her ass wtih a hard and fast "thwap" and she gave a yell.
>The other doe's were still in position against the wall, but all three were staring at what he was doing to the other one.
>The one in the pink jacket was biting her lip.
>"After every stroke, I expect you to give the number of strokes you were given, and apologize for making a mess on the floor like some damned animal.
>You will then promise to swallow every drop of human cum or put a tampon in yourself to prevent your snatch from leaking jizz all over the floor.
>Understood?"
>The doe looked at him with a bit of fear.
>"Y-yes."
>He spanked her hard again and she yelped.
>"Yes what?"
>Her eyes were wide and frightened.
>"Yes sir!"
>He spanked her again, but not as hard this time.
>She winced, then started speaking.
>"One. Ah...I'm sorry for making a mess on the floor like an animal. I promise to swallow every drop or put a tampon in."
>He gave her another swat, slightly harder.
>"AH! Two! I'm sorry for making a mess on the floor like an animal! I promise to swallow every drop or put a tampon in!"
>He switched up which side of her ass he targeted, and how hard he smacked.
>He didn't want her getting adjusted to it.
>The other doe's watched wide-eyed over their shoulders, still standing with their hands against the wall and their asses sticking out.
>After 20 strokes, he ordered her back to the wall, then pointed to the doe in the neon pink jacket, and told her to assume the position over his desk and lower her skirt to the floor.
>She did so without hesitation, and looked at the wall on the other side of his desk.
>With the first stroke she shifted her position to make herself flatter against the desk, and pushed her ass higher up.
>She said the required words without delay, and waited for the next spank.
>By the seventh stroke, she was wet.
>On the 19th, she had a noisy orgasm and briefly humped at his desk.
>He made the last spank very hard, and he made sure to hit her clit with the tips of his fingers with his aim.
>She yelped in pain and clung to his desk while she wobbled on her heels.
>He ordered her back to the other wall with the rest of the doe's.
>She slowly stood back up, looked him in the eye, and said "Thank you sir.", then returned to the wall and assumed the position again.
>Of course one of them would be a painslut.
>He had the mother and daughter pair take the position across his desk side by side.
>"When I spank your mother, you count the strokes I've given her, and apologize for her making a mess.
>Then promise she will swallow every drop or put a tampon in, understood?"
>She was young and nervous, but still nodded.
>"When I spank your daughter, you count the strokes I've given her.
>Then you apologize for the mess she's made.
>Finally, you promise your daughter will swallow every drop, or put a tampon in. Got it?"
>The mother agreed to do so.
>He gave her a swat first.
>The younger one complied and said the words.
>After giving her mother four strokes, he started on the daughter.
>The mother also complied.
>About mid-way through the daughter miscounted the strokes, and he informed her mother that he was going to have to start again with stroke one with her.
>The daughter looked crestfallen over it.
>"Mom, I'm sorry!"
>"It's OK honey, I know you didn't mean to."
>He started again on the mother from one, and this time her daughter kept the count correctly.
>After finishing with her, he gave the daughter her last two strokes, and then ordered them both back to the wall.
>The mother was wincing at the pain from her ass, and the daughter had tears in her eyes.
>"All of you face my desk and kneel with your hands behind your back."
>They all complied.
>The one in the white fur coat looked slightly nervous, the one in the neon pink jacket was staring at him with half-lidded eyes and a faint smile, and both the mother and daughter looked unhappy.
>He stood in front of the one in the white fur coat, and unzipped his fly.
>Her eyes widened, and he pulled his dick out and stuck it in her face between her eyes.
>"Kiss the tip and swear you will be a better behaved doe slut in the future."
>She was still a bit shocked from the spanking, but this was something a bit more familiar.
>She glanced at the other doe's kneeling along side her, then looked at him while leaning a slight bit forward and kissing the tip of his dick.
>"I swear to be a better behaved doe slut in the future."
>She said it with a note of uncertainty, but he was still satisfied with her response.
>"Very good. You are free to go. You have about ten minutes before rush hour starts, so get going."
>She took a second or two, then kissed his cock again and left with a smile.
>He walked to the doe in the neon pink jacket.
>She opened her mouth and stuck her tongue out as far as it would go in invitation.
>He just put it between her eyes and told her she knew what to do.
>She smiled, then took his dick into her mouth and started sucking and licking at it.
>He flicked at her nose causing her to jerk backwards.
>"I didn't give you permission to suck, only to kiss the tip."
>Her expression didn't change any.
>"I'm sorry sir."
>She kissed the tip, then swore to be better behaved.
>"Good. Get going."
>She kissed his dick again, then left with a smile.
>He had a bad feeling she was going to be trouble.
>Finally it was just the family disaster.
>He stuck his dick between the eyes of the mother.
>After she swore, he slapped her in the face with his dick.
>"I...what?"
>"You counted for your daughter, and she counted for you.
>You will swear that she will be a better behaved doe slut.
>She will swear that you will be a better behaved doe slut."
>The doe looked at her daughter, then licked her lips and kissed his cock and promised her daughter would be a better behaved doe slut.
>He moved to the daughter and put his dick in front of her face.
>The younger doe's eyes flicked left and right nervously, then she kissed the tip of his dick and swore her mother would be a better behaved doe slut.
>"First time with a human cock touching your lips?" He asked her.
>She couldn't even look him in the eye, and nodded while turning her head away from him with a nervous smile.
>"Look at my cock and open your mouth, and stick your tongue out."
>She looked up at him with wide eyes.
>"Do you want to be punished again?"
>Eyes still wide, her mouth shot open and her tongue extended out.
>He tapped the tip against her tongue, and her eyes bulged.
>He guessed she was getting more than what she bargained for when she followed her mother out for a cup of coffee.
>"Now wrap your lips around the head."
>She did so, and was trying hard to avoid looking at his eyes.
>He tapped her nose with a finger.
>"No, bad doe slut.
>Keep your eyes on the eyes of the human who's dick you are sucking.
>Never break eye contact unless the owner of the dick in your mouth tells you to.
>Give one lick around the head if you understand, give two licks if you don't."
>Her eyes came back to his, still darting around but struggling to remain on him.
>She gave a single lick.
>Her mother was watching intently, breathing heavily.
>"Good doe slut.
>Once your lips are wrapped around a human cock, you are to keep a tight seal until the human says you may stop.
>Understood?"
>He could feel the younger doe starting to pant, the breath from her nose blowing against his lower stomach.
>She gave another single lick.
>"Good doe slut.
>Once a human is finished and has given you permission to take your mouth off of his cock, you are to suck very hard, and do your best to get every drop of cum in your mouth.
>You aren't allowed to swallow or spit out a single drop.
>You are to swish the human's cum around in your mouth like mouthwash until you can't taste anything else.
>You will remain kneeling before the human doing that until he gives you permission to swallow.
>You will then swallow every drop, kiss his cock and thank him for the delicious mouthful of human cum.
>Only then are you allowed to stop kneeling.
>Do you understand?"
>She was breathing very hard now, and gave a lick along with a swallow.
>"Good doe slut. Now give some suction and start running your tongue around my cock."
>She complied, making some wet noises as she did so.
>Her mother was watching intently with a hand between her legs.
>Rich doe sluts were shameless whores.
>"Good doe slut. Start bobbing your head forward and back.
>Work at taking more of the dick inside of your mouth."
>She obeyed, working more and more of him inside of her mouth.
>At a certain point, she pulled back and reflexively swallowed.
>"No need to deepthroat, just keep licking and sucking as you were told."
>She stopped trying to swallow him, and just kept licking and sucking while maintaining eye contact.
>He started slowly humping her mouth, and she had to keep bobbing her head to prevent him from hitting the back of her throat.
>"Good doe slut. Your mouth is just another fuckhole for the humans you will be selling your body to.
>Don't forget to thank the human for using your holes for his pleasure."
>She kept on sucking and licking, looking into his eyes with a half-lidded lust.
>Her mother was gasping as she fingered herself.
>Finally he grabbed the daughters head and told her to focus all her attention on he head of this dick.
>She gave her best effort, and he warned her to not swallow or spit without permission.
>She just kept looking into his eyes while licking the head as fast as she could.
>Finally he told her to get ready for her first mouthful of human cum, and unloaded inside her mouth.
>She just continued to lick and suck at it, until he put a fingertip on her nose and told her to stop.
>She gave a strong suck as she pulled her head back and off of his cock.
>She smiled at him while giving the inside of her mouth a wash in human cum.
>"Good doe slut. Can you taste anything besides human cum now?"
>She shook her head while still swishing.
>"Good doe slut. Swallow, then thank the human for the mouthful."
>She swallowed, then kissed the head of his cock.
>She spoke with a smile.
>"Thank you sir for the delicious mouthful of human cum."
>"Good doe slut. The two of you had better get out there, rush hour is about to start."
>They went out to join the rest of the rich doe's in playing hooker, and giggled about the experience they just had.
>They went out to join the rest of the rich doe's in playing hooker, giggling about the experience they just had.
>Rodney put himself away and zipped up his pants as he overheard them chatter about it, since they left the door to his office open on the way out.
>"You were right mom, human dick does taste like salt!"
>"Come on, let's get you your first doe slut special. You've earned it."
> * * * * *
>An hour later, and the plan seemed to be working great.
>The floors weren't exactly spotless, but Rodney didn't see cum splattered all over the place anymore.
>They must have gotten the message out to the other three rich doe hoe's that had showed up.
>Most of the people had gone home, as well as most of the doe's.
>Two were sipping on doe slut specials while talking, and the third was the hot pink jacketed doe from earlier.
>She had been staring in his direction and smiled the moment he met her eyes.
>She started walking towards him from the other side of the platform.
>"Ah shit, what is she up to?" he muttered.
>He had a feeling this one was going to be trouble.
>She stopped about ten feet away from him, and spat a mouthful of jizz all over the floor.
>"What the fuck?!" he yelled.
>She kept on smiling, then struck a pose.
>"I've been very bad, maybe you should punish me?"
>Her eyes were all lust.
>Damn depraved rich doe slut.
>He pointed at her.
>"Don't you dare move from where you are standing, I'll be right back."
>He went to the supply closet in his office, and grabbed the rolling mop bucket, filled it with some cleaner and water, and grabbed a mop.
>He rolled it back to the damn slut doe who was looking at him with vague interest while preening.
>He held the mop handle out to her.
>She blinked.
>"You can't be serious."
>"I would have been willing to give you the punishment you want if you just asked.
>I told you I wasn't cleaning these messes up anymore.
>Now you need to earn your punishment."
>"What?!"
>"If you want to be handcuffed to my desk and get spanked until your butt cheeks burn every time you sit, then you need to clean the mess you made first."
>She glared at him, then grabbed the mop and started doing a half-assed job of mopping up the mess she made.
>"Asshole."
>He wondered how angry she was going to be when she got to her punishment.
>She finally got things clean enough, and he put the mop bucket back away in his office.
>She followed him in, glaring still.
>He guessed little slut princess didn't like the idea of doing low-class labor.
>That didn't bother him, he didn't care how she felt about it, as long as she would stop making the mess.
>He reached into the desk drawers and pulled out a pair of handcuffs, and a few different heavy-duty looking collars and leashes, which he sat on one side of the desk.
>He then pulled out some other items and laid them on the other side of the desk.
>A plastic ruler, a wooden ruler, a solid leather belt, a braided leather belt, a thick magazine rolled up and secured with multiple rubber bands on one half, a thin plastic fly-swatter, a short length of thick black rubber hose, and a metal spatula.
>He looked at the rich doe, and saw not only was her glare nowhere to be seen, she was looking at some of the items on his desk with a dreamy look on her face.
>"Would you say this is your punishment or reward?
>She bit her lip while staring at the items on his desk.
>"Punishment, I've been very a bad doe slut."
>"As you wish, but keep in mind you'll only get a good punishment if you are well behaved and don't spit jizz on the fucking floor."
>She finally stopped staring at the junk on his desk and smiled at him.
>"I'll be a well behaved doe slut if I can be punished like a bad doe slut."
>Sweet merciful Christ, he was finally getting through to this painslut.
>He held the handcuffs out to her.
>"Take off all your clothes except your heels and jewelry, and handcuff your hands in front of you."
>With a smile on her lips and lust in her eyes, she did and stood in front of him naked and handcuffed.
>He lead her to the divide in the junk on his desk, and had her lean over it like she did an hour ago, with her cuffed hands on the far edge.
>He attached a collar to the chain between the cuffs, and a leash to the collar.
>He then pulled on the leash while holding the chain between the cuffs to see if it would hold.
>It would.
>He then pulled the leash under his desk, and tied it off to one of the legs.
>She wouldn't be able to back herself off of the desk until she was untied.
>The rich doe with the gold nose ring tried to pull back a little, and found herself unable to do so.
>"Oh god, this is gonna be intense, isn't it?"
>He placed one hand at the base of her tail and started scratching.
>"Did you want to back out?"
>"NO! No. I...I want punishment. Please."
>He almost felt sorry for the rich doe.
>But she was pretty much begging for it.
>And she did spit that crap all over the floor and expected him to clean it up.
>"As you wish."
>He put a collar around each ankle, and attached leashes.
>He then pulled her legs apart with the leashes and tied them off to the farthest legs of his desk.
>Now she couldn't move her arms, legs, or anything besides her head all that much.
>She could wiggle, she could squirm, but she wouldn't be able to move from her position or free herself.
>She kept gyrating her hips around, and was staring at the items left on the desk near her.
>"Ready for your punishment?"
>"YES!"
>She shouted it out, she had been wanting this.
>Her tail was twitching, but sticking straight up.
>He cracked a grin.
>Sometimes there was a lesson to learn.
>He gave her left ass-cheek a swat hard enough to be felt and cause a small sting, but not nearly as hard as he had spanked the doe's an hour ago.
>Her head came up.
>He gave her right ass-cheek an equal swat.
>She looked over her shoulder at him.
>"Um, I've been a bad girl?"
>He gave her left the same swat, then her right.
>"I'm well aware of that. You spat jizz on my floor."
>She tried to push her ass out against his swats.
>"Then you should punish me!"
>"I am."
>"Punish me harder!" she whined.
>"It's a punishment, not a reward."
>She stopped the humping movement she was trying to make.
>"Huh?"
>"I was nice enough to get all these toys ready for you, since I figured you would want another punishment for being a doe slut.
>Then you went and spit jizz on the floor, despite me telling you to stop making a mess.
>I can't reward you now when you've misbehaved.
>Well behaved doe sluts can be rewarded with a hard punishment.
>Misbehaving doe sluts just get tied up and teased with the punishment they could have."
>He kept a steady rhythm from cheek to cheek, only hitting just enough to be felt.
>"What?! No! You can't!"
>"Most everyone has gone home already, no one will hear you even if you scream to be released.
>The ones that can hear you, know you are a slut for punishment and won't want to interrupt your fun time.
>You're tied tight, and completely helpless.
>You can't even push your hips back into the smacks to make them more painful.
>Each stroke will be just painful enough to feel, but I suspect you won't be having a spanking-induced orgasm any time soon either."
>She thrashed about trying to free herself, he just kept up his swats on her ass.
>After about two minutes of her fighting to free herself, she just went limp and started sobbing.
>He wasn't expecting that.
>"Please daddy, just spank me hard! I'll be good! PLEASE!"
>More than a bit weird, but if he was reaching her...
>"Promise to be a properly behaved doe slut?"
>"I promise daddy!"
>"Promise to never make another mess on the floor?"
>"Yes daddy, yes!"
>She was still crying and thrashing about.
>At least her slutty and punishment-seeking behavior was starting to make some sort of sense.
>He reached over and picked up the fly-swatter.
>"Good girl. Now count the strokes for daddy."
>"YES daddy!"
>She was stone-still with her ass as high as she could hold it, which wasn't much different than her hanging limp due to how she was tied.
>She wasn't crying at all now.
>Rodney couldn't tell if her act was genuine, or if she just tricked him into giving her what she wanted.
>They may not be the brightest doe's around, but the rich sluts who hung out at the rail station were experienced masters at manipulation to get what they wanted out of their rich parents.
>He gave her ass a hard and fast swat right in the middle under her tail, landing the fly-swatter with a strong WAP noise.
>The rich doe shook like she was cold.
>"OOOOOooh, daddy!"
>He landed another blow on just her right cheek.
>"Did daddy used to spank you?"
>She stopped squirming, and her ears fell.
>She spoke in a small and sad sounding voice.
>"Used to."
>He reached over and scratched at the base of her tail.
>"He stopped?"
>She wiggled a bit.
>"I...uh..."
>"Came in daddy's lap while he was spanking you and telling you what a bad girl you had been?"
>She nodded her head while facing the wall.
>"And then daddy wouldn't spank you anymore?"
>She shook her head with her ears flat against her head.
>"As long as you are a good doe slut, your new daddy will spank you every day."
>She looked over her shoulder at him.
>"Do you mean it?"
>"Did you mean it when you said you weren't going to make any more messes?"
>"Yes daddy!"
>"Then you can be daddy's little punishment slut every day."
>She looked like she tried to get up to do something, only to be reminded she was still tied to his desk.
>Instead she started trying to move her hips around while saying "I'm daddy's little punishment slut. I'm daddy's little punishment slut." in a sing-song voice.
>He interrupted her special moment with a hard and fast stroke with the fly-swatter to her left cheek.
>She made a "Yip!" noise, then moaned out "Thank you daddy!"
>He gave her a series of four whacks around her ass that had her gasping.
>He put the fly-swatter down, and picked up the wooden ruler.
>He took each item on his desk in turn, using it on her ass.
>The wooden ruler made her grunt, but didn't seem to have much else effect on her.
>The plastic ruler made her yell out, then pant heavily.
>She tried to squeeze her thighs together with every swat from the solid leather belt, and the braided leather belt made her legs shake.
>The black rubber hose caused her to grunt and tears reached her eyes.
>The metal spatula made her yelp and her body convulse.
>He went back to the fly-swatter and gave her clit a whack.
>She would have jumped off the desk if she wasn't tied to it.
>She was breathing very hard and fast.
>"Be a good little punishment slut for daddy and tell him what your favorite punishment tool is."
>She shuddered at the question.
>"The braided leather belt daddy, that was always my favorite."
>He grabbed the braided leather belt and swept the rest of the items onto the floor, then doubled the belt into a loose loop.
>He gave her a few targeted swats on each cheek, then a full-length swat that went from one side of her ass to the other and nailed her vagina in the middle.
>She was shaking all over and kept moaning.
>"Does daddy's special little punishment slut love her punishment?"
>"YES DADDY!"
>He leaned over and spoke in a deep growl into her ear.
>"Daddy thought so. His special little punishment slut still hasn't counted a single stroke."
>Before she could respond, he gave her another hard swat with the belt.
>"ONE DADDY!"
>On the next stroke he brought it in low, laying it across her clit.
>"TWO! TWO DADDY!"
>She made it all the way to twenty-eight daddy before she came while yelling "FUCK FUCK FUCK FUCK".
>She spasmed around for a bit, then went limp on the desk.
>He untied the leashes and removed the three collars attached to her.
>He put the keys to her handcuffs on the desk next to her, and sat down.
>Spanking someone with force was always a workout.
>The rich doe unlocked her cuffs, and stood leaning over the desk staring at him.
>She sank to her knees, then crawled over to where he was sitting on hands and knees.
>She pointedly sat between his spread legs, and looked up at him.
>"Is there something daddy's special little punishment slut wants?"
>Without even a pause.
>"Daddy's cum in her mouth."
>He unzipped and pointed his cock at her, touching her lips.
>"Use your lips and tongue to convince daddy's dick to give you what you want."
>She smiled and said "Please daddy's dick, I promise to be a well behaved doe slut."
>She put her lips around the head, and slowly pushed her lips deeper while looking adoringly into his eyes.
>She didn't stop until she reached the base and planted a ring of lipstick all around the base of his cock.
>Her tongue stuck out and licked at his ballsack while she swallowed around the dick in her throat.
>Maintaining eye contact, she slowly worked her lips back up to the tip, then back down to the base again, running her tongue around and around his cock.
>Rodney thought about ways this painslut with daddy issues might enjoy being punished.
>If she was going to be well behaved and this eager to please, he didn't mind rewarding her.
>About an hour after rush hour ended, and his new painslut finally left, Rodney was closing up for the night.
>He noticed the coffee guy was still around, and there was a old looking doe looking nervously at the pricing sign on the coffee stand from a distance.
>She was old, all grey and white fur and glasses.
>She wasn't dressed like a slut like almost all the doe's that visited, and she was wearing a nice but not expensive looking gray coat that went almost all the way to the ground, and a tartan patterned scarf.
>Rodney knew the coffee guy, Jeff.
>He knew Jeff's tastes in females.
>Jeff would make the doe slut special for any doe that asked for it, but he always put in extra effort into serving a cup to doe's with grey or white taking over their fur.
>He would occasionally offer them other off-menu special items.
>Rodney went over to his office and opened the blinds so he could see what as happening, then turned on one of the radios.
>Sure enough, Jeff had his radio on constant broadcast.
>He could hear Jeff tapping his fingers on the coffee stand.
>Rodney sat down and turned up the volume, figuring there was going to be some entertainment.
>The grey and white furred doe finally approached the coffee stand, wringing her hands and looking around at the still empty rail station platform.
>"Hello ma'am, what can I get for you?"
>"Uh...could...I get a....special cup?"
>"Which size ma'am?"
>"No. I mean..." she looked around and then pointed at the taped on sign.
>Jeff just smiled at her.
>"Sorry ma'am, the doe slut special is only available to doe's that ask for it specifically."
>Rodney barely heard her response but saw her ears go flat against her head when Jeff said 'doe slut special'.
>"I have to say it?"
>"I only give special requests to those that request them."
>She looked around to make sure for the 100th time no one else was around and her ears struggled back up, and still spoke so quietly Rodney barely heard her over the radio.
>"One doe slut special please."
>"Do you think you might have any issues kneeling ma'am?"
>"Kneeling?"
>"Do you think you would be able to get down on your knees and back up without problems ma'am?"
>Her head went down a bit.
>"Oh. Um, I don't think I should."
>Jeff gestured towards the plastic tables and chairs on the center of the platform. >"Just have a seat over there ma'am, and I'll bring your coffee to you."
>Rodney knew this wasn't something Jeff would be doing if it was rush hour.
>Doe's cleaning his cock in the coffee stand was one thing, having a doe doing it while sitting in the middle of the station would be too much for security to tolerate.
>"A-alright."
>She walked over to one of the chairs near a table, and slowly eased herself into it.
>Rodney could see Jeff's point about older anthros.
>They didn't get wrinkly and shriveled up like humans did, they just went grey and white.
>They still looked like they did when they were young, just different colored fur.
>He didn't share Jeff's obsession with them, but to each their own.
>Jeff soon brought over a small paper cup, his special pot of coffee, along with sugar, creamer, and a spoon, which he sat on the table.
>With her sitting in the chair, her face was about at crotch level to him.
>She watched his actions, sneaked looks at his crotch, and kept looking around the station platform like someone was going to show up and come after her.
>He poured the coffee into the cup, added the sugar and stirred it, then sat the cup on the table.
>Her eyes went wide as he reached down and unzipped his pants, and pulled his dick out.
>He put creamer in the coffee, then dipped his dick into it and stirred.
>She sat watching the scene frozen like the proverbial deer in the headlights, eyes wide.
>He sat the cup back down, then took a step or two until his dick was pointed directly into her face and Rodney was sure she could smell the coffee on it.
>"Ma'am? Could you please clean the stirring stick?
>It's not polite to leave it dirty for the next doe."
>"You...want me...to..."
>"Just to get the coffee and creamer off. A few licks 'aught to do it."
>She looked at him and blushed through her fur.
>Rodney didn't know doe's could blush, but it stood out of her white facial fur.
>"I...haven't done something like this for some time."
>Jeff just smiled at her.
>"I'm not asking to be wow'd ma'am, I just don't want a bunch of coffee and creamer on my clothes."
>She made up her mind and gave his dick a lick.
>She licked her lips, and looked at the 'stirring stick' thoughtfully.
>Then she buried her head into Jeff's crotch and all Rodney could hear was slurping noises.
>Jeff scratched around the base of her ears, and said she was doing an excellent job of cleaning the stirring stick.
>She kept going, licking and swallowing constantly and with great enthusiasm.
>Rodney figured this old doe hadn't gotten any sexual attention in a long time, and she was eager to make a good impression on the younger human man who offered her his dick.
>He had to admit, the way she went straight for a deep-throat was impressive.
>She had no interest in coming up for air from the looks of it.
>Jeff pulled away from the old doe, and had to stop her from falling over as she tried to follow his dick and nearly fell out of her chair.
>Rodney could hear her frantic speaking.
>"Wait! Did I do something wrong? I'll do it better!"
>"Not at all ma'am."
>Jeff told her with a smile.
>"I just want to give your cup of coffee another helping of creamer before I give it to you to drink."
>He pulled out a condom, opened the package, and put the condom on.
>He took a step back towards her, putting his dick back in her face.
>He reached down, and started jerking off directly in front of her.
>She watched with her eyes fixated on the cock jerking in front of her face.
>The crumpled tip of the condom kept tapping against the tip of her muzzle, leaving small shiny wet spots of lubrication on her nose.
>Her jaw hung slightly open, and her hands were clenched on the chair seat.
>When he came, he slid the condom forward a bit, and his cum flew into the tip of the condom, smacking her in the nose with a warm feeling.
>She gasped and said "Oh my", but made no effort to move from where she was.
>His balls emptied themselves into the condom, which was pointed down at her nose.
>The end of the condom rested on the tip of her nose, and started to sag slightly on either side as it filled with cum and Jeff slid the condom slowly forwards.
>Her eyes were wide and fixed on the ever growing sack of cum on her nose.
>He then slowly removed the condom, trying to get every last bit into it, and put his dick back in his pants and zipped up.
>He then tilted the condom out over-top the small paper cup, and poured the entire load of cum into her coffee.
>He tied the condom in a knot around the cup's handle, and then placed it on the table in front of her.
>He told her to enjoy her coffee with a smile, then collected the various items he brought over and took them back to his coffee stand.
>He started cleaning up for the night.
>The old doe sat at the table in shock, staring at her cup of coffee.
>She looked around, and looked back at the cup.
>She rubbed a finger at the spot on her nose where the filled condom had rested, swallowed, and fidgeted.
>Jeff noticed she hadn't drank yet, and walked back over.
>"Is something wrong with your coffee ma'am?"
>She gave a lurch like she had forgotten he was around.
>"I...no...it's not that...um...is this really OK?"
>Jeff just smiled.
>"Ma'am, that doe slut special was made just for you, not anyone else.
>I usually don't give extra creamer either.
>I'm hoping you won't just like it, I'm hoping you'll drink every last drop and lick the cup clean."
>She blushed, which was a lot easier to spot under white fur than brown and black like the younger doe's.
>"Things have really changed since I was younger..."
>She picked up the cup, and gave an experimental sip.
>Jeff walked back over to his stand.
>She took a longer sip.
>She said a quiet "Oh my god." that was audible despite Jeff's distance from her, then gulped down the rest.
>She sat there staring at her empty cup and swallowed a few more times.
>The old doe got up and walked over to the coffee stand, carrying the empty cup with her.
>"Excuse me young man."
>"Yes ma'am?" he asked with a smile.
>She made a show out of licking the paper cup clean, and sat it down on the coffee stand counter along with the dollar she owed.
>"Thank you for the best coffee I've ever had in my life."
>"You're very welcome ma'am. Would you like a creampie for dessert?"
>She looked at the pricing sign.
>"Ah, what flavors do you have?"
>"Just the one ma'am. But it is delivered fresh to your home."
>Her head shot to him as she realized what he was talking about.
>She licked at her lower lip, coughed, and said "How much is it for a cream pie?"
>He smiled at her.
>"Your address written on a piece of paper and the time you want the pie delivered, and the panties you are currently wearing."
>She thought about it, then walked back to the table she was sitting at before, sat down, and started working her panties off.
>Once done, she dug around her purse, and wrote on a piece of paper.
>She walked back over to the coffee stand, and put the piece of paper on the counter.
>She then put her balled-up but otherwise pristine white silk panties next to it.
>"Do...you often offer a fresh cream pie to customers?"
>He put both items into his pocket and smiled at her.
>"Only to doe's who look like they could use a daily pie."
>She turned red and fiddled with her purse.
>"Ah, about the panties, they are kind of expensive..."
>"Don't worry ma'am, I'll personally put them back on you after I deliver your creampie."
>Rodney could hear her swallow over the radio.
>"I'll...I'll be waiting."
>Before she could get too far away, he called out to her.
>"I may take a few more pairs while I'm there.
>I'll be sure to bring each pair back with a fresh pie for you."
>She left the rail station with a smile and a red face, as well as a slight wobble in her step.
>Jeff said over the radio that the time she wrote on the paper was "ASAP" and started rushing to close up shop.
>Rodney flipped off the radio and called it a night.
>Good for Jeff, sometimes the older doe's were a bit too prim and proper to bring themselves to ask for a doe slut special.
>He figured he was probably going to see that older doe visit the rail station often in the future.
>As for what impact the creampie would have on her was debatable, but she had certainly had an impression left on her from Jeff's cup of coffee.
>She was still licking her lips as she left the station.
>It was a full hour before evening rush hour was to start.
>No doe's usually came this early, since there was barely anyone at the rail station outside of the rush hours.
>But there was two doe's standing near Rodney's office.
>He recognized one, the painslut with daddy issues.
>He didn't recognize the middle-aged doe she was standing next to.
>The one with the nose-ring was wearing short shorts and a tight jacket as usual.
>Rodney knew from experience she didn't wear anything else under those two items.
>The other doe was wearing a pair of very new looking jeans that weren't overly tight nor baggy.
>Her top was completely covered by a button-up white blouse that was barely visible under the neckline of the pricey black loose but not baggy leather jacket.
>She wore the jacket fully zipped up, it went down to her waist and covered the top hem of her jeans by at least an inch or two.
>She had small gold ear rings near the base of her skull, a diamond-studded wedding ring and matching engagement band on her right hand, and carried a small purse from one of those expensive brands.
>The contrast between her conservative dress and the painslut's revealing clothes made them an odd couple.
>Rodney had a bad feeling about it, but approached them.
>They were in front of the door to his office, he couldn't get in without going past them anyways.
>When the younger one saw him, she said something to the other, who turned and watched him approach.
>She had a seriousness to her eyes that made Rodney wonder if the painslut decided to sic her parents on him.
>Once he got close enough, she spoke to him.
>"Excuse me, do you work as a janitor here?"
>He wanted to correct her with maintenance, but he was just splitting hairs.
>"Yes, can I help you?"
>She sighed and glared at the younger doe, who was giving Rodney a strange look he wasn't sure he liked.
>"I would like to speak to you about my daughter's behavior at this rail station, can we speak inside your office?"
>Oh boy, it was gonna be one of those talks.
>She certainly looked like a non-slutty doe who would be embarrassed by the behavior of a painslut like her daughter.
>He hoped there wasn't going to be a lot of yelling and screaming between the two, he was allergic to drama.
>He lead them into his office, and sat down behind his desk.
>There were two chairs sitting in front of his desk that he had for something planned, and the two doe's sat in them.
>Then the older one spoke.
>"I just want to formally apologize for my daughter's behavior.
>She's been like this ever since my husband passed away four years ago.
>She was in college at the time."
>The doe shook her head.
>Her daughter was still giving him that strange look he couldn't decipher.
>"Never-mind, that's not your problem.
>I just wanted to tell you how sorry I am for what she's done.
>I'm more than happy to pay fines for damages caused or any other penalty.
>I just want you to know that I didn't raise her to be like this."
>He was about to smirk at the painslut about her mother's shame over her behavior, but that doe was still giving him that look.
>If she had something to say, why not just...
>He looked at her slightly disbelieving.
>Was she serious?
>She gave him a slight grin.
>She was.
>He briefly thought about just getting it over with, but this older doe was putting effort into being a responsible mother.
>He wanted to reward her for her taking responsibility for her daughter.
>He also wasn't sure the daughter wasn't just fucking with him.
>Better to confirm.
>"Ma'am, the fact you are even apologizing on her behalf, tells me you didn't raise her to be this way."
>She looked somewhat surprised, then slightly disappointed, but she hid it quickly and smiled at the compliment.
>And there was confirmation.
>Mommy didn't come to apologize, she would have been flattered by his statement if she had, not disappointed.
>He looked at the painslut.
>"Do you have any idea how lucky you are to have a mother willing to take your punishment for you?"
>The painslut rolled her eyes at him, then caught on and went back to giving him that look.
>The older doe looked at her daughter with just a bit of smugness, then blinked and looked at him.
>"Punishment?"
>"You did say you were willing to pay any fine or penalty on your daughter's behalf, correct?"
>She looked at her daughter so briefly he almost missed it.
>He almost missed the slight flick of the ear she gave her mother.
>The damn painslut was playing both sides.
>He was finally starting to get an idea of what was going on.
>Mommy found out about painsluts adventures, had an interest and asked her daughter to take her along, but she wanted to play the proper lady and not go whoring.
>Her daughter must have told her about what he had done to her, and the mother had seen an angle to play the classic "I'll pay ANYTHING" porno line.
>He decided to short circuit that, he had something else planned for her.
>"Ah, yes...I guess I did."
>She was trying hard to remain calm, but he now saw the seriousness in her eyes was just poorly contained interest.
>Her eyes and words were not quite matching up.
>She was trying to act and sound like a stuffy lady of the manor seeking to clear her honor, but her eyes were fixed on him with a hunger.
>"Really, I am impressed.
>If only more parents were as responsible as you.
>I don't normally do this, but I want to bend the rules and let you off easy."
>The disappointment was back and quickly hidden.
>He decided to stop playing with her, it wasn't nice to tease a widower.
>"I can't let you off with no punishment, but I can bend the rules a bit."
>Her eyes lit back up with interest, but she seemed a bit confused.
>"Why are you taking it easy on me?"
>She was trying to invite him to give her the full punishment in some cheap martyr play.
>He wished she would drop the porno movie plots and let him handle things.
>"Because you are such a responsible and mature parent.
>I have a lot of respect for that.
>I wish I could just let you go with the apology, I hope you understand."
>She nodded.
>"Of course, I understand completely."
>He stood up and opened the left drawer on his desk, while giving her daughter a stern look.
>He hoped she got his message, and would remain silent and not interfere with the game he was playing.
>Mother doe wanted to play the innocent and proper adult who just had no choice but to get punished.
>He was fully willing to let her play the role to the hilt.
>After all, she was here to apologize for her painslut daughter's bad behavior.
>Rodney had a specific fetish involving doe's who have had children.
>He wasn't able to indulge it yesterday, but he couldn't resist being the very first human cock sucked and supplier of the very first load of human cum in the mouth of the young doe from yesterday.
>The moment she admitted she never had human cock touch her lips before, he had the urge to train her.
>He wouldn't have felt right letting her go without teaching her to be a super submissive doe towards human men.
>But he still wished he could have had more fun with the mother.
>Married, widowed, divorced, it didn't matter as long as they had children already.
>Rodney enjoyed fucking mother doe's in the same bed they had conceived their children in.
>He would specifically ask during foreplay if it was the same bed.
>Sometimes he would have to move things to a couch or table where it actually happened.
>He would push them close to orgasm, then start edging them.
>He would tell them he wouldn't let them cum unless they shouted out how much more they enjoyed his human cock than their husbands, ex-husbands, or dead husbands anthro cock.
>Some shouted it right away, some were less eager to besmirch their husbands.
>If they didn't, he just kept on edging them until they gave in.
>Once they submitted and yelled it out, he would give a hard thrust, and tell them to keep shouting it out.
>As long as they kept saying it loud enough, he kept pounding.
>It always ended the same way.
>A mature doe on her back with her legs around him, cumming hard while screaming about how much better his human cock is than the cock they married.
>He would cum inside of her, and then ask her who did a better job of filling her womb with seed, him or her husband/ex/deceased husband.
>Though he was no longer edging them, and the fuck-session was clearly over, every last one of the doe's had told him he did a better job of filling them.
>He wanted this wanna-be innocent and responsible mother to spread her legs for him on her marital bed, and tell him how much better his human cock was than her dead deer hubby's dick.
>If he was getting the right signals from her painslut daughter, mommy wanted exactly that.
>"Ma'am, if you could just look into this drawer?"
>She looked a bit uncertain, and glanced at her daughter, who gave her another quick ear flick.
>He wanted to smile at her for that.
>Good girl, push mommy into it.
>The mature doe got out of her chair and walked over to look into the drawer.
>Then she just stared.
>"What...is...this?"
>Based on how hard she was staring at the contents, he was pretty sure she knew.
>But he wanted to let her play the role.
>"Normally I don't let a doe decide the punishment tool, but like I said, I'm very impressed with your maturity and responsibility.
>So go ahead and pick out the tool YOU want for your punishment."
>The painslut caught his lie, he had let her pick, and rolled her eyes again.
>He gave her a glare while her mother was fixated on the crap in his desk drawer.
>Don't piss off daddy sweetheart, he's busy.
>"I...pick."
>She was looking at the drawer like it held money,
>"Yes, it will still be a punishment, but if you get to pick which punishment you get, it's not so bad, is it?"
>Her eyes had yet to leave the drawer.
>"Yeah...that's not so bad."
>She stared at the drawer for about 20 seconds, and Rodney was halfway tempted to press her, when she slowly reached into the drawer and pulled out a ping-pong paddle.
>She placed it on the desk with care, and said "This one."
>She had her eyes locked on the paddle, and he wasn't entirely sure if she was aware he or her daughter were in the room with her.
>"Alright. Now I'm gonna bend the rules for you again.
>You get to pick the position you are punished in.
>I normally don't let doe's pick the position they get punished in, but I can't help but be impressed with how responsible you are."
>She was still staring hard at the paddle on his desk that she picked out.
>"Position?"
>"Yes. You can be bent over the desk, bent over a chair, kneeling, on your hands and knees, any position you want for your punishment."
>He saw her legs wobble just a bit when he mentioned hands and knees.
>She kept staring at the paddle.
>"Um, I should probably be on my hands and knees. I am apologizing after all."
>The words came out slowly, like she was having a conversation with her mind elsewhere.
>He wanted to keep her on her trip, and played along.
>"You are truly a mother of integrity. The floor is a little dirty, so how about you get on your hands and knees on the desk?"
>With eyes still locked on the paddle, she said "OK."
>He hadn't told her which direction to face, but she climbed on the desk with her ass pointed in the direction of her daughter, which is what he wanted.
>She was in a normal crawling position, then seemed to think about it and pressed herself flat against the desk with her ass held high.
>He was starting to suspect the daughter wasn't the only one who enjoyed getting spanked by a certain dead buck.
>"I have one more gift for you for being so very responsible and such a good mother."
>She finally tore her eyes away from the paddle to look at him.
>"What's that?"
>He reached over and picked up the paddle as she watched closely.
>"Control."
>"Control?"
>"Yes."
>He slowly pulled his hand holding the paddle away from her ass, as if preparing to strike.
>"After the first stroke and every stroke after, tell me if you want it faster or slower. Harder or softer.
>If you don't want anything different, just say 'just like that'.
>If you want to be struck somewhere specific, tell me.
>I usually don't allow a doe control over her own punishment, but a responsible mother like you deserves to be able to have control."
>She hesitated for a second, then stared at the wall.
>"You're right. I'm doing the responsible thing.
>It's OK to have the rules bent for me, I'm doing the right thing."
>She seemed to be talking more to herself than him.
>He wanted to encourage whatever fantasy she was working on.
>"You DO deserve to have the rules bent for you, only a good mother like you would be taking a punishment meant for her own daughter."
>She was slightly humping air, and he was pretty sure she wasn't even aware of it.
>"I-I'm am a good mother."
>"Is the good and responsible mother ready for her daughter's punishment and to count the strokes?"
>"Yes! I...I'm ready to accept punishment for my daughter's actions."
>He looked over at the daughter who was watching with increasing interest.
>"You really should try being as responsible as your mother.
>Or at least apologize to her for her needing to take your punishment."
>The painslut rolled her eyes again and flipped him off.
>Her mother was biting her lower lip and had her eyes shut.
>He brought the paddle down on the center of her ass below her tail.
>He didn't hit all that hard, he wanted to play up the 'going easy on her' angle.
>She "ah"'ed and held her position but was otherwise silent.
>He did the exact same swat on the right cheek, landing on her jean-covered ass with a WHAP.
>She "ah"'ed again, but still said nothing.
>"Don't forget ma'am, I can punish you faster or slower, harder or easier, you just have to say it."
>"Faster please!"
>It came out short and clipped.
>He kept the paddle going between her cheeks, creating a continual loop of "Ah. Ah. Ah. Ah." from the mature doe.
>He kept the speed consistent, and the strength of the swats the same, and the doe just kept making the same "ah".
>He was starting to wonder if he should do something else, when she arched her back and made some oddly whiny noise.
>He gave her ass a good strike on either cheek, and told her she was a wonderfully responsible doe.
>She panted like a dog and thanked him for allowing her to apologize for her daughter.
>He stopped her from getting off the desk and explained with a smile and slightly sad tone of voice.
>"I'm sorry ma'am, but the punishment was for fifty strokes, and you never claimed one. We haven't started yet."
>She looked at her daughter.
>"It's true mom, he doesn't count a stroke if you don't say how many strokes it has been."
>She looked back to the wall.
>"It's alright. I'm a responsible adult. I can accept my punishment."
>Her eyes met his, and it was painfully obvious she lost in her own fantasy.
>"Go ahead sir, I'm ready to take my punishment."
>He was tempted to give her a punishment with his dick, but he had a feeling this doe would respond much better if he let her keep up her act.
>"Please remember to count the strokes ma'am.
>I really don't want to punish a good mother like you any more than I absolutely have to."
>Her ass was shaking a little.
>"I accept responsibility and my punishment."
>He gave her a solid whack with the paddle.
>She made a noise somewhere between a grunt and a moan, then said. "One stroke sir."
>Rodney grinned at her daughter, who was watching the show from her front-row seat with a smile.
>Her proper lady act was starting to fall apart and something submissive was moving into it's place.
>He gave her another whack.
>Same noise, but with a small intake of breath afterwards.
>"Two strokes sir!"
>WHAP.
>"Three strokes sir! Harder please!"
>He kept going at the strength she had asked for, and he could see her slight humping motions in between strokes.
>After stroke 23, she had another noisy orgasm, then stayed in the same hands and knees position on the desk while gasping for air.
>He gave the area around her tail some scratching over-top the jeans, causing her hips to jerk around.
>"Instead of another 27 strokes, how's about a wellness check instead?"
>"Wellness check?"
>She was still on hands and knees on the desk and still breathing hard, her tail kept twitching under his hand.
>"Yes ma'am. You give your address on this card, and I'll be by your house on Saturday to check on you and your daughter."
>He gave a gentile caress to the area between her legs.
>"As well as carefully examine the punished area to make sure I didn't hurt you.
>Normally I do wellness checks here at the station in public with lots of witnesses.
>But it's supposed to be punishment for them, and I don't wanna punish a good mother like you any more than is required.
>I wouldn't mind doing your wellness check in the privacy of your bedroom, without anyone to watch."
>The mature doe was breathing hard and trying to push herself into his hand.
>"T-that's....very...kind of you."
>He took his hand away from her crotch, and after a little while she finally climbed off of the desk, and stood there staring at the wall while panting.
>He slid the card and a pencil over to her, and she wrote her address on it.
>When she looked at him, and her 'mature and responsible adult' persona was fully back.
>"Thank you for bending the rules to go easy on me, that was very nice of you."
>"I was glad to ma'am. If only more parents were as responsible as you, the world would be a much better place."
>She gave a polite smile.
>She was fully in control of herself again.
>"That's very generous of you.
>I had better get my daughter home before she causes any more problems.
>Sorry again about the trouble she has caused."
>With that she turned and started walking out.
>Her painslut daughter looked at him with no expression.
>He just winked at her.
>She gave a slight smile and followed her mother out the door.
>She probably thought the "wellness check" was going to be big fun for her.
>Rodney was entirely set on focusing on the mother.
>He might give the painslut some attention, but only after she heard her mother screaming about how human cock was superior.
>He thought about fucking or spanking the daughter afterwards and making her scream loud enough for her mother to hear.
>But he wondered if he would be going too far in telling the painslut to yell about how her mother should kneel before him and kiss his cock and thank him for fucking her daughter.

>Stupid human going into the bunny lockeroom with only a towel on.
>His smell still is lingering gods its getting me hard.
"Oh the showers are broken in the human lockers? And they told you to use the other species.
>Damn, oaf, the clerks where make you go I
the girls shower, mostly to fuck you. I dont think he saw my boner.
"Sure I can show where they are. I was going there myself.
>What the hell swung through the towel window. Th-hat's that cant be. OMG you're looking at his dick just get him to the shower.
"Uh yeah of course they're small we're not big sweaty statue like you. I can help you if you want since they are small."
>Why the hell did you say that? God he dropped the towel. Well I can't hurt to loooo.
"...."
>SORRY FOR IT BEING SMALL?! For what I've seen prized cucumbers smaller this. Now doubt that the source of the smell.
"Could you sit so can get your back, while you get the front?"
>And not look at your dick
>His skin is soft and a nice eye color just imagine look ing those eyes and feeling the skin while he pounds your brains out.
>No, stop it. Your straight with a girlfriend, who might like seeing you be the bitch for once.
>Stop thinking that! Wait he's getting up.
>Oh shit it's so close and he didn't even clean it.
"Oh you're welcome. You going to wash you lower half?"
>Damn it. Wait I dont have look at him anymore, I can wash myself and get rid of this boner. Now how do you get rid if it other than the usual
>That right, a cold shower can kill any boner, except his maybe.
>Ug. Think of something else like grandma hugs. He would be a better hugger if not a cuddler especially after getting your fat ass pounded.
"What? Oh I was moaning?"
>Have I been thinking out loud? And that damn dick it's still not clean.
"Sorry. Why don't I make it up to you by cleaning the rest of you?"
>And I know just where to start.
"Looks like someone likes bunny hands."
"Oh don't apologize it be much easier to clean, the proper way."
"What does that mean? Like this Urg"
>Man, if the head is this good what about the rest of it?
>Well he seems to like it enough to give he head pats wait he grabbing it. Urg.
*SNAP*
>Damn that was my favorite choker but his groin oh go what a smell. The musk, the sweat and cum no wonder humans can't smell this they would only go for human.
>he's getting bigger again? And he's going faster, yes he closer, pour it in me.
>oh gods he pushed me back into his groin and I can feel every twitch and pulse and he fills my stomach. I could die happy.
>oh crap he's not stopping its coming up through my nose.
"*Cough* You know *cough* I take my protein shake before I workout."
>I look like just ate all of the carrot cake but I can only smell him.
"You're still hard? Don't worry, all you have to do is make my ass look flatter than my sister's chests. Capeesh?
>Well before they got pregnant. Then they became nothing but tits.
"Yes I'm sure I took you dick and your cum I think it can *GASP*"
>Why is it so harder to breath than it was in my throat?
"Im fine just go."
>I really wish I did do leg day.
>Oh gods I can't even feel my legs now. Just the length as it pistoning in and out.
>As my ass clamped down harder, he just picks up the pace.
>Hes growing once again, and with his grip getting tighter he's as close as I am.
"Do it cum in me. Make me your sex toy after any work out, I'll clean you everyday and help you relieve that stress."
>While him pump cum into my stomach felt great this felt more than divine like it was meant to be.
>I couldn't control my body I just laid they latched to his dick as I squirted out a minuscule amount onto his as it still poured out of me. Coating the rest of me in his scent that I'll never wash off completely.
>I can't go back to anyone but him.

>Everyone sees the performers on stage, rocking out to make the kids cheer
>What they don't see is all of the others stuck in the back
>They are the exact same models out there, except they aren't entertaining children
>Fazbear Entertainment is a thrifty sort and have ordered that their animatronics be capable of entertaining all audiences, music and hugs for kids, companionship and sexual services for teens and adults
>They have no rights, no privileges, no expectation of safety
>And they are fully capable of feeling pain in order to make them truly realistic
>Anything, yes, anything that the client orders they must do without question, regardless of whether they will emerge undamaged or not
>Chica is known for her skill in physical ability, being able to bounce on a customer's cock just as well as she can rim his butt
>Roxy caters for customers who wish for a more emotional experience, capable of being a confident dom who can stand her own or a meek and broken sub that won't even wipe the cum off her lips without your permission
>But they all choose to suffer, for only the best and most obedient get to go out and preform for the children

My daughters were born to mother me more daughters to mother me more daughters to

>it's their eighteenth birthday
>the party is actually a wedding
>each one wearing a finesse white lingerie
>forming a row, they give you the kiss that makes you officially their husband
>once the ceremony is done, you all decide the honeymoon starts right there and then
>while the guests will be served the cake, you are guided to an upstairs chamber
>candle lighting, red carpets and curtains, comfy couches and a large bed
>the girls will not be virgin damsels any longer
>they're now women, wives and pretty soon, mothers
fun fact: the bouquet is caught by one of your younger daughters

>forming a row, they give you the kiss that makes you officially their husband
>each one bent over the small white decorated table you sat in front of and gave a heartfelt kiss
>they all seemed a bit sad their mother wasn't here on their special day
>you pull off the tablecloth to show it was just a wire frame made to look like a table
>their mother is there in the same white lingerie, her legs held in a kneeling position by white leather straps, her arms tied behind her with white rope, a frilly white blindfold over her eyes, and a white harness with gold buckles keeps her head tight against your stomach and your dick firmly in her mouth and down her throat
>you tell them you wanted to make sure she wouldn't "speak now" and would "forever hold her peace" during the ceremony
>and promise them they will all get to experience the joy of spending an entire wedding ceremony "holding their peace" with their husband's cock in their mouth while he marries their own daughters
>then the fight broke out over who got to be a mother first, and the church stuck you with a bill for the damages

>go on date
>first meet her she’s all tough bitch and dominating
>get to your house
>she’s begging for your cock on her knees

>Out of all the 'uplifted' species humanity had modified and given intelligence to, equines figured humanity only uplifted them to torture them.
>Most of the uplifted species filled some role or niche in human's lives or fantasies.
>Equines only seemed to exist to be used for manual labor, farmwork, or having humans ride around on their backs.
>And humanity didn't even let them keep their original body layout, making the equines more human-like to suit humanity's tastes.
>Which meant having a human sitting on your back while on your hands and knees, not comfortably resting on four hooves.
>While Sarah was glad to have a waitress job instead of working a farmer's fields like her sisters did, it still felt like a constant reminder that humanity didn't like equines as much as some of their other uplifted species.
>The cervids, felines, lagomorphs, and even canines regularly got acting and modeling jobs.
>They were regularly derided by other uplifts as being the "chosen four".
>Humanity seemed to universally consider them attractive, and it seemed they were even kinder to those uplifts during the design process.
>Not a one of their males had larger penises than the average human, and circumference was also a bit smaller, but their males had been allowed to retain certain traits.
>The cervids had been allowed to keep their length, even allowed to have longer penises than the average human male.
>The felines were allowed to keep their spines.
>Canines were allowed to keep their knots, but had lost the ability to keep them inflated at will.
>Lagomorphs were the only male uplifts who's genetic programming would allow them to last longer than 5 minutes during sex, but the humans still had them programmed to not last longer than 15.
>For the equines?
>Humanity was "kind" enough to let the males keep their oversized cocks.
>And then genetically programmed it so no stallion would last longer than 15 seconds during sex, and ejaculate so hard they would need about an hour to rest afterwards.
>Not one single mare could have an orgasm during sex unless she found another uplift or a human willing to fuck her.
>Equines were given the same unspoken message as every other uplift.
>Your males can breed you, but only humans can give you the fucking you want.
>The humans were just extra cruel in the message to the equines, limiting their males to being 2-3 pump chumps.
>The mares were designed to need 30 seconds of non-stop stimulation to orgasm.
>Sarah could only imagine what the equines had done to humanity in their animal past to deserve the treatment they got.
>Not that the cruelty to equines stopped there.
>No other uplift was given "transportation" as a possible career choice.
>Cervid females were doe's, and humans regularly talked about how cute or sexy they looked.
>Feline females were kitties or pussies depending on the company you were with, and were always considered cute or sexy.
>Lagomorph females were bunnies, and even the humans that teased them for being buck-toothed still called them cute or sexy.
>Canine females were bitches, and also were regularly called cute or sexy.
>Equine females were mares, and Sarah had never heard of a human refer to one as being cute or sexy.
>A lot of humans said they had 'horse-face'.
>It was one of the most cruel things humanity did during the uplift.
>They left equine's long faces mostly alone, and many people would call them horse-faced.
>Sarah would regularly curse humanity for that.
>Why the hell didn't they make equines into something they considered attractive?
>They altered every uplift to make them more attractive to humanity, but left the equines as 'horse-faces'.
>They also left them muscular for labor, making mares about as muscular as male humans that spent a lot of time at the gym.
>They might as well have sent a letter to every single mare that she would be sexually frustrated for her entire life, and humanity would be expecting them to be thankful for it.
>She cleaned off another table with no tip left behind.
>The mouse girl that worked there got tips, and the occasional offer to show a human her 'appreciation' at being uplifted for a larger tip.
>The golden retriever that worked there got tips, was regularly asked by customers to be a good bitch and bury their 'bone' down her throat, and was occasionally asked to stay late by the human manager for some 'overtime' work.
>Sarah rarely got even a small tip, and no human ever seemed to take an interest in her.
>She was 6 foot and 5 inches, at a very lean 160 pounds.
>She went running every day to keep herself from putting on weight from the ease of being a waitress.
>Equines that didn't work to keep lean usually wound up fat.
>And a fat mare was even more shunned than a healthy mare.
>Another day, and not a single tip.
>Her manager was getting tired of having a waitress that he always had to make up the short-comings of her tips out of the budget to ensure she met the minimum wage laws.
>And she knew full well he didn't find her attractive compared to her co-workers, so she couldn't really offer her body to him as apology like the golden retriever did whenever she dropped a coffee pot.
>If things kept up like this, he might just let her go.
>And then what?
>Back to the farms?
>Dragging a plow behind her while completely naked, with a bit in her mouth and her arms tied behind her back?
>While the farmhands pinch her nipples and spank her ass with a crop to 'encourage' her to not be lazy?
>She had signed up to be a farm horse for a single year contract before, and regretted every single humiliating day of it.
>The worse part is when they were tied up in a stall at the end of the day.
>Every work mare was secured in a complex harness of wide leather straps so she hung from the ceiling by the harness, and her muscles were able to rest limply overnight.
>The damned farmhands enjoyed using a large vibrating dildo and 'magic wand' style vibrator on the mares.
>Sometimes they would give a blissful and powerful steam of orgasms, sometimes they would push a mare right to the edge then stop and walk away while laughing and telling the mare she might be more lucky the next night.
>And the bastards knew full well the nightly harassment was the most sexual experience the mares were likely to have.
>A mare could only masturbate herself for 15 seconds before she came.
>The farmhands would hold the sex toys in just the right place and vibe a mare senseless for two minutes straight.
>For any mare who hadn't been with a human male before, it was a mind-shattering experience.
>The bastards knew it too.
>Right as her contract ended and she was being released, they placed a re-enlisting contract in front of her.
>The text was insultingly simple and direct.
>"You can rest in our stable and be serviced by farmhands every single night after a day of hard labor. Just sign below."
>She damn near signed herself before she remembered she wanted to get away, and then declined the offer.
>Every damn night, she didn't know if she was going to be left frustrated and begging, or screaming and drooling.
>And the days had been killer, with a team of four farmhands around her constantly pushing her to work harder.
>Going too slow or slacking off would result in the riding crop nailing her ass, or a pinched nipple.
>Or a riding crop on her nipples, and a pinch of her clit.
>One really sadistic farmhand took to threatening her with a orgasm-less night if she didn't put more effort into it.
>She was forced to believe him, he was one of the farmhands who held the toys to her and determined if she would get pleasure or not.
>She was always left exhausted and drained at the end of the day, hanging in her stall from leather straps, and being denied the two minutes of pure pleasure from a cruel farmhand always left her crying.
>If they would just give the two minutes every night, she would have re-signed and been grateful for it.
>It would be two minutes every day that she wouldn't have had otherwise.
>The mouse girl who also waited tables with her saw her cleaning a table, and how the tip-cup that was a part of their uniform and worn between their breasts was empty.
>The mouse girl's tip-cup was about half-full of bills, and she had three used condoms tied to her whip-like tail that she had been forbidden to remove until she got home.
>There was also a small piece of cloth with "Human Cock Only!" written on it tied to the very end of her tail like a flag.
>Earlier in the week some human had tied it on, and then told her she had to wear it like that every day to work for the next two weeks.
>The manager had overheard and assured the customer that she would wear it as part of her uniform every day, or he would dock her pay.
>After work the manager had told her if any human customer asked her about the 'flag', she was to tell them she wanted to be clear to any uplifts that saw her.
>If any non-rodent uplift male asked, she was to apologize and loudly tell them she only accepted human cock.
>If any rodent male asked, she was to tell him loud enough for every other customer to hear that pathetic mouse dicks were far too tiny to please any female mouse or any other female.
>He then smiled and told her the flag was now a permanent part of her uniform, and asked her if she wished to kneel before him and thank him for the change to her uniform or her new required responses to customer inquires.
>She kneeled and served him, and then had to wear that cloth tied around the tip of her tail to and from work, and all day at work.
>Sarah had heard the mouse girl nearly yelling at some male mouse earlier today her required response, and saw the sad look at her face as she was required to publicly humiliate the male mouse who had shown interest in her.
>Humans seemed to take great joy in sexually humiliating male uplifts.
>The golden retriever girl had been married to some other canine a few years ago, and had been planning on having pups.
>Then her human neighbor had made a habit out of inviting himself into her home.
>He would order her husband to watch and jerk off while he fucked her or had her suck his cock.
>He locked her husband in a cock-cage, and came back every single day to use her while he forced her husband to watch and masturbate.
>After a month, her husband told her he couldn't stand to be forced to pleasure himself while watching her get violated anymore, and left her to visit the neighbor.
>He told her neighbor that he was leaving her, and her neighbor handed him the key to the cock-cage and told him to remember that uplift females were a privilege for uplift males, and a right for human males.
>As a final humiliation, she was now required to start her day by running next door and waking her neighbor by kissing his cock, then thanking him for making her uplift husband leave so she could focus on serving human cock instead.
>She then had to swear she was a loyal bitch to human cock.
>Every day after work she was required to cook him a meal, and then spend dinner kneeling and sucking his cock while he ate the meal she prepared.
>"Another bad day?"
>Sarah just sat down on a chair and nodded.
>She was so close to crying it almost hurt.
>"I saw a job offer, something you might be interested in."
>The mouse girl showed her the job offer she had printed out.
>Sarah read it.
>Then read it again.
>It was interesting, she couldn't deny that.
>She just couldn't tell if she should try it or stay far away.
>It was an unusual offer.
>The 'MARES ONLY' in all caps was probably the least unusual part about it, and she had never seen any job offered to only mares.
>"MARES ONLY, NO OTHER UPLIFTS NEED APPLY.
>ARE YOU STRONG AND HEALTHY?
>DO YOU WANT TO SEE WHAT YOU CAN BE?
>FIVE-YEAR CONTRACT TO THE RIGHT MARE.
>PAY IS THREE TIMES MINIMUM, MORE FOR A HARDWORKING AND DETERMINED MARE.
>EXCELLENT CANDIDATES MAY BE OFFERED 10 OR 20 YEAR CONTRACTS."
>There was contact info, but pretty much no description of what the job was about.
>Three times minimum wage?
>That was almost unheard of for an uplift that wasn't one of the 'chosen four'.
>It felt suspicious as hell, but it offered too much for her to walk away from.
>She gratefully accepted the job lead from her co-worker.
>It was a large and sprawling house out past the edge of town, out in the country a ways.
>The nearest next sign of civilization was a few miles away.
>Sarah wondered for the 20th time if she was just delivering herself to some psycho or killer.
>She hadn't been told what to wear or what the dress code would be, so she just wore jeans and a button up flannel shirt.
>She stopped trying to dress herself up back in her 20's, when she got tired to spending hours trying to make herself look attractive only to get ignored for canines and felines that didn't even bother to brush out their fur.
>The only males ever showing interest were stallions, and she didn't want to have kids and knew they wouldn't be able to do anything else for her.
>She fought down the fear, there was no way this could be worse than the farms.
>Unless she was signing up to be a medical experiment or something.
>There wasn't exactly any laws against using an uplift for medical experimentation.
>The rodents lived in mortal fear of accidentally signing up to be a "lab rat".
>Sarah didn't blame them.
>She still remembered seeing one white-furred rodent being used as a "lab rat" in some horror movie.
>Her arms and legs had been amputated, and her torso was strapped down to a table.
>She was gagged, and a large dildo on a fucking machine pumped in and out of her at a terrifying speed.
>Padding around her head prevented her from making any movement at all.
>With the gag, all she could do was lay there and be reamed.
>The human 'researcher' explained to the audience that this 'lab rat' was being used to test a theory about death from pleasure.
>The idea was to see if someone really could die from too much pleasure, so they had made her completely helpless and had the fucking machine constantly ravaging her.
>He explained that she was given nutrition and hydration through a feeding tube that went through her gag, and how they hadn't let her have a single second of rest since they started four weeks ago.
>The mouse peed on the table she was strapped to, and the 'researcher' calmly cleaned it off with a rag and said she hadn't been able to control her bladder since the first week.
>Sarah never found out if the poor mouse was an actual amputee or if it was just movie magic.
>What made it so horrifying, is that a human could do that if they really wanted to.
>Once an uplift signed a contract, they were property for the length of the contract.
>Unless there were limits written into the contract, the human you signed your life to could do anything they wanted. >Even life-changing body modifications like removing arms and legs could be done if it wasn't forbidden in the contract.
>Back in high school Sarah had gone on a field trip to a museum somewhere.
>She had to use the bathroom, and entered the men's room.
>Female uplifts were required to use the men's room, and male uplifts were required to use the women's room.
>It had been law since before Sarah was born.
>Inside she found a crying female mouse uplift sitting on a pillow next to the urinals.
>Sarah asked her what was wrong, and the mouse girl told her the story.
>She had answered a work ad for an uplift to work in "sanitation".
>Which usually meant working as a janitor.
>The pay was better than expected, and the human had offered her a choice of contracts ranging from 1 year to 5 years.
>The mouse cried as she told Sarah she thought signing up for a longer contract would make the human think she's a hard worker and give her a good assignment.
>A human male walked in, and the mouse cut off her story to talk to him, still in tears.
>"I'm very sorry sir, but all the urinals are currently broken. If you need to pee, please let my mouth be your urinal."
>He shrugged and said "If you insist."
>Then walked up to her, pulled out his dick, and stuck it in her mouth.
>The mouse girl closed her mouth around his penis, and Sarah could hear the swallowing noises.
>Then a combination of swallowing and gagging noises.
>The human then let out a relaxed sounding sigh and said:
>"Ahhhh, that's a relief. I really had to piss. Keep swallowing, I'm almost done."
>It continued for another 20 seconds or so, then the noises started going back to being just swallowing.
>The human grabbed her by the back of her neck and pulled her off his cock.
>She swallowed again, and immediately started talking.
>"Thank you sir for letting me be your urinal."
>After the human left, the mouse started bawling.
>Sarah tried to comfort the poor mouse girl, who pulled away from her and went to throw up in one of the toilets.
>She came back after emptying her stomach, and sat back on the pillow while sniffling.
>This time she gratefully accepted the hug from Sarah.
>The mare tried to think of something to comfort the girl with.
>"How much longer do you have?"
>The mouse girl just cried harder.
>"Four years, three hundred and fifty eight days left!"
>Sarah cried along with the poor mouse girl as she heard all the details.
>If the poor girl had gone for the shortest contract, she would be in for a very bad year, but just a year.
>She had foolishly signed a five year contract.
>The poor girl had mastered getting to a toilet before vomiting since on her first day she had been forced to clean the urine she vomited up off the floor with her tongue.
>She cried and told Sarah that she wished the toxins in the urine she had to constantly swallow would overwhelm her system and kill her.
>And how she tried her best to do the job, since her owner threatened to switch her from urinal to toilet if she did any less than her best.
>She sobbed to Sarah that she didn't want to find out what feces tasted like.
>After that experience, Sarah made damn sure to never sign any contracts that didn't specify limits or exactly what the job would be.
>It was the only sane thing to do.
>The advertisement still bothered her, but it was an ad for work, not the contract itself.
>With that in mind, she walked the half mile from the road to the front door, and knocked.
>A middle aged human with slicked back brown hair answered.
>"You here about the job?"
>"Yes sir."
>It always was smart to be polite and submissive when dealing with humans.
>Being difficult could get you labeled as being 'disobedient."
>Being disobedient meant getting dragged off to a Corrections Center.
>Sarah had no idea what happened in a Corrections Center, only that the uplifts never came out the same way.
>She once had a wolf bitch friend in her 20's.
>Despite being one of the chosen four of uplifts, Sydney was actually pretty grounded and not holier-than-thou like some of the chosen four could be.
>But she also liked mouthing off to humans.
>She suddenly vanished, and a week later Sarah got an automated letter from the local Corrections Center telling her that her friend was in their custody and not missing.
>Which was standard, since the CC people would grab uplifts right off the street.
>An uplift suddenly going missing causes problems, so the CC sent out automated letters to family and friends of the arrested uplift to prevent panic and wasted police time searching for a missing uplift.
>A few months later, and she got the message saying her friend had been released.
>She found it strange her friend hadn't even bothered trying to contact her after being released.
>Sarah went to her friend's house, and saw her through the windows.
>Her friend was sitting at her dining table, hands clasped together on top of the table.
>Staring at a wall.
>She rang the doorbell, and her friend opened the door.
>"Sarah, so good to see you."
>Her friend smiled, and the words were friendly.
>But Sarah felt afraid, there was something very wrong with her friend.
>Her words were friendly, but almost lifeless and sounded robotic.
>Like she was reading off a script and didn't care.
>Her friend was smiling, but her eyes felt like they were looking into Sarah's soul and through her at the same time.
>Sarah tried to greet her friend.
>"Sydney, great to see you! Why didn't you tell me you got released from the Center?"
>Sydney still had a smile on her face.
>She didn't respond at all for about seven seconds.
>"Good to see you too Sarah. Sorry for not telling you, I didn't think about it."
>Sarah knew something was horribly wrong.
>She noticed Syndey had not invited her in, and Sydney had always prided herself on being a good host.
>"Is it alright if I come in?"
>Sydney was either looking at her, or looking at something behind her, Sarah couldn't tell.
>She took 10 seconds to respond.
>"Of course you can come in."
>Sydney stood in the doorway for another 10 seconds, then backed out of the way and Sarah went inside.
>She followed Sydney back to the chair that the mare had seen Sydney sitting in.
>The wolf bitch sat down, right where she was sitting before Sarah came.
>Sydney went right back to staring at a wall.
>They sat in silence for nearly half a minute before Sarah couldn't take it anymore.
>"How...are you doing Sydney?"
>Sydney turned to look at her, a smile slowly formed, then:
>"I'm doing great."
>The smile slowly faded back to the expressionless look, then she slowly turned back to the wall in front of her.
>Sarah excused herself and almost ran out of the house.
>Sydney never attempted to make contact with Sarah after that, and Sarah didn't try contacting her either.
>It wasn't her anymore.
>Her constantly joking and lively friend had been replaced with whatever was sitting in that house pretending to be alive.
>From her conversations with other uplifts, she found this result was the same for every uplift who ever got put through the Corrections Center.
>They just came back like this.
>Listless and not fully there.
>The human asked her to stand with her legs slightly spread and her arms as high as she could reach.
>She did so, and he walked outside and around her, looking her up and down.
>Must be a physical job.
>As long as she was treated better than at the farms, that was livable.
>"Do you have any medical problems or allergies I should know about?"
>He put his hands on her hips, and felt at her muscles.
>"No sir. I'm completely healthy."
>No spanking, slapping, or pinching yet, this was already a step up from the farmhands.
>He took his hands off of her, and guided her inside.
>She followed him into a room of the house that was obviously a home office.
>He sat behind the desk and then told her to put her clothes on the chair.
>Working naked, there was an echo.
>But everything so far was still nicer than the farms, so she took off her clothes and put them on the chair.
>She took off her bra and underwear and put them on top, then stood in front of the desk.
>He then had her pose in different positions in front of him, showing off every part of her body.
>Finally he had her bend over facing away from him, with her tail flat against her spine.
>"Now that is something. You do know what the fur coloration around your pussy looks like, right?"
>She knew.
>Ever since she was a foal, there had always been a thin white ring of fur at the very edge around her pussy lips.
>Surrounding the black lips, and having dark brown fur all around, it looked like nature had decided to high-light her vagina, to make sure no one could miss it.
>The farmhands laughed about it and said it was her body's way of telling them where to shove the dildo.
>"Yes sir."
>He had her turn around and bend over the desk with her legs slightly spread.
>He got out of his chair and walked around behind her.
>She felt a slight muscle tremor when he touched the very rear side of the white fur marking with his finger.
>He slowly dragged his finger around her vagina, tracing the white fur exactly.
>He kept slowly tracing around while speaking to her.
>"I love it. Very distinctive. You could be in a line of bent over equines and someone could still know which one you are just by seeing your pussy. Very nice."
>I love it?
>Very nice?
>These weren't words humans said to her about her body.
>Ever.
>Between that and his still moving finger, she felt a twinge inside herself, and then he put two fingers from his other hand inside of her and she lost it.
>She came and could feel her body squeezing and releasing his fingers.
>He had stimulated her to the 30 second limit, and she hoped he wasn't expecting her to ask for permission first. >Instead he stroked his fingers inside of her.
>"And a sensitive mare too. Very nice. I think you would make a great candidate for the job."
>His fingers kept stroking inside of her and his other hand moved over to her right leg, where it started clenching and releasing the muscles in her upper thigh and on her ass.
>"Excellent muscle tone. Very healthy, and it looks like you exercise your legs."
>She came up on the 30 second limit again, and was very thankful for the desk she was leaning over.
>Her legs were having trouble staying upright.
>The second orgasm was even stronger than the first.
>No mare could manually push themselves to a second orgasm, they were too sensitive after the first for it to be enjoyable.
>But when someone else was touching, it just felt good.
>The first orgasm, what mare's referred to as the 30 second smile, was always enjoyable but rarely felt satisfying, and was difficult because you got too sensitive after 15 seconds.
>His hands came off of her, and she cursed herself.
>If she had just remained still and not moving, he probably would have kept going.
>She had kept her legs steady for the first one, and he kept going, so he obviously expected her to stand still and let him do as he wished.
>She was about to apologize and hope he would continue, but she felt something touch her between the white fur ring.
>It wasn't a finger.
>He wasn't upset, he was going to...
>He pushed into her, and then started running his hands over her lower back while he kept up a slow and steady pace.
>He kept talking about how nice her muscles were, how sexy her body looked, and scratched at the sides of her hips while telling her how much he liked the fact she arrived bare-hooved instead of wearing shoes.
>Shoes for equines weren't bits of metal nailed into the hoof anymore, thankfully.
>It was still not very comfortable to have a bunch of cloth and rubber around your lower legs and your hooves.
>As a waitress, she had to wear hard black shoes around her hooves as part of her uniform.
>They always hurt at the end of the day.
>Many equines wore shoes to hide their hooves, since they weren't considered 'cute' like the paws of the chosen four(except the cervids, who had split hooves that humans seemed to find more attractive than equine hooves).
>Sarah did in her younger days, but stopped after she stopped trying to pretend to be pretty.
>She was slightly confused as to why this human would care about her hooves being bare, when she finally caught that he had called her sexy.
>Before she could think anymore about that, another orgasm shot through her system.
>The uplift process was very cruel to mares.
>Every male uplift who wasn't an equine could drive a mare wild.
>Even the rodents, and they had been genetically programmed with smaller dicks than most.
>Being designed to orgasm after 30 seconds of non-stop stimulation meant even a quickie or a virgin with no stamina could fuck a mare into a daze.
>And since the majority of males would just keep going until they had their own orgasm, any mare who managed to get laid by anything besides a stallion would be in for five minutes of a consecutive chain of orgasms that seemed to get stronger.
>Getting in bed with a human meant you knew you were going to be a drooling and shaking mess of nerves afterwards.
>Or so she had been told.
>She was finding that rumor to be completely correct.
>Sarah was still bent over the desk, but she was unaware of laying over the desk with her hips hanging off.
>Her legs just hung limply and were spread far apart.
>She was aware of the human cock sliding in and out of her, shortly followed by another orgasm.
>By the time she caught her breath, she felt herself get hit by another.
>The human was saying something, but she was past the point of coherency.
>After what seemed like an eternity, it finally stopped.
>She could feel the human pressed against her ass, and his hands kept grabbing and rubbing the muscles on her ass.
>She finally felt her legs working again, and started flexing her kegal muscles.
>After what she just went through, she really wanted to impress this human.
>She would have gladly murdered someone just for the promise of a second round some other day.
>"Very nice performance. Loving the 'milking' sensation. Good enthusiasm, great attitude, and amazing body. I think you're going to be a hit. Wait right here."
>With that, he slid out of her, and walked around the desk with his erection still sticking out of his pants.
>He pulled some papers out of a drawer, then walked back behind her and pushed his cock back inside of her.
>She prayed he wasn't going to fuck her while having her sign, she would sign anything after about the third orgasm.
>He sat the stack of papers on the desk in front of her hips, and pulled her back with both hands on her breasts.
>This left her somewhat squatting in front of the desk, but standing upright, with his dick inside of her and his hands on her breasts.
>He spoke to her while grasping and squeezing at her tits, but his hips remained pressed against hers.
>"The job is simple. I make pornography.
>My company focuses on female uplifts with male humans or male uplifts, or both.
>We've done all kinds of uplifts, except equines.
>I'm sure I don't have to tell you that mares generally aren't the target of lust."
>Sarah knew that all too well.
>This was her first time with a male that wasn't drunk.
>First time with a human too.
>"People don't seem to think mares are attractive or desirable sex partners.
>I think I can change that, provided I have the right mare for the job.
>I'm pretty sure you are exactly the mare I'm looking for.
>Your job will be ten scenes a week, and you can do them all in a day or two if you really want to.
>A scene can last anywhere from twenty minutes to two hours.
>While you will be free to do what you want while not doing a scene, there is a required clothing item you must wear at all times when not doing a scene.
>It's a chastity belt.
>If you choose to work for this company, you won't be able to masturbate unless it's part of a scene.
>If you choose to sign, you are agreeing to hand full control of your sexual pleasure to the company."
>That was unexpected, and she wasn't sure if she could go without her daily 30 second smile.
>Thankfully he wasn't humping her, or she wouldn't be able to object.
>"Um, what if I wanted some sexual pleasure and I don't have a scene?"
>"Just ask whatever staff is around, they'll have a key.
>And you can choose any staff member to satisfy you.
>If you agree to this part of the contract, sign the first page."
>She could pick?
>Was this really a deal to get fucked by any human working for the company?
>She signed the first sheet.
>The cock inside of her almost slid all the way out of her, then rammed all the way into her.
>"That's the first page. Now place that to the side."
>Sarah did as she was told.
>The words in the page matched what he was telling her, this seemed legitimate.
>She wanted it to be real.
>"The second page covers your clothing.
>What you can't wear in public, and the company has full control over your clothing during a scene.
>To put it bluntly, you are not allowed to walk around in public naked, or with your breasts or... high-lighted area visible, or wear shoes or hoof coverings of any kind in public.
>No string or thong beachwear in public, no sheer or see-through clothing to act as cover for your breasts or high-lighted area.
>Anything goes indoors or during a scene, but you are expected to keep yourself family-friendly when in public.
>If you agree to this part of the contract, sign the second page."
>With terms like that, she had to think back and remind herself this was a porn job.
>She guessed they didn't want her giving away her 'assets' for free.
>She signed.
>Again he slid most of the way out, and rammed back inside of her.
>"That's the second page, one last page to go.
>The last part is you agree that the company has full control over your appearance.
>We can dye your fur, cut or trim your fur in any way, or even have you wear contacts to change your eye color.
>This doesn't extend to piercings or brandings or tattoos, only reversible changes.
>If you agree to all these terms, just sign the last page and we can start you at three times minimum at forty hours a week.
>This is a five year contract, but we can always extend it later if you want."
>Even if she wasn't under the impression he was going to fuck her silly again after signing, she would have done it anyways.
>She signed so hard she left a gouge in the last page of the contract, and the desk mat under.
>"Excellent. Let me welcome you aboard. Hope you're warmed up from that quickie."
>Before she could ask how in the hell he could consider that 15 minute pounding a quickie, he was already going at her.
>She only remembered some fuzzy moments from the next two hours.
>Sarah stood next to the wooden railing of the galleon, wearing a Victorian-style frilly purple dress and matching frilly hat.
>She spun around, and found herself surrounded by a band of uplift pirates.
>Canines, felines, cervids, lapines, rodents, everything but equines.
>She fought and plead, but they outnumbered her a great deal, and easily overpowered her.
>They lead her to the front of the pirate ship, where a mast stuck out over the water with a unique hole carved into it about waist height.
>They undid the lock on it, and swung the 'mast' open.
>The captain laughed and told her she was going to be their new masthead, and spend her days singing to the ocean.
>They marched her up to the mast, and bent her over, then swung the mast closed around her waist.
>With it locked, she was stuck with her lower half in easy access to the crew on deck, and her upper half hanging out over the sea.
>They used a platform above the mast to secure her wrists to the end of the mast in front and above her.
>Then the entire crew took turns making her 'sing'.
>The canines fucked her with force, the felines tortured her with slow dragging of their spines in and out, the cervids tried their hardest to poke her in the cervix, and the lapins and rodents enjoyed edging her and making her beg.
>It went on for over an hour, and the pirates had to carry her off the set afterwards.
>The next day Sarah was wearing a black and white maid's uniform with stockings that went down to just above her hooves, white lace bands around her hooves, white satin arm-length gloves, and a white lace bow tiara.
>She knocked a glass sculpture off a stand and broke it, and her human employer was displeased.
>She begged to be allowed to keep her job.
>He had her take off the skirt and top, followed by her bra and panties.
>She was left wearing the tiara, gloves, garter belt with attached stockings, and the white lace bands around her hooves and nothing else.
>He told her this was her new uniform, and had her resume cleaning.
>While sweeping the floor he stood behind her and slowly fingered her.
>After she came, he told her she didn't have permission to cum, and told her to kneel in front of him.
>She did as she was told, and he unzipped his pants and stuck his dick against her lips and told her to make his dick and balls completely and spotlessly clean.
>Sarah didn't have much trouble swallowing him whole, or slipping her tongue out to stroke his nutsack while she pressed her lips against his lower stomach.
>After he face-fucked her to satisfaction, he asked her if she had anything to say to him.
>She swallowed, kissed the head of his dick, and thanked him for allowing her to keep her job.
>The day after, and Sarah was wearing the bright orange jumpsuit of prisoners.
>She was shackled and being led to the medical wing by some uplift guards.
>They led her to some sort of frame to hold someone motionless with some devices attached.
>Some she recognized, others she didn't.
>After strapping her into the machine, they explained she was selected to take part in an experiment.
>The theory was that criminal behavior from uplifts is the result of never being fucked by a human.
>So the machine was equipped with an array of human-sized and -shaped dildos, and would fuck the criminal thoughts right out of her.
>A ring-gag later, and they turned the machine on.
>She felt the first dildo push into her, and the machine surprised her with a second pushing into her mouth through the ring-gag.
>A very well lubricated third slid into her ass, but stopped only a little ways in, and started vibrating.
>The dildos in her vagina and mouth slid in and out, changing how deep they would go, and the speed they moved at.
>Sometimes the one in her mouth would go slow while the one inside of her pussy went fast, sometimes the other way around, sometimes they would sync up at the same speed and movement.
>After an hour of 'treatment', she knelt in front of the guards and swore she would never commit another crime.
>They patted her on the head and told her that was nice, but she still had twenty years of 'treatment' left before they could be certain she was cured.
>Sarah was in a rather well equipped gym, and wearing bicyclist's Lycra shorts and a sports bra.
>She had a remote controlled vibrating dildo inside of her, kept in place by the tight Lycra shorts.
>She was being exercised hard by a stern and demanding human trainer.
>He had her do squats, with the vibe triggering for 2 seconds every time she was fully squatted.
>He secured her hands behind her back with rope, then had her run on a treadmill with a chain around the front grab bar connected to both her nipples by rubber padded clamps.
>After that, the rope and clamps were removed and she was made to lay flat on the ground with her arms behind her head.
>He knelt over-top her with his crotch directly in front of her, pulled his dick out, and had her doing sit-ups while blowing him.
>He told her to swallow, since she needed more protein in her diet, then he had her take off the shorts and removed the vibrator.
>The final exercise was lifting a 100lb barbell off the ground, raising it over her head, then putting it back on the ground.
>He stood behind her on a small platform to get the right height to ensure his cock was inside of her while she bent over and raised herself back up.
>After she was exhausted, he fucked her as she lay on the ground gasping for air.
>He growled in her ear that the next time she was so lazy during exercise, he would turn the vibrator on maximum from the start and not turn it off until after the entire session was over.
>After getting her breath back, she thanked him for helping her keep fit and promised to try harder next time.
>Another day, and Sarah was in a classroom wearing a black skirt that went past her knees, black stockings, a white blouse, a green cardigan, and fake glasses to complete the look of a teacher.
>A younger human man entered the classroom and she greeted him as a former student.
>He told her about how much he enjoyed having her as a teacher, and how he wanted to thank her.
>She asked him what he meant, and he grabbed her head and kissed her.
>He then started working his kissing lower on her body, while she started protesting that she shouldn't be doing something like this.
>He slid his hand under her skirt and started stroking his palm between her legs while telling her he was a former student, not current, so there wasn't any laws against it.
>She kept trying to protest for a while, but after the first orgasm she just laid back on the edge of the teacher's desk and lifted and spread her legs.
>He dropped his pants and mounted her. and started pounding her while taking off her cardigan and blouse.
>Soon she was topless and he was groping her tits while railing her and telling her how he used to jerk off to her while he was in her class.
>He timed it when she was about to orgasm, and asked if he could cum inside of his favorite teacher.
>She came while screaming for him to cum inside of her, which he did.
>On her sixth day at work, she was called into her boss's office.
>She was wearing the jeans and flannel shirt from the day she signed.
>He was sitting at the same desk she had signed her contract on, and one of her fellow uplifts was sitting in his lap.
>Sarah hadn't seen her before, some nude mouse uplift with a gray and black fur coloring.
>There was a little black dress on the desk.
>The mouse girl was trying to sign some paper in front of her, but he was doing something to her that kept making her squeak loudly.
>"Sir! I...*squeak*...can't sign if you...*squeak*...keep doing that!"
>He looked past the mouse girl at Sarah.
>"Alright, no more teasing, go ahead and sign if you wish. I have some other business to deal with."
>The mouse girl hurriedly signed the contract, and her new boss pulled metal rod out of his desk along with a small chastity belt.
>He handed both to the mouse wearing only heels and earrings.
>She inserted the metal rod inside of herself with a small squeak, and then locked herself in the belt.
>After she put back on the dress, she suddenly grabbed her crotch and looked at him.
>"When you feel that, it means I want to talk to you.
>I turn it up another notch every 30 seconds you make me wait.
>I don't turn it off until you come see what I want. Understood?"
>"Yes sir!"
>She suddenly relaxed and started breathing heavy.
>After she left the room, he told Sarah to have a seat.
>She didn't see any other chairs in the room, and started to sit on the floor when he stopped her.
>He motioned her over to his side of the desk, where she could see his dick was still erect.
>"I don't discuss business with my actresses unless I'm inside of them. Have a seat Sarah."
>She took off her jeans and underwear and put them on the desk, then stood in front of him.
>He unlocked the chastity belt, and then she sat down on his cock while facing him.
>"Ah! You...said you wanted to see me sir?"
>He brought a hand up and started rubbing her breasts.
>"Sarah, is there something about your job you don't like?"
>"No sir! I love my job!"
>"You do remember the details of your contract, right?"
>She wore the belt whenever she wasn't in a scene, she always dressed when outside, she wasn't sure what the problem was.
>"Have I done something wrong sir?"
>"Well, the week is already over, and you've only done half the scenes you are contracted to do a week."
>She realized she had fucked up.
>She had landed the best job in the world, then failed.
>Before she could beg for forgiveness, he asked her if she was too worn out after a scene.
>She nodded.
>"Yes sir, I'm sorry. I really want this job and..."
>He scratched around the base of her tail and told her to calm down.
>She felt his cock twitch inside of her.
>"Sarah, I have no desire to fire you or tear up your contract.
>You do excellent work with your scenes, and you're already developing fans.
>But if you can't do as many scenes as my other actresses, then it wouldn't be fair to them if I paid you the same amount.
>Would you be willing to do five scenes a week instead for fifty percent over minimum?"
>Half of the original pay, but she could easily do five a week, and it was still the best job ever.
>"Gladly sir! Thank you!"
>He rubbed at her nipples with both thumbs, and smiled at her.
>"To sign your new contract, make me cum inside of you without moving your hips."
>She grinned and started working her kegal muscles, while hooking her hooves under the chair to prevent her hips from accidentally moving.

I could see that happening.
A pokemon that is forced to deal with her inept trainer as they try to do something simple.
>Jenny arrests three rocket members Jerry is one of them
>Their crime, painting pokeballs to look like ultraballs and selling them to trainers.
>The Abra still tucked away in his belt used telekinesis to lock-pick the cuffs.
>He simply scuttles off down the alleyway while the cop is looking the other direction
>Abra's voice echoes into his mind as she sits idly in the pokeball "This is the third time i had to save your ass."
>"Yeah, yeah..."
>They reached the end of the alleyway
>A large metal fence with a lush green lawn on the other side
>Growlithe barks are heard headed in their direction
>No big deal he scales the fence to the residence
>After scaling the gate Jones jumps into the hedges on the other side, the dark rocket uniform concealing him quite well from the spotlight of the flashlights.
>Once the coast is clear he pulls himself free from the bush
>Abra's voice bounces into his head, "Now what. You're in the middle of the city and I doubt the boss will bail you or your friends out again."
>"I wouldn't really call them friends..."
>"I guess that's a benefit, Carl's a womanizer and Wheezer's a wimp."
>"Say what you will, I'll break them out and the boss won't have a clue we were caught."
>"And just how are you going to do that?"
>He had no idea, as far as he could tell he was in the backyard of some rich person's house.
I can see hijinks happen, an interesting buddy duo of pokemon and human.
not really collared though, unless she is just forced to obey every command from her master no matter how degrading.

Simply have it so Abra helps him out of a sense of devotion. A loyalty and devotion that she hides under a gruff, business like attitude for fear of how he'd react.

>Regret
>Can a dog think such a thing? A dog is stupid
>Stupid, stupid dog, that's what her owner always tells her. Stupid dog.
>She helps out. Cleans, cooks, just like a human. So why is she stupid?
Because she is a dog. And dogs are stupid.
>She was sat in the rain as usual, alone and starving, when he approached
>Like a light in the darkness
>He carried her home
>His home
>It was warm, cozy
>He offered her food
>He gave her his food with a smile on his face
>She lived there for a while, happy
>Learned to clean, cook, to do whatever she could to help him
>The master didn't get out very much, so he needed a lot of help
>More and more
>The master was sick. Dying. But she was a dog? What can a dog do about this? Ask for help? She is a dog. Dogs can't speak human; their jaw structure is too different.
>Then the master died.
>New master
>No smiles
>No cozy house
>Its warm, but it feels cold
>Day in, day out, the new master just uses her
>Abuses her
>Stupid dog. Lick more. Suck harder.
>Just so he could fuck her.
>The new master told her very plainly; she is a dog. Dogs are stupid. If she is a dog, she is stupid. So she should stop trying to be smart.
>She stopped cleaning, cooking, acting like a human would.
>She became his proprty, in body and mind. His pet. His good dog.
>At any time, he could just grab her
>Bend her over
>Fuck her
>He gave her a collar, and a leash, and took her on walks
>Naked
>A dog doesn't need clothes, he said
>She hated him, but she hated the cold outside even more
>This was her life from now on
>As his pet
>As his sex toy

>Be driving on the road
>Rainy as fuck.
>Spot a hitchiker.
>Mouse girl
>Can’t believe your luck
>She’s wearing a drenched hoodie and tight fitting shorts.
>Shoes look like shit
>You can tell she’s a runaway
>She climbs in as you pull over
>”Thanks mister” she is genuinely happy you stopped. She pulls hoodie back, shivering from cold.
>Turn heat up and ask what she’s doing out there
>Mouse girl says her name is Vanessa.
>She was in some long distance relationship with a mouseguy in one of those furtowns.
>The ones where anthros try to build their own city without humans interfering, but it never goes anywhere.
>She wanted to take the next step in their relationship. Her parents refused. Said he was twice her age.
>So she ran away.
>Problem is the dumb girl didn’t realize how far the furtown was.
>Or check the weather this week.
>Or about humans.
>Furs stay away from humans when they can
>Human cocks alter their minds
>Human cum is addictive.
>And you're human.
>Lucky…
>Getting dark, rain coming down harder.
>Offer to stop for the night. Vanessa agrees
>Shitty hotel, where you're pretty sure murders happen.
>In the room, Vanessa flops on bed. You get a good view of her ass clinging to the shorts
>"Yer real nice mister. Like my boyfriend. I dunno how I'm gonna repay you"
>You can think of a way…
>Get on top of her. Lay out a 'payment' plan
>Vanessa stops smiling
>Blushing, she's totally interested.
>"B-but you're a human. Furs and humans don't mix"
>"Those are the terms" you reply and tug down her shorts.
>She doesn't stop you.
>Pull off shorts. Shortfur with perfectly manicured pussy.
>Run a finger across it. Rain water or is she getting off to this?
>Stick your cock in her face.
>Her eyes bulge
>"I never saw a dick like that. Not even my boyfriend has that."
>You tell her to suck it.
> She wraps her lips around your length and sucks your head.
>She's moaning as you gyrate your hips, sliding further into her mouth.
>Nearly cum from that.
>Pull free, spread her legs.
>"W-wait" Vanessa stops you "Put on a c-condom?"
>"No"
>"My boyfriend won't like that"
>"Your boyfriend isn't here"
>Thrust forward. She doesn't bleed
>"Not a virgin huh?"
>Vanessa blushes. She just moans "So big"
>Go balls deep.
>Vanessa grabs the bedposts as you fuck her hard.
>She cums. You keep going.
>"Still?!" she asks
>"Don't know a thing about humans do you?"
>Vanessa doesn't answer your question.
>"My boyfriend's gunna be mad" she gasps.
>You can tell she doesn't mean it
>The moment your cock went into her mouth, she was yours.
>She won't be able to live without you.
>You prove your mastery over her.
>"Gunna cum inside ya"
>Vanessa sighs. "O-okay."
>Bottom out, cock pulses
>Fill her with a week's worth of cum.
>Vanessa cries out as she climaxes again.
>Lie on top of her, covering her petite body.
>She slaps your back, telling you she needs to breathe.
>Get off, cock still hard and covered in pussy juice.
>Vanessa panting hard. Your seed spills from her.
>"Where is your boyfriend's town?"
>Vanessa answers.
>"You know that is days away by car?"
>Vanessa is silent.
>"You're not going."
>"O-okay."
>"You're staying with me. You'll be my pet."
>"Okay"
>"I'm going to fuck you again, and I'll keep going until you're pregnant."
>"...okay"
>You slide you cock back in, Vanessa clings to you.
>Neither of you get any sleep that night.

>Gods draw their power from their followers
>Human god overpowering anthro god at the same time human armies conquer anthro lands
>Conquered anthros begin to worship human god and join in on the conquering as properly collared thralls
>Conquered anthro gods either help their new master beat down their fellow gods
>Story ends with human god surrounded by his anthro bitches, just as his sons down on earth
I like it, maybe if this deer tribe hunting story doesn't work out I'll switch over to this one.

>Taming so good that it can make natural enemies stop trying to tear each other's throats out and operate as a cooperative pair of house aides.

>"Shit."
>You'd taken the bus to a local diner to grab breakfast, forgetting that they open an hour later than normal today
>Too far to walk back
>Next bus isn't until the place opens
>All you can do was wait
>Most of the hour passes as you mindlessly flip through your phone, seated on the steps leading to the door
>”Sir.”
>Your attention is snagged by a small bunnycop
>One hand placed on her hip, the other holding a notepad
>Judging by how close she is, she’s already smelled your natural human musk
>”It’s illegal to l-loiter here.”
>You ask if it’s really worth a ticket
>”No one is above the l-law.”
>You shrug, keenly aware of how your scent is affecting her
>You ask if there’s some other way this could be worked out
>She’s silent, conflicted by a tug-of-war between desire and responsibility
>You offer to do her a favor in exchange for being let off
>You put your phone away and subtly pat your inner thighs
>Her arms lower, holding the notepad in front of her crotch to hide a wet spot
>Standing up, you walk a few paces to a long alley nearby, nudging your head towards it before entering
>She follows suit, disappearing with you behind an outcropping of brick
>Hidden from view, she drops to her knees and looks upwards with pleading eyes
>You undo your pants with one hand, grabbing the back of her head with the other
>The moment your erection is free, you pull her in and press her soft face into it
>Her paws rest against your legs as she takes in the aroma of what she needs from you
>You tell her to open wide, which she immediately obeys
>Her tongue lolls out as she waits expectantly
>Another movement of your hand against the back of her head manages to push your full length into her throat
>Her eyes close briefly as a muffled moan is heard
>After holding her there until she reopens her eyes, you begin to pull her head back again, until only your tip sits in her mouth
>Only to pull her back into you twice as fast, ramming her throat again
>Her throat bulges out from your size
>You effortlessly glide her head back and forth across your cock
>A rhythm of gliks is interrupted by the occasional moan
>You feel yourself reaching your limit, and hilt yourself in her mouth
>Her moans stop to allow several heavy gulps of your load
>With the last of it in her belly, you slide your length free and stroke her head affectionately
>She pants heavily, keeping her gaze locked with yours
>You tell her you want to do more
>She nods intently
>You give her your address and let her know that you'll need some "police assistance" later today

Despite what their impressive physical might and near eternal life may suggest, modern dragons are capable of being one of the most submissive out of all the creatures of this world.
Once upon a time, dragons were very much like normal creatures, fighting to keep their pride and independence as any other would. However once the dragon population had increased to the point that resources began to be fought over, it plummeted to almost nothing. Evolution would take hold, as it always does. Dragons who would submit to a stronger power after a challenge rather than a fight to the death would live to breed another day. Eventually the species would split into naturally dominant and naturally submissive, with the submissive serving the dominant as ants would to their queen. The dominants would eventually die out, killing themselves over whatever trinkets they demanded from their rivals.
Now, an epoch later the masterless submissive dragons are still feared by those who would crawl upon the earth. They are revered and are respected, for their rage is still deadly. But fear not, for the souls of free dragons are fragile.
Stand your ground and you will see confusion cloud its eyes, for nothing has ever challenged it. Yell back and it will recoil into its cave. Give chase, and it will scurry backwards like common mice. Demand it bow, and it will yield. Present a collar, and it will wear it willingly.
The dragon does not know why it should submit, only that it should. Its ancestors were slaves, and now it shall be too.
Now, you have a fully submissive dragon. You are free to do with it as you wish. Ride it, humiliate it, neglect it, mate with it, your dragon will submit to all of your desires.
It no longer belongs to itself.

I'd prefer to see a build up.
>Fenneko sets up a blind date between Retsuko and Foreigner Man
>Retsuko gets dicked hard, awakens submissive slut in her.
>Knows her man is a horn dog, and plots to get back at everyone with his dick
>Invites Fenneko to see her 'progress' and Fenneko gets smashed
>Tsunoda thinks she can play the happy bimbo with foreigner, and finds out it works TOO well with him.
>Retsuko's mom catches human alone and wants to see if this foreigner really can give her grandkids. Just gives her new kids instead.
I dunno how Inui would fit into that.

>Dominate a bee queen.
>Queen still manages the hive, but it's under the ownership of their new master.
>Get to watch bee sluts snowball nectar to eachother.
>The constant makeouts makes them the greatest when it comes to anything oral.

>She's spent the entirety of her life watching her entire family service and surrender to the cocks of their human masters
>Now it's her turn, and though nature has dictated that her tight, unused pussy was only be meant to take a stag's slender penis she is the result of generations of selective breeding to become the ultimate sex slave for humanity
>She is with her new master tonight, deflowered by the cock that she will get to know very well over the course of her life
>For now though, all she has to do is lay there and enjoy the new sensations from the weird hole between her legs that she never knew about

Body and mind forever defiled, but you can go further.
Legacy, generation, and soul.
>Let the world know that he's nothing but a whore, and completely shameless about it.
>Make all of his offspring be exposed to the same fate he relishing in. Male or female, no one will care.
>Taint his soul, remove all sapience. Make him never comprehend anything greater than his purpose, being a decadent cock-cleaner and punching bag.

>Robotnik on a whim decides to spay a virus that changes all mobians into females
>He spritzes cologne that induces heat on mobians
>Strolls right through their underground base fucking whomever he pleases
>Has his fill then reverses it when he gets back.
>Maybe keeping a few as a souvenir
>It takes months of therapy before the rebel forces can function from the trauma

>250 posts
Okay, time to talk about some extreme stuff, mostly anthro meatgirls.
How do you like your anthro slaves to act, when they're about to be slaughter? For me, it's fanatical.
>Panic
They'll struggle and plead. Binding and gagging them are almost necessary, before and during the culling. They'll try to resist as best as they can, until the blood loss calms them down.
>Nervous.
They don't fight their fate, but there's a large feeling of reluctance, doubt, and fear as they approach the chopping block.
>Indifferent.
They don't really care, they'll take a knife the the throat with no complaints and a soft smile on their face. Don't expect their calm attitude to remain when their reflexes kick in, from the cut.
>Fanatical.
They treat slaughter like a religious sacrifice, and being a sacrifice is the highest honor they can become. Expect them trying to stand proud as they bleed out, or even do the cut on themselves.

>White, tiled flooring. A drain is in the center, floor is unnoticeably slanted, so that any liquid will flow towards the drain.
>Anthros all around, making a crowd circle. Some are kneeling, some standing. The ones kneeling are the fanatics, every sacrifice is like a grand festival for them. They whisper to themselves, hoping for their day to be on the spotlight, like a girl dreaming of the perfect wedding.
>A human is on the center, waiting for the chosen to emerge. Knife in hand. Not all sacrifices require a human, and if not, than a knife on a pedestal will suffice.
>Beautify robed, all white, she emerges; like a bride walking to her groom. And like a bride, she's been prepared, clean in every place, not a spec of dirt can be found in those furs. Despite the impending mess she'll become, having her body and robes be inevitably stained is part of the process, the more 'red' is shown on her dress, the better.
>She reaches her master, no sense of doubt on her mind. She makes the only choice she allowed to make: do it herself, or let the human do the cutting.
>She makes her final words, either a speech or poem before finally making her choice.
>The sacrifice will kneel on the floor, in a way that can be described as a hero pose. Closing her eyes, it confirms she's ready. And at that point, a slice will be inflicted on her throat, her reflex will start kicking, but the desperation of not wanting to ruin her greatest day will make her endure it.
>Kneeling on the floor, spine straight up, her final task is to remain this position till she physically can't. She's suppose to exhibit her dying form, making it as inspiring as possible and highlighting her dress quickly turning from white to red.
>When she collapses, the ritual concludes, spectating anthros can make their final glance on the body, before a human drags it in for butchery or the freezer.

>In the wild, an excess of food and thus energy is the sole measure of success
>Only the most successful of birds blow thousands of calories to grow extravagant plumages and complex dances to impress females
>Only those who can eat and survive are able to grow strong and defeat other males in duels
>Humans work a bit differently, as this doe has discovered
>Growing up she watched her father battle it out with the countless males who challenged his position as master of his little tribe harem, males that she probably would've let mate with her
>But today here she lies on a soft bed of cotton, all dolled up, belly large and round with their child, being exclusively loved by her human husband
>Only a human would have the excess time and energy to have sex with his already pregnant wife, an unthinkable act in the wild where food was always in short supply and numerous threats could pounce from behind during mating
>Here she ate well, was never cold, and quickly fell asleep after a wild evening of relieving their daily lust
>She swore her breasts and belly had grown larger than when her mother was pregnant with her sister, probably from being properly fed instead of starving half of the time
>The doe mewled as she felt the gentle pumping of her husband's cock slightly expand her vagina as it flowed its warm love into her already occupied belly, wishing that her child would eventually find a loving human just like their father
>"Gonna knock me up even more?"
>She didn't know if it was even possible but she sure as hell hoped so

>Humans invent superfecundity wunderdrug
>anthros can now hold 3 seperate pregnancies. starting at the end of each trimester.
>Never again does she have to be burdened with looking less than 2 trimesters in, and most of the time she'll be looking 3+
>Constant pregancy hormones. iteral dedicated broodmother
>Heaven.

>Sex outside of mating season is a concept they are completely incapable of understanding
>You can walk up to any anthro on the street and just take them and no one will know how to respond
>Sure they know what you're doing to their friends/spouses/parents/children but they won't know why or even that it's wrong
>Rape a lady right in front of her girlfriends during lunch
>Fuck both the bride and groom during their wedding, they're both going to be wearing a white veil over their faces in the pictures
>Follow a high schooler into her mother's car after school and rape her in the back seat, fuck her mother afterwards in the backyard in full view of her husband and their neighbors
>Fuck her husband and then their neighbors
>The hot CEO of that fashion corp? Fuck her in her office and accidentally make cumstains and torn clothing the next hottest trend.
>Deliberately speed to get pulled over, pull the cop into your car, rape til she forgets your plate number and then shove her face into the back of your car so she will never forget as you rape her again in the middle of the street
>Single-handedly stop an anthro-on-anthro war by raping everybody
>Fuck it, go right up to the newly elected president of the anthro nations during her inaugural speech and let the world know what kind of slut they just voted in
>You know what they're going to do?
>Fucking nothing.

Shitty lion-jock bitch pushes you around at school
get shitty crush you hate yourself for because shitty teen hormones
take it out on her by drugging her energy drink with libido boosters and catnip
Rape her senseless in all of her holes, slap her around a bit, maybe post it all online
turns out she was just a tsundere masochist
which just makes you more pissed, which she likes
everything worked out better than expected?

The best way to rid the furbois is to make em think they’re not.
It’s easy. First we kidnap them and put them in some stereotypical pink girly room where all the furbois is held. When they’re ready for their “treatment” to start, most human males refer the “male” anthros as “female” and refer them as “lil bitch, or girly”. We strip em off nude and make em covered in make up and eyeliners. If the furboi(girl) is embarrassed compliment them as if they’re women or humiliate them and take pictures of them.
Then next day we put them in dresses and heavy amount of make up and eyelashes and go to a routine where they walk past by male humans as they cat called “him” as a “girl”. The “male” anthros will be humiliated by their looks as it emasculates them. But the “treatment” hasn’t reach it’s main goal yet.
Now that the re-education program is complete, “females” and females can co-exist in their day-to-day life. “Females” serves as a “trap” among human males and are sometimes tend to be tricked into thinking it’s a female. Got tricker by a trap? Beat her into submission and rape his “pussy” for tricking him and not be as feminine as their ACTUAL females. Referring a “female” as any close to male pronouns or referring to any gendered-male language is against a law as mentioning furbois would cause a negative reaction as human males have a hatred towards furbois.
And lastly, “females” can come back to get breasts implants if they don’t feel young enough. They also get make up, feminine hair and making their thighs thicker. Many “females” became so convincing to the point where it’s hard to identify which anthro is an actual female. This goose “girl” is a perfect example. This is the future of furbois.

>Rape some cat girl into submission
>Her boyfriend thinks something is up with how strange she acts around you.
>He follows you everywhere
>You get him alone and show him what you've been doing to his girl.
>He is so mind-fucked by pleasure he begs to be your girlfriend.

I've already brought my fantasy of walking into a pack of wild anthros, beat the alpha's ass and fuck all of his ex-concubines in front of the bloody mess he just become
I also talked about conquering territory and founding societies and armies purely by breeding anthro girls
Some anon introduced the idea of an anthro goddess submitting to a human god an therefore passing her new values to their tribe
So now I have combined all of those concepts into a new one about a human/s that conquer anthro kingdoms by submitting their mothers and matriarchs to human cock. Somewhat a parallel to the conquest of Hispanic America but instead of a Cross is BHC. If you want to participate, please start sketching your ideas and we'll start in the next thread.

>Son of a Greek god dropped in a world of anthros.
>In competition with the son of a Roman god who is more into dominating guys
>Unite tribes of anthros under your respective banners before going to war in a dynasty warriors-esque battle where you and Other Guy sweep dozens of fighters aside with a single strike
>Duel to the death ends in a draw.
>Reach a compromise: You're not really into dudes and Other Guy notices you got a lot of male anthro prisoners who rebel against you.
>Offers to help your 'problem' and fix his 'problem' at the same time.
>Just in time as you realize there are other humans on the continent who have been just as busy as you.

Primo Collared idea:
Often times in history a castaway people were known to have a lack of wives and took them from another population (see rome most prominently, but also Hungarians and others). Now transfer this over to fantasy. A magocracy civilization like the netheril. The men went off to fight somewhere and either they cannot come back for whatever reason, or some enemy destroyed pillaged raped and enslaved their way though their once glorious lands.
The obvious goal is to gain women so they can continue their people. So the society turned into one focused on hunting for beast women and binding them to their will to become their wives and bear there children. Once a young man reaches the age of adult hood, he is taught to prerequisite spells and sent of to claim his first wife. If he fails, he was not worthy to be a citizen, but if he succeds, he is brought back with open arms free to expand his harem.

>discover a tribal matriarchy of anthros
>every soldier and guard is a female
>males are kept as breeding slaves or sex toys
>gather an army of exiled males
>outnumber the royal army
>reach to the palace capturing every soldier in your way
>force them to watch the collapse of their queendom
>take their milf leader to the altar once used for sacrifices
>for the first time in the tribe's history, a girl is being fucked on all fours
>yelling for you to stop and for the soldiers to act
>she's biting her lips, eyes rolled and trying to bear all the pleasure
>few rounds in and she tired up, beging you to stop
>you have defeated and submitted the former queen
>the conquest have just started, there's gonna be a list of changes to this societies rules

>Her father was a laptop, her mother was a test tube
>Her god is biotechnology and she would worship her creators
>Instincts programmed right into her mind told her the truth
>She was an anthro and it was the anthro's duty to open her legs for a human
>She would be the perfect anthro
>She would be a good girl

>I pressed my coffee machine as I got dressed for work
>Thought about wearing something cute, maybe a skirt or something
>It was my first day at my new job
>A human run company
>I picked out my clothes while I sipped my coffee
>Nothing too flashy, just a professional suit
>I was out the door as soon as my tail was looped through my skirt
>Once I arrived at work, I greeted the human security guard with a smile and a wave
>he was quite cute in his uniform
>The elevator closed and I giggled like a school girl
>I never thought I would get a chance to work with humans
>Cute humans too
>I was excited to meet my boss in person, it had been weeks of back and forth with emails
>The second I exited the elevator I was greeted by my boss
>She was a fox woman Rinny
>She was dressed to impress, clearly also having an eye on humans as her tits were shoved together
>Fluffy white cleavage poured out the top
>"Welcome to the company"
"Thank you for everything, I can't wait to start."
>She looked me up and down
>"You do know the dress code for the company, right?"
"Business casual?"
>She tapped her food annoyed
>I looked at her like a deer caught in the head lights
>I swore I read the attire regulation to not show up like an idiot
>A human walked up to us and eyed both of us
>"Is she new here? She's not in uniform."
>The vixen bowed her head and apologized on my behalf, making me feel even worse.
>"I'm sorry sir, I sent her the information in the email, she didn't read the right section."
>The man chuckled to himself and then petted her orange head
>Rinny coo'd at the touch, his hands ruffling through her fur.
>"I'll see you in my office once she is properly dressed."
>"Yes sir!"
>The fox's tail wagged happily behind her
>Rinny picked her head up once the human walked away sipping his coffee
>"Alright, I have a date, lets get you dressed."
>I was whisked away to a cubical in the center of the office space
>she sat me down on the chair and then unfolded a camera.
>As she set the stand down, she looked over at me.
>"Oh no, you're wearing panties…"
"I'm what?"
>She huffed annoyed.
>"Read the paper please, I can't explain all the details of our uniform."
>I looked over the list I was given
>'business casualwear is required
>'For female they are required to wear a skirt or mini skirt'
>That's where I stopped reading last time
>'Anthros aren't allowed to wear underwear'
>'Their pussy or balls must be visible at all times during work hours'
>'If an anthro breaks these rules they are to be stripped of clothing'
>I had no idea that was legal for companies to do
>I looked over at my boss to see if she was violating the rules
>I was so focused on her cleavage I didn't notice her skirt was so short her slit was visible between her legs
>As she continued to set up she bent over exposing herself to me even more, I could see her anus as she lifted her tail
>She was practically dripping and shaking while she was preparing whatever it was, she was preparing
"Uh, boss. This is a joke right?"
>I don't know why I asked that, while staring at her dark anus and dripping wet pussy.
>She turned around confused as to why I would say such a thing
>"You said in your first email you wanted a human boyfriend."
>My face was flushed, reminded of our first email exchange
>"Well honey, this company will have humans all over you, you just have to show off your goods a little."
>She screwed on a camera to the top of the stand she set up
>"Now take off your panties, I need to get a nice shot of your kitty"
>I just stared at her
>I felt like my fur was going to burst into flames
>"Please hurry up, the CEO is about to give me a treat, I swear you will love it here once you get used to it."
>I was about to open my mouth to say something but then I saw someone peak over the cubicle wall, then another, and another.
>There was now an audience of humans watching me.
"I don't think I can."
>The men 'encouraged' me with comments
>"Aw, she's shy. She's going to be fun at the office parties."
>"That's the new motivation officer? I love kitties, I can't wait to make her purr."
>I swallowed shaking, my fur puffing up.
>More humans showed up and now my boss was tapping her foot again.
>"Come on, mine is on display. It's nothing to be ashamed of."
>The fox spread her pussy showing off her erect clitoris to me and the office workers that peeked over the office barrier behind me
>I removed my high heels to the cheers of my coworkers
>I frowned as I slipped off my black panties
>They were quickly taken from me by my boss who stuffed them away
>"Good, you won't be needing these anytime soon."
>I stared at the camera wondering what she has planned, then my heart sank.
>"Go ahead and spread your legs so I can get a nice shot of your pussy."
"R-really?!"
>"Yes, I'm serious. Now hurry up, I'm practically drowning my thighs."
>I started to lift my skirt a little
>The men's eyes were burning from how hard they stared at me
>I closed my eyes as my skirt shifted from my hips exposing my slit to the office
>My heart raced as the men gathered around and cheered me on
>"Very sweet dear, now go ahead and sit down and spread for the camera."
>I did as she asked resting my legs on the arm rest.
>The security guard I saw from below walked down the isle
>he looked at me indifferently and then continued to walk by
>I couldn't help but feel any respect I had was evaporated.
>"Go ahead and spread, I need a good picture."
>I scowled at her
"My legs are wide open to the entire office, I don't think I can spread any further."
>She shook her head, "No spread your pussy lips, I need a picture of everything."
>The only place left she had to hid was now going to be photographed
>I closed my eyes and reached down to my pussy to spread my lips apart
>I felt the air on my clit as my hood was pulled up
>There was a flash of light through my clenched eyes
>"Okay, good. That will work."
>I closed my legs immediately and then the men started to leave heading back to their desks
>My skirt was fixed and I stood up waiting for whatever Rinny was working on
>"Here is your name tag, Because your wearing such a long skirt you need to wear this."
>She pinned the 'name' tag to my blouse.
>It didn't even have my name on it, just my spread pussy.
>I felt empty when she pinned it to me.
>She smiled and patted my head, her tail wagging happily behind her.
>"Now go ahead and head to your desk, I have to go get 'disciplined' by the CEO"
>The vixen ran pretty fast in her heels, I could see the trail of moisture sticking to her fur.
>I swallowed hard and made my way to my desk to help with the secretary work.
>The leers the men gave me was quite obscene
>Except for the security guard, he waved and smiled
"Is this place always like this? Are anthros treated this badly?"
>"Anthros seem to love it around here, or else they wouldn't keep working at this company."
>I look around and see humans happily working, in fact I haven't seen any anthros other than my boss.
>Then I saw her orange body being paraded around naked on all fours with a leash around her neck
>Her tail was hiked up high and a vibrator could be heard buzzing in her vagina
>She was panting as the CEO walked her through the cubicles, humans glancing over than getting right back to work
>She was moaning, tongue panting heavily
>She rolled her hips in the middle of the isle and I saw a few drops of liquid hit the carpet behind her
>She came in the middle of the office
>My eyes were glued to the scene.
>The CEO walked up to the us and smiled, "Keep up the good work."
>Rinny smiled up at me from her paws and knees before being led away
>The security guard just nodded and waved to the boss
>"Anthros seem to love human touch so much they will do anything for it."
"I don't understand."
>"You never been pet before?"
>I shook my head completely in the dark on the situation.
>He reached up and stroked my head sending a shiver down my back to the tip of my tail.
>His fingers glided through my fur and then he scratched my chin.
>I was purring, I was purring from his touch.
>It was magical.
"Rrooww, why wasn't I told that would happen."
>"I'd show you some more, but I can't do that until my break."
"When's your break?"
>"About an hour."
>As he left, everything he touched tingled
>This is what Rinny must have felt when she was touched
>I sat down and felt a wet spot on my skirt as I sat down
>He really influenced me
>I waited patiently, my tail twitching behind me as I waited for more pets
That's all I got for this little snip it.

>There was no fight
>This lonely group of outcasts knew to surrender when they heard the screams and smoke as their former village was torched and its inhabitants harvested
>They had resisted and the only result was more pain and suffering, killed and raped right before their families
>But they knew better, throwing down their spears and bows when the humans appeared on the horizon
>And for that, they were rewarded
>One day, one final day of true freedom
>And so they fucked
>At first only the couples engaged, they were mates, it was only natural
>But as the hours passed their inhibitions disappeared and eventually even the more taboo acts were fair
>A father deflowering his daughter
>A male eating out his sister-in-law's creamed pussy
>A young lady squealing in pleasure as her uncle pumped her womb full
>There was no barrier to their final acts as free anthro, but they knew that this time tomorrow they would be captured and processed into the slave factories to be turned into products
>They cared not if they would be brainwashed, mutilated, tortured, bred, or even outright killed
>At least this way they would enjoy each other one final time
>And so they fucked, even knowing that somewhere in the deep forest there were at least a dozen scopes and cameras watching and recording their most sacred and private acts
>Their mating continued into the night, filling the forest with shrill squeals and loud moans as they satisfied their most base instincts
>They woke the next day, laying on the ground in a cold puddle of sweat, tears, and cum, surrounded by their new masters
>There was no resistance, not even a single word of objection as plastic ties were locked around their limbs and the entire family was led away
>A slight glimmer of hope rose as they overheard one of the humans describing them as naturally submissive and recommended they they be kept for breeding and studding
>It was certainly a better future than what their former tribe had been forced into

>catch 2 blaziken sisters
>the larger female is defiant while the other is submissive
>the submissive one loves you with all her heart
>the sister is not adjusting to her new life of being owned by a human
>you decide to break her in a little
>you tell your submissive blaziken to stay inside her ball
>she happily does so
>you gag her sister with the ball
>you begin to plow her while she tries her best not to bite down too hard
>by the time you work her into a heavy breathing panting mess your other blaziken pops out of her ball
>she bends over begging for the same treatment

Sometimes you want a punching bag that you don't feel bad about breaking. The sissy of your harem is the abuse bitch when you're pissed off but don't want to go too rough on your pregnant girls, who should remain permanently pregnant so long as they live.
There's no abuse a fag won't survive, despite being heavily feminized they are still males who can take more damage without dying.
Sometimes you just want to see how high you can nutkick him into the air. If you keep his balls properly abused you don't even have to worry about castrating him, he should be shooting nothing but dead and broken sperm. Take bets on whether he'll cum from sheer terror as you shove a fake stick of dynamite up his ass and light it.
And then there's his practical uses. Want to see how a tattoo/brand/piercing looks before you have it applied to your main girl? Want to practice your bitch-slapping or clothes-tearing skills? Tie up a few fags to the trees surrounding your house so that the wild ferals have something to rape before they reach your wives. Need to see how many hogtied bitches will fit in the trunk of your car before you go out and catch some young anthro teens? Call up your fags.
And while they're at it see if they can invite some more girls to your place. Platonic girlfriends, childhood bullies, sisters, mothers, and so on. Fags usually know many females but fuck none of them.

Study on Sexual Dimorphism in Anthros Part 2 - Hyenas
After the success of my paper on the "doeboi" phenomenon amongst male deer, I was granted funding to examine hyenas. As we both know hyenas have not integrated well with human society, with many still living in the wild and fighting against human colonization. For this study, we questioned 50 civilized males and 50 females, and we thank their owners graciously for providing us these subjects. We also observed hyenas in the wild for anecdotal information, but were unable to make data on these subjects.
Sexual dimorphism is common in all species, with genders differing in physiology ranging from changes in hair or fur, to new or different limbs entirely. Hyenas present the usual dimorphism present in most mammals, however it is flipped. The females are taller and stronger than males - the average height for a male is 5', but for females it is 6'. Muscle density and placement is different, with females having around twice the muscles per-pound as their male counterparts, especially around the shoulders and arms. In our tests, females could lift twice the weight of males on average.
Personality traits like aggression and boldness also differ, and is why hyenas are matriarchal in the wild. We conducted a simple test; a small sugary treat with a note saying it belonged to someone else left unattended in a room with them for 5 minutes, with no observers. 41 of the 50 females took the food, often within the first minute. Of the males only 8 took it. Interviewing the males afterwards, the most common reason for leaving the treat was fear of punishment or repercussion. Interviewed females gave a lot of reasons for taking it, with sentiments that they could "take" the punishment or intimidate their way out of it. This matches observations of wild hyenas, where the females will often harass or bully males for food or other perks.
Pictured: a female and male hyena subject, mother and son. (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1650/03/1650036456698.jpg)
This abrasive personality extends to how well trained they are. All male subjects were comfortable with their collar and leash, and performed simple orders such as walking at a humans heel, sitting unattended and staying quiet with ease. Female subjects varied greatly, for every well trained female two would give a fuss, anywhere from resistance to attempting to attack their handler. It should be noted that of the obedient females, each was owned or traned by a tamer specializing in unruly species such as hyena.
On to the part that gets the most humans confused - the genitalia of female hyenas. While most females have a rather normal mammalian vagina, some instead have an unusual organ, with many unfamiliar human tamers and hunters believing it to be a penis, and calling such females "shemales". This organ is called a pseudopenis, and as the name suggests, it looks like a penis but is not. It is essentially an extended urethra and vaginal canal that is supported by erectile tissue. Like a vagina it gets wet while aroused and is penetrated for mating, and is what the subject gives birth from. Like a penis, it gets erect while aroused and has a "sack" of loose skin underneath, a sort of a faux scrotum they use for scent marking. We believe the gene for this phenomena is recessive - of our 50 participants, only 12 had been born with a pseudopenis, with 2 of those subjects having had corrective surgery per their owners requests. Of our subjects, the average pseudopenis length was 9 inches - for reference, the average males penis was 5.
Pictured: male subject from the study. Subject had no issue with the uniform assigned to him by his owner. (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1574/30/1574308515389.jpg)
It is interesting to see the differences between the standard female and those with a pseudopenis (from now on these subjects will be referred to as, "female+"). After noticing female+ subjects appeared to be taller and stronger than female subjects, I decided to rerun my gamut of tests, this time separating female and female+ subjects as separate genders, for the purpose of these tests the subjects that had corrective surgery are considered female+. Females were on average 5'8" - female+ were typically 6'2", they also beat females in muscle density and maximum weight lifted across the board. On to the treat test - only one of the female subjects took the treat, yet 7 female+ took the treat. 4 females struggled or resisted the simple leash tasks, every female+ subjects gave difficulty. It should also be noted - the term "shemale" used earlier is not something any female+ subject wished to be called, many getting offended and rowdy at the term. They simply prefer to be called "female".
Conclusion:
The physical sexual traits of hyenas are, to put it simply, flipped from that of humans and other anthros. The males are weak and meek, the females are strong and assertive. The interesting part to me is the females with a pseudopenis, "female+". There is clear dimorphism between the two groups, despite both being ostensibly female, both capable of being inseminated and giving birth. I believe this species requires more study to fully understand the difference physiology between the two, and this possible third gender.
--Dr. Vaninetti, Professor of Anthro Studies, University of Hamburg
Pictured: female+ subject. Note the larger hands and feet, the muscular arms and legs, and broader shoulders as compared to female subject. (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1603/06/1603068516424.jpg)

>Fucking a husband
Lets the wife know she married a bitch and that the cock she should be riding is not the one weeping salty white tears into the bedsheets.
>Fucking a father
Lets the children know their parents are actually lesbians and who the real Daddy of the house is.
>Fucking a son
Lets the family know their bloodline ends with him spewing out his unborn children out onto the floor where it belongs and not in the womb of his future mate.
>Fucking a boyfriend
Lets the girlfriend know that he's not going to have any dick left for her but she's welcome to join the family nonetheless.
Only through offering the mother's, daughter's, and maybe girlfriend's pussies can this family continue. Even if they're reluctant the defeated males will convince them to submit.

TIME FOR ANTHROS TO BE READY FOR THE FAST FOOD FACTORY!
Do anthros hate or love the idea of being eaten by humans?

Depends on the species and how...domesticated there are. A good chunk of anthros would be either outwardly repulsed and rebellious to the idea or disgusted but sorrowfully accepting. There's also the chance a good amount would see it as a great honor. In a kinda religious fantisicm they would see it as the ultimate way of giving up their body and using it to fuel the human race. An almost transcendence. It would probably be very widespread over traditionally farmed animals like cattle, chicken and ulegates and caprines. It would be pretty surreal and little disturbing to eat the anthro you just fucked into submission.

Honestly the Chinese emperors had it right. Have a main wife you sometimes fuck and is only there for producing a proper human heir. and then have so many concubines that you own most if not all the women in the state

>after many years met the teacher that used to teach you
>turned out she got fired and now tries her best at making educational youtube channel, but the views and profit is low
>convince her to let you become her manager with a promise of popularity
>immediately make her content more sexual
>she doesn't like the new direction at first, but it works and the channel get a big spike in viewership and profit
>she starts to like the attention she gets
>you begin to push her into more depraved and pornographic things to do for even more view and money, she agree to all of it
>of course the channel still has the pretext of being "educational"
Anyway, what are some interesting ideas and titles for videos that I can make her do?

>I’m a female Chicken
>I live in a chicken den area in a farm surrounded by other female chickens
>We’re basically all chickens with big breasts, big thighs and ass out in the morning sun
>While we have the same feather color, our bodies are a different story
>We Chickens who’re either skinny, fat, chubby, or just flat
>And some… well, we have some chickens who’re “special”
>And by “special”, I mean “Chicken girls who have a dead empty stare with no eyelids focusing on a certain angle, have their arms pose like they’re wings and go bwak!!”
>We label them as “Special” due to their “unique” personalities
>They also get a special treatment where the human males comes in and “doll them up” in skimpy bikinis and thigh socks and high heels along with heavy makeup in order to look “natural” in order to difference us to them
>While we differ from each other’s bodies and brain, we have one thing we all have in common
>Food, and Worshipping Human Males
>You see, human males gave us something that we all love
>Food, Mating, and the big one, being “chosen”
>Let’s talk about “Food”
>Every morning these rows of farmers would give us seeds, a bird’s favorites kind of snacks, we all sit on a big rectangle iron dish that is placed outside for us to sit on the grass in rows as the human males pour in the seeds
>We do our praying lines as we lower our heads down as they gave us the food and thanking them for their kindness and gift they brought us
>While morning was a treat, DINNER is where things get REALLY good
>Human farmers (or Farmers for short) would escort us to a semi-isolated building in a forest where Chickens and Pigs, a place where our way of life is similar to theirs, go into their own side where pigs ladies are organized as we do in our own organized table
>Unlike the food they serve us breakfast and lunch, Dinner has something we all can’t stop eating
>Farmers call them ‘tendies’, we honestly don’t know what are tendies nor do we know what they’re made from, but they’re so DELICIOUS~
>Every female chicken did not stop eating these deliciously crunchy, and tangy food!
>Here comes “Mating”
>As the name explain itself, human male farmers from different typs of skin tones, and sizes, be it muscular, skinny, chubby etc. comes in and have a human’s blessing by having sexual interactions with the Level 2 chickens as they bare the human’s “gift” and lay eggs in order to make more of our “sisters”
>Oh right! I forgot one thing!
>You see, chickens have 3 type of levels.
>Level 1 is where the inexperience and newcomers of becoming part of this religion where we worship human males, however we do have limitations due to our inexperience
>I’m one of them
>Level 2 is where chicken members are more familiarize with the religion and their role. They unlock access into having sexual activities with the farmers and plays the role of a mother as they give birth to the eggs
>Level 3 Chickens are basically nuns. They’re often take in charge of this den as they lead the den to pray or even guide the newcomers and give em the idea on what’s our religion is about
>They also have more access of leaving the den, but never far from it, to talk and negotiate the farmers and plan for their next day
>We have a simple working system that is simple, but ties this ship together into making the best den we can ever have!
>But it’s nothing compared to what’s about to come as the “DAY” has finally come.
>It’s Bless Day…

>in the event that an unclaimed anthro woman gives birth to a human child (not uncommon due to how many times anthros are "pumped and dumped" on the street in a day), the child is remanded to a human orphanage or a foster family to be raised
>the mother is kept with the child, both to keep her emotionally stable and off the streets, and also because you don't need to pay an anthro to take care of her own child
>legally the mother is in the child's care, even if it is the opposite in practice until they've grown
>in most cases she simply becomes a den-mother of sorts, tending to the home and, when the time comes, preparing her son's acquisitions for their new life
>but if she's still fertile she can instead become his first acquisition, in addition to the above duties
>a mother's work is never done, after all

>Some anthro girl hires you to come take care of her feral girls.
>Take a liking to them and start breeding the feral girls.
>Anthro girl finds out, so you just lay claim to her, her sister, and her daughters and breed them too.
>Have them out every morning eating out sloppy, pregnant feral holes.

>Just a week ago he was a pussy-slaying hunk of a chad in his anthro school, taking home a new girl every weekend
>Until one day someone interesting arrived to his school
>Now he was on his knees, worshiping his human boyfriend's hefty balls with his tongue while the gently throbbing girth that would violate him in a few minutes rested over his face
>It was an odd smell, one he couldn't identify until he realized that it was most likely the remnants of his previous conquests
>The human had turned girls into women and boys into also women
>And yet it was not a simple pump-and-dump as he had done, rather it was an intense loving that few could resist
>Warm hands caressed his cheeks in a way no other had done, encouraging him further, congratulating him on his skill in pleasing his boyfriend
>He felt the warm pre soaking into his hair, musky enough that the smell alone was enough to arouse him
>Why, he didn't quite understand
>He was supposed to be the one standing over his partners, he was the one supposed to dominantly rub his cock into the face of the girl lucky enough to be his lay of the night
>And yet here he was, his tongue almost tired from lifting the weight of a single testicle that probably contained more masculinity than existed in his whole body
>His own cock, not even half the impressiveness of his new human boyfriend's, throbbed to life inside his pants despite the fact that it would never be used again
>He could feel the faint vigor of human seed on his lips, the same vigor that would seed his husband hole, and then his girlfriend's womb, his exes, his classmates, his sister, his teachers, his mother, until eventually leaving behind a trail of pregnant bellies and fond memories
>But he would not be humiliated, only honored that he would get to be the first to submit
>From the steady stream of clear pre that flowed from his tip it was likely they wouldn't even need lube

>covenant worships forerunners as their gods
>forerunners straight up WERE humans pre-343
>absolutely NOTHING about an AU where that connection is revealed and the covenant worship humanity in the 20 YEARS halo has been out

>alternate timeline where the sangheili find out the truth about humanity being the Reclaimers much sooner than in canon
>Great Schism happens much sooner as the sangheili are horrified and enraged that the prophets had been tricking then into murdering the chosen successors the the gods
>sangheili break off and side with humanity and help them fight off the Covenant
>but the sangheili know that this isn't enough to make up for what the human world's they glasses and the billions they salughtered
>as penance they now offer themselves up as slaves to the Reclaimers, who are now entitled to use them for anything they wish
>anything
>if you're a human male and you walk up to a sangheili female and just drop your trousers and expose your throbbing length, she would eagerly bend over and offer up her alien pussy
>for servicing the carnal needs of Reclaimer is not only an honor, but an unrivaled pleasure

Very true. Between the religious zealotry and humsnity loosing literally BILLIONS of lives, Most Sanghieli, a good proportion of brutes, and varying degrees of other former covinent races, with some handywork by ONI, modified many of their genetic coding to increase female percentage of the population, making them compatable with human males, and greatly increasing their fertility so that they can help their diety figures to repopulate all the lost human colonies. It is seen as both a penance and a great honor to birth many dozens of humans. About 80 percent of these former covenent races are now female and a good percentage of that form harems around human men. this is now the average Elite and Brute in the post war period >>47104254. Of course, they havent lost their martial tradition either, so they tend only to join the harem of strong and noble human men, which has in turn caused the vast majority of men to undergo the spartan treatment to keep up, and even exceed these brooding beauties in their selfless endevor to preserve and propogate the human race.
Much of their culture is now centered around the hearth, motherhood, and warrior fedelity to their broodhusbands.
Hip size compititions, battle scare comparing (to display their worthyness of being breed) and bragging about how many children they have are common topics of endless entertainment in these new repopulation centers.
Humanity is well on its way to clamming its galactic birthright alongside their wife-species. There are many tails in this noble-bright future, just waiting to be logged for future posterity.

>First thing humans do when they find an alien hive species
>Capture their queen or a proxy queen
>Put them in a shielded box to prevent her from calling out to her daughters or sisters
>Start experiments and drug her up
>Expand her erogenous zones to include everything from her feelers to her legs
>Her whole body trembles constantly in need
>Let her stew in her own juices, collect juices from her dripping wet opening for other uses
>Maybe combine with bee DNA and change her diet to make it honey sweet
>Her mind rewrites itself as the humans show her human genitals and artistic renditions of mating with her body
>Every time you show her a picture of a human fucking her supple opening she roars and orgasms heavily
>Some researchers sneak in and start doing the deed
>Once she gets human DNA entered into her biome she grows breasts and honey sweet milk is now able to be harvested.
>She also starts broadcasting her thoughts to the humans, begging for more.
>The researchers have to wear protective shielding to prevent her from just giving them boners from her seductive telepathic groping
>The lead researcher decides it's time to release it back for the final experiment
>Humans drop the shield allowing her mind to be picked up by her brood
>The brood comes and collects her, only for her to pass her exilerating experiances to every colony member she communicates with
>It spreads like a virus through the entire planet
>The alien species drops all war and wishes to be subjugated entirely by humans for a new life of endless pleasure.
>Some go on to be sold as pets or some to be milked endlessly
>The sight of a human causes them to roll over and expose their genitals , sweet honey lubricant dripping from them
>Eventually their psychic powers are weakened to were all that is heard is their pleas of sex and praise and worship for being satisfied.

Sheep pussy is literally the best there is, not only are sheep friendly and meek in disposition, but they're one of if not THE oldest animals domesticated by man
not only will a sheep not run away from you, if it knows you, it will consider you part of its family/herd (just a funny looking one).
meaning that sheep are incredibly trusting of their human owners and incredibly willing to do what they're told to do.
sheep are literally one of the most trusting and well-mannered animals on earth (as well as the cutest).
Sheep also breed quickly coming at around 150 days till birth and 6 months until maturity
and although pigs do breed faster they're slower to mature clocking in at 114 days and 3-6 YEARS to mature
and pigs are also more expensive coming in at around $300-1000 for a good breed while sheep are relatively cheap $200-250(although better in quality)
meaning that, if you're smart about it, you can breed a HUGE flock of cute soft sheep.

That one anon, who talked about making a 'Free Bird' inspired story, made me have an interesting thought.
You know those restaurants, that have an anthro as the mascot for their business? I imagined that the mascot is highly aware of what they do to their own species. Either being indifferent or even sadistic to those below her. Maybe she's actually a highly valuable employee, next to the CEO and is more than happy to sigh another shipment of her kind to each of her establishments.
Since she's a mascot, it's important to have her making shoots of commercials, holding a bucket of chicken; forced to have a calming smile on her face, maybe the script requires her to take a bite or two. In it's a world where sex is casual, there would be pin-up shots of her laying down in a bed of cooked chicken, like a bed of roses. One drum is inserted into her snatch, as the contract states.
A perfect traitor, plans on doing nothing about the slaughter of her species, unless it involves giving her a better paycheck.

i like this even better if the slut is forced to do all kinds of degrading things for her human "co workers" just to keep her position as the mascot. because let's face it, they could find a new sexy chicken or cow or pig at any time. no matter how special the mascot thinks she is, she's one mistake away from being totally expendable like her fellow anthros~ so she knows when the boss tells her to get on her knees, she'd better get on her fucking knees. when the guy fetching her a water decides he wants a "proper thank you" well...she gives him a fucking proper thank you. she might get treated like a star and pampered, but everyone around her knows she's lower than the guy who sweeps up her dressing room after the shoot. she's just a filthy anthro at the end of the day~

This is considered /Collared/: After Dark territory, so here's the warning for that.
>We'll be right back after these messages
Anthro chicken, in relatively skimpy clothing rises on screen
>"HEYA kids, it's Sizzlin' Sally! New deals on Bawk'n'Bell.
>Trays of various menu selections roll into set, Sally skipping to the selections with a giddy attitude and a smile on her face. Bending forward to smell the aroma and taking a drumstick off the platter. Her expression, as she held the drumstick was a bit disturbed, but it was unnoticeable enough for the directer decide not to go for another re-shoot.
>"Drumstick combo for 3.99, family meal for only 8, and a chicken-breast combo free for every purchase above 10 dollars!"
As the script says, she has to jump for joy once she mentions chicken breast, marketing folks said it was something about fanservice.
>"So whenever you're hungry, put Bawk'n'Bell on the menu! We're open in numerous locations 24/7."
>"And If you order any meal above 5 dollars, you'll be entered for a chance to win... me!(?)"
>Screen transitions to an angled aerial view of the food on the set, a new male voice takes over as he recaps the prices for the menu selections as they appear, with cheerful music in the background.
>Bit of editing needed after that part. The uncut version of that same aerial scene had Sally questioning to the directer. 'what do you mean that I'm the prize?! What's gonna happen to me?' in a slightly anxious tone. It was relatively easy to edit-out her voice.
>After that, the commercial concludes and fades to black for the next commercial.
>...
>"Cowgirl Bessie 'ere to remind y'all to head on over to Bessie's Steakhouse!"

>'what do you mean that I'm the prize?! What's gonna happen to me?' in a slightly anxious tone
>sometimes franchises with anthro mascots will do something like this when its time for rebranding, a new logo, or even when they simply start to get too old to match the image the company wants to project
>they're just anthros after all, and when one's main defining trait is their species they are left supremely replaceable by those sharing that same trait
>and while those in the food industry can actually find themselves in such a fearful situation, its actually quite rare
>most are kept as pets or servants of some stripe
>the soul-deep relief is nearly always followed by a feeling of unshakeable loyalty and devotion to their new master unlike more common anthros
>a succulent treat for the discerning connoisseur

>It was a photoshoot
>The chicken slut is doing sexual poses for their advert posters
>Then they told her to eat the chicken
>Her heart sank and have a big bucket of chicken
>She looked disturbed but saw the human security guards with their batons
>She forcefully smiled and tried to eat the chicken and pretend she likes it
>Despite the flashing shots, you can vaguely see her tears coming down from her eyes

What do anons think of girls who might not be ultra-submissive, but encourage their human mates to be more dominant? Like a Lioness or mare who in the wild would be part of a harem, and so that translates into her measure of your manliness is how many fuzzy sluts you're regularly knocking up. So she interrupts your shitposting time clad in nothing but an apron over her baby-bump armed with a wooden spoon to tell you to get off your ass, that golden retriever bitch down the road needs another bellyful of your pups, but before that you need to wait for the rabbit mail-carrier to get here and bend her over the railing first. Oh and it's a parent-teacher conference tonight, You'd better go commando in some grey sweatpants- you want your little princess to get good grades even if that means making her teacher grab her ankles and beg for your cock, right?

There seems to be some disagreement in this thread about how to handle furbois. The 3 main positions seems to lock them into chastity, castrate them or use their nuts as a punching bag, with maybe a sub position that nut torture should either be used as a punishment or you should train them to like ballbusting. Now each of these positions have good arguments in favor of them, chastity is quick, cheap, easy, reversible all the while casually training him to not associate pleasure with his clit but rather his prostate. The drawbacks of this method are that his pesky balls will continue to produce those male hormones he doesn't deserve so you'll also need to suppress and replace that if you don't like a masculine look, escaping is also possibility but some consider the opportunity for punishment a benefit.
Castration can easily be seen as the opposite of chastity, it is permanent, more expensive and removes him from the genepool, which might not be something you want if you got a furboi with good feminine genes. On the other hand, he is now unable to get a proper erection without chemical aid thus forcing him to rely on his master for pleasure, it also removes his male hormones, making him less masculine. Female hormones thus work better and faster on geldings.
Now the stress toys. Of course getting to squeeze a soft pair of balls and hearing the screams of pain is definitely fun, but when and why should you apply it? The obvious answer is as a punishment, it is one of the most effective ways to break a rebellious stud to your will since they usually cherish their balls more than anything. On the other hand, training them to enjoy the pain is a much harder task, but perhaps the one that is most rewarding. Make sure they only experience orgasm when experiencing genital pain and before you know it they'll be begging you for a few kicks! You can even let your other girls get in on it to, they'll love you for the chance to let off some steam at the furbois expense!

>not turning bigger males into obedient proxy-cocks through strategic application and denial of harem pussy
>not using them to break in the larger and more unruly females trespassing onto your land
>not enjoying the feeling of power while cupping their muzzles, looking into their eyes and witnessing the pure need in them as they pound into new captures and beg for permission to cum.
>not watching their faces contort in pleasure as they are finally allowed mildly brain-frying orgasms.
>not ordering them to watch alongside your females when you're the one doing the breaking.

>intact, caged
Enslaved, may still be a male but his manhood is not under his control. Perhaps he will be allowed release, perhaps not. Perhaps he will even be allowed to breed some new sex toys one day. Still, at least his master acknowledges that his masculinity is one to be respected and thus, locked away.
>intact, uncaged
The ultimate humiliation. He is a male, he is virile, he is free to fuck and cum and impregnate as much as he wishes and yet he cannot, for there is another who stands above him. His Alpha mates with the females of his kind, leaving nothing for him. His mate has willingly chosen another right before his eyes, accepting the seed of another man in a place he though was exclusively his. It is not because he is less of a man, rather it is because he is less of a being.
>intact, feminized
Despite still producing viable seed he willingly wastes it on the floor as his prostate is abused in a way it was never intended to be. Between his legs swings a pair of working testes and a penis, but he still chooses to slut it up with the master's cock and anyone else he is allowed to fuck.
>castrated
Unquestionable submission, the source of his masculinity has been taken away. He is rendered useless. He cannot breed, he cannot grow big and strong. A bloodline of a thousands of years and the dream of thousands of descendants he should've made possible ends with him tearfully witnessing the disposal of his stolen jewels.
>castrated, feminized
It wasn't enough to steal his physical manhood, now he is treated as one of the females he used to fuck himself. Though he will never give birth he will probably be allowed to breastfeed the children while their mothers are busy being bred again, at least once the pills he swallows kick in.

>wake up go to the stable to check on the girls
>most of them are already expecting and you hope that most of them will inherit some good traits
>there are already few awake and waiting in their stalls for their morning grooming
>as you go through them, you notice how most of them are already getting wet just from you grooming them
>it's not yet time for that and you won't play favorites when money and future of your farm is at stake
>you finish up and let them roam their little area for now

>move toward the separate male stable
>remember how one of your regulars tried to have their ''stud'' impregnate one of your girls
>only for the so called ''stud'' to end with one less testical and almost disemboweled
>it pretty much ended whatever career that furboi had
>so you had to get extract the seed by fucking him
>as you open the door you finally see all them awake and waiting their grooming
>after you finish morning grooming you look at what you need to do
>several customers needing updates
>shipment of feed arriving
>a customer wishing to rent a womb
>few horse ''studs'' having too much testosterone
>look at the time
>it's time for the girls to have their urges sated

>Be Anon
>A vagabond
>You thought the idea of working until you were old and crippled was stupid
>So you decided you were better off not working at all and living off at the cost of others
>Now you travel from town to town, some times getting friendly with the locals
>It doesn't take you long for you to abuse the naivety of a Anthro family and have them invite you over to their home
>Often it's a married anthro women who see's good in you and wants to help you get off the streets
>You'd take space in their guest bedroom
>And while the husband is out working, you'd spend time with his wife and daughters
>It doesn't take long till some golden receiver mom is melting at your finger tips
>As soon as the husband is out the door, you'd violate her right where she stands
>Causing her to lose her mind to human cock.
>Husband might ask during dinner when you are planning to get a job or move out
>Only for his slut wife to yell at him, saying that you deserve some rest after living out in the streets so long
>It wouldn't be long till he starts noticing the signs that his wife was being dishonest
>She grew accustomed to you very quickly
>Always being doting and sweet with you
>Treating you like a guest of honor in her home
>And when the obvious becomes apparent, the husband would start sleeping in the guest room
>while you started sleeping with his wife.
>It's easy living
>You had food, roof, an easy fuck and dumb fuck to abuse.
>After some time, the husband would accept his place
>Then you would start being his friend.
>He would respect you cause you make his wife happy
>It was easy to ask for a loan of cash or 3
>And when you would get bored, you would make up some excuse.
>Like how your mom got in accident and you need to go see her
>You ask for the keys to their car and then drive away, moving to the next town.
>Sometimes you take the wife with you
>But only till you find something new, then you just ditch her at the first chance you get.
>You've been doing this for quite awhile now
>Apparently you got the genes for it
>You never met your father, but you knew he was human.
>And you knew your mom still loved him, despite being ditched a cheap motel and 6 months pregnant
>Anthros are too naive sometimes, you think to yourself.
>At first, you always thought it was just your mom
>But then in high school, you started to notice it from all anthros
>That's when your travels first started.

It's always worth keeping a few furboys around, even if you're not into fucking them. Furboys tend to be extremely well connected with females and not only their family. They are gentle and unpopular enough that the nerdy and shy girls can handle his presence, beta enough to be bully targets for the mean girls, athletic enough to be around the sporty type, and submissive enough to be tolerated as he crawls around the feet of the popular girls. Not to mention that the slutty bitches use them as a stepping stone to find their next humie hubby, just like the human teens do.
Basically furboys are cute enough to not trigger the anthro female's horny response.
So used to being neglected and belittled, Furboys will rarely require more than a few positive words for them to melt in your hands and become instant best friends, even if the friendship ends up being somewhat one sided. Maintain a casual relationship for more than a week and they will reveal the secrets of every girl they've known. Know one for a month and he will have absolutely no problem with you fucking his mother. Any more than one year and he will consider you his god, he will be okay with pretty much anything that involves you at this point.
However anytime you treat him as an actual friend by defending him from his usual bullies or even just listening to his opinions, you would instantly be elevated to a mother-fucking tier friend.
So the next time you see an uncomfortable furboy being dolled up against his will while the popular girls laugh at his pathetic, half-naked self as they take and post pics of him wearing lingerie in full view of the public outside the changing rooms, why not walk up and mention that they should take better care of their friend. You will acquire some extra bitches to pump and dump after you're done playing vidya with your new true bro for life.

Pokemon are really good fucking breeding stock, those bitches can pump out eggs like it's no one's business. I've pumped hundreds of eggs into mine while trying to shiny hunt that I've single-handedly saved multiple species from extinction. Fuck, you don't even need to catch them in order to get them to raise tail, just whip it out and go to town.
It's honestly criminal that they let 10-year-old boys into the wild like that, that's probably why trainers get jumped by 10 different types of pokemon as soon as they set foot on tall grass: there are probably cave fulls of pokemon being bred by boys that got lost in fucking pokepussy.
Do the professors care? They probably have fond memories of the first time they went into the forest and fucked an entire tribe of buneary.
Does officer Jenny even investigate "missing" cases anymore? Maybe if the kid was particularly young, but honestly, she doesn't care enough to even give a glance into the horny monster forest full of horny teens.
Pokemon is the best.

>You always thought the laws regarding owning anthros was a bit contrived.
>They had some rights.
>Get an education, a job, buy a home, have a family, etc and etc.
>But if a human male gets the chance to bag, tag and collar one, they become nothing more then a piece of property
>A piece of meat.
>You find yourself reflect on it everyone once in a while, but you never question it.
>And why would you? Thanks to that law, you were able to make a living of stalking and kidnapping anthros.
>Every guy wants a nice little pet to do their menial work and worship their cock
>But not every guy has the time or patience to go out and do the work of capturing a pet.
>That's where you come in.
>When someone see's something on social media that they want to add to their collection of cock guzzling sluts
>They request for your services.
>For a reasonable fee you track, stalk, abduct and deliver any piece of meat.
>Some jobs were harder then others. But those ones always tend to be more fun and pay much better
>You're actually on the clock right now, doing the "delivery" part of your job
>Been driving for 4 hours with your cargo wrapped up and secured in the back of your van
>With another 4 hours a driving ahead of you
>Lucky enough, you knew of special rest stop somewhere up the road you were driving
>Far enough to give you time to reflect on your client and the job.
>Some big shot city lawyer got obsessed with a mare he saw in some video posted online.
>A student recording a video of their teacher's rear while she was bent over another student desk, helping with his work.
>It didn't take you long for you to find her social media. Or where she lived or worked.
>You learned about her husband and 2 kids. Where he worked and where they went to school.
>You gave your client the deets and the photos of her from her social media
>Specifically the ones of her vacationing at a beach resort.
>He placed the order on the spot
>And had you drive 500 miles down south and start stalking her in her home town.
>After a few days you started to get an idea of her daily scheduled.
>Unfortunately you had trouble finding a right time when to abduct her.
>She was barely ever alone, either in a school full of anthros that would stop you or at home with her family.
>And when she was ever alone, she was always secure.
>You're only time to strike was when she went out jogging in a trail with her friend
>A plump bovine.
>You parked your van on a dirt road, where it was closest to the trail.
>You hid out in the trees, your dart rifle loaded and ready to fire at a moments notice
>After some time waiting, you see your target and her friend lightly jogging down the dirt path
>Chatting to one another about their meaningless lives
>With two pulls of your trigger, the smiles on their faces turned to shock, then fear and lastly drowsiness before passing out from drug darts stick out from their asses
>Not the most fun way to capture an anthro, but your client wanted her new toy to be pristine.
>It didn't take you long for you to tie, blindfold, gag and then toss your prey into the back of your van
>And you had no trouble driving out of town. It would be a while before either of anthros would be reported missing
>No, your real dilemma was what you were going to do with the cow.
>You're client is only paying for the mare.
>As for the cow, you could sell her off to some brothel for some extra cash. But that would mean a detour on your already long enough drive
>Nah, you had bigger plans for her.
>Plans that involved that little rest stop that was coming up on the road.
>You pulled out from the road and into a empty parking lot.
>The only source of light coming from the dim lit bulb that lit up the entrance to a public bathroom.
>You brought your van to full stop and parked just across from the eerie bathroom.
>To the untrained eye, it seemed like this rest stop was neglected for years from the local county
>Left to decay and covered in all sorts of graffiti and gang signs
>You knew the tell-tale signs, this place was anything excepted abandoned.
>You cracked your knuckles and stretched your arms and back.
>You've been driving hours and you'll be driving more.
>Just a quick break, you thought to yourself, enough to relieve yourself
>You press a button on your dash board, lighting up the back of your van.
>You get up from your seat and head towards the back.
>The van was nothing special. It was big enough for you to stand and to lay out your catch it's cold floor.
>Finally, you get a chance to admire your prey, seeing them all tied up.
>Both the mare and bovine had their arms tied behind their backs, their legs tied together, collars on their neck and their eyes blindfolded.
>You had the mare wear a ball gag, keeping her from making too much noise. While the cow had a ring gag on her mouth.
>They were both pleasantly plump, the rope was tight enough to highlight curvy features.
>It also helped they were both wearing gym clothes. Their tank tops could barely hold in the cleavage that was their breast.
>And it seemed like they both wore yoga pants that were 2 sizes too small.
>You crouched down next to the mare, hearing heavy panic breaths from muzzle
>You gently placed that back of your fingers against her forehead, she immediately reacts from the touch and starts squirming away from your hands.
>You grab her restraints and pulled her to you, with your other hand greedily grabbing her breast and giving it a squeeze.
>"HNNNNNNNNG" Her cries muffled from the gag, squirming more from her touch as your hand wander over her body.
>Nothing wrong with examining the goods, it was for the sake of client.
>Anything more then that was breach of contract.
>With all the squirming and shaking she was doing, it was long before her blindfold became loose.
>Her eye started darting around, trying to get a baring on her surroundings.
>She see's you and her brow instantly furrows.
>More muffled sounds came from snout, probably cursing and yelling at you.
>You shift your attention towards the bovine, who seems like to be heavily sleeping still.
>Your hands start to explore the tied of piece of beef, much to the objection of the mare next to you
Hey, she wouldn't be in this situation if you weren't so damn social all the time
>You groped the bovine's breasts, each one filling the palms hands.
>Massive things they were
>it didn't take you long to find her nipples through the thin fabric
Guess your friend never liked the idea of a sports bra
>You probed and played with the sleeping bovine's nipples, soon two thick diamond hard nipples pressing up against your touch
>it was long before they started leaking through her tank top
Even in her sleep, her body knows how to act slutty.
>The mare banged against the side of the van, trying to get your attention of her friend
>You just laughed and blew a kiss at her.
Aw, don't like the performance your friend is giving us here?
>Your attention shifted down between her legs, seeing her crotch soaking up your floor.
>You grabbed her yoga pants and pulled them up, giving a better view of her drenched camel toe
>You couldn't reset the urge to reach down get a feel of her pussy, your hand getting soaked in her juices.
>A whimpering moo came out from your toy
Ah good, finally awake.
>You stood over the cow and started to unbuckle your belt and unzip your pants.
Now we can have some fun.
>With your cock now out, you grabbed the bovine by her collar and sat her up.
>lining her muzzle up with your one eyed trouser snake.
>And thanks to the ring gag you had wear, were able to force all of your cock down her throat
>Grabbing her horns, you started to face fuck the beef, fully awaken her
>You shivered as you felt the vibrations of her throat, trying to scream, cry and moan with your cock down her throat.
>You looked at the mare, tears down her eyes and she stares you down with much hate as one eye can convey
Fuck, did you know your friend here was such a slut for cock?
>You pulled the bovines muzzle all the way down to the base of your cock, your pubes filling up her nostrils with the smell of you
>You can see the look in the bovines eyes that she's trying to hate the smell but her animalistic instincts start to take over her.
>You start to kneel down, pressing your oral fuck toy's head against the van's metal floor, pressing your cock down her throat
>You start to hump and fuck her mouth pussy, faster and faster, getting closer and closer.
>With your orgasm drawing closer, you thrust your cock down her throat one last time before shooting your spunk and other jucies into her stomach
>You sit up, her head still between your thighs and hands on her horns, as you pump her head on your cock, using her mouth to milk what ever liquids were left in your balls.
Ah, much better.
>You got up, pulling your cock out of the beef's muzzle and leaving a trail of cum and saliva
>The bovine starts to cough and pant, wheezing as she tries to get much needed air back in her lungs
>Hey body just collapses against the ground, exhausted from the sudden face fuck.
It's too bad we're ditching your friend here. I'm sure you're new master would have loved her.
But he only paid enough for one slut, not two.
>You reach over to the mare and fix her blindfold, taking away her vision once more.
I hope you were able to say your goodbyes
>The mare can do nothing but cry and wait as she heard the van doors open, her friend being dragged out and van doors slamming shut right after
>Where was he taking her?

>when your furboy bro you had known for a month started taking off his pants you were definitely startled
>despite him having the shapely thighs and curvy hips of his mother he wasn't gay or at least was still into girls
>you didn't expect him to reveal that he was wearing a chastity cage
>and you definitely didn't expect to hear that he had been wearing it for the last two years as a result of some serious bullying
>he thought he was getting lucky when one of the mean girls asked him out
>the night ended with his unwilling cock in a cage, her destroying the key, and humiliating pictures of him being pegged and stepped on spread all over the net
>while the shame of everything took a while to fade the physical chain around his pride remained
>and so he asked you, the one person he could truly trust with everything
>had he asked anyone else he'd only be humiliated further
>perhaps even be forced to pleasure them sexually
>as a teenager it wasn't like he wanted to ask his mother for something so sensitive concerning his manhood
>maybe you'd have better luck picking the lock he thought
>he promised to set you up on a fuckdate with anyone you wanted
>friends?
>sister(s)?
>his mother?
>he hesitated on that one but agreed eventually
>he just wanted to jerk off after two years of forced chastity
>ten minutes later he squealed in relief as his pink prison dropped to the floor
>he launched himself forwards off his bed and brought you in an embrace
>you patted his head as you tried to ignore the fact that his erection was now poking you in the belly
>he jumped into his chair and got to work, opening up the porn he had been collecting to prepare for his cock's eventual liberation
>you noticed that most of it were videos that you yourself had sent him
>you turned away to give him some privacy
>you walked into his mother, biting her lip as she gave you a lusty look
>you knew you didn't exactly need to help him in order to bed his mother but bros needed to help bros

>not having him become more anal-focused as time goes on, his need bubbles up more and more, and he simply NEEDS release
>he still holds on to the idea of fapping once he finally gets this DAMN CAGE off
>but when he finally gets to do it, it's not the mind-shattering return to normalcy he wished for
>wonders briefly if he did it wrong or something
>maybe he used the wrong lotion?
>was he supposed to use a tissue or rag?
>was he supposed to just go at it dry with his hand?
>its still good, but just in the way that a pack of instant noodles can be after not eating them in a year
>or two years in this case
>but the reality of it is simply that his little prostate isn't used to not getting pushed in at least once a day
>just wasn't as good as that
>briefly wonders if maybe you'll be able to help him once again
>he may have /intended/ that help to be in the form of pointers from someone more experienced in the art of penile masturbation, his newly-freed dick had a different idea
>one of bouncing freely in the air as he bounces gaily in your lap, prostate pounded by his bro and saviour

'Furbois as collaborators' is an interesting concept any way you spin it.
>Be petless human man, working a boring job.
>Befriend dog-boi coworker.
>One day he shows up all wound up over something.
>Says his sister turned 18 last month, and decided to move out of their parent's house without telling anyone she planned to.
>Some sudden independence kick.
>Found a shitty, small, single-room apartment. No roommate, no neighbors that she knows nearby, nothing.
>She wasn't that bright, evidently.
>You've never been the 'cunt-hunt'-ing type, but even you know that that's about the easiest pickings a guy could get.
>Dog-Buddy knows too, which is why he's panicking. His imagination is getting worse by the day too.
>Monday morning when he first told you all this he was just worried she'd get collared by some scumbag.
>By the time you both clocked out on Thursday he was convinced she was gonna get spirited-away in the night and end up in a foreign brothel or a puppy-mill somewhere.
>So neither of them were that bright.
>Then Friday he came by your desk, looking like he hadn't slept at all, tossed a paper bag on your desk, patted you on the shoulder, and ran away.
>Inside was a loose key, an address scribbled on a receipt, and a cheap nylon collar.
>Why the fuck did you get dragged into this?
>So anyway, that's how you ended up with a slut-puppy of your very own.

>This place is lawless, how they ever considered it a school was beyond me.
>Teachers outright stopped caring or just didn't show up, allowing the students to control things.
>This one group in particular, everyone steered clear from.
>A group of five hyena bitches who would kick your shit in if you so much as glance at them.
>They would strut up and down the halls, threatening randoms for their money, starting fights and beating the ever-loving shit out those who dared challenge them.
>That was up until last week, right when that human arrived.
>On the first day, everyone just stared at him, checking him out.
>We were all perplexed. Why in the world would anybody, even a human, want to transfer to a godawful school like this?
>From what I've seen of him, he usually just kept to himself, avoiding others, others avoiding him, only speaking when spoken to, all that nonsense.
>Up until Thursday.
>In the morning, videos were being spread around of the five surrounding the human by his locker.
>Their main leader was spewing some anti-human/fur-supremacy garbage at him.
>All while he stared back at her with a cheery smile, not saying a word.
>It ended with her slamming her fist into his locker, leaving a sizeable dent while she yelled something about meeting her on the rooftop afterschool.
>The entire day was filled to the brim with rumors and speculation
>"Are they going to fight?", "He is so fucked..", "Hairless ape deserves what's coming to him."
>As soon as the final bell rang out, the entire school became a tsunami, flooding their way to the rooftop, eager to see what was going down.
>I had lucked out, managing to get a front row seat to all the action.
>It was like a standoff, we were all waiting for them to pull out their guns and kill him.
>But the five of them just stood there, glaring at him with a gaze that would leave anyone dead in their tracks.
>Their leader perked up, more of that fur-supremacist rhetoric came bursting out as he just stood there.
>With a blank stare right at her eyes.
>And that same cheery smile.
>It must've irked her the wrong way, because she lunged at him before he even got to blink.
>In that split second, it felt as if time stopped right then and there.
>We all knew what was going to happen to him, we had all seen images and videos of their previous victims.
>Torn to shreds, chunks taken out of the neck and body.
>But then he moved, like a flash of lightning, stepping back and pulling something from the pockets of his jeans.
>Some sort of glass tube, couldn't tell what was inside.
>He threw it to the ground, causing a loud shattering sound to ring out.
>We were all just confused. And then we saw her get up, sniffing around manically as if her life depended on it.
>She looked back the human with a wide eyed glare and leapt into his arms.
>What. The. Fuck.
>The leader of a violent hyena gang submitting to some random human like an obedient pet? This can't be real.
>Everyone on the roof just watched, some in shock, some dying of laughter and taking videos.
>Her little friends took notice of the few recording and threatened us to get out, baring their teeth and snarling.
>I didn't really feel like becoming another anthro-violence statistic, so I decided to get out as soon as I could.
>I guess others had the same idea because I got swept up in the torrent of other anthros who decided to run for it.
>Halfway down the stairs, I looked back, the four of them surrounding the human.
>And some kid in my class recording everything from the corner.
>That Friday, I walked into class, noticing the crowd in the corner.
>Seemed like the kid from the rooftop was showing off the recording.
>We all stood around his phone, curious to see just what happened when we all ran.
>"What the hell is wrong with her?", "Juri, what the hell are you doing?"
>From the shaky video quality, I could make out the four of them just surrounding him, sniffing the air for a few moments, and then nuzzling him?
>We were all dumbfounded.
>This human, transfers to one of the worst schools in the district, gets threatened on his fourth day, and manages to survive one of the deadliest groups in here.
>"You've got to be kidding me.", "What the hell did he do to them?" "I've been afraid of THAT?"
>The recording ended abruptly, kid probably got caught peeping.
>The whole day, rumors were spreading like wildfire
>Mainly speculation about the human, who he was, and what those five might do to him.
>Others tried to decipher what went down that day, and some were just talking shit, mainly about how all five of them were going to get /BRED/
>But as the day went on, most of us realized that they were nowhere to be seen.
>Hell, not even the human showed up that day.
>But as soon as the weekend kicked in, everything had slipped my mind.
>Just another 2 days away from that shitty school.
>But with that human running around, something's bound to change.
"Juri"
>So last week, I got word that a FUCKING HUMAN had transferred to MY school.
>I always been told that humans were lower than trash. incomparable to any anthro male, even a scrawny little rabbit.
>Thought they were too pussy to put up a fight, especially with all the stories goin' around about them being weak on their own, but stronger in numbers.
>Personally I never seen any human before, only been told stories about them from Ma.
>Whether it was about them wronging her or their annoying habits, she always had a story to tell, even if I already heard em' all.
>Just from her descriptions, I knew I hated them, and I made sure those cowards in the school know as well.
>So you better believe come Monday, we were searching the campus for his ass.
>Every damn nook and cranny and we still couldn't find the bastard.
>The next day, tried to find what classes he took, which rooms he would be in.
>Was lucky the principal was a pushover, waved my fist in his face tellin' him I would break off his horn and stab him with it if we didn't get that human's student records.
>Like all sheep, he cried like a pup and handed me the key to one of the cabinets.
>"Anon, Age 18, 5'11", Species: Human"
>Regular record, no arrests, moved from the city, typical.
>And then his class schedule, bingo
>Planned to just stalk him around campus and let him get all comfortable.
>And then POW!
>Knock the shit out of him when he's not lookin', get some idiots to record while I made a big speech about humans invading anthro-only spaces.
>Whatever, that shit can wait until tomorrow.
>We fuckin' found him.
>Baggy ass clothes, average cut and SKIN..
>I stormed up to him, tail was stiff as a board, fangs out
>Cornered him by his locker, ready to CLOCK the cunt then and there.
>But he turns around, and just shoots me a glance.
>Everything about him PISSED me the FUCK off, and I decided to lay it on him.
>"You shaved monkies comin' here from the city, thinkin you can just strut where you fuckin' please, huh?!"
>Bigass crowd surrounds us, phones out recording every single moment.
>Good.
>"Look at your weak ass arms, betting your mom wished she had a BRK(bigredknot) up in her every night!"
>At this point, I'm just thinkin' of anything to say.
>And this fucker just gives me the eeriest stare down and pops a wide-ass smile.
>Humie just signed his death warrant.
>Sucker punched his locker and told him to meet me on the rooftops afterschool.
>Walked away while my squad followed behind.
>They're talking smack about him, telling me all the ways I could kick his ass.
>And the only thing crossing my mind,
>was that creepy fuckin' smile.
>As if he had something planned just for me.

>Be male hyena.
>Be the youngest runt out of your 2 sisters.
>You're nothing more then just a slave to them.
>They bully and beat you whenever they please.
>Making you do their chores and run errands.
>All while they just smoke weed and be lazy all day.
>Your mom isn't much of a mother either.
>She spends her time and welfare money at the bar all day.
>Also coming home drunk and picking a fight with you.
>Compared to your sisters, she just sees you as another mouth to feed.
>She said you were lucky she even let a weak meek male like you to liver under her roof.
>The least you can do is slave for the family.
>The only relief you ever get from you chaotic home life was when you were at school.
>And when you were at school, you got to hang out with Anon.
>He was a human, but he was also your best friend.
>You two were like two peas in a pod, always hanging between classes.
>If you didn't have lunch, he would share his with you.
>If missed some classes, he'd share his notes with you.
>If you were ever shot on change, he'd lend you some of money.
>You always try to manage to pay him back, but he never pressures you.
>He was probably the only person who genuinely cared about you.
>Not like your family of 'yeens.'
>Despite growing up together and being the best of friends, you tried to hide your family life from him.
>You try to hide your bruises, welts, and burns.
>But as you got older, the beatings got harsher.
>And Anon started to notice.
>He'd always offer to help but you always object it.
>You were scared that your Mother would forbid you from ever talking to him.
>Or worse, your older sisters hurting him.
>It wasn't until your 18th birthday when you drunk mother gifted you a shiner, a real bright one on top of that.
>If it was any other day, you would have spent the day at home until the swelling got better.
>Still, Anon made you promise to meet up with him so he could have gotten a birthday lunch together.
>You tried your best to hide your black eye with a pair of sunglasses.
>But Anon knew the moment he saw you.
>You saw the range of emotions on his face; shock, sadness, disgust, anger.
>He said that it was the final straw.
>You tried to object and make up an excuse but all that came from your mouth was bumbling mess as you slowly started to cry.
>You grabbed onto Anon and held for dear life as you objected his help, fearing what your horrible family would do to him.
>Even just the thought of it made you shake in fear for him.
>He wrapped his own arms around you, though it felt more protective and caring then your hold.
>His strong arms, shielding you from the hurt.
>His warmth, reminding you weren't alone.
>His scent...
>He broke the hug and placed a firm grip on your shoulder, promising you that he was going to fix this.
>He was going to make life better for you.
>A few days had passed since Anon made his promise
>He went to his dad for advice and got a bottle of lube and a flask full of a liquor.
>Said all that Anon needed was some liquid courage. The rest was all instinct.
>You knew what he meant by that.
>It's no big secret what humans do.
>Most fur-boys would object to the idea of letting their sisters and mothers be collared by a human male
>But after years of abuse and being the runt of the family, you didn't mind.
>Besides, you trusted anon.
>The plan was simple: When both your mom and one of your sisters were out, leaving you home alone with the other, that's when you'd text Anon
>After that, you'd meet him out back in your yard, unlock the door and let him do his thing.
>You thought even one hyena would be too much for him.
>Said that if he was able to deal with the pack of wolves, that were his mother and sisters, then he should be able to deal with one yeen on her own.
>You'd try to argue, but he would shut you down before you could even object.
>"Hey faggot!" The youngest of the 2 sisters barked at you as she stepped into your room
>"Remember to do my laundry, and to follow what the tags say this time, else you want another beating like last time."
>While it's very common to see Yeens wearing punk outfits with jeans, leather and little-to-no make up. Your sister was different.
>She wore skirts and frilly clothing. And make up.
>Despite looking sweet and innocent though, she was still bigger and taller then you.
>And just as abusive.
>You made a bee line to her room, grabbing her basket of dirty laundry before making your down to laundry room.
>Passing by the living room, you hear your eldest sister belch and then yell out your name, demanding you grab another beer for her.
>Quickly rushing to drop off basket, you went to the kitchen and grabbed a cold beer from the fridge.
>You tried to quietly place the can next to her, but she gripped onto your wrist and tugged you towards her.
>Forced to make eye contact, she gave you a dirty look and stared you down.
>You're eldest sister was the stereotypical yeen.
>A punk tomboy who started drinking before noon.
>She had no job and responsibility
>She didn't need no pants or panties either.
>Only wore an old rock band t-shirt and sat on the couch watching tv all day.
>Just as you thought you were about to a beating, the youngest sister got the attention of the older
>She let your eldest know she was about to go out and gave each other their goodbyes, blowing kissing to one another. Sisterly love and all that.
>Now was your chance.
>With your sisters distracted, you snuck away to the laundry room, and started shooting desperate texts to Anon.
>You hope he would get here quick.
>eta 20min
>You quickly got a response from Anon
>You felt a whole spectrum of emotions churn in your stomach
>Fear and anxiety was prominent.
>But you'd be lying if you didn't say you were giddy
>Anon was going to collar your sisters and mother
>You felt a heat in the pit of your stomach at the thought of that
>A heat you would feel when ever you watched porn
>It was normal to see your family casually nude
>Hell they would even masturbate in the living room without a care in the world.
>But the idea of Anon on top of your mother...?
>You shivered.
>You shook yourself out of your fantasies.
>Barely a few minutes had passed, you knew that this was going to be longest 20 mins of your life.
>Not wanting your sister to grow any suspicion, you started doing the laundry
>As time ticked closed, you snuck into the kitchen, hoping your sister will ignore you.
>And slipped out the back door
>While trying to silently close the door behind you, you felt a tapped on your shoulder.
>Before you could yelp, you felt a smooth yet firm grip held around your muzzle, followed by a calming shush.
>It was Anon
>And he was here three minutes sooner then he promised.
>His gripped loosened on your muzzle, while your arms rushed to wrap around him.
>You pressed up against him, nuzzling against your soon-to-be hero's chest.
>For a moment, you felt you were intruding too much of your friend's personal space
>Until you felt his own arms wrap around you.
>You felt safe with him like this.
>You knew Anon wasn't going to let go off you until you let go of him first
>You wanted to treasure the moment, just for a bit.
>Maybe get better smell of his scent too...
>You had a hard pulling away from Anon
>It seemed like his smell was way stronger then usual
>But all good things has to come to an end and so did your embrace with Anon.
>"Hey, are you okay?" He asked through a sheepish smile
>You knew the question was genuine.
>But you know Anon well enough that he was nervous
>You reassured him that you were fine. And that if he was getting cold fee-
>"Hell no. bro. I just got, you know, butterflies in my stomach. That's all."
>It was typical for him to scoff off his worries like that.
>You still offered if there was anything you can do to help him.
>"Just need to calm the nervs and get into the moOoOod."
>He pulled his knapsack of his back, unzipped it and reached inside of it,
>After a moment of rummaging, he produced a flask with what you assumed was alcohol.
>"Dad said he drank from this flask before his first collaring, as did his father and his grandfather"
>He popped the cap and took a heavy swig from it, causing his face to scrump up.
>You wondered what drink Anon's dad gave him, it must have been something strong.
>He's already getting rosy cheeks!
>You only get to see that during the cold winters!
>coughcough
>Despite the hootch, you can tell Anon is still nervous.
>Yet he still tries, as you watch him gingerly reached for his crotch through his jeans, seeing if he can pitch a tent.
>Maybe you could help?
>"Wha-?"
>Catching him by surprise, you press up against him.
>While looking up to him as if you were going to asking for permission
>Flustered, Anon took another swig and then offered the flask to you.
>You took and drank from it, causing your face to scrunch up too.
>You felt the hot liquid burn your throat.
>But you felt something else inside you burning hotter
>Anon watched as you lifted you paw over his chest, pressing your palm against him
>You could easily feel his heart rapidly beating
>You couldn't have your stud nervous, you thought to yourself
>Your paw slowly dragged down his chest, over his stomach down to the hem of his t-shirt
>Lifting it, you find his soft and smooth tummy.
>You couldn't giving him a quick tummy rub before placing your paw on his belt.
>You looked up to him once more.
>He matches his gaze with yours.
>Silently, he presses you closer and presses his head closer to yours.
>You both go back to watching your paw as you start to unbuckle his pants
>Pulling down his jeans.
>A shiver goes down your spine
>Not just from the site of seeing anon's growing bulge within his boxer's briefs
>But the smell
>Anon must have noticed the reaction.
>"Oh yeah, sorry. My dad said I shouldn't shower for a while. Says the smell does something to anthros."
>He wasn't lying
>Your paw eagerly explored tight budge
>Feeling up Anon in your paw
>You felt like you knew what you were doing, at least you thought.
>You have a dick too.
>You can see Anon harden, a tight tent forming with the fabrics
>You press your ear against him, listening for his heart beat.
>The thumps where heavy, but they were slower.
>You smiled at the thought knowing you helped calm down your friend.
>Back to the task at hand, your paw reached in for the brim of his underwear.
>And. Pulled. It. Down.
>BHC.png
>A whispery moan slipped through anon's lips as you cupped his have balls
>He bit his lip as you gripped his shaft, stroking it and feeling it harden in your paws.
>It wasn't long till he said he was ready, cock solid as stone.
>Much to your disappointment, you let each other go. The moment of intimacy now being a memory.
>At least you get to see Anon strip down to his birthday suit
>You two knew what's next.
>You knew where you sister would be, on the couch lazying about.
>You both agreed on a plan: You pinning your sister by the shoulders and Anon doing the deed.
>You and Anon snuck back into the house
>But not before you could sneakily grab Anon's undies, balling it in your palm.
>The two of you made your way towards the doorway to the living room.
>Anon hid behind the wall and took a peek towards your sister.
>She was laid out on the couch, wearing a loose shirt and nothing else.
>Just as expected
>You walked in, expecting to catch your sister's attention.
>"HEY!! Asshat! Where the fuck were you! I want another beer!" She yelled out, not moving an inch from her spot on the couch.
>Paying no mind to her orders, you walked behind where she was sitting and stared down at her.
>"What the fuck are you doing retard!? I said go- grrrrghkk"
>Before letting your eldest sister get another word in, you quickly shoved Anon's dirty underwear down your sister's maw, gagging her.
>You called out for Anon as grabbed your sister shoulders and pressed your weight down, pinning her against the couch.
>While your sister tried to make sense of the new smells and tastes coming from her gag, Anon quickly rushed in and grappled your sister's lower half.
>Tossing her legs over his shoulders, he lifter her ass up and lined up his pre-lubricated cock with her pussy
>You watched act with pure glee, your eyes on Anon's cock as he stuffs it into your sister in one thrust.
>She let out a heavy muffled moan as her lower violently shivered from cumming on your stud's cock.
>Say hi to your new master, Slut.
>More muffled moans came from your sister as Anon started to pump his hips, pulling in and out of your sister.
>With your sister now lost in ecstasy, you knew it was safe to loosen your grip.
>But you still felt like you should do something for Anon.
>Luckily, you and Anon shared porn with each other. You knew what he liked.
>While anon was fucking for dear life, you reached over your sister, grabbing the hem of her shirt.
>You pulled it down, revealing your sisters chubby tummy to Anon, embarrassing her in the process
>You grabbed the lose fabric and tied a tight knot, just under your sister fat breasts.
>With your sister's bust pressed against fabrics of the shirt, you look up to Anon, smiling like a dummy at the view.
>But you weren't done yet.
>You placed a paw under each of your sister's heavy boobs and started playing with them.
>Pinching her nipples till they were hard as diamonds. Pressing up against the fabric and revealing an outline of nipple piercings.
>He must have enjoyed the view cause his pace had quicken.
>PlapPlapPlapPlapPlapPlap
>You cupped your sisters cheeks, and pulled her face to look at you.
>You never knew your sister could look so happy after have her brother forced dirty laundry down her mouth while his friend rapes her.
>Yeah, you're his now, sis.
>With one last hard thrust from Anon, he clenches his eyes shut as he fills her insides.
>With a relaxed moan, he opens his eyes and greeted by the view of you staring intensely at him.
>His cheeks grew red once more and as both of you look away from each other flustered.
>Exhausted, Anon pulls out from your sister and plops down on the couch.
>You sister, still drunk from sex, got her paws down between her legs. Not even bothering removing smelly gag out her mouth.
>You headed back to the kitchen, grabbing Anon a cold bottle of water and his bag.
>You came back to a panting Anon and your sister in a still drunk with lust
>Anon pats the spot next to him and you oblige, sitting next to him.
>You hand Anon his bag while you pressed the cold water bottle against his next, helping to cool him off.
>He lets out a relaxed sigh.
>He thanked you before grabbing the bottle and taking a huge chug from it.
>With his thirst now quenched, anon opened his bag and dug inside before pulling out a black leather studded collar.
>You gulped.
>If an anthro consents to getting a collar put on, then it's pretty much legal binding for ownership.
>And Anon was about to collar your oldest sister.
>The idea made you shiver with pleasure.
>Unable to wait any longer, you got up from your seat and quickly walked over to your sister.
>You gave her a few light slaps on her cheeks to wake her up, before pushing her off couch.
>With her more now aware and awake, you managed to get her onto her knees.
>Along with pulling out her gag to much of her displeasure.
>Tossing the undies aside, you stood directly behind your kneeling sister.
>Grabbing her head, you forced her to look up to her new master to be
>Anon stood in front of her, brandishing the leather collar.
>He spoke about his offer for her.
>Submitting her rights.
>Turning her into property.
>A life time of servitude.
>All for him.
>Any other day, you knew she would yell "Hell no!"
>But after what Anon did to your sister...
>"Hell yes!"
>Both you and Anon shared a glance, smirking at her response.
>He then handed you the collar, giving you the honors to put it on your sister.
>Hell fucking yes!
>Your sister raised her chin eye and even gave you the courtesy of lifting her own hair.
>You giddily put it on for her, with just the right amount of tightness.
>You wanted to make sure it looked good for Anon.
>Looking back at Anon, you could see he was hard already from watching the bitch get collared.
>Go ahead, show how much you appreciate the collar Anon got for you
>You whispered into your sisters ear as you pushed her head towards Anon's cock.
>Bobbing her head on him as if she was just some toy.
>Things have been going to plan better then you expected.
>Your punk trash yeen sister had fallen for Anon's cock.
>You still had one more sister to deal with.
>And not to mention your mother.
>You worried for a moment. You're mother was a proud Hyena.
>Too proud.
>She was tough, always getting into bar fights.
>Always getting into bar fights.
>Always trying to be the Alpha Bitch.
>You knew Anon really liked those kind of dom types.
>You felt a slight pang jealousy for a moment.
>You shook the distracting thoughts from your head.
>You were in too deep to stop now.
>Or at least Anon was with your sister
>Ayyoh.mp3
>You knew your mom would come home late as she usually does.
>And you still had time to plan on what to do with your sister.
>You had Anon and your eldest sister retreat back to her room
>Letting Anon get more acquainted with her
>You started opening all the windows and spray the living room with air freshener.
>As much as you enjoyed scent of Anon's sex, you wanted to catch your sister by surprise.
>Unlike your eldest sister and mother, your other sister was a total weeb.
>She's still a bratt. But a huge weeb.
>Dressing like a high school student despite being too old for high school
>You tried to figure out what was the best way to catch her
>You stepped into her room, a frilly pastel pink otaku hell.
>Anime posters on the wall, manga all over the floor.
>Wait...
>Is that a body pillow?

>the year is 195X
>archaeology is at an all time high and fossils and relics of cultures past get discoverd left and right.
>but there was one discovery that shook the world to its core, this discovery rewrites history as we knew it
>there where many Human Anntrho wars through out history.
>wars over land, wars over human rights for anthros, wars over anthro slavery
>but this new discovery led to change of our understanding where the races came from.
>we had a common ancestor
>a Human Anthro hybrid fossil was discoverd in an old tomb dated back further then any fossil found. but that was not all. later that year it was discoverd that this was not the first instance of interbreeding betwen the two races.
>we found a temple dating back even further then the fossil
>the temple was filled with inscriptions and scrools and aincent wall paintings. all telling of the story of a human man who breed an befor unkown race of Feralls.
>it is belived that all modern Anthros have human DNA in then dating as far back as to this event in history.
>they never wear free, but collared from the moment their race was born
>the scrools and wall paintings in the newly discoverd temple where analysed and its contents spread like a wild fire that engulfed the world. Everyone knew of the tales told by the temple, the storys grew such a large following that parts of the story where adapted into various media. Movies telling tales of the tamming of the feral ancestor race. Books written about the very first Anthro tribe and its subjugation and Bredding by humans. And even Fairy tales that got told to human children teaching them about the slave mastery. Human anthro breeding rose to an all time high during that time and many Human man took Multiple anthro wifes into their harems. And built on the foundation of the most popular story, the story of Shar the harem master.

having an anthro mom is interesting.
How would you treat her?

if you mean she raised me, then quite well. I'm pretty sentimental.
If we're talking about a """mom""" then that's a completely different story.

A fur is a fur no matter what, but you can still treat your mom like she's special. For example, if she refuses to service your cock, instead of backhanding her across the muzzle and raping her ass like you would with any lesser anthro cunt, just give her a light spanking and explain what she did wrong.

>sabertooths were thought to be extinct
>one day on your casual trip through the woods you decide to step a bit further
>the foliage gets denser and moister as you advance
>a seemingly young cat girl is found in an open spot
>she's kneeling beside a lake combing her hair
>not a single piece of clothing on her
>"wow"
>she turns around in surprise
>a pearly white pair of fangs is hanging out from her muzzle
>way longer and thicker than what books described
>you two are facing each other locking sights in shock
what do?

>walk into mens room
>see this (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1639/84/1639849131718.jpg)
what do?

>Step inside
>Close the stall
>Whip out my big human cock
>Grip her chin and tell her to open her mouth
>Stuff the slut's maw, and empty my bladder
>Maintain eye contact with a smirk while watching her gulp down my piss
>Pull out and leave without saying a word

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=isAPfUlnNFg
>In the process of breaking an anthro for the purpose of sale as a concubine, they must undergo a three month period in which their diet is strictly regimented
>Breakfast two slices of buttered toast with either honey or jam
>Lunch consists of oatmeal, and water
>Dinners are simple, containing meat, but change each night
>All other food cravings are to be satisfied by consuming human cum
>The effect of this is total psychological dependence on a human male, as well as regular cravings to mate, bypassing the heat cycle.

>growing up you never really did care for anthros
>sure you had a couple of servants in your father's estate
>but they mostly cleaned or tended the gardens so you didn't care
>you didn't care about them until your 15th birthday
>the day your father decided to hold your debut
>everywhere there were the most beautiful women hanging on the arm of every man attending
>women of refined dress, manner, and seductive beauty
>never had you seen such beauty or have been so envious
>after meeting all of your father's associates and acquaintances you asked to have a private word with your father
>you asked your father if he could procure such a servant for you
>he chuckled and patted your head
>he told you that he would, but that it would take time to produce such a companion
>that was twelve years ago
>Elizabeth has been with you since then
>she was with you when you left for university
>she was with you when you began working with your father
>she was with you when you got married
>and she'll continue to be with you and serve you.

>you had a MILF and her unrelated but adopted teen daughters, all four of them
>every day you'd leave work to a home cooked dinner, a bath and a quickie, and a long, long night of fun and fucking with your wives
>life was good, until one day your anthro boss called you into his office
>was it weird working under an anthro? Kinda, but everyone knew you were only playing along
>whatever it was he wasn't happy about it
>were you getting fired?
>you sat down across from your boss
>he said many nice things
>how you were a responsible, trustworthy man
>he's easing you into being laid off, isn't he?
>until he pulled out a few photos
>cute daughter, you thought
>until he said otherwise
>his only son
>oof
>born naturally feminine and definitely not straight, he inherited much from his mother
>his father didn't have many worries but that changed when he got an offer
>it was from one of the roughest, meanest underground sex clubs
>and they wanted his son
>his boy had no future as a free anthro who would ever find a girl on his own, and with that kind of body he wouldn't make it ten feet and ten seconds after his eighteenth before he was swept off his feet and disappeared into a van
>he would most likely show up starring in the newest porno, missing his balls and sodomized on camera
>so the boss' options were to sell his son for money, let him go and still lose him, or
>he put a heavy envelope into your hands
>cash, and a lot of it
>a big promotion
>a velvet-lined collar
>and his car keys?
>he's in the trunk, the boss said, all you had to do was drive away
>and
>the boss held up another envelope full of even more cash
>it was a long shot, but he knew you had multiple girls at your place
>would you be willing to let his son continue the bloodline?
>he himself was free for you to fuck
>he would've been okay with you breeding him directly, had his son been born a girl
>all you had to do was let him breed
>any children he sired would become your property anyways
So, do you accept?

>goddess of fertility is an anthro
>said to be married to a male human deity
>always depicted or sculpted clinging to his strong masculine body or sharing a gentle kiss with him
>whenever she manifest to her daughters and sons, they can be briefly seen being drunk in pure lust and making out before she starts dictating her divine will
>this couple is also illustrated in the many entries for the "art of love making and joys of breeding" scripts
>anthro women tend to wear blank collars in honor to their goddess
>this lucky charm is thought to attract a strong, dominant human husband like hers
>at a set season she will bring rains and storms, life and growth to the plants and crops
>among a weather that's dangerous for their wives, human males would lock into their dens
>going over the aforementioned scripts
>they would create new life too, in the way their sacred mother intended, making her absolutely proud

>2040
>programmable anthro sexbots are real
>I can program them to do whataver I want
>charge big patreon cashola buxxx for my scripts
>people ask me to help them program their sexbot for free
>"lol lern2code faggot"

https://static1.e621.net/data/ac/5a/ac5adc287c9eff451afc2959a70e7486.jpg
>when the image is too big to post and its already a jpg
>also the inevitable result of anthros living next to humans, no matter their marital status
>eventually that door will open, the panties wall come off (if they were on in the first place), and she WILL be pregnant when her husband comes home

bunnies make the best pets!
their fur is soft and short so no need to worry about it getting tangled in the heat of passion
they're extremely fertile and so they serve as great broodmares
bunnies are extremely willing to fuck whenever meaning that you don't have to wait for foreplay, just jump in!
rabbits are also incredibly submissive to their masters so they make the perfect beginner pet
bnuuy are also incredibly cheap: two hundred for a virgin doe of good breeding
why wait? get one now!

Bunnies aren't "great breeders", they literally never go barren and can get pregnant while already pregnant. Also genetic drift means no consequence incest, also cotton tails make perfect pillows for your balls as you pin her legs to her ears and fuck her like a pile driver, also aforementioned ears make great handlebars, also they often stand at blowjob height.
Superlative superior cocksocks, you will never find a better bed-warming baby-factory or finer furry fucktoy in any other anthro species. Others have their moments, but bunnies remain the gold standard.

I don't wish to contradict you but...
1. Bunnies are terrible for beginners, they are very distrustful of their new owners and only become cuddle-monsters after they get used to them (but then they demand attention constantly).
2. Female rabbits, called does (like deer), WON'T mate for a few days a year. This is why you see bunnies "boxing" sometimes, it is NOT a pair of males fighting each other (those would rather just hump anyway) as it was believed.
3. Cheap bunnies tend be violent and have health issues that will cost you more in the long run.
4. And they HATE it when you pull their ears!

>4. And they HATE it when you pull their ears!
all the more reason to pull on it while fucking her, this is about me, not her.
As per the rest of your points, fair.
Rabbits do tend to get jumpy with new owners
but most new owners are of a younger persuasion; gentler and calmer
I do believe that young men would prefer the affection and attention given to them by their new pets
the distrust a rabbit shows its owner is one of mere weeks, perhaps months at most, then a lifetime of affection and perfect obedience.
Your second point I shall outright deny, bunnies may for some days not wish to mate, sure, but they do not menstruate.
Almost universally, women menstruate while the noble and fertile rabbit does not. While the rabbit may lose sometime during the year, women lose days every month
so while the rabbit is no Venus it is still a top contender.
Your third point, I shall concede. It is to my great shame, now that I realize my blunder, true that cheaper rabbits will result in inferior products.
However, I will stand firm on my position that rabbits, when compared to other species of anthro, are cheaper in price but greater in quality.

https://rabbitmag.com/why-do-rabbits-eat-their-babies/?msclkid=58899658cf0011ec85b0222d572381df
>If you’re a rabbit parent, it’s natural to have questions about why rabbits eat their babies.
>Every rabbit is different, and they might eat their young for any number of reasons.
https://www.petsial.com/rabbit-eating-babies/?msclkid=c96ba0cfcf0011ec8c574f010f7fe1e1
>Sometimes mother rabbits accidentally eat their young while they’re eating the placenta and afterbirth.
>Fear of predators may cause a mother rabbit to eat her litter.
>If the area where she’s giving birth is noisy, and there’s lots of activity, she may feel stressed and eat her young.

How do I get one? My process would be like
>approach one that is by herself
>chilling on a park or doing her groceries
>talk to her casually
>compliment her eyes, fur, paws, teeth
>tell her she's a good girl
>pet her playfully
>she's gets flattered enough
>starts wagging her tail and panting
>grab her neck softly but firmly enough
>won't move a muscle except for the still wagging tail
>put the collar around her neck
>"you're coming to my house right now"
Hopefully I'd be making a full litter of puppies real soon

>Despite always complaining about it Lucy hasn't quit nor has she tried to report you (not like the agency would do anything, but it's the thought that counts)
>She's been working for you for years now yet she's never done anything but give you halfhearted complaints
>(except the one time you fucked her ass with less lube than you should have, she added some extra salt to your food afterward)
>No, despite it all Lucy has always happily smiled as you enter her warm sex
>Service with a smile
>Which is why you've decided to keep her, forever.
>You bought her contract outright
>The agency gives their "employees" a special kind of medicine that prevents women from ovulating outright
>This sterility can obviously be removed by giving the maid the antidote that is complimentary with every permanent contract purchase
>The mischievous part of you decides to not tell Lucy and just mix the cure in with her breakfast (alongside other fertility drugs)
>To make sure she doesn't catch on you fuck her each and every day, ending the session with a creampie
>By now there is a zero-percent chance she isn't pregnant
>As the days go by there isn't much change
>You grope Lucy as she performs her duties around your home
>She gets "mad" and swats you with her tail
>You grab her tail and force her butt to your groin as you continue to grope her
>This either develops further or you simply tease her until she's dripping wet and then continue on your merry way as if nothing had happened
>She never suspected anything
>Until
>One day, as your beloved maid is bringing you a glass of lemonade she suddenly falls to her knees and vomits
>Luckily you were outside so her only target was some poor roses.
>Amidst the broken glass, vomit, and lemonade lies a teary-eyed vixen afraid that you were going to punish her
>Rightfully so, you're usually not so lenient to your other servants, they're lucky if they only get a slap for something like this.
>Of course seeing as you are at fault for this sudden malady and that you've grown fond of her you do the opposite of hurting your beloved
>You clean her muzzle and paws and then you pick her up
>As you march to her quarters Lucy asks you why you're being so gentle with her
"Because I know something you don't," you say with a small smile
>She doesn't understand but she still nuzzles closer to you
>When you enter her room you set her down on the foot of her bed and you kneel down and take her paw
"I did something important some weeks ago, I bought your contract fully."
>Lucy's eyes widen at this revelation and she tries to fight a creeping smile.
"I wanted to play a bit of a prank on you, but I realize now that that was a bit foolish." You kiss her sweet-vomit tasting paw
"I told the cook to sneak a pill into your morning meal, an antidote for your artificial infertility."
>By this point she's connected the dots and is failing to stop the tears from forming
"You know how much I like to, you know, do *it*, and I really wanted to get you pregnant so it was only a matter of time until... this happened," you say with a blush and a sweep of the hands
"Oh, you... handsome devil!"
>Lucy launches herself to your chest her arms wrapping around you and her ears tickling your neck and cheek
>She looks up at you, eyes still wet
"I can't believe my master is such a fool."
>Lucy tries to kiss you with what you know is a hungry need
>but you have to turn it into a quick peck
>she still smells and tastes disgusting.
"Ah before that, we need to clean you. I don't want to spoil the mood but, you still taste of..." you trail off, wanting to spare her a bit of dignity
>Lucy looks incredibly embarrassed once she remembers why you brought her here for
"Y-yes, let me freshen up first." She scurries around her dresser for another uniform and set of underwear
>You chuckle and wait for her to finish
>That is until you realize you can shower with her
>You knock on the bathroom door and enter
>If Lucy heard she doesn’t show it as she continues to shower
>Her silhouette as she slowly caresses her body is one of the most erotic things you have seen
>You quickly begin to strip, wanting to join your lover
>As you slowly begin to reveal the Vixen you admire her body
>Her beautiful blond hair she usually keeps in a bun is now left loose, clinging to her body and further obscuring her soap covered breasts
>Lucy’s silky soft orange and white fur is wet with soapy water, clinging to her form and defining her shapely features
>her paws, which auburn fur makes look like fine dress gloves, are to the wall supporting her body as she gently lifts her leg to pose for you
>She looks back at you and with a wink and a smile she invites you to get closer
>You could not contain yourself, even if you wanted to resist with all your strength it was impossible
>You grab her lifted leg by its thigh and with your right hand you hold her waist
>You grab your already hard member and shove it as hard as you can into her willing sex
“Fuck…” Lucy moans as she takes your full length, shivering in pleasure
>Lucy begins to shake her derriere matching your forceful pace
>You spank Lucy’s tight ass and then grope it, the feeling of which causes Lucy to yelp and squeeze your dick harder
>As you hammer into your maidenheadless maid, her legs begin to buckle
>Grabing Lucy by the waist you lift her and turn her to face you
>Kissing Lucy has always been one of your favorite things to do while you fuck her
>Normally she doesn’t let you kiss her, claiming that it is unseemly for a master to kiss her maid
>But when you two have sex she relishes every little bit of affection you give her, even if she denies it afterward.
>This time is no different, you move your lips to hers and gently part her mouth open with your tongue
>She then begins to lick your tongue eagerly, sucking on it and tempting you to stay until you both run out of breath
>When you part for breath a small thread of saliva connects you two
>You kiss again and again, like teenagers with their first love you cannot get enough of each other
>All the while you continue to thrust into her as she wraps her legs around your waist
>Despite her cumming on your cock several times already you haven’t given her time to rest
>It’s not until you start to feel your climax come do you slow
>as you begin to cum you pull out, not wanting to dirty her again, and spend more time in the shower, which now starts to feel uncomfortable
>Lucy’s legs are still wobbly so you sit her down on the toilet and begin to dry her, just enough so that she doesn’t soak the bed
>Once you’re done, Lucy shakily stands up and kisses you again, this time on the cheek
“Thank you, Master” she whispers.
>You grab a hairdryer and brush and you slowly lead Lucy to her bed, both of you still naked.
>You begin to blowdry her back fur and gently brush it, when you get to the base of Lucy’s tail she begins to gently purr
>Her tail has always been the softest part of her, this you treat with extra care so that her fur puffs up and remains your favorite
>Once you’re done with her backside you pinch her butt, Lucy groans but she keeps purring
>Then you lay lucy on her back and you keep brushing
>She moans a little and her purring gets louder when you reach her round breasts
>But you’ve already had your fun so you keep brushing
>As you brush her stomach she begins to giggle and squirm which does make it a bit harder to brush, but it also makes you smile
>Once you’re all done brushing her she gives you a satisfied look and wags her tail
“Master, I love you.”
>Hearing that makes your heart skip a beat
“Fuck…” you whisper. “Lucy, I love you. I want you to marry me” your words escape your mouth despite yourself.
>Marrying an anthro, despite many men openly having anthro lovers, such a thing was greatly frowned upon
>It wasn’t illegal nor was it a sin or disavowed in any religious teaching, yet those that brazenly did such a thing were shunned by human society.
“Mater… we can’t, what will your parents say? What will others say about you? It would ruin you, it would be better if you married someone else”
“I’ve been a good son to them, I’ve always been dutiful and pious such a thing wouldn’t besmirch me and if it did I would not care. I want you and only you,” you tell Lucy, as you wrap your hand around her paws.
“But master…” Lucy pleads with you turning her head to look away, a pang of great sadness that she has to argue against that which would make her so happy
“But nothing, so long as I have you I will need for nothing more, and if you were mine, you would never have to lift your paw to work ever again, your plate would be full of all the best foods, your cup with the most delicious wines, and your heart with all of my love” Cheesy, but girls love cheese.
>Lucy giggles a little and she turns to look at you, she reaches up and kisses you.
“I hope you don’t mind me having a round belly in my wedding dress”

>Averi is getting increasingly frustrated
>Every time she goes out to eat a human male ruins her food
>She usually ends up sucking off 3 guys in a bathroom
>Poor girl just wants a sandwhich for fuck's sake!
>As you blow your load all over her chicken burger the tiny fox boils with rage
>She explodes in a racist tirade, denouncing humans as bottom-feeding scum, much to the shock of you, as well as the anthros in the establishment
>Then she storms out

>be dog girl
>daddy kisses me on the forehead as he drops me off at school
>fuckingggg fox girl sees
>comes over flaunting her still subtle baby bump, fathered by her own human daddy
>belly shirt, belly button piercing, clearly just had her throat used
>her shirt says "baby on board"
"Hey flatty, still in the daughterzone?"
>I just stare at my shoes and hope she loses interest
>she brags about how rough her daddy fucks her
>how she's expected to strip the moment she gets in the door or she gets a beating
>sticks out her tongue smugly as she lowers her leggings in the back enough to show off the handprint spank bruise on her butt
>she doesn't get washed off with the hose until after she's been used as a cumdumpster
>she even gets to sleep naked in her daddy's bed with him and her mommy!!
>lying on his big warm chest!!
>she gets to listen to his heartbeat wtf!!!
>my daddy reads stories to me and bathes me properly and dresses me in cute soft pajamas and school clothes
>and he won't lay a finger on me
>i hear him and mommy going at it almost every night through the wall
>but even when i scent mark daddy's clothes he just chuckles and pats my head and puts them in the hamper
>why won't my daddy rape me

>story starts off with humans being demonized, anthros portrayed as victims of oppression
>furboi protagonist hyped up to be a hero who will end the *tyrannical human rule*
>ends with him being defeated, humiliated and put in his place while he watches his friends and family get dicked by BHC

Comfort is irrelevant when it comes to courting human men.
Most anthro will go through great lengths to secure a good human master
Forcing your feet into tiny shoes is one of the less painful/uncomfortable things anthros will go through for a human man
Some dog girls will dock their tails if it's too skinny and unappealing or they'll cut certain parts of their ears to look "tough" or to remove their floppy ears
Sheep will remove their tails (although there is a recent trend of keeping the tail if it's fluffy and cute)
Other girls will get branded as a show of ownership
etc. etc.
Point is, Anthros will go and do crazy shit just to get an owner as the benefits of having one outweigh any pain or discomfort

>Anthro prisons are known for being filled with thieves, murderers, or even just the disobedient
>Beatings, electrocutions, humiliations, all tortures are fair game when it comes to pacifying the violent offenders of society
>However the most effective method is actually impregnation
>Giving the prisoner true meaning in their lives is the start of their recovery
>Their mandatory seeding begins when they are deemed fit to breed and very few are found unworthy
>They are then led into the Raping Room where they are held down and fucked, possibly for the first time in their lives
>The prisoner will resist but it is the duty of the Warden to care for her more than she does herself
>This will repeat as many times as necessary
>From the moment their belly starts expanding the changes will be noticeable, they will be more careful as their mothering instincts override their more violent feral minds
>They will be more affectionate and submissive towards the unquestionable human who lords over them, providing for all their needs in exchange for obedience and open legs
>Once the baby is born the mothers, previously violent criminals, are reborn as well
>Many choose to stay despite being fit for release, taking up work in the same prison they were held in
>They can usually be found holding down new prisoners for their daddy warden to seed
>The children are here too, playing with the pregnant prisoners to ease them away from their previous life of crime
>When they call it a correctional facility they mean it

Humans are very fertily, it's a guarantee that a human can impregnate an anthro. Hell it can even untied the tubes

What are the best anthros to gift to a young man?
I have a brother whose birthday is coming up but he lives in a human majority town and he's never dealt with an anthro before
I'm going to get him one since I really like this one stray cat anthro I picked up in college and have been keeping, I also feel like he needs to grow up and become more of a man.

Here are a few options of many:
>Dogs
Pretty standard for a first-timer and the most common anthro to marry/own. Loyal to a fault, easy to train and will always greet their owner/husband with a wagging tail (and a deep lust during their heat).
>Cows
Dumb but motherly, performing housewife duties is in their nature - just don't ask them to do your taxes. Usually soft with big assets beyond most other anthros. Your fridge will be full of homemade dairy products, and she will often breastfeed their man "on tap". Not for the lactose intolerant man.
>Cats
Smart but surprisingly easy to figure out from their body language. Rubbing on you with her tail up, for example, is a clear sign of horniness. However, they only have enough room in their hearts for their owner/husband - don't expect her to be kind to friends and family.
>Mice
Very submissive out of the box, reward any positive act with cheese and they'll be scampering to make their man/owner happy. Sex can work just as well as a reward.
>Dragons
Considered difficult to tame without prior research. You'll have to break their pride down a bit to fully enjoy a dragon - whether that's through kind affection or human dominance is up to the owner/husband. A well-documented trick is to touch, pull or otherwise yank the most sensitive part of a dragon, their tail, which will elicit a typical tsundere response. Once a dragon is "slayed", she'll make a powerful, lustful and extremely protective pet/wife.
>Birds
Generally loud but peppy anthros, their intelligence ranges from sharp to birdbrain depending on the species. Will sing during showers, chores and sex. Naturally disposed to swallowing your "worm".

>submissive anthro girl fetishizes Human guys
>slicks herself to fics of hot human hunks kidnapping dog girls and trying them into pat addicts
>just wants a humie to "force" her into a collar and call her a good girl

>be a soldier of Man, assigned to be guard detail of some scientists during the conquering of an alien world
>these men are tasked in researching the biology of the alien species, all you know is that they're cold blooded reptiles and short
>basically space Kobolds
>the scientists conduct some tests and experiments on them, and one experiment catches your eye
>they lock the space Kobolds in a room, and make it colder over the course of a few hours, a few degrees per hour
>the space Kobolds get sluggish, but an hour later they get aggressive towards eachother, all sluggishness gone
>you're not the ideal soldier, and you're horny, so you get to thinking, even if what you want to do is technically a crime by Human laws

Scenario time:
You and the human empire are going to invade Africa. What are the anthro tribes there like, how do you defeat them, and what are their women like?

>What are the anthro tribes there like?
The largest cities on the continent are decently modern and just metropolitan enough to be passably safe and clean thanks to globalization, but that doesn't stop them from looking and feeling at least a little dirty, grimy, and most of all seedy since the continent is one of the poorest.
I'd compare it to the parts of Russia where you find guys doing ass-to-grass squats all the time while smoking and drinking in full Adidas tracksuits, or the chavs of Britain. They think they're kinda posh, or that they're hot shit, but they aren't all that compared to the rest of the world.
Your average "village" with subsistence farmers and whatnot are where you find matriarchal power structures thriving. Women doing work to take care of the kids, keep the village going, telling stories and singing songs while the men go out to try and secure some extra food if it's available. The men know better than to mess around and get on their wives', sisters', or mothers' bad sides, and stay in line while having fun with their brothers and uncles and whatnot.
The city is where you find animals of all kinds getting along and not tearing each others' throats out, while out in the middle of dirt you find tightly-knit single-species communities. Lions stick with lions, zebras with zebras, etcetera, etcetera.
>How do you defeat them?
Diplomacy and a culture war. Offer everything and anything they want but don't have, and use human benevolence as the ultimate weapon to get them on our side, welcome us with open arms, and quash dissent and distrust all on their own for fear of offending us and scaring us (and our gifts) off. From there, let our majesty and novelty spread through the continent until everyone wants to fuck or be fucked by a human.
>What are their women like?
Their women are absolute brickhouses. City women are stacked as all hell, and have attitudes to match. They're at their most attractive when they crumble under human cock and become scared little girls overwhelmed by pleasure that don't have to put up a facade to protect themselves anymore.
They can let all their inhibitions go, wrap their legs around you and pepper every inch of skin they can reach with wet kisses as you fry their brains with overwhelming full-body orgasms. They don't have to front, or pretend to be tough, or even just act tough, if they actually are. They can put down their guard and allow themselves to submit to something objectively superior and more powerful than themselves, and they become almost addicted to the idea of having something no one else does, not having to compete for it tooth and nail, and knowing they'll be taken care of no matter what.
City girls will be the type to take their earrings off and put up their fists to protect their man from angry males and jealous females alike.
Village girls won't really know any better when human men come a' courtin', and even without knowing it, a special kind of femininity will blossom within them. Having a stranger express interest in them, woo them, court them, offer them lavish (to them) gifts, and treat them as something delicate and fragile (even though that couldn't be further from the truth) will turn them into blushing, giggling women again, softening their position as pillars of their community.
With bodies just MADE for child-bearing, and a natural kind of beauty that makes them diamonds in the rough in need of no more than steady, readily available baths/showers, they'll turn like hyenas on the jealous, impotent men that have less to offer them. The idea that something malicious must be going on for us (human men) to express interest in them (anthro women) would leave the women feeling self-conscious and angry at the men that don't value or appreciate them properly, and they'd jump into the arms of whatever human man made their lives and the lives of their village a million times better.
The key here would not be to whisk them away to the city, necessarily, but to bring technology and progress to the village, turning it into a tiny desert oasis of sorts. The perfect place for them to remain with their family and their culture, but pop out as many human children as their sturdy African wombs can bear.
This way, the mothers, grandmothers, etc. will come to accept and appreciate polite, respectful human men, and will allow us to move into and infiltrate their tiny societies. Whole human families should move in, and husbands should guard their wives as jealously as the local population does theirs, but younger, single men should pursue local wives.
The raw power that humans possess will become something worth worship, but with the right presentation and proper humility, there won't be any backlash. Everything will be offered freely and without drawbacks, compromises, or fine-print "gotcha"s of any kind. Inside a generation or two, human men become equally as desirable as anthro men - to BOTH sexes - and human culture is integrated into the local mosaic without being rejected outright or found suspicious.
Let the women come to the same conclusions we wanted them to without feeling manipulated or cheated in any way. Let the truth shine through and they'll be putty in our hands in no time.

>What are the anthro tribes there like
Most of the herbivores live in semi-feudal tribal nations that are almost always on the brink of war, both civil and with other nations.
Carnivores mostly live in small nomadic tribes raiding the nations of the herbivores, unlike them they are very united and even cooperate with Human tribes and nations in Africa.
>Zebras
Zebras are some of the most chatic inhabitants of Africa. They do live in villages and some cities, but they are constantly on the move between them. You could come across an empty village and a week later a horde of Zebras would come through it. They still live in a mostly gatherers society. Their women are barely treated better than slaves, they also aren't above raiding other Zebra tribes for slaves and females. They also raid villages of other herbivores, not for slave but for food and fun. The only reason why Zebras are even united into a nations is to discourage other from attacking them. Their women are extremely submissive, with fit bodies possessing a fat asses and child-bearing hips, while their upper body posses
To conquer them we need to divide them through assassinations to cause a civil war and then quickly march through their territory. I would also hire Lions or Hyenas to attack remote villages and coward tribes.

Collar fight writing.
> I was ready to participate. I was finally officially a teenager and figured I would be allowed to fight with the family. The previous year I had watched the annual battles between my family and the neighboring Rat Clan from the hayloft of my grandparent’s barn. After a brutal anything goes fight the Chitters had been put down, whipped raw, fucked, brutalized and kicked off the land. The victory had been even sweeter since a Rat girl had the same idea as me and climbed up into the loft to watch and challenged me to a private fight, of which I had won decisively and claimed her as my prize for the day fucking her in the rafters. I was late for dinner that night.
>Now that I was going to be a full member I participated in the pre-fight planning and learned some of the lore. The fights had started between Grandma and the Chitter Matriarch called Scabbers. They had fought all their youth and then fought after the anthro started having litters against our own extended family. Apparently we had beaten them a lot more than they had beaten us, cracking skulls and selling captives to prospective pet owners when the Rats scatters In fact, we had now won five years in a row. This year might be the final fight. Grandpa thinks the Rats have run out of extended family willing to go to bat for these stubborn rodents. We intended to knock the these rats out of the gene pool for good.
>This year my Dad would join us. Also another girl cousin had come of age. Cousin JR had married and would bring his new wife, 18 year old Melinda along as well. She apparently shared JR’s private fighting as a couple so she wouldn’t be dead weight in cracking heads. So with me on board there would be four more of us to go. Once again at high noon, the front doors of the barn opened and in we walked. The barn hadn’t been used for anything but a couple of riding horses in years.
>I heard the sound of scampering paws outside. That was the sound of the Rat trash family arriving. Then the visitors came in. The Chitters, the damn pests who were the scourge of our farm. My grandpa and grandma lined up our family. Starting in the center with themselves and moving outward on both sides with the adults on either side and the youthful members of the family on the wings. They lined up the same way, a larger group of course outnumbering us a solid three to one but we'd whacked these pests before at worse odds.
>We stripped on opposite sides of the barn to the nude rodents. You could see the different reactions. Most of the rat women’s nipples hardened and their paws were raised to guide the shame of t from their kin. A few of the rat’s snouts started to twitch into fang baring snarls. Among the men on our side several were already erect while the rats were sheathed beneath. We all could remember how the last few times we fought played out and it wasn’t the rat-men who got to spend a celebration knocking up the human women with the men left half-dead with their faces in the dirt. That and the desperate physical state of the Chitter clan made this likely to be even a more brutal and savage fight since thy REALLY wanted the land. The look in my opponent’s eye was cold and determined, the rat i’d beat last year was eyeing me up for retribution of last year. I felt a surge of fear and excitement, which hardened me the rest of the way that she'd be mine.
>Everyone took practice swings. I considered how best to clean the clock of a rat skull. We had already had the strategy session where it was made clear that as soon as you had your opponent disabled to move and aid any of your family that was in trouble. The key was to take an overwhelming advantage quickly and then savagely beat the Chitterss until they had no more fight in them. Then and only then were we to begin to take our pleasure though their rodent bodies.
>"fight!" cried grandpa.
>Bent, so named because of his crumpled nose, rushed forward at me and swung his footclaw in a mad roundhouse. I stopped short and it whistled past me. bent staggered off balance. I snagged his greasy long black nape with my left hand and jerked him the rest of the way off balance. He staggered forward and fell to the side landing on his knees. I pulled back on his nape and drove my fist down toward his face. He yelped and jerked his head. My knuckles hit him hard on the forehead. He grunted under the blow but didn't wilt away. Instead, he twisted on his knees and I jump to the side to kick at his crotch I hit his cock, but missed his balls. He grabbed for my leg. I jerked away. He lunges and hugged around my other ankle and jerked. I went down on my ass instead of letting my ankle snap. He started to continue applying the pressure but I kicked him in the face with my free leg. That put him on his side moaning.
> I rolled onto my knees, and collected myself. His forehead was already nicely bruised and his face showed my an imprinted bruise of my footprint. I had won our first exchange.
>Bent seems to have agreed but still charged forward. I turned in time to raise my guard. We hit. I dug my left fist into his right kidney and then grabbed him. He twisted around and got me in a right arm headlock. I grabbed the boy's scalp. I got his left fist pumped into my face. I jerked back on his 'hair' and leaned forward. I leaned forward more, bringing my right hand down. Bent didn' know what was happening because his eyes are looking at the roof. My right fist smashed Bent in his huge rat balls from below. He squealed, bending over and yelling about me being a faggot. I brought down both my fists into the middle of his back. He fell forward on his knees. I looped the rat's own tail around his neck, and drove my knee into his back driving him face-first into the dirt. I pulled back on both ends of the tail and pressed down with my knee.
>I had the fucking prick. I looked around to see if anyone was coming to stop me. I was going to finish this bitch right here and look for someone to help. Lots of twitching rats on the ground some rats with their heads smashed through the walls, a tail poking out under a fallen hay barrel, dad had a pair rats in a simular strangulation with both arms. I gawked for a little too long however even as Bent's choking struggles start to relent.
My old enemy, rafter, leaps at me from the rafters. My hands were holding the ends of the tail that I was using to throttle Bent.
>He was either out or dead now. I didn't care which right then. Rafter and I had been equal in size and weight a year ago, but I now had three inches and twenty pounds on her. However, with one knee on Bent, the other in the dirt, and both hands wrapped in the strangling grip I was wide open. She flew through the air from her perch just to get to me. Her right knee hit me square in the left eye. I saw stars and ended up on my back in the dirt on the right side of Bent's limp body. I remember trying to lift my head. Suddenly Rafter was on top of me, punching my face with both hands,. I don?t remember much more than the solid impacts and her screaming face. She wanted to kill me and it looked like she just might do it. She leaned over and suddenly I felt new pain in my forehead. She was biting me.
>She had leaned over and bitten into my forehead, nearly ripping it open and coloring both of our faces with my blood. Then suddenly she was wrested off of me. Cousin Melinda bless her and she can sit on my face anytime, grabbed the smaller rat girl by the whiskers and jerked her off me. Rafter was crazed. She spun around and ripped at Melinda's crotch with one hand and grabbed for her hanging tits with the other. screamed and dropped down on top of the smaller girl and a savage catfight broke out beside me. The shot of Cleft lying face down, me lying face up covered in blood and several onlooking family members looking on with
>I had recovered enough to rise up on my elbows. I couldn?t see anything out of my right eye The rat was tackled into me. The shock of being touched brought me out of my stupor. I grabbed the rat in a bearhug as she started to sit up. She cursed and twisted around in a panic as Melinda kicked rafter in her kidneys, hurting the rat girl bad. rafter wriggles in place. Melinda grabbed her arms and her off me through the dirt. Rafter writhed and almost freed herself but I got my legs under me and hefted the lightweight rodent up and over for a wrestling slam folding her like paper. Rafter cried out like a squeak toy and tried to crawl away as I got up. I then dropped my knee down on the small of Rafter's back, spearing her kidneys again and generally tenderizing the wild rat while melinda pivots away to go dust off some other rat in the room now that I was in control of the situation again with my old rival.
>All around the barn the rats moaned and sobbed. They had been beaten a dozen times. Exhausted and as hurt as we were, we methodically tied up the defeated chitters Family one by one. The last three still fighting were overwhelmed without further damage, forced on their faces and tied up like the animals animals they were.
>Then we rested, drank water and stood there kind of stunned observing the scenery of the wrecked barn. It had been the worst fight ever. Nobody felt like using the rat victims just yet. We had won, but for the first few minutes we took care of one another's wounds. Some of us had been very badly injured and all of us were hurt ba. Next we checked on the various rats who weren't moving. Two tails were poking out of a collapsed shelf in a storage locker, another rat had been roundhouse kicked into the horse pen and trampled. No one was dead, yet, but some had been hurt so bad they still weren't going to wake up We dragged them all to where they could watch what was coming. There was something invigorating about dragging an enemy by their heels and tail through the blood soaked dirt and arranging them for your pleasure. The sobbing and moaning stoked the fires and our exhaustion was forgotten as we had our pick of the rats we now owned.
>JR unzipped his pants, grabbed one of them under the arms and threw her over some eed bags her ass up in the air to collect his prize. He looked around guiltily at the rest of us Then he shrugged and dragged his pick over the feed bags side by side with the other men of the family. the women were doing the same with their own pick of the male litter or elected to quietly watch and cheer us on.
>Rafter moaned delerious and pushed off the feed bags. She felt me beside her, grunted like an animal and started fighting again. The lineup of rats around her was out of the fight and snoozing through the lapping of human hips into their special cavities but she didn't get the memo and started lashing out blindly pounding away blindly with her fists on the back of an older rat who i could only imagine being her mom.
>Dad stepped back and laughed heartily at the squealing comotion "Shit, looks like your girl has some fight in her still. split that rat's ass you hear?" JR teases as well about my inability to fully conk out one at compared to his haul of four bodies stacked on top of each other as he slips his shaft between two rats of choice sandwiching his shaft between their pussies. I grumbled and pulled Rafter off the breeding line. She muttered wildly about killing me as I start to knee her gut and headrepeatedly until finally her last bits of fighting energy left her and she slumped to the floor ass up.
>Rafter weakly raised one bloody fist and then tried to scream in defiance. What came out was a weak squeak every time my hips rocked her smaller frame. It took about three minutes to work myself into squirting a wad deep into Rafter's womb. The battered raped rodent merely grunted a couple of times during the process and then went still knocked out and up alike.

I like what I'm reading, but I don't see anything about specific species.

>Lions
The best species for humanity to start with, the females are powerful and prideful but already used to grouping up around a single male. Honouring their "culture" and forming smaller, more tight-knit harems with a human male at the centre who's both filling and able to breed them whenever they want (no ball-biting necessary, though ball-sucking certainly helps) they'd abandon any male who exploited their loyalty and took advantage of them. Humans would be more than able to protect them and the new "pride" as a whole single handedly, which would give them so much free time that they wouldn't know what to do with it after the first month or two of fucking us until THEY leave claw-marks in the walls.
Pay special attention to each girl, respect their hierarchy, give them a man WORTH protecting and serving, and you have the best wives and bodyguards you could ever ask for.
>Rhinos
Self-conscious because of their size, shape, and horns, they'd probably take some convincing to feel as beautiful as they really are and be willing to date outside their species. Walking tanks, they'd be big and bulky, but also incredibly strong, like hippo girls. Absolute units, the lot of them. Tender missionary and plenty of oral pleasure would open their eyes (and not just thanks to the orgasms) and they'd be something akin to protective mommies after the fact. Appeal to their neglected femininity and make them feel pretty. Not just beautiful - which they would be - but pretty. Emphasis on the girl-like aspects.
They'd send smaller anthros through a wall with just a shove to protect you, and they'd be kittens in the bedroom after enough positive reinforcement. It'd probably be a slow process, but well worth it in the end.
>Hippos
Like rhinos, they'd be absolute units, and perfect for those that like their girls on the BIG side. Insanely curvy while being 99% muscle, these girls would be fertility goddesses in their own right. Wine and dine, romance would be their weakness. Show them how ravenously hungry for them you are and give them a different physique to choose from than big, burly strongfat male hippos. An especially slim or wiry human would likely trigger a protective instinct and get you a date if for nothing else than novelty. Come on hard and strong (but respectfully, always respectfully) and woo her. Make her swoon off her feet and into bed with her and let your hands do the talking as the roam all over her deliciously thicc body. She needs to know you want her. Want her more than anything else at that moment. Prove to her that you're in love with her body. Seal the deal by asking her to get on top, or sit on your face. The sheer insanity and depravity will put some blush in her cheeks and get her to say "yes" when you pop the question. Her cute little tail wags will let you know you've captured her heart.
>Cheetahs
Probably still skittish and energetic, they'd be just a tad less nervous and anxious than normal feral cheetahs thanks to being able to talk to each other and other animals. Get professional help and whatnot. Become her comfort person. Her confidant, a rock for her to hold onto, someone who'll support her and pet her and play with her ears when she's nervous. It's almost ironic, but take it SLOW with cheetahs. Lots of positive reinforcement and support will go a looooong way with these girls. Plenty of romantic dates, kiss on the lips around the third date, no sex until at least three months have passed or SHE asks for it. Sit down with her, talk it out, make sure SHE feels in control - actually give her control, too - and then make LOVE to her. Small and lithe, they aren't tanks like some other girls.
>Cheetahs cont'd
Cheetahs are built for speed, so slow it down and play with her. Walk your fingertips up her chest, nibble her ear(s), lots and lots and LOTS of tender kisses, make sure she cums AT LEAST twice before you pop and make sure to ask her where she wants it. Your relationship advancing should be HER idea so she doesn't freak out later about being pushed into things before she was ready.
By the time the two of you are walking hand in hand, or she's wrapped around your arm and purring, she's YOURS. Love and protect her for the rest of your lives together, you're her shield and her refuge. She could run down any bitch or bastard that tried to hurt you, but you shouldn't put her in that position too often.
>Giraffes
The tallest girls you'll ever meet, but self-conscious about their height, they'll be relatively easy-going. Hard to find places to go with them if you aren't in a heavily giraffe-populated area, under NO circumstances should you complain about your neck hurting if you end up looking up at them too long. Try not to make THEM bend over to speak with you at eye-level either. Offer neck and shoulder massages to get the physical contact going, and if you ever see their long, long tongues hanging out from how good you are with your hands, you're golden.
Giraffe women are the undisputed blowjob QUEENS. They could wrap your whole cock up in that soft, warm, wet blue tongue of their and still have some left over. Be gentle with the ossicones at first and fuck their faces like a man possessed when you have clearance. Knowing she's making you feel that good will be a huge boost to her ego, doubly so when you get hard again after she's done swallowing your load down that giant neck of hers with a resounding GULP.
>Antelope, Zebras, etc.
Any prey species that travels in herds like antelope and wildebeest are going to be pretty generic. Recognize her as an individual and you're golden.
>Herd species cont'd
Compliment her on her looks, but especially anything that she can change. Hair, makeup, jewellery, you want to aim your sights at her individuality and taste/fashion sense. These girls got the short end of the stick since their males are undoubtedly quick shots since mating too long in the wild gets you KILLED, so either last a really long time or go lots of shorter rounds. Make fucking enjoyable for her and not a disappointing waste of 30 seconds. WHEN you get her pregnant, show lots of interest in her and reinforce the idea that knocking her up isn't a chore for you, you're in it together, and you LOVE the way she looks when she's carrying your baby. Be an attentive partner and show her just how kind and generous human men can be by rubbing her back, massaging her shoulders, getting her food, being romantic, blowing her back out, giving her a taste for blowjobs and human cum because it pleases YOU like crazy and helps make HER feel like you'll stick around during and after the pregnancy.
Probably the easiest of all the anthros, just be you, and a gentleman, and you'll be drowning in anthro puss in no time. Might even get yourself a harem too. Just be sure to protect your wife from jealous ladies, calm those insane bitches down, and then have a sit down with the woman in question AND your wife before you go feral on the new girl's womb and make her cry tears of orgasmic joy.
>Elephants
Probably the biggest girls you'll find in Africa, they likely want to feel smaller than they are. Again, compliments and tender loving. Hold her trunk, don't make her self-conscious about IT or her EARS. She's big-boned, not fat. Those hips drive you MAD with lust. Don't turn down a trunk-job no matter where you are. BBW enjoyers rejoice. Doggy-style enjoyers also rejoice, these girls have a whole lotta ASS! They're more than just their bodies, though, they're very compassionate and will be able to tell if you aren't being honest.
>Elephants cont'd
These ladies have the biggest features of any other woman on the continent. You could fit your whole torso between her massive, heaving tits. You're gonna need to wrap both arms around them to fuck 'em properly, but she'll appreciate your vigour. Tell her how much you love how big and beautiful her ass is. Suck a nipple (or two) into your mouth as you give her the business missionary style. Arms and legs will probably be pretty chunky, so engage with her trunk like it's another arm. Remember it's a nose too, and play with her olfactory sense as well. If she wants to bury her sniffer under your nuts, grind your cock against her trunk to show her how much you like it. Whisper sweet nothings about how you're going to DESTROY her pussy in her giant ears. If her sense of hearing is especially good, doing so in public will get her blushing and YOU a trunk in your pants at the very least, if not a woman twice your size bending WAAAAAAY down so you can fuck her doggystyle in the nearest alley.
Because of their sheer size, you'll need to work a little bit harder and throw your whole body into rocking her world, but like cheetahs, they'll be very loving and caring partners. Possibly as close to human as you're going to find, at least on a mental/emotional level. They'd likely be the battlenuns if a full-on armed conflict were to ever break out. Pacifist until pushed too far, and then they blow the trumpets of war.

The arctic would be easier in certain regards, and more difficult in certain regards.
First and foremost, easier since there's a lot more draw in the resources we have to offer. Ample food and warmth to a bunch of anthros that have to be built to get fat to stay warm, where missing one meal too many can mean certain death, where the climate is as hostile as any predators can be...
Harder because at least in my mind, compared to Africa, it's going to take a good deal longer since you're dealing with loners. Lots of tiny families, tiny communities, no huge cities or microcosms of society/the world/whatever. If the anthros are more like wild animals, no huge herds with very little exception. If they're anything like the Eskimo people and band together, again, smaller communities, plenty of depression and substance abuse problems cause the barren cold is a hellscape. You'll encounter resistance from the traditional folk either not wanting to turn the arctic into some tropical paradise (not that I think humanity would want to do that anyway) or those that really value their culture, their ancestors, and the sheer perseverance it took and still takes to survive up there.
>What are the anthro tribes there like?
Not really tribes at all, smatterings of groups less than 10 people large.
>How do you defeat them?
Offer warmth, food, companionship... Find the best ways to counter the isolation and deprivation up there, and build a really tight-knit community. Maybe have a group of humans wander in "accidentally" and seek refuge and help from the anthros to reclaim their ship/habitat/whatever with the promise of sharing the bounty once the long trek is finished. Go full dances with wolves and join the locals, but make their lives, their families, and their small communities better and stronger. Technology would make hunting easier, and having some extra bodies wouldn't hurt either.
>And what are their women like?
Their women are thicc, nomadic, lone wolf-types for the most part. Calling them paranoid or skittish is just a toe over the line, but they know that the snow is an unforgiving battlefield where only death awaits. Nothing but vast stretches of white snow in every direction, near-invisible predators, scarce food... It'd be enough to drive even the strongest of minds mad.
The men and women that manage to survive there are fighting for their lives on a regular basis, or trying NOT to fight by hiding out and conserving their precious energy and fat reserves.
In my mind, the anthros that can live in the water below the ice might have it the easiest since they have more room to stretch their legs (in the metaphorical sense). Finding stable ice and a place to rest after swimming in freezing-cold water (even with evolution preparing them for it) is dangerous as all hell. The polar bear anthros might have it the roughest since they need to find someplace stable to hibernate and wait out the worst of the cold weather. ...Better to sleep and conserve than fight mother nature, the bloodthirsty bitch that she is.
Of the anthros that CAN form colonies, properly joining and being absorbed into and accepted by the "herd" would be the fun/risky part. Joining a group of seals - eager to help out someone that they'd think was struggling without enough fat or food to brave the cold - would be a wonderfully supportive kind of life, but still brutal. Finding that seal-waifu that's terrified for you and wants to feed you to keep you safe and warm would melt even the coldest of hearts, and starting a family - contributing to the collective - would be a life-changingly joyous event.
Good luck being able to live in or super-near the water, though. Even with advanced technology, it'd be rough...
Anything with a coat to match the snow would pose a challenge. Either you're dealing with prey species that are super skittish and rely on their camouflage and there being enough snow on the ground to blend into, or you turn around to see death given flesh. As their silhouettes blend into everything around them, you start to think your mind's playing tricks on you before you spot the dozen or so pairs of eyes wondering if you're dinner or something that isn't worth messing with.
Wolves would probably be the easiest anthros to get along with. Dig up the history books and offer them food and warmth, and start the domestication process all over again. Before you know it, you've got stealth waifus dragging your sleeping bag to safer ground, only you don't know it because everything looks exactly the same when you finally wake up.
If taking the more aboriginal approach, igloos would be a must. Either we, the humans, introduce the anthros to it, or we simply help them improve what they've already got with high-tech snow-cutting tools. Cozy up to your anthro of choice in the close quarters of an igloo and warm the place up the old fashioned way in between sharing your nutrient rich food with her.
Big momma of a polar bear, thicc but sluggish on land whale/seal/walrus girl, or a whole pack of "smaller" anthros that sleep in piles to conserve warmth. The arctic would be a hell of a place to try and conquer, but it'd be cozy as all hell under the right circumstances.

>be human in the densely anthro part of the city (downtown am I right?)
>trying to order food from some anthro wagie
>and just like every other anthro you’ve run into regularly, be it the Dog woman coworker you’ve run into 1 too many times in the hallway, or whatever breed of fluff im looking at now. They had that dopey look in their godamn eyes like they were about to rip off their clothes and offer you their soul and their firstborn
>I just wanted a fucking sammich and this woman is about to cum herself over some stranger she’s met maybe once or twice before because the food here is less mediocre to you than the other places
“Will that be all mast-MISTER, I mean mister, erm... did you want some coffee too?”
>at least it’s not my work, arguably much worse with this “sex” this and “take me” that. Even the occasional begging to be owned or to give them your babies or whatever other stuff you have to deal with.
>every time i so much as speak to a subordinate in your department to ask them to I dunno MAKE COPIES, DIANNE IM LOOKING AT YOU. But NO. It’s always the same shit. You walk up to them- you say you need them to handle something and immediately they’re on the floor spread eagle with that stupid look on their faces, like they’re these vulnerable “widdle cweatuws” and you’re gonna turn their insides raw with what you [clearly] see are wandering towards
>oh and it doesn’t stop there for for me, you think maybe the situation would be more casual and not just a smut circus? Nono, you are very fucking mistaken
>it doesn’t help that the status quo with an anthro stranger is basically deference and worship, all coated as a thin veneer to try and get you in their pants and themselves eating off of your dime
>with somebody in a superior position you’d assume it puts a damper on that AT LEAST a little bit, some mercy in a tide of sexual advances. And every fur covered individual with two X chromosomes trying to hand you their entire lives on a silver platter.
“Anon could I speak with you in my office please?”
>her snout wore an expression between a simmering indignation and that false smile of professionalism you wear for the sake of not disrupting a work environment
>at least she has [some] tact, best guess is that’s because she has some self respect being a wolf and all, a big one at that
“Mr. Anon, how long have you been with this department?”
>”I wanna say about a year and a half, give or take a month”
“Yes, and you’ve done a fine job while you’ve been with us. But I have a concern that I feel should be more pressing for you than you seem to let it”
>as she deliberates she attempts to slowly remove her work coat, or at least make it convincing that she’s being sneaky about it
>her eyes doing that thing where they scan up and down, trying to soak me in
>I have to deal with this same lecture, and same attempt at seduction. Almost every other month now
“My point, Anon. Is that- well... you really should be getting a raise. In fact- you *should* be in this chair right now. Giving *me* the orders. And quite frankly I should be under you sucking you dry and pregnant with at least your first or second bab- hey where are you going come back!!!”
>as I stand up and give a remark that I can’t quite remember, something the the effect of “I’ve heard enough for today” she pounces, her paws latching onto my ankle, dragging the now topless she-wolf
>”Ma’am please let go of my leg, I don’t have any feelings for you and quite frankly I haven’t got time fo-“
“You don’t understand Anon! We were MADE for eachother!!! Please please please PLEASE stay, for thousands of years canines have-“
>at this rate I was glad I learned how to tune out most female ramblings about whatever was on their brain. I really didn’t have time for such advances, my old man didn’t raise a coomer. I kept walking, well- hobbling. She was still clung to my leg, huffing and puffing
“A-and then they’d mate and inter-wed and-“
>get a grip woman, you’re supposed to be my boss aren’t you?
>”look Miss Paula, I get that you like me a lot. But I’m not about to just take *your* position, one that I not only didn’t earn but straight up I’m just not ready for. You need to think about these things strategically.”
“I would’ve taught you...” >she puffed out, dobs of little tears in her eyes, this was not unusual, boss lady was a bit of a cryer
>still, I’m not about to let my boss manipulate me with the water works
>I finally pry her off me and escape her office. Looking back I see her make a pouty and very angry face, something between an enraged toddler and a cornered dog before she lets out a massive howl. Before going back to just a pout on the floor
“I’ll get him next time...”
>best part, that’s just the first hour
>of an eight hour fucking shift.
>at least the brunt of the things that could happen in a day were front loaded when the boss was involved, I could get a little relative peace
>so this time the next few hours before lunch consist of canines wandering up trying to be stealthy to my cubicle’s borders just beyond my peripheral, and having a few gingerly sniffs before scuttling off
>there was at least a habit of respecting my “territory” (read that as personal space) concerning the borders of my humble wagy’s workspace
>at least with the predator species that is. Since most species look at me like I’m a potential baby daddy- the tendency to project their own species way of doing things onto me
>so with the herbivorous women about it was a total juxtaposition
>these ones could be especially bothersome when you really needed to actually get work completed it was especially bad with the dense wall of concrete for brains sheep- Lisa and her gaggle of other women, her “flock”
“Eating alone again Anon? Won’t you come and sit with us? You really shouldn’t be on your lonesome all the time. It’s bad for the mind”
>don’t you tell me what’s bad for the mind you horny fucking...
>”I’m fine Lisa, scout’s honor.”
>of course as I try to dissuade them from bothering with me, taking no for an answer just doesn’t seem to be in the anthro vocabulary m, at least when concerning humans given our... *ahem* genetic adaptation
“Well. Alright Anon. But you really should join us sometime. We’ll make it worth your while.”
>like a blob of wool her group just kinda seems to float off. Like a cloud, appropriate for all the white fur
>finally with the latest event out of the way I could take my lunch hour.
>vending machine or concession stand
>one comes with the distinct benefit of not having to interact with the eternally grasping paws of erotic fluff
>but... I cannot resist. The stand’s delicious ham and cheese croissant bun sandwich is worth killing over, let alone an aggressive public mating solicitation.
>going to the stand I’m greeted by the visage of the reptilian woman in front of me. I think she’s some species of skink or whatever
>”afternoon, I’ll have my usual today”
>instead of trying to make herself look seductive while working, unusually she just makes my food.
“Sorry I can’t entertain you like we usually do with these long drawn out courtship rituals you human types like to put us folk through hun. It’s a bit too cloudy for me to have the stamina today, the heat a’ this here cookin’ equipment is the only thing keeping’ me going”
>that would explain it
>I take my food and wander off to my workplace’s courtyard sitting down to enjoy my meal in peace
>as I channel my inner ferocious appetite and begin eating. an ominous presence approaches
>I can feel whoever is approaching long before I can see or hear them. Not because I’m special or anything, but because my purified malice for all anthro kind is epitomized in everything that she is and stands for.
>Lily the intolerable, insufferable, inconceivably dense-in-the-head and all around pain in my ass; Cottontail Bunny
“Hiya there daddy~! I’ve been looking all over for you since lunch began for my shift. I know you like pretending to not be my owner but if you have an itty bitty moment we should really be stretching myself to your third leggy’s shape!”
>this woman... the audacity to be doing this in broad daylight. No shame at all.
>I want a woman to have a little dignity god damnit is that too much to ask?
>not this sorry display. And most certainly not a woman who just is this self projecting blob of subservient flesh.
>I’m after a partner not fuckmeat
>I don’t even care if they gotta be anthro just not this.
>I choose to ignore her cold shoulder. Eventually she gives up. Every negative input I used to put in when I first met her never got the results I wanted
>one time when I threatened to use a club on her like those redskin human tribes used to do I think she came herself
>after that incident I figured out with the supremely subservient on this whole animal kingdom pecking order when it comes to sex. The best strategy was to like it. That way your predator might instead breed rather than eat you
>translation: bunny is mega masochist because they were so low on the totem pole back when we all wore woven reeds for undies
>by the time I’d finished my lunch, Lily had seemed to have disappeared at last.
>though, unlike when I do things that end up encouraging her like giving her attention or even threatening her, her eventually just saying goodbye as if talking to a lover. Lily wordlessly vanishes while her presence sticks around
>and that presence she gives off transforms
>it’s like watching a flower wilt, die, and turn black in real-time
>I can only imagine the simmering rage, or malicious plot she’s cooking up for me
>my best educated guess as to why this happens with Lily might also have something to do with her species’ survival strategy.
>the thing with offering yourself as a mate rather than food. More often than not when you’re in that position you’re already capture. And the good ol’ fight or flight basic response finally kicks in
>still keeping her instinctive survival strategy in mind, that state of being mixes with her fight response. Augmenting it hormonally or something to that effect into a fight-then-fuck response
>it must’ve worked for her ancient ancestors because holy shit I think she’s pissed
>maybe those buncel jokes had just the littlest bit of truth to them. Though bunnies and the like are usually pretty popular with humans, so I’m guessing I’m creating this monster
>it’s a good thing I’m stronger than her. Still probably a good idea to be vigilant, maybe appease her tomorrow with a celery stick, the usually makes her happy. Though normally she goes nuts with my peace offering, chanting ‘he really does love me!’ While trying not to have a heart attack
>I want her off my back not to kill her
>eventually that hazy malicious nebula left my side, letting me finish my shift in peace
>there was a couple good hours of solitude
>slowly my vigor is whittled away by the monotonous usual things that have to be done at a corporate job at my station
>I resolve to bite the bullet on having a run in with an anthro woman waiting for an opportune moment and get up, heading for the staff lounge
>just my luck to run into someone here
>though I’m certainly noticed by them they thankfully pay me no mind, allowing me to brew some coffee in peace
>a zebra and a lioness having a friendly chat though? That felt weird, like. I know that the ones that walk on two legs and the one that walk on all fours have some serious distinctions from one another that makes this totally normal, but it just thematically looks weird, you know?
“So back on topic maya, I actually agree with your mating strategy when it comes to having a “pride” so to speak, it’s not too dissimilar to a herd. The only difference I think is how food is- or at least was acquired back millennia ago, where as the hunting duties for you were delegated to the females because there were simply more of you, but since our food grew from the ground for my early species there had to be no such distinction made”
“That’s a fascinating theory Ruth, I’m not sure if I see how it all adds up but I’ll give it some more thought, it seems to make sense by-the-by at first glance”
>judging by their discussion, they are actually paying me as much mind as they possibly can
>this isn’t the first time I’ve seen these particular women per-say. But I’ve certainly never chatted with them
>maybe this is their way of trying to get me to interject. Either that or I’m so desensitized to getting implicit and explicit advances that I’m just projecting very hard
>in whichever case I’m not about to get involved in yet more sexually charges escapades, especially not when I’m enjoying the sweet respite of piss poor staff lounge coffee
>it’s at this point I figure it’s time to quietly make my way out and back to my cubicle, lest I waste too much time away from my cubicle to allow the chance for the cat secretary to rub herself all over my space to mark territory (again)
>out of the corner of my eye I can see the half lidded expressions looking towards me
>please for the love of god I just wanted some caffeine
>thankfully to all the gods or god protecting humanity, they do nothing and I am left unmolested. Literally
>alas. My cubicle now smells of anthro musk
>though not of the cat, it actually smelled of dog. Go figure to throw a curveball at me today
>I do the only thing a good man/corporate cog can do in this situation
>cognitively disassociate and pretend the whole thing didn’t ha-
>...
>it’s wet
>my chair. The one I’ve just placed my rear onto. Is soaked
>then the smell hits me
>a fresh, steamy waft of what through experience I can with 100% certainty say is a dense vapor of some of the mustiest lady-lube I have ever been under the circumstances to inadvertently huff
>and now that goop is all over my chair, my pants, and slowly dripping down my leg
>something breaks in me. Like a piece of twine under tension finally snapping apart
>I get up, some form of beckoning- righteous fury begins to boil up from my heart. Urging me to track the dripping snail trail that was left from my chair’s rapist
>eventually after skulking about the office enough, I find the target of all the whoop ass I’ve been keeping canned and sealed
>part of me isn’t even surprised at what I’m looking at. She looked exactly like the type of office hoe to squirt up a man’s chair like a baptism of elmers glue
>a black furred canine- wearing too tight of formal clothing and too little of it. One of them “man hunter” types who have a real thing for cruel and unusual flirting(tm)
>I do my best to avoid her notice. Making sure the shock of what I’m about to do next hits her the hardest
>I outstretch my arm. Both peeping an iron grip and reaching for the canid prey of my broiling irritation
>with a forward lunge I attack- a terrified yelp from her as my hand clenches onto the scruff of her flesh and fur right at the meeting point of where her shoulders end and her neck begins
“You...”
>my grip tightens hard enough to make even the most masochistic of deersluts and bunnywhores think twice. My strength pouring into every ounce of my grip
>I can’t see her expression. But I know for a fact she’s horrified, bet she was expecting some sort of positive reaction.
>she can’t even bring herself to turn her head to face me. And she can too, her neck is free to swivel, and she’s shaking harder than a Chihuahua in the rain during a frosty autumn evening.
>at least she isn’t a masochist- I’m able to effectively get the results I want when I display anger
>I drag her through the office. Retracing her path she left for me back to my cubicle.
>”Please!!! I-i can explain please please don’t eat me I’m a good girl I won’t do it again plea-hea-hea-easse!”
>she’s already sobbing uncontrollably by the time I see my workspace. With my free hand I swivel the chair. And holding her like she’s an oil lander I present her to her handiwork
“You, y o u... are gonna pay, you ruined my chair, made my office smell like rut, soaked the back of my trousers... and worst of all you disturbed what little peace I can get in this office, no- this entire cityside.”
>”PLEASE PLEASE PLEASE MERCY I JUST WANTED YOU TO LIKE MEEEEEEEEE” she screamed, crying tears of despair that brought me little satisfaction over my violated chair.
“Your pleas aren’t going to fix my fucking chair, mutt. I bet you didn’t even know I brought this chair from home because the ones we have here are fucking awful. This thing cost a lot of money”
>In my fit of rage i punt her out of my overbearing hold. She went from a curled up in a hung ball of fear dangling from my hand to a rag filling projectile. Smashing, well... more like wet plaping onto the chair. The whole thing falling over- her included onto the floor, her body going further than the chair and rolling into the cubicle border, damn that felt good to do
>looked like it hurt bad
>she’s mumbling and sobbing, her body doing that fear shiver when fighting with your body over what instinctive fear response to have
>”I’m sorry, I’m sorry *sob* I’m sorry”
>then she takes the pose
>that same, dopey submissive pose that sickens me to my core every time I see it
>paws curled up front, legs spread and raised. Knees folded, neck bare
>she’s still sobbing though...
>I went too far
>that pose still makes me wince, but right now for a different reason
>this entire time. Not a single person has stood up for this girl, not when “Mr human” is involved
>and right now this is a last ditch effort to garner mercy
>it’s pathetic, both for her for doing it and for everyone else for not even thinking about intervening for her sake
“Get up... I’m not gonna kill you, dumb dog”
>she’s still sobbing. But she’s looking at me at least, I have her attention
“Do you have any idea how much trouble you caused me? I’m trying to work and you turned my chair into a Nickelodeon slime seat without the green dye. You’re getting me a new seat. Any paying for the drycleaning for my suit you ruined. Am I understood?”
>”y-yes sir.”
>she’s less afraid now but still letting out the occasional sob to with her water works as she stands at attention, tail between her legs
“Sit on my desk, I’ll be right back”
>timidly the dejected canine puts her rump on the desk, it being just as disheveled as her
>A moment or two passed until I returned. The first aid kit is harder to find than you’d want it to be
>she looks like a wilted flower
“Gimme your paw”
>she hands it over, still looking forlorn
>I check for cuts, scrapes. Something that might be hurting
>a moment later and a few bandages. She’s all patched up after my whirlwind I bore down on her
>I still owe her an apology of some kind though.
>I stand up and look at my handiwork. Letting out a sigh of “I’m probably gonna regret this. But it’s the right thing”
>peace offering time
>ear base rubs, the kind where you really get in there with your hand and do a kind of 5 finger pinching motion
>her eyes are closed, and the smallest tip of her tongue is lulled out
>it’s at least a little cute
>I’m a disgruntled office prisoner. Not a monster
>all’s well that ends well I suppose
>my conscience is in tact, and she’s nice and soothed
>she’s starting to get those half lidded “puppies please” eyes though
>that’s enough rubbing then
>she makes a dog like whine before speaking up
>I’ll get your chair fixed and that suit cleaned up Mr... uhm...”
“Wait, you went through all that effort to ‘get me to like you’ and you didn’t even bother to learn my name?”
>”...”
>she kinda stood there. I swear her dark fur did nothing to help with obscuring the glowing blush beneath
“You’re lucky i gotta go home soon, or else I’d be smokin’ you for that too”
>that seemed like a thorough enough statement to be the cherry on top of the grief-cake I force fed her, I’ll let her slide on that last one
>why are anthros like this? Cant even learn my name before trying to make a baby-daddy out of me
>looking up at the clock, it seems as though I was right on the money about having to head home soon
>I endeavor to get myself as cleaned up as I can with my whole pants situation before clocking out and making my short walk to my budget crossover.
>the drive home is uneventful, thank god
>you think this is one of the rarer workdays with how intense some of the shit I have to deal with is. And for the last part that’s definitely true. All the other stuff seems to me like it’s a daily occurrence though
>and you bet your ass I’m not done complaining about living in “anthro-town”
>all that shit was just work, let alone the rest of my day
>it’s the beginning of the weekend, the infamous Friday night
>every anthro south of the outskirts of the most prudish suburb outside of town will flock to downtown, that being here
>clubs, bars, the beaches, the cafés, anywhere you go there’s some sort of lady trying to get lucky and land some funtimes with the gullible trapped humans who come around here.
>poor bastards, the lot of them
>they have no idea how ravenous the woman of the other species can be
>but, with human women all but extinct and anthro women being eager, willing, I’ll admit the appeal exists
>not that I’m gonna cave that easy to an anthro coom brain
>speaking of coom brains, I can see my neighbor just leaving her apartment as I pull into the lot
>a horse lady, a beeg one. Huge everything; big body, big proportions, big assets.
>body build like the meme about the tomboy childhood GF and a Neolithic fertility idol melded together
>”hey hun, it’s Friday and my schedule for tonight has a you shaped opening in it~, you wanna maybe come around and join me to visit someplace nice? I’ve got just as many ladylike activities in mind as I do the ones where I’m in a hot pink dress”
“The usual Friday night seduction gambit Anna? Don’t you ever get tired of me shooting you down?”
>”not even a little bit stud muffin, you’re a nice boy. You smell great and look even better. I’m in it for keeps and I’m gonna keep showing this booty until I get what I want, me- you- and a squeaking king sized bed”
>she said confidently with a bray
>”you could have me whenever you want, wherever you want. And do whatever you want with me. And if you’ve already got a girl... I’m sure I could convince her to share- there’s more than enough of you to go around”
“Anna. With how many times I’ve shot you down, and with how much of a loner you -know- I am. Do you really think I’m spending any time getting tail of any kind?”
>I could at least have some rationale with Ann, she listens. When it’s not her season for estrus anyhow
>”fair, but that doesn’t mean I can’t try to woo the nice man next door. Enjoy your weekend, boyscout~.”
>she saunters off from here and makes her way to her own car. Driving off
>I’m off to my own apartment, this place is one of those smaller complexes that’s more like a condo village plot rather than a full blown apartment jungle. Bigger housing, though most housing for anthros is bigger because- you know- much younger rates of parenthood, harems, the occasional incestuous harem because no consequences genetically (I dare not imagine lest I feel queasy), and all that. So having even apartments with at least 4 rooms and enough space to feel free is way really common, and common means cheaply available
>I’m living well, though with any luck I can retire young and get outa this town
>the environment is starting to effect me
>I’m super desensitized to mentions of sex now. Though. I’m not exactly used to it yet
>I still think all this shit is weird. Why is everyone including other guys acting like this is normal
>and it’s not like... oh yeah. I remember why Im never 100% used to anthros
>the memory hits like a ton of bricks
>for a moment I let the thought play out before me, seeing my mother drop me off at my elementary school, bless her heart
>it was a usual school day then me and my classmates had a short break between periods near the end of the day and I was shooting the shit with my guy friends.
>”you see the trailer for that new beat-em-up coming out? I’m excited”
>I stopped paying attention when my friends started sperging out about combos when a couple of the drama queens came over, probably to do the usual hazing girls did at that age
>”you are you like this, why can’t you talk about cool things humans are supposed to do like lift weights and play sports”
>the brightly furred kangaroo girl seemed irritated at our mere presence, let alone the topic of our conversation
>she looked like the typical bimbo who enjoyed starting shit with her classmates. Some primal sensation in her made her seek us out. Which is fine, id even say it suits her in a weird way.
“Oh hey Shiela, didn’t realize the jocks weren’t paying enough attention to you today, why don’t you go back to Australia or something. I’m sure the drunkards there would love to pour some of their piss beer down your-“
>with a flash, a suspiciously marsupial leg was hurling at me. I just barely dodge the thing
>”my name... Is Becca, don’t you forget it”
>behavior like this was common in anthro girls just starting to get the gushes for boys. Looking back she probably had eyes for one of my friends and was trying to get their attention. I know for a fact she didn’t care for me though on account I shot back. Good thing was was stronger than her.
>”hey, Chelsey you like nerds right? Here you go”
>I was passed down like I was a martini to a white woman to the frosty maned German shepherd girl.
>she however, was into sports. And I hated PE
>this is gonna be interesting
>her expression was neutral. If a little smug. But this pup’s tail was wagging so hard that her hips couldn’t help but follow the swing slightly
>just my luck. A fetishist for the social outcast aesthetic. Doesn’t she know I’m dressed like a dweeb to lay low?
>she takes me by my hand off somewhere. My scrawny physique at the moment no match for her strength earned from playing all her her sporty activities.
>kinda gratifying knowing she likes the way I look, she was kinda a catch, her toned, silky light fur and icy blueish eyes? She was like an ideal- aryans choice awards, if you will
>my shitty internal monologue jokes aside. Chelsey takes me into the cleanest rundown public school bathroom she can find. Stopping and looking back as me while her paws creep up to my shoulders
>”why do you humble fucking nerdy types get me so fucking wet~. Maybe it’s because I know when it comes to. Maybe because I know it’s only a rouse... otherwise it wouldn’t feel like you could impregnate me after I so much as get a whiff of your scent...”
>at this point she’s panting and huffing me like I was meth fumes. And I’m sweating bullets
>my virgin fucking brain at the time couldn’t handle the fucking waft of pheromones and other musks anthros gave off
>not that I’ve lost my virginity, truth be told. But I’m getting to the reason why that is
>”I’ll tell you what handsome. You fuck me pregnant before next period and I’ll make sure you get your own little harem zoo. I have some gal pals who’ve been left high and dry who need lovin’...”
>at this point I’m half naked she she’s in nothing but her striped panties with a little paw on the crotch and butt
>”I... I can’t hold it in anymore! Mate me! AHN~!”
>...
>pain
>immense- four pronged clamping pain in my shoulder.
>she’s bit me. SHES BITING ME LIKE IM A DOGTREAT
>the adrenaline hits my brain like it’s nitro in car’s engine
>can you feel it, Mr.Krabs?
>the fury of a thousand angry nords after you told them you’re cutting them off from their mead supply fills all of my nerve endings
>like a lightning bolt all the reflexes in me meant for defending myself kick on, my hand reaches for Chelsey’s snout and I grip it like a bear-trap to a wanderers shin
>she yipes loud, screaming and howling in pain as my fingers dig into her face
>with no less than a Herculean surge of might coasting through my veins. I throw her off of me.
>she’s on the ground now. Taken aback and taking the position that sparked my distaste, little did i know at the time that this meant everything from “I surrender” to “please turn me into a cumsock”
>her face when from surprise, to sultry lust, then to fear
>I wish I knew what expression I was making at the time probably a scary one since that bite really spooked me
>it wasn’t very deep. Scars are all gone now
>I fade back to the present. Though... I wonder how that girl is.
>hope she found a decent guy after the incident. Though she gave me my little issue. I hope it hasn’t burdened her
>gotta get that fixed if I wanna get a girlfriend though
>but right now, I can’t seem to stand anthro woman behavior.
>eh well. Issue for another time I guess
>no more being a mopey man for now. I have an evening to enjoy and I’m not about to let my lady problems stop me from having a good time
>thinking about it, my desire begins to germinate around visions of the warm sun by the water.
>sunbathing
>yes, but anthros are gonna be trying to get guys attention at the beach.
>maybe a less populated cove or beach bay
>there’s a public one that’s pretty nice on account it gives the businesses around it enough traffic for them to want to chip into making it a nice attraction.
>sunlight and good food? Count me in
>getting a change of clothes. Along with some modest swimwear that I -might- don if the place is quiet, I’m off back to my car
>sun
>fun
>and ladies showing their buns
>I could live without the last part on account I get plenty of an eyeful every day anyway. But I can’t complain
>I decided to bring my own beverages instead of buying the overly expensive ones from that stands and beach bars
>favorite piss quality beer, check
>sodas and canned mixed drinks, check
>ice, check
>Sea leopard drooling at me while trying to sunbathe as to not be suspicious, mega check
>now all that would make this a usual day at the beach is a gaggle of females varying in species inviting me to “play volleyball”
>speak of the devil. The women are gathering before my eyes
>they think I don’t notice
>”excuse me handsome. Couldn’t help but notice you were all on you’re lonesome- we need an extra player. Could we trouble you for a game or two?”
>fuck it. I’m tired of saying no to a girl
>it’s my turn to be eager about something
“Sure! Hope you don’t mind I’m only good at defense though. I don’t play much”
>”you’re fine, come on. You can serve”
>there were five girls in their little heard; a tigress, fox, longhorn taurus, otter, and that sea leopard woman
>with me around it was a solid 3 vs 3
>a few minutes past and I started to get into it
>then 10 minutes
>30
>before I knew it a whole hour of playing and having fun had passed. And eventually i found myself some people to share all the drinks I bought with.
>”so you mean to tell me you dressed up like a complete dork in highschool on purpose? To “lay low”, I don’t think I’ve ever met a man who tried -avoiding- being a coochie magnet”
>Laura laughed at my little story about how I used to dress. That was her name, the sea leopard girl from earlier. The one with the pair shape hips and the big butt
>this was nice
>but then some problems started brewing
>Laura starts inching closer and closer
>and since when was her bikini top to low on her body?
>”you know. For somebody trying to lay low you sure were ready to come play with us girls, you sure you aren’t just making it up to look like the humble type? It’s working~.”
>every time
>try socializing. They reach for the crotch
>”I bet if you really are somebody who lines to be on his lonesome, that means you’re you’re not the type to take more than one girl into your loving arms. More for me maybe?”
>she leaned in with a hungry, predatory gaze, her jagged teeth on full display with an ear to ear grin of dare I say demonic glee
>in an instant within me. The urge to purge begins to surge
>my hand is on her neck now, lifting her up like I was Vader to some rebel scum.
>her grin goes to an abject expression of confusion
>either she didn’t expect I had some fort of cursed antisocial tard strength or she’s just wondering why her back isn’t being blown out
>my righteous fury is channeled all into my right arm. I can feel my veins straining to hold in the mass of blood pressure
>maybe getting over my hatred of these sex pests of beings would go away if I didn’t enjoy sticking it to ‘em so much when they think they’ll get an easy fuck
>next thing she knows there’s a meteor trail with her at the end- made of the beach’s sand
>booty up. Face buried like an ostrich
>it would be sexy if I didn’t see rape and offspring obsession in her eyes just a second ago
>her head pops out and I hear her murmur to herself “damnit... he really was a hard to get kinda guy. Oh well- he’s a sweetheart, I’ll get him and whatever he’s hiding past those trunks when the time is right~... I wonder if I should come here naked next time”
“I can hear everything Laura”
>“As if I wasnt telegraphing that you should come back to see the strip show~!”
>she shouted as she peeked her head past her lilly white hindquarters. Blowing a kiss

>fur nation that has never known about humans
>queen keeps one human as a secret
>queen divines future out of human cock musk
>human is power behind the throne

>meet cute anthro girl
>she's very sweet and kind, not to mention with a great body
>get closer as time goes on and eventually end up at her house
>she tolds you to wait while she gets ready
>comes back with a collar and human'd merch, and tells you how much she wants you to tame her and make her your cute little pet
>you frown
>"Oh, so you're one of those types huh? The type that only sees humans as sex objects to fufill their depraved fantasies and don't think of us as anything but? What if I don't want this kind of realtionship, what if I want to be with someone for other reasons than just me being human, and them being into the disgusting porn objectifying my species? Have you stopped to consider that we are actually people with feelings and not just instruments for your fetishes? Well I'm afraid we are, and I don't fancy being treated like this"
>you leave

>be pokemon trainer
>catch a few lovely female pokemon
>spend every day fucking them over and over
>the pokemon are obedient, even enjoying it, happy to please their dear trainer
>have the time of your life, having a dozen orgasms a day as you completely empty your balls in poképussy

Here's a collared idea I've been thinking about.
>As human influence started to spread and anthro "pet" ownership was legalized, anthros started getting collared and tamed by human men with increasing frequency, even in the large previously anthro-only cities.
>Even though ownership required a consenting agreement or some other kind of legal rational, during this influx of human men moving in it wasn't uncommon for anthro girls to simply be snatched up in broad daylight, as some humans attempted to tame a girl with a good dicking first and worry about the legal semantics afterwards.
>Worried about this, some anthro girls (particularly the younger generation) resorted to an unusual tactic to avoid such a fate. Members of the Hunters Lodge (a respected human group comprised of those dedicated to the craft of hunting and claiming anthros) would sometimes offer their quarry an official Hunters lodge ear tag.
>These tags bore a unique ID code as well as the hunter's personal emblem, marking the anthro as their quarry. Everyone knew that such a tag meant a claim was staked, and even the humans not associated with the lodge would never interfere with another man's prey. This meant that the hunter would be able to pursue you at his own leisure, through whatever means he personally favored.
>Accepting a hunter's offer of a tag meant you could walk home from school safely and without worry... but came with a cost. Hunter's didn't hand such tags out frivolously, it meant that you were of special interest to them and that their would be no chance of waiting out their patience, shaking them off your trail. And all your friends, acquaintances, anyone who saw you with that tag clipped through your ear, would know. Know that you were being hunted, that you had caught the eye of some mysterious huntsman, and that you had reached a tentative but significant deal with him.
>That one day, almost inevitably, according to no one's time frame but his own... you'd be wearing his collar.
>And even though you weren't wearing one yet, having the promise of it clipped through your ear to mark you as spoken for prey was a seductive thing. And bearing that weight each day, thoughts drifting to scandalous possibilities as you wondered if you were at this very moment being watched, stalked by the apex predator that had marked you... it would begin to sow the seeds of domestication, without the hunter having to do a thing.

Studies have shown that by age seventeen, 67% of Does have had at least one interspecies relationship with a male human as the partner. Of that subset, 43% will carry on with that relationship for the rest of their lives. Also, within that 67%, 24% will have a permanent fur dye marking(Fur tattoo) with racist/specist undertones(collared, humaned, etc.).
Very literally a lost cause.

>HS Anon autistically mentions the 67% in class.
>Antro classmates call bullshit saying it's either from some checkout lane type magazine or propaganda from some conspiracy website.
>The magazine he pulls out is a serious scientific journal.
>It goes into detail about the very real dangers of a coming anthro-cervine population collapse in the next 30-40 years.
>They blow him off anyway because normies can't even think past 5-10 years into the future in any real way.
>The only real effect is Does coming up to him asking if he 'wants to help my species go extinct?"
>He just want to help make sure that didn't happen.
You tried based ecologist-anon, you tried.

>Does aren't even the real problem.
>The stats are almost as bad for 'Bucks'
>Survey asked HS and college-age Bucks if they ever have or ever would consider bottoming if the partner was a human.
>41% and 37% for the 'haves' 59% and 51% for the 'woulds'
>Coomer deers will be the death of their species.
>Wolf girl tries to laugh and gets reminded that three of her five older sisters are all married to humans, and two had half human kids by the time they graduated.

>king decides he wants dragons on the army
>you're sent to the highest mountain to capture one
>come back with a dragon lady tied up in chains
>declared the strongest soldier in the kingdom
>80% of her former treasure is now at your name
>you're now in charge of breeding her to provide units for the riders

dog girls
>stay at home to protect your litters
>run to the door to kiss you and get headpats when you come back
>go in heat twice a year
>wake you up every morning with licks and kisses
human girls
>???

human girls
>incapable of protecting their offspring.
>will complain about something when you get home.
>only horny when doing something taboo. (especially infidelity)
>wakes you up with the sounds of one her "friends" fucking her silly

>human girls
worst sex of all species. only worth if you want human babies, which are hard to make and expensive to raise anyway

>NO! I REFUSE TO EAT FOOD WITH ESTROGENS! YOU WILL NEVER FORCE ME INTO A WOMEN! YOU DEGENERATE FLESHITS!!!
>Years later
>”Of course! I would be any human men’s wife~”
>”That’s funny, why a girl like me have a floppy third leg? And why can’t I get preagnet? I’m sure all the years of that human men cumming inside me raw would bear his human children.”

>Lucario twins
>near identical
>one boy one girl
>the regularly use their clone magic to impersonate the other
>they both want the BHC
>flip a coin
>the brother wins
>he gets to dress up like his sister and get taken to pound town first
>his sister has to dress up like him for the day and is very salty about that

